Draining and drawing out every day, examining every day, understanding and thereby relinquishing every day.
The waters will then start to seem not quite so great.
They are really only as large as our aggregates, that's all.
But for the heart that is attached to the aggregates, this is a weighty matter.
The heart doesn't bother with any piece of land, instead it comes and seizes hold right here.
This is the big issue, the hot and heavy concern.
This is where the defilements scorch the heart as no other fire can, endlessly turning up the heat.
We have all heard about floods.
When our lungs are flooded and congested, the doctor can drain them.
But when the defilements, complete with craving, engulf the heart, what are we going to use to draw them off?
We can only bring in faith, energy, mindfulness and wisdom.
Thus, we must probe, examine and investigate to see things clearly, as they really are.
What is being clung to?
About what are false assumptions being made?
And why is it that the voice of Dhamma, the aid in drawing-out, is never listened to?
The defilements usually try to play smart with the Buddha.
They are his adversary and must always assert their cleverness against the Dhamma and contend with it.
Grasping is the defilement's line while correcting and uprooting is the way of Dhamma.
Extracting defilements with wisdom is Dhamma, and transcending them and arriving at serene happiness is the Nibbana Dhamma, or the Pure Dhamma.
There is always this rivalry.
Keep on trying!
Don't lose out to these things, for you now have entered the boxing ring and must determine to be the champion.
Fight without backing down.
You'll have to be dead before you'll allow yourself to be carried out of the ring.
If you've been floored but still live and can return to the fight, then battle on.
If you can't manage to fight on anymore, then you can always denounce and curse them right there in the ring.
What harm can that do?
We are fighters and if we can no longer fight the defilements, then curse every mother and father of them.
This is our single remaining weapon.
We are down and cannot punch back, yet we still have a mouth.
We can still talk, scold and curse even though we are knocked down.
Of course, this is only an analogy.
To be a warrior doesn't mean that we go round cursing or abusing anyone, but rather that we combat the defilements.
We must fight to the extent befitting a disciple of the Tathagata, who was himself of the warrior class.
Have you ever noticed how our teachers and venerable acharns practiced?
These meditation masters, whom we respect so deeply, were all warriors in this way.
If that's how they themselves triumphed, why should they teach us to go in a different direction?
Alright then.
Keep switching and varying your probe, using wisdom to stay on top of the events within.
This wisdom is of such sharp discernment that it will be able to find a way to draw us out of the deep mire of elements and aggregates in which we've been stuck and buried for countless eons.
Ultimately, we end up with the heart, and even here we have to pull everything out.
The 'I' must be extracted from form, from the body and from the elements of earth, water, air, and fire.
We must pull the heart out of the painful feeling that we have taken on as ourself.
The way to withdraw from form is simply to let go of the very form that we have grasped as self.
We pull away from grasping each of the aggregates that we have taken as 'me' and 'mine'.
Use wisdom to try and root-out, right here, keeping pace with whatever's going on.
The heart is subtle and extraordinary.
The body, in contrast, is nothing special — however much we uphold and cling to it in our delusion.
It can only be our utter stupidity that leads us so readily to shoulder this gross thing, without ever wanting to put it down.
If we were really smart and considered what's behind it all, we would let it go.
Why carry it?
Probe and investigate these questions using mindfulness and wisdom that are available.
There's no need to go and be so afraid of dying.
Fear itself is just another defilement.
Why build up defilements by being frightened?
We must rather build up our courage because this is a quality that counters the defilements.
Bring it out to fight the defilements and to find out what actually dies.
In fact, nothing dies.
And the defilements are always lying to us about it.
The moment we are unguarded, they instantly insinuate themselves and whisper: “When will I die… today?… tomorrow?… here?… or over there?… I'm going to die very soon.” We upset ourselves with such thinking, while the elements just exist, indifferently.
In this way we complicate matters and confuse ourselves by thinking that we are responsible.
What sort of responsibility is this?
It's more a matter of self-confusion than self-responsibility.
If we are to be truly self-responsible and self-reliant, then our heart will need full mindfulness and wisdom to use for investigation and rooting out.
It must be able to probe and extract from the heart all the anxieties and confusions about living, about death and sickness — and whatever else is found there.
There can be no easing off or allowing the defilements in to fool us.
One can then say that those who practice in this way are truly being responsible for themselves.
By investigating everything, both close in and all around, you will come to realize the true situation and be able to free the heart.
Then there's contentment and relief.
Contentment is found right here.
Success and correctly assumed responsibility are also right here.
We hear news reports that so and so is an arahant — as in the case of those arahants — or that that person is a stream-enterer, once-returner or non-returner.
But what about ourselves?
Our news is only about weakness, discouragement, depression, stupidity, dejection and confusion.
This is our whole story.
Doesn't it run contrary to the reports about those others?
Our personal news is exactly the opposite of those who possess the Ariyan Treasure, the Dhamma Wealth in their hearts.
If our news only measures up to this, then it can only be concerned with the thousand-and-one kinds of suffering.
It's more like 'sinking in the mud'.
The unwanted news makes up our account, and because we create this story we must also bear the result.
Who is Dhamma intended for?
Who is it taught for?
Who makes up the Buddhist Community — if we can't be counted as members.
Surely the Dhamma was taught and intended for us.
Then what are we taught to overcome?
Do we have the means for this purpose?
Yes, they are right here — it's as if the Lord Buddha is right here before our very eyes, pointing them out to us.
This isn't something about long ago or far away.
It's fresh and vibrant right here.
The Dhamma of the Lord Buddha exists here with us now, so why go elsewhere with all your worthless speculations?
“The Buddha realized Nibbana in a distant time and place.
He taught the Dhamma long ago and it has become stale and insipid.
Its flavor can't last up until today.
There!
Listen to that!
The defilements lie to us — can't we hear them?
Beware of Maara whose fabrications will destroy us with such ideas, mashing us to pulp.
The Truth has no time or era and is there with everyone who is searching for it.
How can Dhamma ever vanish with time?
How can we kill the truth with these ideas, needlessly bringing utter ruin to ourselves?
Who in this world can know better than the Lord Buddha?
The Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha always stand challenging the defilements in the arena of truth.
This is something timeless.
Therefore virtue, concentration and wisdom are never outmoded or behind the times.
They're independent of period or place — and yet are within everyone.
They can be produced at anytime, and whenever developed they grow and thrive.
This is the way leading to the Path, Fruit and Nibbaana; which is timeless and independent of place.
While the defilements for their part also manage a continued presence within the hearts of sentient beings.
We all now, as in the Buddha's time, have defilements.
The overcoming of these defilements must still be done with the same old virtue, concentration, wisdom, faith and effort.
How can this be kept far away and long ago from us?
It cannot.
We will all be able to go beyond suffering by rectifying the situation at the right spot and in the right way.
Expose whatever is cloaking the heart by focusing with wisdom and mindfulness on whatever is dark and obscure, taking that spot as the target for investigation.
Where exactly is this sadness and gloom?
It's a condition of the heart that we can perceive, just as we know when darkness or light contacts our eyes.
We notice that darkness is dark, but the one who knows is not also in the dark.
Light is known; darkness is known; any amount of darkness can be known within our heart.
And gloom and depression are also known together with brightness and cheerfulness.
The one who knows, knows in this way.
We must make wisdom penetrate further, taking the heart or these things as its target.
When sadness and gloom appear within the heart, don't be alarmed, or glad or regretful.
Look on them as mental conditions that must be investigated, as things that arise and cease.
They're not of the heart but simply depend on it to appear and then hook into it.
Persevere with the examination but don't get excited or unsettled with the objects themselves.
Whatever arises and passes through — that we must know.
Then we can be counted as being one who takes up the study and practice.
We have to study until we know through wisdom and can understand those things that appear within ourselves.
This true knowingness has no ups and downs.
It is never like that.
A condition arises and the one who practices recognizes it as such.
When all these conditions end, so does any concern about them.
All that is left is the consummate state of purity.
Our investigations depended on the continual encountering with such conditions in the heart.
If they were around they would need to declare their existence, so that it's always possible to know the true state of affairs.
Therefore, if we want the truth, we must look for and investigate the feelings that arise, and similarly with any sadness or cheerfulness, any happiness or suffering that appear.
Such is the way of one who knows with all-round wisdom, being aware of any condition that resides with the heart.
There is only this one place where we can finish off our studies.
They talk of graduating with a Bachelor degree or a Masters' or Doctorate; or of passing the various exams of Paali language study, following the popular convention of the time.
Throughout the ages people with defilements have always had to rely on customs and observances and these are numerous beyond description.
The ways of Dhamma though always remain current because their nature is constant and immutable.
You can have as many grades and degrees as you like — level fifteen or level thirty… But I wonder if defilements bother with such things.
They just have a great time, singing away there on top of people's hearts.
Since when were they meeker and more humble than people?
They wield greater power than people — stupid people, that is.
Intelligent people are able to crush and destroy them and this is the way to gain our knowledge and qualification.
Our Bachelor's degree of virtue, samadhi and wisdom is all around us — better to take this B.A.
Then on to the Masters' and the premier 'Ek' grade so that we have 'one heart, One Dhamma'.
But this isn't the preeminence of someone with only one eye, who is already nearly blind.
Don't be foremost in that way.
The true preeminence of the Lord Buddha is 'one heart One Dhamma'.
Study up to this Ph.D.
by having all-round knowledge to the highest degree, replacing our ignorance with knowledge about ourselves.
Inspect, using wisdom to probe and clear-up, until reaching the Highest Dhamma level, or the genuine Dhamma, which are the same.
'The heart and Dhamma are one and the same!'
“Buddha.m, Dhamma.m, Sangha.m sara.na.m gacchaami” — finding refuge in Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha falls completely within this One Dhamma.
“Dhammo padiipo” — the radiance of Dhamma always shining brightly.
This is the genuine Dhamma.
It is timeless and unconditioned… the true Dhamma.
Alright then — build the Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha right here within the heart:
“Buddha.m, Dhamma.m, Sangha.m sara.na.m gacchaami.
We go for refuge to the Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha.
More precisely, we arrive at the Buddha, Dhamma, Sangha in the purity inside the heart, for this is the coming together of all three refuges.
See them clearly within the heart and make yourself a refuge within.
This is the complete “attaahi attano naatho”: 'We are our own refuge, not needing to depend on anything else.'
As is the Buddha so is Dhamma and Sangha.
Buddha Dhamma Sangha are the same.
When one has reached this stage there's no need to go out seeking to pay respects to the Lord Buddha, for we can now offer this purity of heart — the whole Dhamma of this purity — as our puja- offering to him.
Nothing else intermeshes and fits together as well.
As is the Buddha of the Lord Buddha so is the Buddha of us.
As is that Dhamma, so this Dhamma here.
Without doubt, they are all one and the same.
Did the Lord Buddha finally pass away so long ago?
We no longer ask, because this concerns the conditioned state of elements, the body and aggregates.
The Lord merely let go of his aggregates, at a certain time, in a certain year and place.
The Noble Disciples were just the same.
Were they all completely annihilated after they passed away?
Is it really like that?
This is the view of empty, worthless men and women; the truth is otherwise.
The real Dhamma is that of supreme happiness, which endorses and confirms the fruit of that purity.
What is Sangho?
It is the one who upholds the state of purity.
This is the true sangho and is found within ourselves: “Attaahi attano naatho” — 'oneself is one's own protector'.
The vital point is to make this refuge sufficiently secure, for it's imperative that the heart frees itself from all dangers and attains to deliverance.
Whatever is worth attaining is worth striving for.
Go for it right here.
Don't upset yourself over anything at all.
Nothing really matters in this world.
It's just that our heart goes and gets involved.
We actually go looking for affairs to indulge our-self in, and this needs cutting away with mindfulness and wisdom.
Wherever we are, we are always alone.
We are born alone.
When illness comes, it isn't the assembled relatives that are in pain.
When we die, we die alone — nobody else can die in our place or deputize for our distress.
Therefore, we must help ourselves — Attaahi attano naatho — using our own mindfulness and wisdom.
This is the right and most fitting response.
The Lord Buddha decided to let go of his life on this same full moon day.
For us today, we should resolve to abandon craving and defilements.
These are the essential things that one must be rid of.
As far as dying is concerned, the Lord Buddha said it wasn't important which day we die on.
Whenever the breath runs out, that is the day we die.
The only criterion is our last breath.
If there's still breath, then we haven't yet died.
So we keep on breathing… which in itself is no great problem.
It's really just about a lot of wind.
The important point is the founding of a base and the putting ourselves on alert — all for the sake of our heart.
“Attaahi attano naatho”: 'oneself is one's own protector'.
When this is accomplished then there is contentment in living or dying, wherever and whenever it might take place.
No more problems remain, for they were only concerned with mundane conditions.
That's it for this talk on Dhamma.
I think it's suitable to stop here.
No one can surpass the Lord Buddha in wishing for people to be virtuous and good.
His Teaching was offered so that people in the world might find goodness and happiness.
He didn't want the world to be troubled and hurt through misdeeds arising from ignorance of the right way of conduct.
The building up of the perfections to become a Buddha, full of compassion for all sentient beings, was an exacting task — very different from all other forms of achievement.
And his mastery went along with his compassion, hand in hand.
Anyone listening to the Lord Buddha's teachings — from his own lips or from the scriptures — and trusting those principles of truth would then try to correct and improve themselves, so as to be a virtuous person.
One individual takes it up, and a second, and then each family member, however many there might, be all change themselves for the better.
One virtuous person — but when such people live together it becomes one virtuous family-circle, and then one virtuous village, and town and country.
There's no need to ask about the whole country's peace and stability for it must definitely follow from the goodness of all its individual citizens.
On the other hand, hardship and discontent only arise because of wrong doings and baseness.
The number of corrupted individuals corresponds to the extent that the body of society is stuck with 'splinters and thorns'.
The more there are, the more hellish the world becomes.
It is then dark both in the night and daytime, and is in a constant state of disturbance.
There is no need to go and search after hell for it is being forged right there in the hearts of people.
From there it spreads and extends everywhere, turning all to fire.
This only happens because of those wrongdoings, not because of what is skillful and right.
When things are in harmony with the Buddha Dhamma such a situation can't arise.
There would then be no need for judges, courts of appeal or a supreme court.
There would be no cases to settle because everyone is intent on living virtuously, all trying to follow a just and sensible way together.
In discussions there would be mutual understanding — it wouldn't matter if it were between young and old, man and woman, ordained and householder.
This springs from a deep understanding of the nature and reasons for goodness and baseness that is within one's heart.
There only would be the wish and intention to see in the way of reason, truth, and virtue.
Everyone would listen sympathetically to one another, and always conduct themselves fairly and justly with no need for secrecy.
The world, however, doesn't seem to follow the heart's wish.
Wherever one goes, there are only complaints about suffering and misfortune.
The whole earth seems to be in a state of confusion and unrest, even though everyone studies and searches for knowledge.
This knowledge, however, doesn't appear to be of much use — it might even end up burning one instead — because it isn't knowledge imbued with Dhamma.
It doesn't have Dhamma to add a protective coat or to act as a support, a brake, an accelerator, or steering-wheel.
It therefore trundles forward in any old direction, without any limit or bounds.
When examined in this light, the value and importance of the Lord Buddha's Dhamma stands out clearly.
The individual effort to change oneself for the better, even though one can't do the same for anyone else, will provide peace and contentment wherever one is.
Such happiness will result from your right actions and way of living, and this will follow for anyone who practices in the same way.
This right way and contentment have a series of levels — everyone being able to step up to the general level with the right intention and effort.
Don't allow yourself to miss out on this, for the world can be worth living in and can bring happiness, peace, and joy.
Beyond this mundane joy lies the prospect of progress and happiness within the heart itself.
However, it does need commitment and energy to achieve this subtle and more refined type of happiness.
Those who are especially interested in the way of meditation really stand in the front line — if this is considered in images of going to war and battle.
Those who decide on this approach can't afford to be weak and faint-hearted.
Whatever they attempt will require vigilance, and such exertion will then steadily develop in them a consistent and stable mindfulness.
Any lack of this and they won't be considered tough enough to succeed in the war.
This toughness depends on an alert effort, together with mindfulness and wisdom checking on the behavior to see whether it is going in the right or wrong way.
As this becomes increasingly subtle and involved, it is more and more necessary to depend on the protection of mindfulness and wisdom.
The stream of the heart and its various imaginings and concoctions will not then go and amass poisonous ideas and emotional objects with which to burn and torment itself.
Once the heart has received proper care and nurturing it will gradually come to peace, and be radiant and happy without any fading into downhearted dullness, as it did before.
All of you have been training here for quite a long time, so please draw into your heart the Dhamma of the Lord Buddha.
Don't think that you'll be leaving your teacher and monastery behind.
Your departure is only an activity or physical movement.
The important thing to remember are the Lord Buddha's words:
“Anyone who practices Dhamma in accordance with the way of Dhamma, is truly one who offers reverence to the Tathagata.
That practice is the way of mindfulness, wisdom, faith and diligent effort.
It has to be there in every posture and at all times.
This right conduct within the heart, together with continuous watchfulness is what is meant by 'practicing Dhamma following the Way and giving constant reverence to the Tathagata', the Lord Buddha.
The Lord Buddha continued:
“Whoever sees Dhamma, sees the Tathagata.
How does one see, know and practice so as to see this Dhamma?
It's by practicing as we are doing now, and especially refers to meditation.
This is the way of practicing Dhamma.
Seeing Dhamma is discerning those obstructions present within oneself that should be counted 'the enemy'.
These are the first two Noble Truths, that of Suffering and its Cause.
We investigate these things to penetrate to their true nature, which exists in every human being and animal — the only exception being the arahant who has gone beyond.
The rest of us must possess this Cause to some degree, and it's this that he called the Noble Truth.
By examining and seeing Dhamma in the true state of affairs, it's then possible to turn to letting go and uprooting.
This results in coolness and peace within.
This letting go and uprooting is also termed 'seeing Dhamma', for it is a gradual seeing, level by level, step by step, until one finally perceives the whole Tathagata.
We can speak about these levels of attainment in this way: Those who have practiced up to stream-entry can be said to have seen the Lord Buddha at one level, having penetrated into the stream of Dhamma.
It is the beginning of seeing, as if you are standing in a field and can glimpse the Lord in the distance.
The once-returner stage seems to bring the Lord a little closer and the non-returner sees him closer still.
Until finally, with the arahant stage, you see the Lord Buddha in full.
The Dhamma that facilitates our reaching each of these stages resides with everyone of us.
Holding to the practice is like following behind and sighting the Tathagata.
One sees him by way of cause, which is our practice; and by way of result, which is the steadily attained fruit of that practice.
The Lord Buddha went this way before, seeing and steadily realizing and passing beyond.
Therefore, the heart of the one who practices is never apart from the Lord Buddha, Dhamma, or the Sangha.
By virtue of that practice, reverence is given to the Tathagata, the Dhamma, and the Sangha.
This is true reverence and is the way — through diligent effort — of having continuous audience with the Lord Buddha.
Departing and going away is only activity.
There is a departing right here when, for example, after sitting here you leave to sit over there; from there you return to sit here.
There is a continual departing.
You shouldn't be concerned with leaving this place for that, this town for that, this house for elsewhere.
Leaving from here for far or near — there is continual departing in this world of impermanence where things are constantly changing.
By using the three marks we can reflect upon these things so that it becomes a Dhamma lesson.
Those who truly know and see will always depend on this principle as the way to move forward.
While we are here we practice Dhamma and when we are there we practice Dhamma — because it is aimed at letting go, at eradicating defilements and ending all the suffering within the heart.
We practice wherever we are so as to uproot and release, and for this purpose our present location isn't relevant.
The Lord Buddha therefore taught the Noble Disciples:
“Go bhikkhus, and seek secluded places.
Be steadfast and resolute there.
This is the way to have constant audience with the Tathagata.
There is no need for all of you to come here to gather around the Tathagata.
That is not the way.
But rather, whoever has mindfulness and is diligent in all postures immediately gives reverence and has audience with the Tathagata.
Nonchalantly sitting around here is not the way to meet, nor to see or have audience with the Tathagata.
The Tathagata does not regard the coming here and the going away as having an audience with or taking leave of the Tathagata.
The Tathagata considers that diligence in the practice to eradicate defilements from the heart, whether little or much, as steadily gaining audience with the Tathagata.
This is the progressive seeing of the Tathagata.
It is the major principle in the Teaching that allows a clear sight of the Tathagata, rather than peering with dim and blurry eyes, lacking in mindfulness.
Just completely rid yourselves of the poisons in the heart, and then compare the resulting state that you have realized — is there any difference between that nature and the Tathagata?
Plainly, without question, such a purified nature is identical with it.
Listen!
The essence of the Lord Buddha's teaching is just like this.
Training your heart and developing yourself into a good person is the way to accumulate happiness.
With increasing growth within the heart the result will, of course, be happiness.
Not being able to find happiness or it being incomplete, arises because of obstructions in the heart, which are the defilements.
Nothing else is able to obstruct and pierce the hearts of all sentient beings, preventing them from finding happiness and fulfillment.
Suffering and hardship, whether internal or external, is solely caused by defilements.
For example, when the body is feverish or ill, the defilements will also get in the act by moaning about the pain here or the ache there.
This disturbs and worries, which adds yet another load of suffering for the heart, to go with the bodily illness.
Common bodily upset or illness was experienced by both the Lord Buddha and the Noble Disciples.
It's the nature of the aggregates to be ruled by the this-worldly law of the three marks.
Whoever has aggregates and elements cannot go beyond this worldly norm, with the inevitable consequences of change and impermanence.
However, their hearts did not waver because there was already total understanding of the state of things.
But it's not like that for us.
When we have bodily pain, whether much or little, it also shows in the heart that accumulates additional suffering.
The amount can't be estimated but sometimes the suffering within the heart becomes greater than that of the body.
This is what is meant by 'an encompassing infiltration by the defilements', when we are absent-minded and careless.
When there is no mindfulness and wisdom to know what the defilements are up to, they can penetrate in every possible way, regardless of time, place or posture.
All that's necessary is for the heart to move and show itself without mindfulness, and wisdom becomes more like perceiving-memory.
It's as if the heart becomes the defilement's unknowing helper.
In such a situation Dhamma can't possible arise and it can only go the way of the defilements and their steady increase.
It's therefore necessary to throw in the full force of your mindfulness and wisdom, faith and energy, to keep up with the events happening within the heart.
Research into these elements and aggregates will make you an outstanding person but graduation from any other kind of study will never be enough.
There will still be the thirst for more, much like anything in this world.
However, when your studies into the elements, aggregates and heart are completed, that thirst will also be ended.
You will find complete fulfillment.
At present you are deficient in the theory of Aggregate-ology and the application and practice of it.
This is really about mindfulness and wisdom, and the penetrative insight into the true nature of the elements and aggregates.
It is analysis by separating the true from the false.
But when the study is not yet concluded or understood, endless confusion and turmoil will remain with the elements, aggregates and heart.
There is no confusion and agitation worse than that found in the elements, the aggregates and heart.
This is where all sorts of complications are constantly emerging because we have yet to clear them up.
This indictment can only be dismissed through the studying of the case right there, with mindfulness and wisdom disentangling the truth and giving judgment after careful deliberation.
Alright!
Let's wind up these studies.
What is there in these elements and aggregates — as I've always said, there's:
Form aggregate, which is everything in this body of ours.
Feeling aggregate, which comprises painful, pleasant and neutral feelings, that arise within the body and heart.
Perception aggregate is memory and assumed knowledge of various things.
Thought processing is the creative, concocting facility of the heart that thinks about virtue or wickedness, past or future, without any limitation.
Consciousness aggregate, which acknowledges forms, sounds, smells, tastes, or tactile objects as they come into contact with the senses.
And at that moment reports them to the heart to acknowledge.
Once that contact ends the consciousness lapses as the object passes.
This is called consciousness of the five aggregates.
The consciousness of the five aggregates is different from the re-linking consciousness.
This refers to mind and particularly to the heart.
It is the heart that is about to enter into re-linking consciousness, taking birth in the various forms of existence.
The consciousness of the five aggregates arises and ceases with the things that come into contact with it.
That is, the acknowledgement ceases along with the passing away of those things.
The re-linking consciousness however, refers to the heart that possesses the faculty of knowing, alone and by itself.
Even if nothing makes contact with it, it doesn't end.
Study these five aggregates — and do it exhaustively.
Keep on going over it, revising and researching until you can understand.
This is the field of work for anyone wanting to be rid of defilements and craving, by the demolishing of the cycle of birth and death.
The heart spins through birth in various forms of existence, endlessly roving and reserving itself a place in cemeteries all over the place.
The reservation is made even before death.
This is all due to delusion — ignorance about the true nature of the aggregates.
We grasp at more of them even though we already have a heap of them.
There's never enough, so we fall and catch hold of them without limit — unless, of course, wisdom can be called in to investigate.
Analyze and investigate so that you come to true knowledge and can therefore cut free the attachment.
Take up the study of the elements and aggregates — or take this body, for therein lies the 'substance' of the Noble Truth and the Four Foundations of Mindfulness.
These are synonyms for the same thing and can replace each other in our investigations.
We will find that they are all essentially concerned with the Noble Truths and the Four Foundations of Mindfulness.
Normally, without illness or disease, the body exists simply as the body, and form is still just form.
However, when the body changes and becomes abnormal and disordered, it then follows its natural course.
The painful feeling that arises due to this irregularity does not remain for long and you should just let the heart know it for what it is.
This is the way to study Aggregate-ology.
Don't be alarmed or frightened, or depressed with them; for this is their normal, inevitable course in the world.
They have to follow a progressive transformation with both subtle, unnoticed changes and marked changes.
They change in accordance with their nature — at every period, every second.
But perhaps even a 'second' is too long a time, rather make it every instant, all the time.
They just change, continually change.
There is no pause, no taking time off for rest and sleep like animals and people do.
As for suffering, that also manifests itself constantly, without stopping for sleep or rest.
People may take time off for leisure and recuperation but that doesn't apply to the Noble Truths and 'the three marks'.
They never stop, never ease off with anybody.
They proceed along their course both day and night; with standing, walking, sitting, or lying down.
The condition of these things is to turn through their changes.
This body, too, revolves, as it changes its position and state.
We sit for a little while and then an ache appears.
Have things changed?
Well, if they haven't what's this pain doing here?
This ache is called painful feeling.
It is one sort of condition that arises in our awareness, one aspect of the Noble Truths.
Examine it and see it as it really is, for in the last resort there's no alternative.
To think that you can depend on some other person is a misreading of the situation.
Something that will drain your resolve, leaving you weak and disheartened in the task of saving yourself.
Such wrong understanding or misapprehension comes from the defilement's subversive insinuations, constantly deceiving you.
This happens both in normal times and in times of sickness and emergency, cutting the ground from under your feet by means of their trickery.
When the final time is really drawing near, it is like a boxer in the ring.
Before climbing into the ring the trainer can teach and instruct, but once in the ring there is no way to teach anything more.
Right or wrong, good or bad, alive or dead — you now have to rely and help yourself to the utmost.
It's now too late to learn any new boxing techniques.
The time of going into battle is that of the final moment when the aggregates and the heart are going their separate ways.
It is the time of breaking up.
It is like when crows and vultures come down and sit together on the branches of a tree.
When they alighted, the branches hardly shook at all but when they fly away they jolt the branches until the whole tree vibrates.
Any dry, dead branches will break and fall in the process.
At the time when the body is departing, how hard will it shake us?
How are we going to stand up to this shaking — with mindfulness and wisdom, that's how.
Without them we definitely won't be able to bear it and will lose our balance and control.
We must therefore fight to the fullest capacity of our mindfulness and wisdom.
Don't even think about the possibility of collapsing in the fight.
Our vigorous questioning of the truth about the nature of the body is aimed towards gaining release, not towards destruction.
This is the chief way to help oneself in a critical situation, by using all one's strength, and is the right course recommended by the wise.
When the time of emergency arrives it will be all pain — clearly showing itself throughout every part of the body as if each piece is burning.
Inside, the body will be like a blazing, red-hot furnace.
So, what are we going to do now?
Mindfulness and wisdom must be sighted on that heat, that suffering and pain.
Clearly discerning we can then turn and observe our heart.
Is the heart also red-hot?
Or is it only the body and aggregates that are on fire?
If you are already well-practiced in using mindfulness and wisdom, you'll find that the heart is cool and unaffected even in the midst of such a conflagration.
It is the body that is burning with the flames of suffering.
This is how we who practice must see it.
This is the way of self-help, without leaning on any one else, for you are already up in there in the fighting ring.
Once you are determined to fight, then fight using reason and your full strength.
“Come what may!
Live or die!
Who cares who might have to carry me out of the ring.” It's a fight to the end — but fight cleverly, don't just close your eyes and allow yourself to be like a dummy accepting all the punishment without blocking or returning punches.
That's useless!
Fight with energy putting your life on the line.
If you have to die, then so be it.
But there'll be no retreat.
Use your mindfulness and wisdom that is tuned to be the most advanced weapon going.
Battling with feeling means penetrating to its true nature.
Don't attempt to force it to disappear for that is trying to go against feeling's natural course.
The only way is to examine it as it really is and then let it disappear of itself.
If it still lingers then realize that that's how things are, and don't go in and grasp hold of it.
Form is form — don't bring in anything to contradict this or make it something else.
Form is form; body is body, and it's just body, just form.
Feeling is feeling — whether it's painful, pleasant or neutral, it's really only feeling.
What is this that knows body, knows feeling?
It's the heart, of course.
The heart is not of that nature and must be separated and clearly seen with wisdom.
This is truly seeing the Noble Truth and there will now be no wavering even if the body can't endure.
Right then.
Let's turn and face the battle, let's see what will go first and what will outlast.
With our confidence riding with mindfulness and wisdom we'll know the truth that the heart is not the one that dies, but is that which is there to acknowledge whatever is present.
Alright then, whatever is impermanent — may it go its way.
The body can't endure?
Then let it break up.
Feelings don't last, well, let them dissolve.
If it's impermanent, then let is all disperse.
However, whatever endures will last and prevail.
What is it that prevails?
It is that which knows, which is the heart.
There!
It's the one who knows standing out distinctly all the time.
The results will definitely be like this once you have successfully trained yourself in the way of mindfulness and wisdom.
But if your mindfulness and wisdom are deficient then the heart will remain feeble and easily discouraged.
All kinds of suffering will then converge into the heart because it is the heart itself that accumulates suffering through its own stupidity.
Weakness, therefore, is certainly not the path that leads away from harm and danger.
It has to be accomplished through diligence and hard work, with a warrior spirit armed with mindfulness and wisdom.
Nothing else can bring victory and preeminence, goodness and virtue, excellence and distinction; nothing else brings bravery and fearlessness to arise within the heart.
Please consider it in this way: Suppose that we return home without a teacher or instructor.
Well, what teaching have we already received and what are we really missing?
The teacher is still present in his teaching, and it's there that we'll find the Tathagata and the Dhamma.
We are with the Dhamma, with the Lord Buddha, and with the Sangha at all times because of the Teaching that we train ourselves with.
We do not lack a teacher or an instructor.
We live with a refuge in having mindfulness, wisdom, faith, and energy out fighting to destroy those things that are our enemy.
How can we say we are without a teacher when we exist with our teacher!
So we must strive to gain knowledge together with this teacher.
This is the way to practice, without loneliness or wavering but endowed with firmness and steadfastness in the truth of Dhamma.
The teacher's instructions are constantly embraced as the internal guide within the heart.
Wherever we may be, we can say that we are with a teacher, with an instructor, with the Lord Buddha, the Dhamma and the Sangha — because the real Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha are within the heart.
It is only the heart that can be with Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha, or the whole essence of Dhamma.
The body doesn't know anything.
How on earth can it ever know anything about the Lord Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha?
Feeling also doesn't know; while perception just remembers and then it's gone; and thought processing imagines and then vanishes.
How can there be any basis in them sufficient to accommodate the Lord Buddha?
The one who can truly receive, is that which really understands the Lord Buddha.
The real Buddho is just this heart.
So, investigate the heart to your utmost.
Don't be weak or discouraged.
In any case, all of us must eventually enter into this battle.
It's unavoidable.
All we can do is to help ourselves, and it's very certain that we will need to help ourselves.
When the time of necessity is upon us, nobody else can help.
Whether father or mother, son or daughter, husband or wife, they can only stand by and watch with affection, sympathy, and yearning.
They all long to help but when the time comes, they are powerless.
The only things that can help us transcend suffering and torment, and to be free from all bondage, are mindfulness, wisdom and our own effort.
There is nothing else.
We must therefore be strict with ourselves, be firm at heart, even if the body is nearing its end.
From this moment on, this is something to keep close to your heart.
Then you won't lose out later on.
However the aggregates might display themselves, the one certain thing is that they aren't above death.
Whether they appear often or not, they will come to die.
So the one who knows knows till death, at which time the body dissolves and that which knows is rid of all problems and obligations.
Let's get down to the crux of the matter.
Right to the essence of truth, of cause and effect.
Then we will arrive at the real and genuine Dhamma within the heart.
This Dhamma presentation seems enough; so I'll finish here.
Listening to a Dhamma talk keep your attention in the present.
Don't send the mind outward but keep it focused within, you'll then be able to experience the true taste of Dhamma right in your heart.
It has been taught that one may gain five benefits while listening to a Dhamma talk.
Then there are also those benefits that come to fruition in the future that are extra gains.
This is the reason that so many followers became enlightened while listening to the Lord Buddha's Dhamma.
They had correctly stationed their heart in the present, without concern for past or future; being wholly receptive and ready to experience the taste of Dhamma that the Lord was presenting.
The Lord first went forth into homelessness greatly aroused by Dhamma.
Even prior to this he had had a growing fascination and concern, originating with his successive encounters with the four deva-dutas — the sights of the old man, the sick man, the dead man, and the holy man.
From the first day of his going forth he labored with great effort and determination through the austere practices, always committed to his task up to the day of his Enlightenment.
He thought neither to abandon his undertaking nor to slacken in his pursuit.
The laziness, discouragement and weakness prevailing over the hearts of all other sentient beings could not overcome him.
The noble disciples also went forth with conscientiousness and the intention to find freedom from suffering, following the example of the Lord.
They attended to each word of the Lord's Dhamma and put it into practice with devotion.
Their staying, their coming or going, were always accompanied by mindfulness.
Every facet of exertion went together with reflection and application of the principles of truth.
The results and the rewards of their concern and dedication seem to contrast with those of our time.
This is due to the immense difference in the appreciation of Dhamma and the intensity of practice.
It's then obvious that the results can't possibly be the same.
The Lord Buddha didn't relent or relax in his quest from the first day of his endeavor to the day of his Enlightenment.
It was on finally reaching his goal that he became the Great Teacher of the world.
He then brought the Dhamma out to the Buddhist Community — teaching and urging them to follow the path of Dhamma by which he himself had succeeded.
Those who received what was revealed by the Lord, delighted in the essence of Dhamma.
By taking it up and applying it in their practice, in due course they had all variously come to Dhamma attainments; acquiring the Dhamma Eye like the Lord had before them.
The Lord Buddha became the model and ideal for the Buddhist Community right from the beginning.
This is made plain from the way he practiced, by always spending his time living away in the forest.
When he renounced the home life, he went forth into the forest and no longer took any interest in people; including those in the realm he had once ruled over with peace and security.
No longer being concerned with his princely status he courageously and unflinchingly stood up to the ordeal of his exertions.
In this respect, no one can surpass the Lord, for every mode of his practice transcended the world.
His renunciation and going forth into homelessness differed from the usual way of the world, so when the results appeared they also differed.
They were now of two disparate 'worlds', for his heart had been transformed into the purified heart of a Buddha.
His accomplishments stood in distinct contrast to the rest of the world.
This was also true for the noble disciples who had gone forth following the Lord Buddha.
They rejoiced and delighted on hearing the Lord present the basic, fundamental guidelines:
“Rukkhamuulasenaasana.m nissaaya pabbajjaa tatthavo yaavajiva.m ussahokaraniiyo.
We could express this in our own words:
“Look, over there!
There's a mountain and a deep jungle; mountainsides and gorges, brooks and streams, cliffs, peaks and mountain slopes.
There are the water courses and banks of mountain rivers.
These are places of ease and quietude, free from all forms of entanglement.
Seek for such areas and strive there amongst such scenes.
“The Tathagata attained his Buddhahood from these settings and surroundings, not through socializing and mingling together.
He didn't become enlightened by indulging in frivolity and merriment, by trailing in the flow of desire, self-seeking ambitions and obsessions, and allowing himself to be dragged away under the authority of defilements and desires.
On the contrary, the Tathagata came to his Enlightenment in secluded and deserted places.
Those were the spots where he made his great effort, escaping from his palace and city and all their manner of peoples.
The Tathagata went through hardship and adversity that was born and derived from his exertion in those secluded and remote places.
Enlightenment didn't come to him amidst the grandeur and magnificence of palaces, or amongst the crowds at crossroads or market places.
It came to him in solitude and seclusion, totally retired from the world.
The Tathagata accomplished and arrived at the state of purity of a Buddha in these outlying places.
“May all of you therefore turn towards these places that the Tathagata has described.
The mountains, hillsides, caves, and shady trees; the deep forests and the distant open spaces where the air is light and clear.
These spots are deserted and quiet, free from confusions and troubles, forsaken by people.
If you all aspire to the state free from suffering then you must follow the route of the Tathagata to those places.
Then you too will definitely, one day, also reach the ending of lives and existences, the of the glowing coals in the pit of repeated births and deaths.
What I've just explained was, in fact, the second of the basic guidelines.
The first directive was:
“Pa.msakuula ciivara.m… “
“All of you who have gone forth should seek for discarded materials left in cemeteries or along the road sides.
Stitch and sew them together to make your lower robe, upper robe and outer robe; so they may be used to cover and protect your body, sustaining the holy life from day to day.
This will accord with your recluseship and spartan life following the way of Dhamma.
Subsist frugally on the four requisites of living — food, shelter, clothing and medicine — and be content with little, satisfied with whatever requisites accrue without indulgence in excess and lavish wastefulness.
You may however, accept the gift of robes presented by lay devotees as long as it is the way of simplicity and moderation.
One causes oneself to be easily fed and cared for without causing problems and concerns for the faithful supporters.
The third of the guidelines was:
“Pi.n.diyaalopabhojana….
“Having gone forth in the religion you can't afford to be lazy.
Go on an almsround, feeding yourself by your own effort and on your own two feet with a pure and honest heart.
The faithful devotees willingly and happily offer the gift of food following the samana's tradition, avoiding the usual worldly bargaining with money.
The going for alms in order to support yourself is the pure and impeccable livelihood for one who has gone forth.
You should try to maintain this practice for the rest of your life.
Any occasions of abundance and excess should be considered exceptional circumstances, when you need to oblige the laity.
Any shower of gifts, however, must never be taken heedlessly, complacently thinking that they indicate your honor and dignity.
They would then be transformed into gifts and offerings that kill the unworthy.
The fourth instruction was: “Gilaanabhesajja….
This refers to medicine for curing the sickness that can, depending on conditions, afflict both monks and lay people.
The remedy needs to accommodate to and measure up with the particular situation as if it were its shadow.
However, know and exercise moderation in requesting assistance from relatives or those supporters who volunteer their service.
You must keep it well within the bounds of propriety.
Knowing moderation is the necessary quality that all who have gone forth must bear in mind.
He then becomes sangha sobhana, a graceful recluse who adorns the religion with refinement and beauty, being well received by fellow Buddhists and the public everywhere.
The important point for a monk to remember is to be always prudent and wary of immoderation in soliciting anything at all.
Never make a habit of visiting and seeking aid from lay people, but rather exercise moderation in response to the given situation.
After hearing and accepting these fundamental Dhamma guidelines from the Lord Buddha, the noble disciples all gladly practiced them with zealous dedication.
Each went their separate ways into the seclusion and solitude of the forests and mountains, unhindered by concern for life and well being.
Whatever their family backgrounds — some were even kings and princes — none asserted their status and position.
That would have only activated pride and snobbery, and contempt for those requisites of living that the ordinary lay supporters were able to provide.
The noble disciples welcomed any kind of food — save that set aside under the vinaya code — for the sake of sustaining their life processes and supporting a steady Dhamma practice.
They were mindful of their exertion, their practical duties and observances.
They were attracted to quiet and secluded surroundings, far away from noise, confusion and all disturbing influences.
They continued with steady endeavor by both day and night and in all postures.
For them nothing was more worthwhile and rewarding than the practice that would rid them of suffering.
All the noble disciples considered freedom from suffering as the priceless Dhamma.
It went beyond any gains that repeated births and deaths could show, for those all originated in the deceit of ignorance, which is the root source of the constant suffering of all sentient beings.
The total dedication of the noble disciples meant that neither pride of royal blood and wealthy family, nor pride of scholarship and erudition, could infiltrate their hearts.
For this reason all of them, from the first to the last arahant disciple, were able to gain Enlightenment following the Lord Buddha.
May all you who practice therefore turn your attention to the reports describing the Lord Buddha and his arahant disciples.
Consider how their practicing came to success, how they achieved renown and were revered by all sections of the world — including those of the heavenly deva realms.
The Lord Buddha, the Dhamma and the Sangha cannot be surpassed for wisdom, discernment and accomplishment.
They reign supreme, so let us all carefully consider this.
Being easily discouraged and obsessed with food and sleep are not ways to nobility and freedom from suffering.
They can't make the supreme Dhamma manifest within the field of our awareness, which is our heart.
In every movement and posture, always give heed to reason and be constantly observant of your actions.
Make sure that these actions don't cause delay or 'stain' your body, speech and heart.
Delight in seclusion and solitude, and totally commit your efforts of both body and heart to the Dhamma work.
Let a dogged determination be your guide through every thought and movement, always pointing to the goal — freedom from suffering.
The outcome is then assuredly equivalent to that found by the Lord Buddha and the noble disciples, since it follows the same path.
The Lord Buddha did not present the Dhamma teaching — about right view and right thought, for instance — to just anyone.
It was aimed specifically at all those who practice the way of moral precepts, samadhi and wisdom.
Having once stepped out along the Path that the Lord pointed out by living and practicing in accord with the fundamental guidelines that we've already discussed — rukkhamuula senaasana.m or living at the foot of trees is another example — there can only be one result.
It is freedom from suffering and reaching to the natural prominence of a noble disciple of the Lord Buddha, which is the state of purity within the heart.
Whatever your posture, whatever you're doing, always be mindful — the only exception being during sleep when it's beyond one's means.
Incline yourself towards applying mindfulness and wisdom with strenuous effort.
The reality of deliverance will then appear within the heart.
During the Lord Buddha's time people listened to Dhamma with earnest interest, securing the Dhamma they heard within their mind.
They didn't allow the Dhamma to slip away and disperse; nor did they listen merely for courtesy's sake, treating it more as a ritual.
Whatever people do nowadays — and that includes all you monks here — seems to become mere ritual.
Without true dedication and firm determination everything you attempt will insensibly turn into ritual.
For instance, to walk along your meditation path just to keep up with a set schedule becomes ritualistic.
The question is whether the heart and mindfulness are in harmony with your exertion.
Consequently, the end results may very well be different from what was expected.
Why should it be so?
It's because, even though we may be 'walking meditation', the heart is elsewhere, occupied with every other thing except the Dhamma-theme.
What is this principle of Dhamma?
It is always to be mindful while striving in one's practice.
The heart together with mindfulness may drift and wander; drawn away by the allure and fascination of other places and objects rather than being focused in the object taken up.
This indicates that the flow of the heart is already going astray.
Whether your practice is one of samadhi or investigation, the ensuing results must be contrary to Dhamma — being something else altogether.
Such is the way when we are not observant of our actions, and strive in the practice more for practice's sake or from a sense of obligation.
We might then fall into wrong view and criticize the religion, disparaging the Lord Buddha's Dhamma Teaching as not being the true Niyyanika Dhamma, unable to lead us away from suffering.
And that it's unequal to its claim of being the Well-taught Dhamma.
The reality is that the flow of our heart is constantly, by both day and night, pulling toward the world.
So please bear in mind that the world, whether the inner or the external world, is different from Dhamma.
The endeavor of the Lord Buddha and all the noble disciples is aimed at the Dhamma principle as the deliverance from suffering.
Consequently, every turn of their exertion was for the erasing of 'stains' until they were totally removed and came to Buddho — to which the world pays homage and respect.
They had attained to the summit of Dhamma because their practices accorded with Dhamma.
This has to be the outcome when the means and ends come together in complete harmony.
For us though, we may be walking on our meditation path or sitting in samadhi practice but our samadhi is merely a stump-like samadhi.
This is when we actually fall asleep right in that samadhi practice.
We may do this many times — and it may even become routine for some people, although I personally can't confirm it.
Yet it does seem quite probable going by the results people manage to get.
If the cause accords with Dhamma, then the result can't be otherwise.
Both the means and ends must correspond.
It must be because we don't practice following the principles of Dhamma.
Instead of walking or sitting in meditation — with mindfulness in tune with our exertion and the Dhamma theme or processes under investigation — the heart turns aside.
The flow of the heart goes chasing after forms, sounds, smells, tastes, and tactile objects.
Furthermore, the mental objects conceived in the heart are also about forms, sounds, smells, tastes and tactile objects, whether they be past or future.
The heart never stays with the present for even a single moment.
If this is the case, the results must always be mundane and commonplace, since the flow of the heart is constantly involved with worldly affairs.
The heart for its part will also remain mundane, acting as the source of suffering that afflicts us with trouble and hardship.
We consequently find fault with that which results: “Why should there be anxiety and worry?
Why am I miserable today?” We never consider that it's we ourselves who perpetually instigate this unpleasantness by running at cross-purposes with Dhamma.
That's why the outcome has to be as it is.
For this reason, all of us who practice must constantly secure within our minds the resolution to be free from suffering.
We must never allow our actions done through body, speech and mind to deviate from the teaching of the Lord Buddha.
He taught us to seek for seclusion and solitude in the deep forests that are appropriate and conducive to our exertion.
There were no exhortations to go live and practice in the market, at the crossroads, or in crowded places packed with people.
As if such places would instantly enable us to arrive at the safe haven free from suffering.
We must consider what this living at the root of a tree really means.
Every facet of the Dhamma Teaching expounded by all the Buddhas has behind it sound and justifiable reason.
It is the basis for truth, bringing benefit to those who observe and practice it.
This is why the story of the Lord Buddha and the noble disciples — how they cultivated the Way and came to the ultimate accomplishment, becoming great teachers for the whole world — is a story of great wonder and marvel.
Yet, however great a Teacher they may be, the teaching can't always hit home.
For us, the vital point is to take the Dhamma — the principle of truth and reason that is the essence of the Great Teacher — as that which will give us constant instruction.
Every action will then be made known to our teacher, which is our own heart.
This must, without neglect or absent-mindedness, always be borne in mind.
Otherwise we will never manage to keep to our course and survive, but will squander time worthlessly.
Don't allow the idea that one particular day or night, whether past, present or future, is somehow exceptional or unusual.
It's still that regular sort of day or night.
The defilements don't depend on time but are concerned with the heart and all related states and conditions.
This is the crucial fact.
Please investigate it.
Wherever you go always make sure the great Teacher leads as the guide.
Whether sitting, lying down, standing or walking, mindfulness must be there with each posture.
Without a basis in mindfulness and wisdom, calm of heart and clear discernment cannot arise.
This is because mindfulness, wisdom and diligent effort form the surrounding protective barrier and are the elements that substantiate them.
As we tread the path through our strenuous effort, we keep within the guidelines of precepts, samadhi and wisdom.
This is all that is required.
We will then experience the realm free from suffering right within our own heart — without having to ask anyone else about it.
Regardless of time, if the Well-taught Dhamma is still extant in the world, and if the one listening to it takes it up for study by dedicatedly practicing following its instruction, the result can only be freedom from suffering.
This will be clearly perceived in their heart.
Please keep this in mind, and correct the problem there, otherwise you'll steadily regress and will fail to accomplish anything.
With mindfulness and a continual probing with wisdom into the natural things and processes — the body for example — you'll constantly come across extraordinary understanding.
On the other hand, if your effort is unsettled and spasmodic the forthcoming results will similarly be deficient.
Therefore, really try to cultivate and develop mindfulness and wisdom up to a steady awareness and discernment.
This will definitely contribute to samadhi, the firmness and stability of heart, and to a genuine wisdom that follows from investigating the four Foundations of Mindfulness and the four Noble Truths.
Please also understand that both the Foundations of Mindfulness and the Noble Truths are dhammas of the present, which are constantly manifesting here and now, within our body and heart.
In the Middle Way of Practice the Lord detailed right view.
There are right views concerning things in general, more specific things, and the really subtle aspects of Dhamma.
The right views of ordinary Buddhists deal especially with the conviction that virtuous deeds and wrongdoing, good and evil, really do exist.
And that those performing such actions must reap the corresponding results, either of good or evil.
This is one level of right view.
The more specific view is of those who take up the practice and, using wisdom, investigate the four Foundations of Mindfulness and the four Noble Truths.
Here one examines the body, feeling, citta and dhamma in terms of the three marks — that they are all intrinsically bound up with impermanence, suffering and not-self.
Build up your faith and firm conviction in Truth and Dhamma through investigating the three marks inherent within all things and by making that the course for wisdom to follow.
Moreover, explore the Noble Truths to realize that suffering — that which arises in body and heart, in both oneself and all other beings — is something that one can't afford to remain complacent about.
Recognize the harm caused by the Source that generates the immeasurable suffering that all creatures must endlessly endure.
Then you'll be ready to dismantle and undo that Source, using wisdom to arrive at Cessation which is the sphere of the total ending of suffering.
The level of right view on these subtler aspects of Dhamma deals with correctly seeing the Truth of Suffering, its Source, its Cessation and the Way, which are precepts, samadhi and wisdom.
This is right view void of judgmental opinions concerning the Noble Truths and the natural processes everywhere.
This is another level of right view.
The levels of right view vary according to the Dhamma accomplishments of the one practicing.
If there was only a single level of right view then wisdom would be limited too.
Since there are many grades of defilements, many layers of downheartedness and depression, wisdom must have the equivalent levels.
It's for this reason that I've been explaining about the varied aspects of sammaa ditthi or right view.
The second path factor is right thought.
There are three categories: the thought of non-oppression; the thought of friendliness, free from enmity and ill-will; and the thought that extricates one from entanglement and bonds.
The thought of non-oppression refers to a regard for the welfare of one's fellow creatures, both human and animal alike.
However, you will also need to take care of your own well-being by not straining or overburdening yourself.
One neither gives thought on how to inflict troubles and hardships on others, nor on how one can indulge in self-destructive habits — like consuming drugs, alcohol or opium and heroin.
These thoughts that go in the direction of non- vindictiveness are really the not thinking in malicious and violent terms, whether towards people or animals.
One doesn't wish to hurt anyone; or that anyone should be sick, or that they might drop dead.
Nor does one think of suicide — killing oneself in the various ways they regularly report in the newspapers.
These things happen because they are the fruit of the seed of the original wrong reflection.
One once valued oneself; one thought of oneself as one's most precious resource.
Then, because of wrong thought, it all turns sour and one now appears as the enemy, one's antagonist.
This seems to happen all the time, and it does so because of wrong thoughts and reasoning.
Those who genuinely take care of themselves will immediately act to stop the train of wrong, dangerous thought.
As soon as the heart becomes aware of the beginning of such disquiet it will abandon and let go those thought concoctions.
How could one allow these wrong reflections to get out of hand to the point of committing suicide?
It's hardly an example of caring for oneself.
The commonplace ideas of finding a way to cast off the bonds of poverty and want, in order to find abundance and wealth, is also a thought of renunciation.
So is the thought of involving oneself in actions of generosity, morality and meditation.
One might think about contributing to the construction of roads, wells or pagodas; about maintaining and renovating old and crumbling shrines; about building dwellings and halls for monks, or other structures.
This impulsion towards good works in order to extricate oneself from the mass of suffering also comes under thought of renunciation.
Another kind of renunciation is the contemplating and the seeing of the peril contained in birth, decay, sickness and death.
This being inherent within every form of sentient existence — without exception — one sees the life of one gone forth as fulfilling one's own aspiration to develop precepts, samadhi and wisdom.
So one resolves to go forth as nun, 'white robe', monk or novice.
One who practices, contemplates and investigates his subject of meditation to release the heart from all mental hindrances.
He utilizes all the various methods, developed by continuing analysis and reflection, to remove defilements.
He steadily eradicates defilements through the various levels right up to the automatic stage of right thought.
With a constant probing and examining, he will ultimately eliminate all defilements.
This is the final category of right thought which completes the explanation of this second path factor.
The third path factor was stated as being right speech.
This includes general speech and specifically that concerned with Dhamma.
Passing on aphorisms of the wise that are not detrimental to those who listen; speaking from sound principles that are impressive and eloquent; speaking politely and modestly; and expressing gratitude and appreciation to anyone, of whatever rank, who has shown kindness and support.
These can all be classed as one level of right speech.
The primary form of right speech within the sphere of Dhamma are the sallekha dhammas, which are fitted to scour out the defilements.
These include:
Santu.t.thiikathaa — talk of contentment with whatever requisites become available and are properly offered according to Dhamma.
Asa.msaggakathaa — talk favorable to not mingling together or socializing.
Pavivekathaa — talk favorable to seclusion and detachment of body and heart.
Viriyaarambhakathaa — talk favorable to strenuous exertion.
Siilakathaa — talk favorable to upholding the purity of moral precepts; and to the development of samadhi and wisdom.
Vimuttikathaa — talk favorable to deliverance; and to the clear, penetrative realization of deliverance.
These are the subtler aspects of right speech.
There's no vain talk or gossip here but only serious speech, dedicated to exertion and the utilization of these purifying dhammas.
The fourth path factor was stated as being right action or right undertaking.
There are those right actions that deal with commonplace work and those concerned with the task of Dhamma.
Occupations that are not against the law, like farming or trading for example, fall within the bounds of right undertaking.
Likewise with the building of temples and monasteries, or the practice of generosity, morality and the development of the meditation on loving kindness.
These form another kind of right action.
Walking meditation and sitting in samadhi are also there as right action.
Every movement of the body, speech and heart is kamma, which is action.
The body acts, speech verbalizes and the mind deliberates, and it's all action or kamma.
Actions done by body, speech and heart are called kamma.
Those correct and proper bodily actions, speech and thoughts are called right actions.
Right action covers a wide and extensive range and it's up to each individual to work it out and apply it for himself.
This is because the world and Dhamma have always been paired together, like the left and right hands of the same person.
The world and Dhamma can't be separated — the world has its work, as has Dhamma.
Since the situation and make-up of each person vary, their undertakings cannot all be identical.
It's because of this that lay people and those who have gone forth following the way of Dhamma, have to undertake work that is appropriate to their position.
Don't allow opinions to interfere and conflict with anyone's undertaking; each person will then be able to undertake his or her 'right action'.
Each day will then see the world and Dhamma steadily flourishing together because of everyone's mutual contribution and support.
The fifth path factor was stated as being right livelihood.
One aspect of this is the eating and consuming that is an everyday form of making a living, whether by humans or animals.
Catering to feed the heart with emotional objects born of contact is another kind of livelihood.
The step by step nourishing of the heart with the various levels of Dhamma is another.
Making one's living in a scrupulous manner that accords with Dhamma, without violating the law by actions like robbery and theft, is one form of right livelihood.
One lives within one's means from day to day.
But if things accrue in abundance and through honest means, then that can also be reckoned as right livelihood.
Contact will arise with external objects such as the form, the sound, smell, taste, or touch of man or women.
If it suits one's disposition and provides nutriment for the heart with mental and emotional objects that delight and relieve the heart's sadness, then it serves as an elixir of life.
However, by pursuing them in the wrong way it becomes poison and devours the heart.
This type of right livelihood is appropriate for the person in the world who knows the right measure of things, and their suitability and limits.
Sustaining the heart with Dhamma is done by declining to admit entrance to the world's poison to disturb the heart through contact between the sense organs and external objects.
Every contact made with forms, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile and mental objects should always be contemplated in the light of Dhamma.
Neither a warm welcome nor a hostile rejection should be allowed, for that would bring hardship for the heart.
A Dhamma-imbued investigation will provide and sustain the heart with the essence of Dhamma; and it will be gladdened and delighted through both the heart's serenity and its wisdom and discernment.
There will then be no seeking after poisonous objects that are ruinous for the heart, rather it will be constantly nourished with Dhamma.
In the light of Dhamma, always try to push the investigation of every contact made between the sense organs and the sense objects towards true understanding and emancipation.
Never contemplate in a worldly-minded way, for that will be the taking in of fire to burn oneself with, and it can only cause the heart to overheat.
Constantly screen and feed the heart only with objects of Dhamma, and this Dhamma essence will nourish the heart, steadily sustaining and protecting it.
What I've been talking about here is one more kind of right livelihood.
The sixth path factor was stated as being right exertion.
There are four ways of exertion:
The effort involved in preventing the accumulation of unwholesomeness within one's character and make up; in getting rid of anything unwholesome that has arisen; in developing and bringing up wholesomeness; and the effort in maintaining that wholesomeness that has already arisen.
These must be drawn inwards by applying them to the level of Dhamma that you are actually practicing in, where they will be ready to add to whatever basis of samadhi and wisdom is necessary.
First: Devote yourself to caring for the heart that is so liable to become obsessed and infatuated with the flow of craving.
This is based in ignorance and will drag the heart away.
Second: Try to develop precepts, samadhi and wisdom, for these are the dhammas capable of rectifying every type of defilement.
If you aspire for Nibbana, totally extinguish your burning anxiety.
Third: Don't allow your standard of precepts, samadhi and wisdom to fall back and slip away through negligence.
You will need to develop and nourish them to full maturity and to their transmutation into the supramundane knowledge of the Path, which erases all defilements, including those lying latent.
The sphere of Freedom and Nibbana, previously perceived as beyond one's capacity, will arise within the heart the instant all the defilements are cleared out.
The seventh path factor was stated as being right mindfulness.
This is setting up mindfulness to attend to your exertion.
Whatever you fix on as the heart's meditation object — “Buddho” or mindfulness of breathing for instance — should be the place where mindfulness is established.
If you settle on the Four Foundations of Mindfulness — whether as a basis for samadhi or in the development of wisdom — you must constantly have awareness minding and attending to every round of practice.
This is one section of right mindfulness.
The eighth path factor was stated as being right samadhi, which is the heart rightly and firmly established in calm.
This refers to the samadhi that is imbued with wisdom and not that stump-like samadhi.
Also, it isn't the addictive sort of samadhi that sticks both day and night and is loath to investigate by way of wisdom.
That sort of samadhi may seem, in itself, to be an adequately exalted dhamma but wisdom will end up being dismissed as phoney.
Samadhi, in this case, is called incorrect or wrong samadhi and can't truly deliver one from suffering.
To practice the samadhi that will free one from suffering, attention has to be focused on one's selected Dhamma principle or theme, with mindfulness guarding and directing until the heart converges.
It doesn't matter too much which class of samadhi this may be — it's the right or correct samadhi as long as you feel that the heart has calmed down.
It has ceased from concocting amongst the various thought processes, and abides, for a time, singular and distinct from all surrounding conditions, before withdrawing from that state.
This is not the same as that type of samadhi where, once the heart has converged, one loses track of day and night, not knowing if one is alive — and it's as if one is dead.
It is only after the heart has emerged that one starts to wonder about what had happened: “Was it that the heart converged?
Wherever did my mind go?”.
This is 'stump-like samadhi' because it resembles a stump without any consciousness.
Try to avoid and quit this type of samadhi, and if you've already fallen for it then you must immediately extricate yourself.
This stump-like samadhi is certainly found among those of us who practice.
The remedy is to hold back and break the habitual way the heart tends to converge.
If one indulges it then it will always stick with that propensity, so you will have to compel it to break away and 'take a tour' of the body.
Mindfulness needs to be firmly in control, traveling up and around and down and around, over and over again until wisdom, Path and Fruit are realized.
The kind of samadhi that is right samadhi is that which has mindfulness attending to the state of calm, when the heart has converged into samadhi.
After the heart has emerged again, the various natural conditions found within the body and mind should be investigated with wisdom.
Therefore, with the right occasion and appropriate conditions start up the investigation.
Samadhi and wisdom are dhammas that should always interrelate and collaborate.
Don't allow your samadhi development to drift without giving it the necessary attention.
So, to summarize, one can say that these three dhammas — mindfulness, samadhi and wisdom — are interrelated and inseparable.
They can't move forward alone, for samadhi and wisdom have to take their turns in taking a step, with mindfulness minding and watching over them.
I've discussed these eight path factors partly according to the principles of Dhamma and partly from practical experience.
Please note that right view through to right samadhi are formed from dhammas of many different levels.
It's up to each of you listening here to take them up and apply them in your own practice.
How far you can go depends on your Dhamma understanding and ability.
Regardless of whether you're a lay person or have gone forth, with commitment you'll be able to practice for the full development of these eight path factors.
The fruits of Freedom and knowledge and insight of Freedom will then become your most valuable possession.
This is because precepts, samadhi and wisdom are integral to this Path and they function as the key that clearly reveals these two Freedoms to the heart.
Moreover, all of you who practice shouldn't misunderstand and think that Freedom and knowledge of Freedom are separate from each other or that they perform two different functions.
Truly, that's not so.
When a man uses an axe to chop up wood, as soon as the wood is cut through he both sees it with his eyes and at the same instant realizes it in his heart.
In the same way, Freedom and knowledge of Freedom simultaneously allow the seeing and the knowing that the defilements have been excised from the heart, through using precepts, samadhi and wisdom.
Thereafter, there can be no more fussing with problems because all bothersome concerns derive from the conflict between the heart and the defilements.
This is the truly great issue of the three realms of existence.
By letting go of the heart, which is the cardinal problem, the defilements that are lodged there will spontaneously detach themselves.
Furthermore, sila, samadhi and wisdom, Freedom, and knowledge of Freedom all remain as they really are.
Each side comes to truth, and consequently all the contentious issues come to an end.
Today, I have presented a talk on Dhamma to all of you who practice by highlighting the example of the Lord Buddha and the Noble Disciples.
May it serve you as a guide, pointing out the Way so that you can set your compass — your programme of practice — and relentlessly strive to follow the Lord Buddha.
Once you have fully developed sila, samadhi and wisdom, then Freedom and knowledge of Freedom, which is the essence of Nibbana, will undoubtedly be yours.
Therefore, may all of you listening here realize that all these matters are found right here in your body and heart.
Please draw Dhamma inwards as your own.
Then, both the cultivation of the means and the fruits of Freedom and Nibbana, which I have elucidated, will all belong to you, either today or sometime in the future.
May this talk on Dhamma now reach its conclusion.
Mrs.
Pow-panga Vathanakul died on September th,.
She had asked her husband, Mr.
Vai Vathanakul, to keep her funeral rites simple and to cremate the body within a few days.
But when the time came her own family insisted on the customary Thai funeral.
Khun Vai, for his part, put together a book to give to family and friends at the funeral.
Memorial books are customary on such occasions but Khun Pow had rather preempted this by already distributing, when she ill, some Dhamma books that she had had printed.
Khun Vai, however, produced his book with the idea of it being a 'case study'.
Four of the Dhamma talks translated above came from this book, and it seems worthwhile here to mention some of the other points that Khun Vai brought together.
In many ways they are also highly relevant to Buddhists outside Thailand, living under modern conditions.
Relatives and friends contributed a section about Khun Pow's life and career:
She was born in in Bangkok and studied there, entering the Accountancy Department of Chulalongkorn University.
However, poor health forced her to cut short her course after only two years.
She went out to work for an insurance company in, and was one of the first staff of the newly established firm.
Business conditions were difficult in those early days but Khun Pow worked her way up so that in she was made Secretary to the Board.
The company sent her on study tours abroad to other insurance companies, in India and Europe, and for six months in the U.S.A.
The American insurance managers were highly impressed with her “excellent judgment… in underwriting problems…” and considered her “… an unusually capable woman and apt scholar…” 
In she was made General Manager of the company.
Nine years later she stepped down from that post — although staying on as Secretary to the Board — so that she would have more time for Dhamma practice.
At that time the company had more than employees with another insurance agents.
When, in, she fully retired she had been with the company for almost thirty years, having overseen a large part of the company's growth.
She now turned more to concentrate on Dhamma.
In the company she had been renown for her hard work and discipline, and had expected the same from her workers.
She was also known for her care and helpfulness.
This is perhaps made evident by the gathering of over a thousand former colleagues and co-workers who came to pay their final respects at her funeral rites.

Another section concerns Khun Pow's Dhamma practice:
In Khun Pow started to visit Bangkok monasteries to listen to sermons and join in the meditation.
When, for health reasons, she retired from being General Manager she had more time for her Dhamma studies, and a scholar monk at a major Bangkok monastery was designated by the abbot to teach her the third, and then second grade General Dhamma studies.

In a friend gave Khun Pow a Dhamma book about the meditation masters in the North east of Thailand.
She was deeply impressed and when one of them, the Ven.
Acharn Maha Boowa, visited Bangkok she went to pay her respects and asked permission to go and stay at Wat Pa Bahn Tahd.
On first going to a jungle monastery she found herself too frightened to come out of her room at night, but after listening to the Dhamma teaching she became determined to return every few months to practice.
She also decided not to go for her grade one General Dhamma studies, but to concentrate on putting those studies into practice.
Khun Pow, with Khun Vai's agreement, started to keep the Eight Precepts on the Observance Days.
When business pressures — guests from abroad for instance — made this difficult, she would simply keep them on another day.
To help make such days more suitable for meditation practice at home, one upstairs room was set aside and dubbed 'Ekasatarn'.
Any disturbing telephone calls could then be deflected with the news that, 'Khun Pow had gone to 'Ekasatarn'.
Khun Pow's friends would then assume that she had gone to the monastery, and there would be no need to lie about Khun Pow 'not being at home'.
In, Khun Pow thought back upon the help given to her by her teacher in Dhamma studies, the scholar monk in the central Bangkok monastery, and offered to sponsor his further studies at the Banares University in India.

By Khun Pow was spending much more time away in the north eastern meditation monasteries, and decided that the following year she would spent the whole of the three month Rains Retreat period up there.
Back home, a small hut had been made in the garden, beneath a tree and with a view of the nearby pond.
That was where she retired to, for she was now regularly keeping the Eight Precepts.
She and Khun Vai decided that it was also time for her to fully retire from the company, which she did in, and she was then ready to go on the three month's retreat that year.
Khun Pow had always been bedeviled with health problems that resulted in many stays in hospital.
These included operations on the womb, the gall bladder and the breast.
This last treatment concluded with radiation therapy that seemed to clear things up in.
However, that July, when she was already settled in the monastery for the Rains Retreat, she met a fellow devotee who was also a doctor.
The doctor noticed that Khun Pow's eyes were yellow and so advised her quickly to go to Bangkok for treatment.
Eventually, after many tests and a final bone biopsy, it was confirmed that this time the cancer had penetrated to the bone marrow, and that no further treatment was possible.
When Khun Pow knew that the cancer was terminal, she asked permission to go and practice Dhamma at Wat Pa Bahn Tahd.
She arrived there in October and Ven.
Acharn Maha Boowa gave her a Dhamma talk virtually every evening, for over days.
Other devotees were also staying there with her, one being a lady doctor, and when her condition made it necessary to be nearer the hospital she returned to Bangkok.
When Khun Pow was home again, she and Khun Vai decided that they would be fellow Dhamma farers, rather than husband and wife.
She asked him to help remind her about Dhamma, to awaken her mindfulness, in the coming days.
Khun Vai therefore prepared some appropriate Dhamma verses and set himself the task of giving as much spiritual support as he could.
He was able to sit with her and prayed and meditated.
When Khun Pow could not read anymore, he would read aloud and tape some of the important Dhamma teachings for her to listen and meditate on.
Khun Pow went into a semi-coma, but when she became more conscious, Khun Vai was there to repeat some words of Dhamma.
He then thought a better way would be to use the original voices, by using a tape machine.
So he arranged tapes of the morning and evening chanting; and a tape of the final Dhamma talk — the farewell night — that Khun Pow had listened to at Wat Pa Bahn Tahd.
There were also tapes of Dhamma chants and verses that Khun Pow particularly liked: such as The First Sermon of the Lord Buddha, the Turning of the Dhamma Wheel, with its explanation about the Four Noble Truths.
And the Discourse on the Highest Blessing.
By the time that Khun Vai had arranged the tapes, Khun Pow's condition was obviously deteriorating.
The oxygen tubes that she had resolutely refused and pushed away, wanting to be left unencumbered in her final moments, had now been reinserted by the nurses.
This showed for certain that she had to be unconscious.
Khun Vai started a cycle of tapes and within a few moments Khun Pow's hands were lifted together in anyjali, the traditional gesture of respect and veneration.
The hands fell back… and were then raised again, palms together, over the heart.
Khun Vai was delighted with this sign that the Dhamma was penetrating, even though Khun Pow was in a coma.
He therefore arranged for the tapes to be continually interchanged using two machines.
The Turning of the Dhamma Wheel sounded, with words about the heart of one who practices, how knowledge and light arise, and how by going beyond all attachment there is the Undying Dhamma.
Khun Pow appeared calm but her breathing became irregular.
Khun Vai sat close by and quietly meditated; and as her breathing faltered he asked everyone in the room to stay still and not to cry, and for nobody else to come in.
As they meditated, the sound of the breathing gradually diminished.
And was still.
Khun Vai collected all the above to be a 'case study' about an ordinary person taking up the practice of Dhamma.
Khun Vai himself is something of a 'case study' too.
He was Khun Pow's business colleague throughout, successfully overcame a major cancer operation and, more to the point, is a devout Christian.
It's said that Khun Vai would accompany Khun Pow to the Buddhist monastery and everyone who didn't know would think he was a Buddhist too.
It was much the same when Khun Pow went with Khun Vai to church.
Religion for him is not just Christianity, for he sees much value in Dhamma and fully supported his wife in her practice.
With his wife's death he was keenly aware that both faiths are concerned with suffering — death and separation from the person one loves — and how to deal with that truth.
Khun Vai has been a leading member of the YMCA — he's now President Emeritus of the YMCA in Bangkok — and has addressed various international meetings, often concerning his understanding of religion.
He has spoken about how he sees a similarity between Christianity and Buddhism.
On the basic level, he compares the Buddhist generosity and moral precepts, with the Christian Commandments and love.
Or “Love in action for all faiths and beliefs.” Then he says, “Whereas for spiritual higher attainment, we have to leave to each person depending on his or her belief to pursue.
It is now fifteen years since Khun Pow's death, yet the Dhamma Teachings she received and practiced are still available to those who want to develop their own 'case study'.
The language used in these talks is that of Forest Dhamma.
This means that apart from some Paali quotations — usually taken from the chants that many of the listeners would be familiar with, and most of the monks would have learned by heart — it is usually ordinary Thai.
Many Thai words are rooted in Paali and this can be seen in their spelling.
However, both the present pronunciation and the meaning of the word have often been transformed.
Forest Dhamma therefore should not be treated as if it was classical Paali, and scholars should beware of trying to track definitions through the text.
It's important to remember that this is an oral teaching, which afterwards was warmed up between pages.
As this book is mainly concerned with meditation, here are some Sutta passages with descriptions of generosity and moral precepts.
Daana: Generosity
In contrast to the modern emphasis on consuming and possessing, the Lord Buddha spoke of the virtue of giving and being content with whatever one has.
There are always circumstances where one can give.
For instance, one can offer one's time, help and sympathy.
And one can for-give.
If one has wealth, he explained the use of possessions; the benefits which one should get from wealth; reasons for earning and having wealth:
ii) to share this happiness and comfort with one's friends.
iii) to make oneself secure against all misfortunes.
iv) to make the fivefold offering:
to guests, by receiving them.
to the departed, by dedicating merit to them.
to the king, by paying taxes and duties and so on.
to the deities, i.e., those beings who are worshipped according to one's faith.
v) to support those monks and spiritual teachers who lead a pure and diligent life.
Sappurisa Daana: Gifts of a good man
ii) to give choice things.
iii) to give at fitting times.
iv) to give suitable things.
v) to give with discretion.
vi) to give repeatedly or regularly.
vii) to calm one's mind on giving.
viii) to be glad after giving.
Siila: Precepts
The basic guidelines for the actions and speech of any Buddhist can be appreciated by anyone, of any religion or none.
There is no dogma involved, it is a plain and simple way of living without harming or hurting any creature.
The other feature to bear in mind is that it is accepted voluntarily by the individual.
This is not something that one is commanded to receive.
It is the individual's volition that changes a list of precepts into a way of living.
With that change, the appreciation and mindfulness of one's actions and speech become more subtle and which automatically leads on to meditation.
There are the basic Five Precepts and these become more refined with the Eight Precepts.
Everyone who listened to the original Dhamma talks would be keeping the Eight Precepts.
These Precepts can be received by simply saying:
“I undertake the training rule/precept…
ii) to abstain from taking what is not given.
iii) to abstain from sexual misconduct.
iv) to abstain from false speech.
v) to abstain from intoxicants causing heedlessness.
vi) to abstain from untimely eating.
vii) to abstain from dancing, singing, music and unseemly shows, from wearing garlands, smartening with scents, and embellishment with unguents.
viii) to abstain from the use of high and large luxurious couches.
Thus have I heard.
On one occasion the Exalted One was dwelling at Anathapindika's monastery, in Jeta's Grove, near Savatthi.
Now when the night was far spent, a certain deity whose surpassing splendor illuminated the entire Jeta Grove, came to the presence of the Exalted One and, drawing near, respectfully saluted him and stood at one side.
Standing thus, he addressed the Exalted One in verse:
“Many deities and men, yearning after good, have pondered on blessings.
Pray, tell me the greatest blessing!
“Not to associate with the foolish, but to associate with the wise; and to honor those who are worthy of honor — this is the greatest blessing.
To reside in a suitable locality, to have done meritorious actions in the past and to set oneself in the right course — this is the greatest blessing.
To have much learning, to be skillful in handicraft, well-trained in discipline, and to be of good speech — this is the greatest blessing.
To support mother and father, to cherish wife and children, and to be engaged in peaceful occupation — this is the greatest blessing.
To be generous in giving, to be righteous in conduct, to help one's relatives, and to be blameless in action — this is the greatest blessing.
To loathe more evil and abstain from it, to refrain from intoxicants, and to be steadfast in virtue — this is the greatest blessing.
To be respectful, humble, contented and grateful; and to listen to the Dhamma on due occasions — this is the greatest blessing.
To be patient and obedient, to associate with monks and to have religious discussions on due occasions — this is the greatest blessing.
Self-restraint, a holy and chaste life, the perception of the Noble Truths and the realisation of Nibbana — this is the greatest blessing.
A mind unruffled by the vagaries of fortune, from sorrow freed, from defilements cleansed, from fear liberated — this is the greatest blessing.
Those who thus abide, ever remain invincible, in happiness established.
These are the greatest blessings.
The Mahaniddesa, the first part of the Niddesa of the Khuddaka Nikaya, is a commentary, attributed to Ven.
Sariputta, on the Atthakavagga of the Sutta Nipata.
The translator appears in the square brackets.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from killing.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from stealing.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from sexual misconduct.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from lying.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from liquor that causes intoxication and heedlessness.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from untimely eating.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from dancing, singing, music, and visiting unseemly shows.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from the use of garlands, perfumes, cosmetics, and embellishments.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from the use of high and luxurious beds.
I undertake to abide by the precept to abstain from accepting gold and silver.
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Savatthi at Jetavana at Anathapindika's monastery.
Now when the night was far advanced, a certain deity, whose surpassing radiance illuminated the whole of Jetavana, approached the Blessed One, respectfully saluted him, and stood beside him.
Standing thus, he addressed the Blessed One in verse:
“Many deities and men longing for happiness have pondered on blessings.
Pray tell me what the highest blessings are.
“Not to associate with the foolish, but to associate with the wise, and to honor those worthy of honor — this is the highest blessing.
“To reside in a suitable locality, to have performed meritorious actions in the past, and to set oneself in the right direction — this is the highest blessing.
“Vast learning, skill in handicrafts, well grounded in discipline, and pleasant speech — this is the highest blessing.
“To support one's father and mother; to cherish one's wife and children, and to be engaged in peaceful occupations — this is the highest blessing.
“Liberality, righteous conduct, rendering assistance to relatives, and performance of blameless deeds — this is the highest blessing.
“To cease and abstain from evil, to abstain from intoxicating drinks, and diligent in performing righteous acts — this is the highest blessing.
“Reverence, humility, contentment, gratitude, and the timely hearing of the Dhamma, the teaching of the Buddha — this is the highest blessing.
“Patience, obedience, meeting the Samanas, and timely discussions on the Dhamma — this is the highest blessing.
“Self-control, chastity, comprehension of the Noble Truths, and the realization of Nibbana — this is the highest blessing.
“The mind that is not touched by the vicissitudes of life, the mind that is free from sorrow, stainless, and secure — this is the highest blessing.
“Those who have fulfilled the conditions are victorious everywhere, and attain happiness everywhere — To them these are the highest blessings.
Translator's introduction: The occasion for this discourse, in brief, according to the commentary, is as follows: The city of Vesali was afflicted by a famine, causing death, especially to the poor folk.
Due to the presence of decaying corpses the evil spirits began to haunt the city; this was followed by a pestilence.
Plagued by these three fears of famine, non-human beings and pestilence, the citizens sought the help of the Buddha who was then living at Rajagaha.
Followed by a large number of monks including the Venerable Ananda, his attendant disciple, the Buddha came to the city of Vesali.
With the arrival of the Master, there were torrential rains which swept away the putrefying corpses.
The atmosphere became purified, the city was clean.
Thereupon the Buddha delivered this Jewel Discourse to the Venerable Ananda, and gave him instructions as to how he should tour the city with the Licchavi citizens reciting the discourse as a mark of protection to the people of Vesali.
The Venerable Ananda followed the instructions, and sprinkled the sanctified water from the Buddha's own alms bowl.
As a consequence the evil spirits were exorcised, the pestilence subsided.
Thereafter the Venerable Ananda returned with the citizens of Vesali to the Public hall where the Buddha and his disciples had assembled awaiting his arrival.
There the Buddha recited the same Jewel Discourse to the gathering:
“Whatever beings are assembled here, terrestrial or celestial, may they all have peace of mind, and may they listen attentively to these words:
“O beings, listen closely.
May you all radiate loving-kindness to those human beings who, by day and night, bring offerings to you.
Wherefore, protect them with diligence.
“Whatever treasure there be either in the world beyond, whatever precious jewel there be in the heavenly worlds, there is nought comparable to the Tathagata.
This precious jewel is the Buddha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“That Cessation, that Detachment, that Deathlessness supreme, the calm and collected Sakyan Sage had realized.
There is nought comparable to this Dhamma.
This precious jewel is the Dhamma.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“The Supreme Buddha extolled a path of purity calling it the path which unfailingly brings concentration.
There is nought comparable to this concentration.
This precious jewel is the Dhamma.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“The eight persons extolled by virtuous men constitute four pairs.
They are the disciples of the Buddha and are worthy of offerings.
Gifts given to them yield rich results.
This precious jewel is the Sangha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“With a steadfast mind, and applying themselves well in the dispensation of the Buddha Gotama, free from, they have attained to that which should be attained encountering the Deathless.
They enjoy the Peace of Nibbana freely obtained.
This precious jewel is the Sangha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“As a post deep-planted in the earth stands unshaken by the winds from the four quarters, so, too, I declare is the righteous man who comprehends with wisdom the Noble Truths.
This precious jewel is the Sangha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“Those who realized the Noble Truths well taught by him who is profound in wisdom, even though they may be exceedingly heedless, they will not take an eighth existence.
This precious jewel is the Sangha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“With his gaining of insight he abandons three states of mind, namely self-illusion, doubt, and indulgence in meaningless rites and rituals, should there be any.
He is also fully freed from the four states of woe, and therefore, incapable of committing the six major wrongdoings.
This precious jewel is the Sangha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“Any evil action he may still do by deed, word or thought, he is incapable of concealing it; since it has been proclaimed that such concealing is impossible for one who has seen the Path.
This precious jewel is the Sangha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“As the woodland groves though in the early heat of the summer month are crowned with blossoming flowers even so is the sublime Dhamma leading to the of Nibbana which is taught for the highest good.
This precious jewel is the Buddha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“The Peerless Excellent one the Knower, the Giver, the Bringer, taught the excellent Dhamma.
This precious jewel is the Buddha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“Their past is spent, their new no more arises, their mind to future becoming is unattached.
Their germ has died, they have no more desire for re-living.
Those wise men fade out as the flame of this lamp.
This precious jewel is the Sangha.
By this truth may there be happiness.
“Whatever beings are assembled here, terrestrial or celestial, come let us salute the Buddha, the Tathagata, honored by gods and men.
May there be happiness.
“Whatever beings are assembled here terrestrial or celestial, come let us salute the perfect Dhamma, honored by gods and men.
May there be happiness.
“Whatever beings are assembled here terrestrial or celestial, come let us salute the perfect Sangha, honored by gods and men.
May there be happiness.
Translator's introduction: While the Buddha was staying at Savatthi, a band of monks, having received subjects of meditation from the master, proceeded to a forest to spend the rainy season.
The tree deities inhabiting this forest were worried by their arrival, as they had to descend from tree abodes and dwell on the ground.
They hoped, however, the monks would leave soon; but finding that the monks would stay the vassana period of three months, harassed them in diverse ways, during the night with the intention of scaring them away.
Living under such conditions being impossible, the monks went to the Master and informed him of their difficulties.
Thereon the Buddha instructed them in the Metta sutta and advised their return equipped with this sutta for their protection.
The monks went back to the forest, and practicing the instruction conveyed, permeated the whole atmosphere with their radiant thoughts of metta or loving-kindness.
The deities so affected by this power of love, henceforth allowed them to meditate in peace.
The discourse gets divided into two parts.
The first detailing the standard of moral conduct required by one who wishes to attain Purity and Peace, and the second the method of practice of metta.
“He who is skilled in well being, and who wishes to attain that state of Calm should act thus: he should be dexterous, upright, exceedingly upright, obedient, gentle, and humble.
“Contented, easily supportable, with but few responsibilities, of simple livelihood, controlled in the senses, prudent, courteous, and not hanker after association with families.
“Let him not perform the slightest wrong for which wise men may rebuke him.
'May all beings be happy and safe.
May they have happy minds.'
&.
“Whatever living beings there may be — feeble or strong long, stout, or of medium size, short, small, large, those seen or those unseen, those dwelling far or near, those who are born as well as those yet to be born — may all beings have happy minds.
“Let him not deceive another nor despise anyone anywhere.
In anger or ill will let him not wish another ill.
“Just as a mother would protect her only child with her life even so let one cultivate a boundless love towards all beings.
“Let him radiate boundless love towards the entire world — above, below, and across — unhindered, without ill will, without enmity.
“Standing, walking, sitting or reclining, as long as he is awake, let him develop this mindfulness.
This, they say, is 'Noble Living' here.
“Not falling into wrong views — being virtuous, endowed with insight, lust in the senses discarded — verily never again will he return to conceive in a womb.”
The Dhammapada is the best known and most widely esteemed text in the Pali Tipitaka, the sacred scriptures of Theravada Buddhism.
The work is included in the Khuddaka Nikaya of the Sutta Pitaka, but its popularity has raised it far above the single niche it occupies in the scriptures to the ranks of a world religious classic.
Composed in the ancient Pali language, this slim anthology of verses constitutes a perfect compendium of the Buddha's teaching, comprising between its covers all the essential principles elaborated at length in the forty-odd volumes of the Pali canon.
According to the Theravada Buddhist tradition, each verse in the Dhammapada was originally spoken by the Buddha in response to a particular episode.
Accounts of these, along with exegesis of the verses, are preserved in the classic commentary to the work, compiled by the great scholiast Bhadantacariya Buddhaghosa in the fifth century C.E.
on the basis or material going back to very ancient times.
The contents of the verses, however, transcend the limited and particular circumstances of their origin, reaching out through the ages to various types of people in all the diverse situations of life.
For the simple and unsophisticated the Dhammapada is a sympathetic counselor; for the intellectually overburdened its clear and direct teachings inspire humility and reflection; for the earnest seeker it is a perennial source of inspiration and practical instruction.
Insights that flashed into the heart of the Buddha have crystallized into these luminous verses of pure wisdom.
As profound expressions of practical spirituality, each verse is a guideline to right living.
The Buddha unambiguously pointed out that whoever earnestly practices the teachings found in the Dhammapada will taste the bliss of emancipation.
Due to its immense importance, the Dhammapada has been translated into numerous languages.
In English alone several translations are available, including editions by such noted scholars as Max Muller and Dr.
S.
Radhakrishnan.
However, when presented from a non-Buddhist frame of reference, the teachings of the Buddha inevitably suffer some distortion.
This, in fact, has already happened with our anthology: an unfortunate selection of renderings has sometimes suggested erroneous interpretations, while footnotes have tended to be judgmental.
The present translation was originally written in the late 's.
Some years earlier, while consulting a number of English-language editions of the Dhammapada, it was observed that the renderings were either too free and inaccurate or too pedantic, and it was therefore felt that a new translation avoiding these two extremes would serve a valuable purpose.
The finished result of that project, presented here, is a humble attempt by a practicing follower of the Buddha to transmit the spirit and content, as well as the language and style, of the original teachings.
In preparing this volume I have had access to numerous editions and translations of the Dhammapada into various languages, including Sanskrit, Hindi, Bengali, Sinhala, Burmese and Nepali.
I particularly benefited from the excellent translations of the work by the late Venerable Narada Mahathera of Vajirarama, Colombo, Sri Lanka, and Professor Bhagwat of Poona, India; To them I acknowledge my debt.
A few verses contain riddles, references or analogies that may not be evident to the reader.
The meanings of these are provided either in parentheses or notes, and for their interpretation I have relied on the explanations given in Bhadantacariya Buddhaghosa's commentary.
Verses discussed in the notes are indicated in the text by an asterisk at the end of the verse.
A first edition of this translation was published in and a second in, both by the Maha Bodhi Society in Bangalore, India.
For this third edition, the translation has undergone considerable revision.
The newly added subtitle, “The Buddha's Path of Wisdom,” is not literal, but is fully applicable on the ground that the verses of the Dhammapada all originate from the Buddha's wisdom and lead the one who follows them to a life guided by that same wisdom.
I am grateful to the editors of the Buddhist Publication Society for their helpful suggestions, and to the Society itself for so generously undertaking the publication of this work.
I make this offering of Dhamma in grateful memory of my teachers, parents and relatives, departed and living.
May they find access in the Buddha's Dispensation and attain Nibbana!
May all beings be happy!
— Acharya Buddharakkhita
From ancient times to the present, the Dhammapada has been regarded as the most succinct expression of the Buddha's teaching found in the Pali canon and the chief spiritual testament of early Buddhism.
In the countries following Theravada Buddhism, such as Sri Lanka, Burma and Thailand, the influence of the Dhammapada is ubiquitous.
It is an ever-fecund source of themes for sermons and discussions, a guidebook for resolving the countless problems of everyday life, a primer for the instruction of novices in the monasteries.
Even the experienced contemplative, withdrawn to forest hermitage or mountainside cave for a life of meditation, can be expected to count a copy of the book among his few material possessions.
Yet the admiration the Dhammapada has elicited has not been confined to avowed followers of Buddhism.
Wherever it has become known its moral earnestness, realistic understanding of human life, aphoristic wisdom and stirring message of a way to freedom from suffering have won for it the devotion and veneration of those responsive to the good and the true.
The expounder of the verses that comprise the Dhammapada is the Indian sage called the Buddha, an honorific title meaning “the Enlightened One” or “the Awakened One.” The story of this venerable personage has often been overlaid with literary embellishment and the admixture of legend, but the historical essentials of his life are simple and clear.
He was born in the sixth century B.C., the son of a king ruling over a small state in the Himalayan foothills, in what is now Nepal.
His given name was Siddhattha and his family name Gotama.
Raised in luxury, groomed by his father to be the heir to the throne, in his early manhood he went through a deeply disturbing encounter with the sufferings of life, as a result of which he lost all interest in the pleasures and privileges of rulership.
One night, in his twenty-ninth year, he fled the royal city and entered the forest to live as an ascetic, resolved to find a way to deliverance from suffering.
For six years he experimented with different systems of meditation and subjected himself to severe austerities, but found that these practices did not bring him any closer to his goal.
Finally, in his thirty-fifth year, while sitting in deep meditation beneath a tree at Gaya, he attained Supreme Enlightenment and became, in the proper sense of the title, the Buddha, the Enlightened One.
Thereafter, for forty-five years, he traveled throughout northern India, proclaiming the truths he had discovered and founding an order of monks and nuns to carry on his message.
At the age of eighty, after a long and fruitful life, he passed away peacefully in the small town of Kusinara, surrounded by a large number of disciples.
To his followers, the Buddha is neither a god, a divine incarnation, or a prophet bearing a message of divine revelation, but a human being who by his own striving and intelligence has reached the highest spiritual attainment of which man is capable — perfect wisdom, full enlightenment, complete purification of mind.
His function in relation to humanity is that of a teacher — a world teacher who, out of compassion, points out to others the way to Nibbana, final release from suffering.
His teaching, known as the Dhamma, offers a body of instructions explaining the true nature of existence and showing the path that leads to liberation.
Free from all dogmas and inscrutable claims to authority, the Dhamma is founded solidly upon the bedrock of the Buddha's own clear comprehension of reality, and it leads the one who practices it to that same understanding — the knowledge which extricates the roots of suffering.
The title “Dhammapada” which the ancient compilers of the Buddhist scriptures attached to our anthology means portions, aspects, or sections of Dhamma.
The work has been given this title because, in its twenty-six chapters, it spans the multiple aspects of the Buddha's teaching, offering a variety of standpoints from which to gain a glimpse into its heart.
Whereas the longer discourses of the Buddha contained in the prose sections of the Canon usually proceed methodically, unfolding according to the sequential structure of the doctrine, the Dhammapada lacks such a systematic arrangement.
The work is simply a collection of inspirational or pedagogical verses on the fundamentals of the Dhamma, to be used as a basis for personal edification and instruction.
In any given chapter several successive verses may have been spoken by the Buddha on a single occasion, and thus among themselves will exhibit a meaningful development or a set of variations on a theme.
But by and large, the logic behind the grouping together of verses into a chapter is merely the concern with a common topic.
The twenty-six chapter headings thus function as a kind of rubric for classifying the diverse poetic utterances of the Master, and the reason behind the inclusion of any given verse in a particular chapter is its mention of the subject indicated in the chapter's heading.
In some cases this may be a metaphorical symbol rather than a point of doctrine.
There also seems to be no intentional design in the order of the chapters themselves, though at certain points a loose thread of development can be discerned.
The teachings of the Buddha, viewed in their completeness, all link together into a single perfectly coherent system of thought and practice which gains its unity from its final goal, the attainment of deliverance from suffering.
But the teachings inevitably emerge from the human condition as their matrix and starting point, and thus must be expressed in such a way as to reach human beings standing at different levels of spiritual development, with their highly diverse problems, ends, and concerns and with their very different capacities for understanding.
Thence, just as water, though one in essence, assumes different shapes due to the vessels into which it is poured, so the Dhamma of liberation takes on different forms in response to the needs of the beings to be taught.
This diversity, evident enough already in the prose discourses, becomes even more conspicuous in the highly condensed, spontaneous and intuitively charged medium of verse used in the Dhammapada.
The intensified power of delivery can result in apparent inconsistencies which may perplex the unwary.
For example, in many verses the Buddha commends certain practices on the grounds that they lead to a heavenly birth, but in others he discourages disciples from aspiring for heaven and extols the one who takes no delight in celestial pleasures 
Often he enjoins works of merit, yet elsewhere he praises the one who has gone beyond both merit and demerit.
Without a grasp of the underlying structure of the Dhamma, such statements viewed side by side will appear incompatible and may even elicit the judgment that the teaching is self-contradictory.
The key to resolving these apparent discrepancies is the recognition that the Dhamma assumes its formulation from the needs of the diverse persons to whom it is addressed, as well as from the diversity of needs that may co-exist even in a single individual.
To make sense of the various utterances found in the Dhammapada, we will suggest a schematism of four levels to be used for ascertaining the intention behind any particular verse found in the work, and thus for understanding its proper place in the total systematic vision of the Dhamma.
This fourfold schematism develops out of an ancient interpretive maxim which holds that the Buddha's teaching is designed to meet three primary aims: human welfare here and now, a favorable rebirth in the next life, and the attainment of the ultimate good.
The four levels are arrived at by distinguishing the last aim into two stages: path and fruit.
The first level is the concern with establishing well-being and happiness in the immediately visible sphere of concrete human relations.
The aim at this level is to show man the way to live at peace with himself and his fellow men, to fulfill his family and social responsibilities, and to restrain the bitterness, conflict and violence which infect human relationships and bring such immense suffering to the individual, society, and the world as a whole.
The guidelines appropriate to this level are largely identical with the basic ethical injunctions proposed by most of the great world religions, but in the Buddhist teaching they are freed from theistic moorings and grounded upon two directly verifiable foundations: concern for one's own integrity and long-range happiness and concern for the welfare of those whom one's actions may affect.
The most general counsel the Dhammapada gives is to avoid all evil, to cultivate good and to cleanse one's mind.
But to dispel any doubts the disciple might entertain as to what he should avoid and what he should cultivate, other verses provide more specific directives.
One should avoid irritability in deed, word and thought and exercise self-control.
One should adhere to the five precepts, the fundamental moral code of Buddhism, which teach abstinence from destroying life, from stealing, from committing adultery, from speaking lies and from taking intoxicants; one who violates these five training rules “digs up his own root even in this very world”.
The disciple should treat all beings with kindness and compassion, live honestly and righteously, control his sensual desires, speak the truth and live a sober upright life, diligently fulfilling his duties, such as service to parents, to his immediate family and to those recluses and brahmans who depend on the laity for their maintenance.
A large number of verses pertaining to this first level are concerned with the resolution of conflict and hostility.
Quarrels are to be avoided by patience and forgiveness, for responding to hatred by further hatred only maintains the cycle of vengeance and retaliation.
The true conquest of hatred is achieved by non-hatred, by forbearance, by love.
One should not respond to bitter speech but maintain silence.
One should not yield to anger but control it as a driver controls a chariot.
Instead of keeping watch for the faults of others, the disciple is admonished to examine his own faults, and to make a continual effort to remove his impurities just as a silversmith purifies silver.
Even if he has committed evil in the past, there is no need for dejection or despair; for a man's ways can be radically changed, and one who abandons the evil for the good illuminates this world like the moon freed from clouds.
The sterling qualities distinguishing the man of virtue are generosity, truthfulness, patience, and compassion.
By developing and mastering these qualities within himself, a man lives at harmony with his own conscience and at peace with his fellow beings.
The scent of virtue, the Buddha declares, is sweeter than the scent of all flowers and perfumes.
The good man, like the Himalaya mountains, shines from afar, and wherever he goes he is loved and respected.
In its second level of teaching, the Dhammapada shows that morality does not exhaust its significance in its contribution to human felicity here and now, but exercises a far more critical influence in molding personal destiny.
This level begins with the recognition that, to reflective thought, the human situation demands a more satisfactory context for ethics than mere appeals to altruism can provide.
On the one hand our innate sense of moral justice requires that goodness be recompensed with happiness and evil with suffering; on the other our typical experience shows us virtuous people beset with hardships and afflictions and thoroughly bad people riding the waves of fortune.
Moral intuition tells us that if there is any long-range value to righteousness, the imbalance must somehow be redressed.
The visible order does not yield an evident solution, but the Buddha's teaching reveals the factor needed to vindicate our cry for moral justice in an impersonal universal law which reigns over all sentient existence.
This is the law of kamma, of action and its fruit, which ensures that morally determinate action does not disappear into nothingness but eventually meets its due retribution, the good with happiness, the bad with suffering.
In the popular understanding kamma is sometimes identified with fate, but this is a total misconception utterly inapplicable to the Buddhist doctrine.
Kamma means volitional action, action springing from intention, which may manifest itself outwardly as bodily deeds or speech, or remain internally as unexpressed thoughts, desires and emotions.
The Buddha distinguishes kamma into two primary ethical types: unwholesome kamma, action rooted in mental states of greed, hatred and delusion; and wholesome kamma, action rooted in mental states of generosity or detachment, goodwill and understanding.
The willed actions a person performs in the course of his life may fade from memory without a trace, but once performed they leave subtle imprints on the mind, seeds with the potential to come to fruition in the future when they meet conditions conducive to their ripening.
The objective field in which the seeds of kamma ripen is the process of rebirths called samsara.
In the Buddha's teaching, life is not viewed as an isolated occurrence beginning spontaneously with birth and ending in utter annihilation at death.
Each single life span is seen, rather, as part of an individualized series of lives having no discoverable beginning in time and continuing on as long as the desire for existence stands intact.
Rebirth can take place in various realms.
There are not only the familiar realms of human beings and animals, but ranged above we meet heavenly worlds of greater happiness, beauty and power, and ranged below infernal worlds of extreme suffering.
The cause for rebirth into these various realms the Buddha locates in kamma, our own willed actions.
In its primary role, kamma determines the sphere into which rebirth takes place, wholesome actions bringing rebirth in higher forms, unwholesome actions rebirth in lower forms.
After yielding rebirth, kamma continues to operate, governing the endowments and circumstances of the individual within his given form of existence.
Thus, within the human world, previous stores of wholesome kamma will issue in long life, health, wealth, beauty and success; stores of unwholesome kamma in short life, illness, poverty, ugliness and failure.
Prescriptively, the second level of teaching found in the Dhammapada is the practical corollary to this recognition of the law of kamma, put forth to show human beings, who naturally desire happiness and freedom from sorrow, the effective means to achieve their objectives.
The content of this teaching itself does not differ from that presented at the first level; it is the same set of ethical injunctions for abstaining from evil and for cultivating the good.
The difference lies in the perspective from which the injunctions are issued and the aim for the sake of which they are to be taken up.
The principles of morality are shown now in their broader cosmic connections, as tied to an invisible but all-embracing law which binds together all life and holds sway over the repeated rotations of the cycle of birth and death.
The observance of morality is justified, despite its difficulties and apparent failures, by the fact that it is in harmony with that law, that through the efficacy of kamma, our willed actions become the chief determinant of our destiny both in this life and in future states of becoming.
To follow the ethical law leads upwards — to inner development, to higher rebirths and to richer experiences of happiness and joy.
To violate the law, to act in the grip of selfishness and hate, leads downwards — to inner deterioration, to suffering and to rebirth in the worlds of misery.
This theme is announced already by the pair of verses which opens the Dhammapada, and reappears in diverse formulations throughout the work.
The ethical counsel based on the desire for higher rebirths and happiness in future lives is not the final teaching of the Buddha, and thus cannot provide the decisive program of personal training commended by the Dhammapada.
In its own sphere of application, it is perfectly valid as a preparatory or provisional teaching for those whose spiritual faculties are not yet ripe but still require further maturation over a succession of lives.
A deeper, more searching examination, however, reveals that all states of existence in samsara, even the loftiest celestial abodes, are lacking in genuine worth; for they are all inherently impermanent, without any lasting substance, and thus, for those who cling to them, potential bases for suffering.
The disciple of mature faculties, sufficiently prepared by previous experience for the Buddha's distinctive exposition of the Dhamma, does not long even for rebirth among the gods.
Having understood the intrinsic inadequacy of all conditioned things, his focal aspiration is only for deliverance from the ever-repeating round of births.
This is the ultimate goal to which the Buddha points, as the immediate aim for those of developed faculties and also as the long-term ideal for those in need of further development: Nibbana, the Deathless, the unconditioned state where there is no more birth, aging and death, and no more suffering.
The third level of teaching found in the Dhammapada sets forth the theoretical framework and practical discipline emerging out of the aspiration for final deliverance.
The theoretical framework is provided by the teaching of the Four Noble Truths, which the Buddha had proclaimed already in his first sermon and upon which he placed so much stress in his many discourses that all schools of Buddhism have appropriated them as their common foundation.
The four truths all center around the fact of suffering, understood not as mere experienced pain and sorrow, but as the pervasive unsatisfactoriness of everything conditioned.
The first truth details the various forms of suffering — birth, old age, sickness and death, the misery of unpleasant encounters and painful separations, the suffering of not obtaining what one wants.
It culminates in the declaration that all constituent phenomena of body and mind, “the aggregates of existence”, being impermanent and substanceless, are intrinsically unsatisfactory.
The second truth points out that the cause of suffering is craving, the desire for pleasure and existence which drives us through the round of rebirths, bringing in its trail sorrow, anxiety, and despair.
The third truth declares that the destruction of craving issues in release from suffering, and the fourth prescribes the means to gain release, the Noble Eightfold Path: right understanding, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.
If, at this third level, the doctrinal emphasis shifts from the principles of kamma and rebirth to the Four Noble Truths, a corresponding shift in emphasis takes place in the practical sphere as well.
The stress now no longer falls on the observation of basic morality and the cultivation of wholesome attitudes as a means to higher rebirths.
Instead it falls on the integral development of the Noble Eightfold Path as the means to uproot the craving that nurtures the process of rebirth itself.
For practical purposes the eight factors of the path are arranged into three major groups which reveal more clearly the developmental structure of the training: moral discipline, concentration, and wisdom.
By the training in morality, the coarsest forms of the mental defilements, those erupting as unwholesome deeds and words, are checked and kept under control.
By the training in concentration the mind is made calm, pure and unified, purged of the currents of distractive thoughts.
By the training in wisdom the concentrated beam of attention is focused upon the constituent factors of mind and body to investigate and contemplate their salient characteristics.
This wisdom, gradually ripened, climaxes in the understanding that brings complete purification and deliverance of mind.
In principle, the practice of the path in all three stages is feasible for people in any walk of life.
The Buddha taught it to laypeople as well as to monks, and many of his lay followers reached high stages of attainment.
However, application to the development of the path becomes most fruitful for those who have relinquished all other concerns in order to devote themselves wholeheartedly to spiritual training, to living the “holy life”.
For conduct to be completely purified, for sustained contemplation and penetrating wisdom to unfold without impediments, adoption of a different style of life becomes imperative, one which minimizes distractions and stimulants to craving and orders all activities around the aim of liberation.
Thus the Buddha established the Sangha, the order of monks and nuns, as the special field for those ready to dedicate their lives to the practice of his path, and in the Dhammapada the call to the monastic life resounds throughout.
The entry-way to the monastic life is an act of radical renunciation.
The thoughtful, who have seen the transience and hidden misery of worldly life, break the ties of family and social bonds, abandon their homes and mundane pleasures, and enter upon the state of homelessness.
Withdrawn to silent and secluded places, they seek out the company of wise instructors, and guided by the rules of the monastic training, devote their energies to a life of meditation.
Content with the simplest material requisites, moderate in eating, restrained in their senses, they stir up their energy, abide in constant mindfulness and still the restless waves of thoughts.
With the mind made clear and steady, they learn to contemplate the arising and falling away of all formations, and experience thereby “a delight that transcends all human delights,” a joy and happiness that anticipates the bliss of the Deathless.
The life of meditative contemplation reaches its peak in the development of insight, and the Dhammapada enunciates the principles to be discerned by insight-wisdom: that all conditioned things are impermanent, that they are all unsatisfactory, that there is no self or truly existent ego entity to be found in anything whatsoever.
When these truths are penetrated by direct experience, the craving, ignorance and related mental fetters maintaining bondage break asunder, and the disciple rises through successive stages of realization to the full attainment of Nibbana.
The fourth level of teaching in the Dhammapada provides no new disclosure of doctrine or practice, but an acclamation and exaltation of those who have reached the goal.
In the Pali canon the stages of definite attainment along the way to Nibbana are enumerated as four.
At the first, called “stream-entry”, the disciple gains his first glimpse of “the Deathless” and enters irreversibly upon the path to liberation, bound to reach the goal in seven lives at most.
This achievement alone, the Dhammapada declares, is greater than lordship over all the worlds.
Following stream-entry come two further stages which weaken and eradicate still more defilements and bring the goal increasingly closer to view.
One is called the stage of once-returner, when the disciple will return to the human world at most only one more time; the other the stage of non-returner, when he will never come back to human existence but will take rebirth in a celestial plane, bound to win final deliverance there.
The fourth and final stage is that of the arahant, the Perfected One, the fully accomplished sage who has completed the development of the path, eradicated all defilements and freed himself from bondage to the cycle of rebirths.
This is the ideal figure of early Buddhism and the supreme hero of the Dhammapada.
Extolled in Chapter under his own name and in Chapter under the name brahmana, “holy man,” the arahant serves as a living demonstration of the truth of the Dhamma.
Bearing his last body, perfectly at peace, he is the inspiring model who shows in his own person that it is possible to free oneself from the stains of greed, hatred and delusion, to rise above suffering, to win Nibbana in this very life.
The arahant ideal reaches its optimal exemplification in the Buddha, the promulgator and master of the entire teaching.
It was the Buddha who, without any aid or guidance, rediscovered the ancient path to deliverance and taught it to countless others.
His arising in the world provides the precious opportunity to hear and practice the excellent Dhamma.
He is the giver and shower of refuge, the Supreme Teacher who depends on nothing but his own self-evolved wisdom.
Born a man, the Buddha always remains essentially human, yet his attainment of Perfect Enlightenment elevates him to a level far surpassing that of common humanity.
All our familiar concepts and modes of knowing fail to circumscribe his nature: he is trackless, of limitless range, free from all worldliness, the conqueror of all, the knower of all, untainted by the world.
Always shining in the splendor of his wisdom, the Buddha by his very being, confirms the Buddhist faith in human perfectibility and consummates the Dhammapada's picture of man perfected, the arahant.
The four levels of teaching just discussed give us the key for sorting out the Dhammapada's diverse utterances on Buddhist doctrine and for discerning the intention behind its words of practical counsel.
Interlaced with the verses specific to these four main levels, there runs throughout the work a large number of verses not tied to any single level but applicable to all alike.
Taken together, these delineate for us the basic world view of early Buddhism.
The most arresting feature of this view is its stress on process rather than persistence as the defining mark of actuality.
The universe is in flux, a boundless river of incessant becoming sweeping everything along; dust motes and mountains, gods and men and animals, world system after world system without number — all are engulfed by the irrepressible current.
There is no creator of this process, no providential deity behind the scenes steering all things to some great and glorious end.
The cosmos is beginningless, and in its movement from phase to phase it is governed only by the impersonal, implacable law of arising, change, and passing away.
However, the focus of the Dhammapada is not on the outer cosmos, but on the human world, upon man with his yearning and his suffering, his immense complexity, his striving and movement towards transcendence.
The starting point is the human condition as given, and fundamental to the picture that emerges is the inescapable duality of human life, the dichotomies which taunt and challenge man at every turn.
Seeking happiness, afraid of pain, loss and death, man walks the delicate balance between good and evil, purity and defilement, progress and decline.
His actions are strung out between these moral antipodes, and because he cannot evade the necessity to choose, he must bear the full responsibility for his decisions.
Man's moral freedom is a reason for both dread and jubilation, for by means of his choices he determines his own individual destiny, not only through one life, but through the numerous lives to be turned up by the rolling wheel of samsara.
If he chooses wrongly he can sink to the lowest depths of degradation, if he chooses rightly he can make himself worthy even of the homage of the gods.
The paths to all destinations branch out from the present, from the ineluctable immediate occasion of conscious choice and action.
The recognition of duality extends beyond the limits of conditioned existence to include the antithetical poles of the conditioned and the unconditioned, samsara and Nibbana, the “near shore” and the “far shore.” The Buddha appears in the world as the Great Liberator who shows man the way to break free from the one and arrive at the other, where alone true safety is to be found.
But all he can do is indicate the path; the work of treading it lies in the hands of the disciple.
The Dhammapada again and again sounds this challenge to human freedom: man is the maker and master of himself, the protector or destroyer of himself, the savior of himself.
In the end he must choose between the way that leads back into the world, to the round of becoming, and the way that leads out of the world, to Nibbana.
And though this last course is extremely difficult and demanding, the voice of the Buddha speaks words of assurance confirming that it can be done, that it lies within man's power to overcome all barriers and to triumph even over death itself.
The pivotal role in achieving progress in all spheres, the Dhammapada declares, is played by the mind.
In contrast to the Bible, which opens with an account of God's creation of the world, the Dhammapada begins with an unequivocal assertion that mind is the forerunner of all that we are, the maker of our character, the creator of our destiny.
The entire discipline of the Buddha, from basic morality to the highest levels of meditation, hinges upon training the mind.
A wrongly directed mind brings greater harm than any enemy, a rightly directed mind brings greater good than any other relative or friend.
The mind is unruly, fickle, difficult to subdue, but by effort, mindfulness and unflagging self-discipline, one can master its vagrant tendencies, escape the torrents of the passions and find “an island which no flood can overwhelm”.
The one who conquers himself, the victor over his own mind, achieves a conquest which can never be undone, a victory greater than that of the mightiest warriors.
What is needed most urgently to train and subdue the mind is a quality called heedfulness.
Heedfulness combines critical self awareness and unremitting energy in a process of keeping the mind under constant observation to detect and expel the defiling impulses whenever they seek an opportunity to surface.
In a world where man has no savior but himself, and where the means to his deliverance lies in mental purification, heedfulness becomes the crucial factor for ensuring that the aspirant keeps to the straight path of training without deviating due to the seductive allurements of sense pleasures or the stagnating influences of laziness and complacency.
Heedfulness, the Buddha declares, is the path to the Deathless; heedlessness, the path to death.
The wise who understand this distinction abide in heedfulness and experience Nibbana, “the incomparable freedom from bondage”.
As a great religious classic and the chief spiritual testament of early Buddhism, the Dhammapada cannot be gauged in its true value by a single reading, even if that reading is done carefully and reverentially.
It yields its riches only through repeated study, sustained reflection, and most importantly, through the application of its principles to daily life.
Thence it might be suggested to the reader in search of spiritual guidance that the Dhammapada be used as a manual for contemplation.
After his initial reading, he would do well to read several verses or even a whole chapter every day, slowly and carefully, relishing the words.
He should reflect on the meaning of each verse deeply and thoroughly, investigate its relevance to his life, and apply it as a guide to conduct.
If this is done repeatedly, with patience and perseverance, it is certain that the Dhammapada will confer upon his life a new meaning and sense of purpose.
Infusing him with hope and inspiration, gradually it will lead him to discover a freedom and happiness far greater than anything the world can offer.
— Bhikkhu Bodhi
The Therigatha, the ninth book of the Khuddaka Nikaya, consists of poems — stanzas in all — in which the early nuns recount their struggles and accomplishments along the road to arahantship.
Their stories are told with often heart-breaking honesty and beauty, revealing the deeply human side of these extraordinary women, and thus serve as inspiring reminders of our own potential to follow in their footsteps.
A selected anthology of suttas from the Therigatha, Poems of the Elders: An Anthology from the Theragāthā & Therīgāthā, by Thanissaro Bhikkhu, is distributed free of charge by Metta Forest Monastery.
It is also available to read online and in various ebook formats at dhammatalks.org
For a complete translation, see Poems of Early Buddhist Nuns, translated by C.A.F.
Rhys Davids and K.R.
Norman.
The translator appears in the square brackets.
Pali verse numbers appear in the braces.
Like a pot of pickled greens boiled dry.
Bursting the mass of darkness.
Free at last from three crooked things!
Collapsing to the ground from weakness —the Dhamma appears!
The Theragatha, the eighth book of the Khuddaka Nikaya, consists of poems —, stanzas in all — in which the early monks recount their struggles and accomplishments along the road to arahantship.
Their stories are told with often heart-breaking honesty and beauty, revealing the deeply human side of these extraordinary men, and thus serve as inspiring reminders of our own potential to follow in their footsteps.
A selected anthology of suttas from the Theragatha, Poems of the Elders: An Anthology from the Theragāthā & Therīgāthā, by Thanissaro Bhikkhu, is distributed free of charge by Metta Forest Monastery.
It is also available to read online and in various ebook formats at dhammatalks.org
For a complete translation, see Elders' Verses I translated by K.R.
Norman.
The translator appears in the square brackets.
Pali verse numbers appear in the braces.
Go ahead and rain!
Evil mind-states vanish with the breeze.
Discernment, like a fire in the night.
The rewards of allowing yourself to be tamed.

Steadfast in oneself.
Unsmeared with regard to all dhammas.

Refreshment in the wilderness.
There's no tying down one who knows.
A happiness not of the flesh.
Contemplation of the body.
Be careful, Mara!
Splitting a horse's hair with an arrow.
Shatter ignorance to bits!
Acquiescing to discomfort like an elephant in battle.

A fair trade.
Be good to all creatures.

Practice mindfully, as if your head were on fire.
Lightning can't shake one in jhana.
Free at last from three crooked things!
The delight of a well-focused mind.
Where neither rain nor wind can reach.
Are you wasting your hut?
Why hope for a new hut?
How far can you see?
Free of sorrows.
Three sights prompted this monk to leave home.
Who can make a fool wise?
When will the fool awaken?
A pleasure not of the flesh.
All paths do not lead to the same goal.
Raising myself from the flood.

Sensual pleasures are stressful.
Shun the evil companion!
Blanketed with the flowers of release.

How light my body!
With your faculties exposed, you’re prey to danger.

The perception of “wilderness.” 
Ponder inconstancy, constantly.
Refreshment in the wilderness.
If you’re greedy for carcass pleasures, where will you gain excellence?

Aging drops on us like a curse.
Leave chitter-chatter.
Do jhāna.

Cutting through the roots of suffering.
The Petavatthu contains poems, each explaining how unwholesome deeds led to the rebirth of a being into the miserable realm of the “hungry ghosts”.
The translator appears in the square brackets.
The Vimanavatthu of the Khuddaka Nikaya is a collection of stories in verse describing the vimana — a kind of personal heavenly mansion — inhabited by beings reborn as gods or goddesses as a reward for meritorious deeds performed by them as human beings.
All the stories follow a similar pattern.
They begin with an introductory verse in which the god or goddess is asked about the cause for his or her rebirth within that particular mansion.
The deva thereupon relates his or her previous good deeds.
— John D.
Ireland, in Vangisa: An Early Buddhist Poet
In the passages listed below the translator appears in the square brackets.
Editor's note: There are currently no translations from the Abhidhamma at Access to Insight.
The seven books of the Abhidhamma Pitaka, the third division of the Tipitaka, offer an extraordinarily detailed analysis of the basic natural principles that govern mental and physical processes.
Whereas the Sutta and Vinaya Pitakas lay out the practical aspects of the Buddhist path to Awakening, the Abhidhamma Pitaka provides a theoretical framework to explain the causal underpinnings of that very path.
In Abhidhamma philosophy the familiar psycho-physical universe is distilled to its essence: an intricate web of impersonal phenomena and processes unfolding at an inconceivably rapid pace from moment to moment, according to precisely defined natural laws.
According to tradition, the essence of the Abhidhamma was formulated by the Buddha during the fourth week after his Enlightenment.
Seven years later he is said to have spent three consecutive months preaching it in its entirety in one of the deva realms, before an audience of thousands of devas, each day briefly commuting back to the human realm to convey to Ven.
Sariputta the essence of what he had just taught.
Sariputta mastered the Abhidhamma and codified it into roughly its present form.
Although parts of the Abhidhamma were recited at the earlier Buddhist Councils, it wasn't until the Third Council that it became fixed into its present form as the third and final Pitaka of the canon.
Despite its relatively late entrance into the Canon, the Abhidhamma stands as an essential pillar of classical Theravada Buddhist thought.
Its significance does, however, vary considerably across regional and cultural boundaries.
In Thai Buddhism, for example, the Abhidhamma play a relatively minor role in Buddhist doctrine and practice.
In Sri Lanka and Myanmar, however, they hold the same venerated status as the Vinaya and Sutta Pitakas themselves.
The modern Burmese approach to the teaching and practice of Satipatthana meditation, in particular, relies heavily on an Abhidhammic interpretation of meditative experience.
Regardless of the Abhidhamma's position on the shelf of Buddhist canonical texts, the astonishing detail with which it methodically constructs a quasi-scientific model of mind, insures its place in history as a monumental feat of intellectual genius.
The Abhidhamma Pitaka is divided into seven books, although it is the first and last that together lay out the essence of Abhidhamma philosophy.
The seven books are:
The Abhidhamma Pitaka has a well-deserved reputation for being dense and difficult reading.
The best way to begin studying Abhidhamma is not to dive right into its two key books, but to explore some of the more modern — and readable — commentarial texts.
These will help you get oriented to the Abhidhamma's challenging terrain:
The Sutta Nipata, the fifth book of the Khuddaka Nikaya, consists of short suttas divided into five vaggas.
A complete translation of the Sutta Nipāta, Sutta Nipāta: The Discourse Group,, by Thanissaro Bhikkhu, is distributed free of charge by Metta Forest Monastery.
It is also available to read online and in various ebook formats at dhammatalks.org
Another complete translation, which also includes the commentaries, is Bhikkhu Bodhi's The Suttanipata: an Ancient Collection of the Buddha’s Discourses Together with Its Commentaries.
Some of the passages listed below originally appeared in John Ireland's The Discourse Collection: Selected Texts from the Sutta Nipata,.
The braces contain the corresponding verse numbers in the original Pali text, as listed in H.
Saddhatissa's The Sutta-Nipata.
See An Introduction to the Sutta Nipāta, by Thanissaro Bhikkhu.
See The Atthaka Vagga — The Octet Chapter: An Introduction, by Thanissaro Bhikkhu.
See The Parayanavagga — The Chapter on the Way to the Far Shore: An Introduction, by Thanissaro Bhikkhu.
The Udana, the third book of the Khuddaka Nikaya, offers a rich collection of short suttas, each of which culminates in a short verse uttered by the Buddha.
Altogether there are eighty suttas, arranged in eight vaggas, or chapters.
The translator appears in the square brackets.
The braces contain the starting page number in the PTS romanized Pali edition.
The Khuddakapatha is a collection of nine short passages that may have been designed as a primer for novice monks and nuns.
It includes several essential texts that are still chanted daily by laypeople and monastics around the world of Theravada Buddhism.
The Sutta Pitaka, the second division of the Tipitaka, consists of more than, suttas delivered by the Buddha and his close disciples during and shortly after the Buddha's forty-five year teaching career, as well as many additional verses by other members of the Sangha.
More than one thousand sutta translations are available on this website.
The suttas are grouped into five nikayas, or collections:
The “Division of Short Books”, consisting of fifteen books:
The Vinaya Pitaka, the first division of the Tipitaka, is the textual framework upon which the monastic community is built.
It includes not only the rules governing the life of every Theravada bhikkhu and bhikkhuni, but also a host of procedures and conventions of etiquette that support harmonious relations, both among the monastics themselves, and between the monastics and their lay supporters, upon whom they depend for all their material needs.
When the Buddha first established the Sangha, the community initially lived in harmony without any codified rules of conduct.
As the Sangha gradually grew in number and evolved into a more complex society, occasions inevitably arose when a member would act in an unskillful way.
Whenever one of these cases was brought to the Buddha's attention, he would lay down a rule establishing a suitable punishment for the offense, as a deterrent to future misconduct.
The Buddha's standard reprimand was itself a powerful corrective:
It is not fit, foolish man, it is not becoming, it is not proper, it is unworthy of a recluse, it is not lawful, it ought not to be done.
How could you, foolish man, having gone forth under this Dhamma and Discipline which are well-taught,?… It is not, foolish man, for the benefit of un-believers, nor for the increase in the number of believers, but, foolish man, it is to the detriment of both unbelievers and believers, and it causes wavering in some.
— The Book of the Discipline, Part I, by I.B.
Horner, pp.
-.
The monastic tradition and the rules upon which it is built are sometimes naïvely criticized — particularly here in the West — as irrelevant to the “modern” practice of Buddhism.
Some see the Vinaya as a throwback to an archaic patriarchy, based on a hodge-podge of ancient rules and customs — quaint cultural relics that only obscure the essence of “true” Buddhist practice.
This misguided view overlooks one crucial fact: it is thanks to the unbroken lineage of monastics who have consistently upheld and protected the rules of the Vinaya for almost, years that we find ourselves today with the luxury of receiving the priceless teachings of Dhamma.
Were it not for the Vinaya, and for those who continue to keep it alive to this day, there would be no Buddhism.
It helps to keep in mind that the name the Buddha gave to the spiritual path he taught was “Dhamma-vinaya” — the Doctrine and Discipline — suggesting an integrated body of wisdom and ethical training.
The Vinaya is thus an indispensable facet and foundation of all the Buddha's teachings, inseparable from the Dhamma, and worthy of study by all followers — lay and ordained, alike.
Lay practitioners will find in the Vinaya Pitaka many valuable lessons concerning human nature, guidance on how to establish and maintain a harmonious community or organization, and many profound teachings of the Dhamma itself.
But its greatest value, perhaps, lies in its power to inspire the layperson to consider the extraordinary possibilities presented by a life of true renunciation, a life lived fully in tune with the Dhamma.
Many of the formidable social and cultural problems we face today are rooted in the sharp schism that has divided Western civilization between science and religion, where science claims invincible knowledge based on the empirical investigation of the natural world, while religion can do little more than call for faith in supernatural creeds and obedience to codes of ethics that require restraint, self-discipline, and self-sacrifice.
Since religion, as traditionally understood, often rests on little more than blithe promises and pompous threats, its appeals to our allegiance seldom win assent, while the ethical ideals it advocates stand hardly a fighting chance against the constant injunction — thrust upon us by TV, radio, and signboard — to enjoy life to the hilt while we can.
As a result, a vast portion of humankind today has become alienated from religion as a meaningful guide to life, left with no alternative but to plunge headlong into the secular religion of consumerism and hedonism.
Too often, those in the religious camp, sensing the threat secularism poses to their own security, feel driven toward an aggressive fundamentalism in a desperate bid to salvage traditional loyalties.
The quest to establish a sound basis for conduct in today's world has been made particularly difficult because one consequence of the dominance of the scientific worldview has been the banishment of values from the domain of the real.
While many scientists, in their personal lives, are staunch advocates of such ideals as world peace, political justice, and greater economic equality, the worldview promulgated by modern science grants to values no objective grounding in the grand scheme of things.
From this perspective, their root and basis is purely subjective, and thus they bring along all the qualities the notion of subjectivity suggests: being personal, private, relative, even arbitrary.
The overall effect of this scission, despite the best intentions of many responsible scientists, has been to give a green light to lifestyles founded on the quest for personal gratification and a power drive aimed at the exploitation of others.
In contrast to the classical Western antithesis of religion and science, Buddhism shares with science a common commitment to uncover the truth about the world.
Both Buddhism and science draw a sharp distinction between the way things appear, and the way they really are, and both offer to open our minds to insights into the real nature of things normally hidden from us by false ideas based on sense perception and “common sense.” Nevertheless, despite this affinity, it is also necessary to recognize the great differences in aim and orientation that separate Buddhism and science.
While both may share certain conceptions about the nature of reality, science is essentially a project designed to provide us with objective, factual knowledge, with information pertaining to the public domain, while Buddhism is a spiritual path intended to promote inner transformation and the realization of the highest good, called enlightenment, liberation, or Nibbana.
In Buddhism, the quest for knowledge is important not as an end in itself, but because the main cause of our bondage and suffering is ignorance, not understanding things as they really are, and thus the antidote needed to heal ourselves is knowledge or insight.
Again, the knowledge to be acquired by the practice of Dhamma differs significantly from that sought by science in several major respects.
Most importantly, the knowledge sought is not simply the acquisition of objective information about the constitution and operations of the physical world, but a deep personal insight into the real nature of one's personal existence.
The aim is not to understand reality from the outside, but from the inside, from the perspective of one's own, living experience.
One seeks not factual knowledge, but insight or wisdom, a personal knowledge, inescapably subjective, whose whole value lies in its transformative impact on one's life.
Concern with the outer world, as an object of knowledge, arises only insofar as the outer world is inextricably implicated in experience.
As the Buddha says: “It is in this body, with its perception and thought, that I declare is the world, the origin of the world, the cessation of the world, and the way to the cessation of the world.
Because Buddhism takes personal experience as its starting point, without aiming to use experience as a springboard to an impersonal, objective type of knowledge, it includes within its domain the entire spectrum of qualities disclosed by personal experience.
This means that Buddhism gives prime consideration to values.
But even more, values for Buddhism are not merely projections of subjective judgments which we fashion according to our personal whims, social needs, or cultural conditioning; to the contrary, they are written into the texture of reality just as firmly as the laws of motion and thermodynamics.
Hence, values can be evaluated: rated in terms of truth and falsity, ranked as valid and invalid, and part of our task in giving meaning to our lives is to unearth the true scheme of values.
To determine the true gradation of values, we must turn our attention inward and use subjective criteria of investigation; but what we find, far from being private or arbitrary, is an integral part of the objective order, permeated by the same lawfulness as that which governs the movement of the planets and the stars.
Affirmation of the objective reality of value implies another major distinction between Buddhism and science.
In order for the liberating knowledge of enlightenment to arise, the investigator must undergo a profound personal transformation guided by inner perception of the genuine values.
While natural science can be undertaken as a purely intellectual discipline, the Buddhist quest in its entirety is an existential discipline which can only be implemented by regulating one's conduct, purifying one's mind, and refining one's capacity for attention to one's own bodily and mental processes.
This training requires compliance with ethics all the way through, and thus ethical guidelines support and pervade the entire training from its starting point in right action to its culmination in the highest liberation of the mind.
What is especially noteworthy is that the ethical thrust of the Buddhist training and its cognitive thrust converge on the same point, the realization of the truth of selflessness.
It is just here that contemporary science approaches Buddhism in its discovery of the process nature of actuality, implying the lack of an ultimate substance concealed behind the sequence of events.
But this correspondence again points to a fundamental difference.
In Buddhism the impermanent and substanceless nature of reality is not simply a factual truth apprehended by objective knowledge.
It is above all an existential truth, a transformative principle offering the key to right understanding and right liberation.
To use this key to open the door to spiritual freedom, its sole purpose, we must govern our conduct on the premise that the idea of a substantial self is a delusion.
It is insufficient merely to give intellectual assent to the idea of selflessness and turn it into a plaything of thought.
The principle must be penetrated by training ourselves to discover the absence of selfhood in its subtlest hiding place, the deep recesses of our own minds.
It is to be hoped that Buddhist thinkers and open-minded scientists, by sharing their insights and reflections, can show us an effective way to heal the rift between objective knowledge and spiritual wisdom and thus bring about a reconciliation between science and spirituality.
In this way spiritual practice will become an integral part of the discipline aimed at knowledge, and spiritual practice and knowledge in combination will become the tools for achieving the highest good, enlightenment and spiritual freedom.
This has always been the position of Buddhism, as evidenced by the most ancient texts themselves.
We must remember that the Buddha, the Enlightened One, is not only, like the scientist, a lokavidu, “a knower of the world” but also, above all, a vijjacaranasampanno, “one complete in both knowledge and conduct.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Today the practice of insight meditation has gained global popularity, yet in achieving this success it has undergone a subtle metamorphosis.
Rather than being taught as an integral part of the Buddhist path, it is now often presented as a secular discipline whose fruits pertain more to life within the world than to supramundane release.
Many meditators testify to the tangible benefits they have gained from the practice of insight meditation, benefits that range from enhanced job performance and better relationships to deeper calm, more compassion, and greater awareness.
However, while such benefits may certainly be worthwhile in their own right, taken by themselves they are not the final goal that the Buddha himself holds up as the end point of his training.
That goal, in the terminology of the texts, is the attainment of Nibbana, the destruction of all defilements here and now and deliverance from the beginningless round of rebirths.
Perhaps the most powerful pressure that has shaped the contemporary expression of insight meditation has been the need to transplant the practice into a largely secular environment remote from its traditional matrix of Buddhist faith and doctrine.
Given the skeptical climate of our age, it is quite appropriate that newcomers to Dhamma be invited to explore for themselves the potential inherent in the practice.
Perhaps the last thing they need is to have the full agenda of Buddhist doctrine thrust upon them from the start.
However, though we may initially take up meditation with an open and explorative mind, at a certain point in our practice we inevitably arrive at a crossroads where we are faced with a choice.
Either we can continue the meditation as a purely naturalistic, non-religious discipline, or we can transpose the practice back into its original setting of Buddhist faith and understanding.
If we choose the first route, we might still deepen our meditation and reap more abundantly the same benefits we have obtained so far — deeper calm, more equanimity, greater openness, even a kind of penetration of the here and now.
Nevertheless, as desirable as these fruits might be in themselves, viewed against the Buddha's word they remain incomplete.
For the practice of insight meditation to achieve the full potential ascribed to it by the Buddha, it must be embraced by several other qualities that rivet it to the framework of the teaching.
Foremost among such qualities is the complementary pair of faith and right view.
As a factor of the Buddhist path, faith does not mean blind belief but a willingness to accept on trust certain propositions that we cannot, at our present stage of development, personally verify for ourselves.
These propositions concern both the nature of reality and the higher reaches of the path.
In the traditional map of the Buddhist training, faith is placed at the beginning, as the prerequisite for the later stages comprised in the triad of virtue, concentration, and wisdom.
The canonical texts do not seem to envisage the possibility that a person lacking faith in the tenets specific to the Dhamma could take up the practice of insight meditation and reap positive results.
Yet today such a phenomenon has become extremely widespread.
It is quite common now for meditators to make their first contact with the Dhamma through intensive insight meditation, and then to use this experience as a touchstone for assessing their relationship to the teaching.
At this juncture, the choice they make divides meditators into two broad camps.
One consists of those who focus exclusively on the tangible benefits the practice yields here and now, suspending all concern with what lies beyond the horizons of their own experience.
The other consists of those who recognize the practice to flow from a fount of understanding far deeper and broader than their own.
To follow this wisdom to its source, such meditators are prepared to subordinate their own familiar assumptions to the disclosures of the teaching and thus embrace the Dhamma as an integral whole.
The fact that insight meditation can be seriously practiced even outside the domain of Buddhist faith raises an interesting question never explicitly posed by the canon and commentaries.
If insight meditation can be pursued solely for its immediately visible benefits, then what role does faith play in the development of the path?
Certainly, faith as a full acceptance of Buddhist doctrine is not a necessary condition for Buddhist practice.
As we have seen, those who do not follow the Dhamma as a path to spiritual deliverance might still accept the Buddhist ethical precepts and practice meditation as a way to inner peace.
Faith must therefore play a different role than that of a simple spur to action, but the exact nature of this role remains problematic.
Perhaps the solution will emerge if we ask what faith actually means in the context of Buddhist practice.
It should be clear at once that faith cannot be adequately explained simply as reverence for the Buddha, or as some alloy of devotion, admiration, and gratitude.
For while these qualities often exist alongside faith, they may all be present even when faith is absent.
If we examine faith more closely, we would see that besides its emotive ingredients, it also involves a cognitive component.
This consists in a readiness to accept the Buddha as the unique discoverer and proclaimer of liberating truth.
Seen from this angle, faith necessarily involves a decision.
As the word decision implies, to place faith in something is to exercise an act of discrimination.
Thus Buddhist faith entails, at least implicitly, a rejection of the claims of other spiritual teachers to be bearers of the liberating message on a par with the Buddha himself.
As a decision, faith also entails acceptance.
It involves a willingness to open oneself to the principles made known by the Enlightened One and adhere to them as trustworthy guides to knowledge and conduct.
It is this decision that separates those who take up the practice of insight meditation as a purely naturalistic discipline from those who practice it within the framework of the Buddhist faith.
The former, by suspending any judgment about the picture of the human condition imparted by the Buddha, limit the fruit of the practice to those that are compatible with a secular, naturalistic worldview.
The latter, by accepting the Buddha's own disclosure of the human condition, gain access to the goal that the Buddha himself holds up as the final aim of the practice.
The second pillar that supports the practice of insight meditation is the cognitive counterpart of faith, namely, right view.
Though the word “view” might suggest that the practitioner actually sees the principles considered to be right, at the outset of the training this is seldom the case.
For all but a few exceptionally gifted disciples, right view initially means right belief, the acceptance of principles and doctrines out of confidence in the Buddha's enlightenment.
Though Buddhist modernists sometimes claim that the Buddha said that one should believe only what one can verify for oneself, no such statement is found in the Pali canon.
What the Buddha does say is that one should not accept his teachings blindly but should inquire into their meaning and attempt to realize their truth for oneself.
Contrary to Buddhist modernism, there are many principles taught by the Buddha as essential to right understanding that we cannot, in our present state, see for ourselves.
These are by no means negligible, for they define the framework of the Buddha's entire program of deliverance.
Not only do they depict the deeper dimensions of the suffering from which we need release, but they point in the direction where true liberation lies and prescribe the steps that lead to realization of the goal.
These principles include the tenets of both “mundane” and “transcendent” right view.
Mundane right view is the type of correct understanding that leads to a fortunate destination within the round of rebirths.
It involves an acceptance of the principles of kamma and its fruit; of the distinction between meritorious and evil actions; and of the vast expanse and multiple domains of samsara within which rebirth may occur.
Transcendent right view is the view leading to liberation from samsara in its entirety.
It entails understanding the Four Noble Truths in their deeper ramifications, as offering not merely a diagnosis of psychological distress but a description of samsaric bondage and a program for final release.
It is the transcendent right view that comes at the head of the Noble Eightfold Path and steers the other seven factors toward the cessation of suffering.
While the actual techniques for practicing insight meditation may be identical for those who pursue it as a purely naturalistic discipline and those who adopt it within the framework of Dhamma, the two styles of practice will nevertheless differ profoundly with respect to the results those techniques can yield.
When practiced against the background of a naturalistic understanding, insight meditation can bring greater calm, understanding, and equanimity, even experiences of insight.
It can purify the mind of the coarser defilements and issue in a tranquil acceptance of life's vicissitudes.
For these reasons, this mode of practice should not be disparaged.
However, from a deeper point of view, this appropriation of Buddhist meditation remains incomplete.
It is still confined to the sphere of conditioned existence, still tied to the cycle of kamma and its fruit.
When, however, insight meditation is sustained from below by deep faith in the Buddha as the perfectly enlightened teacher, and illuminated from above by the wisdom of the teaching, it acquires a new capacity that the other approach lacks.
It now functions with the support of dispassion, moving toward ultimate deliverance.
It becomes the key to open the doors to the Deathless, the means to gain a freedom that can never be lost.
With this, insight meditation transcends the limits of the conditioned, transcends even itself, to arrive at its proper goal: the eradication of all the fetters of existence and release from the beginningless round of birth, aging, and death.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
“Have I not told you already, Ananda, that there must be parting and separation from all who are dear and agreeable to oneself?” These words, spoken by the Buddha to his devoted attendant on the eve of his parinibbana, took on an especially poignant meaning for me this past rainy season, when in quick succession my beloved ordination teacher, Ven.
Balangoda Ananda Maitreya Mahanayaka Thera, and my longtime spiritual friend, Ven.
Piyadassi Nayaka Thera, succumbed to the implacable law of impermanence.
Ven.
Ananda Maitreya expired on th July, just one month short of his nd birthday, Ven.
Piyadassi followed exactly a month later, on th August, a little more than a month past his th birthday.
Both monks had lived full and fruitful lives in the Sangha throughout the twentieth century, leaving behind such deep tracks in the contemporary history of Sri Lankan Buddhism that it would hardly be an exaggeration to say that their death spells the end of an epoch.
Yet, though the two were firmly rooted in Sri Lanka and its ancient Theravada heritage, neither was a narrow nationalist who restricted his field of activity to his native land.
To the contrary, they both had a breadth of heart and range of vision that enabled them to feel at home anywhere.
Their rich inner springs of compassion extended to people throughout the world, and even in their ripe old age they both traveled the globe to teach the Dhamma to all who would lend an ear.
Both monks also transcended the limits of hidebound traditionalism, achieving for themselves a rare synthesis of tradition and modernity.
They had studied English in their youth; had read widely in world literature, other religions, and modern modes of thought; and had developed approaches to the Dhamma that highlighted its timeless rationality and timely contemporary relevance.
My own relationship with these two elders was close and deeply personal, unfolding under such unlikely circumstances that it seems a karmic nexus had reached out across the oceans and linked us half a world away.
The story of this relationship began in, when I was living at a Vietnamese Buddhist center in Los Angeles and teaching world religions at a college in the sprawling conurbation of southern California.
One day at our center we received notice that a Buddhist monk from Sri Lanka would be coming to LA, and we invited him to stay with us and give a series of lectures on Theravada Buddhism.
That Buddhist monk was none other than Ven.
Piyadassi, who was then on his second world Dhamma tour.
His lectures were excellent, conveying with crystal clarity and gentle humor the heart of the Buddha's teachings which he knew so well.
At the end of the week, when we parted at the LA airport, Ven.
Piyadassi suggested to me that some day I should come to Sri Lanka and spend time in a Buddhist monastery.
This suggestion resonated with an idea that was already taking shape in my mind, and thus the following year, when I decided to come to Asia to enter the Sangha, I wrote to Ven.
Piyadassi to remind him of his invitation.
In reply he gave me the name and address of a “senior prelate,” Ven.
Balangoda Ananda Maitreya.
At first I hesitated to contact this elder, for he was already years old and I feared that at such an age he might not be fit enough to teach me.
Little did I realize I was being introduced to a monk of such amazing strength and vitality that he would still be striding the globe well into his th year.
In any case, I took the chance and wrote to him, and his welcoming reply set me on a “journey to the East” that culminated in my ordination as a bhikkhu and a three-year tutelage under him at his small village temple near Balangoda.
The future Mahanayaka Thera had been born just across the paddy field from this temple in and was ordained there as a novice in.
His teacher, Ven.
Denihena Silananda, reputed to be the most learned monk in the Balangoda area, subjected his young pupil to a nine-year course of training so rigorous it left him only a few hours of sleep per night.
But Ananda Maitreya emerged with a masterly knowledge of the Tipitaka and its commentaries and of the languages Pali and Sanskrit.
At this point his far-sighted guru, aware of the need of the hour, sent him to Ananda College in Colombo to study English, a move which equipped him for his important work later in life.
Through the middle decades of this century Ven.
Ananda Maitreya played a pivotal role in almost all the major episodes in the modern history of Sri Lankan Buddhism.
As a teacher at Ananda College he helped to educate many of the future leaders of the nation.
He founded a prestigious monastic college in Balangoda, which he served as principal for years.
He served on the Buddhist Committee of Inquiry which sought to rectify the injustices imposed on Buddhism during the period of colonial rule.
He was a member of the Buddha Jayanthi Tripitaka Editorial Board.
He compiled the first modern biography of the Buddha in Sinhala and wrote school textbooks for the study of Pali, Sanskrit, and English.
He joined the faculty of the new Vidyodaya University as professor of Mahayana Buddhist studies.
He was elected the first Mahanayaka Thera of the United Amarapura Nikaya.
On the wider Buddhist scene he participated in the Sixth Buddhist Council in Burma, where he was appointed the Sri Lankan representative on the Final Editing Committee and later became chairman of the entire Council.
In, at the age of, a new leaf opened up to Ven.
Ananda Maitreya's life: that of a Buddhist missionary to the West.
Between then and he must have made seven or eight extended Dhamma missions which brought him to Britain, France, the U.S.A., and Canada.
He also appeared in the well-known BBC television series, The Long Search, where, as the informant on Theravada Buddhism, he deeply impressed viewers around the world.
During one stay in the U.S., at the age of, he learned to use the computer and returned home with his own little desktop unit: living proof that one is never too old to learn!
On a trip to Colombo in June I had the fortune to meet Ven.
Ananda Maitreya in his temple near Colombo.
He had just returned from a trip to Taiwan, Thailand, and Singapore, and appeared to be in sound health, except for complaints about “ a little phlegm trouble.” He then seemed so fit, so clear-minded and energetic, that we never suspected the “little phlegm trouble” would turn into the illness that only a month later would take him from our midst.
It is testimony to the high regard in which he was held in this country that a hundred thousand people attended his cremation, and the whole road which the cortege traveled from Avissawela to Balangoda was lined with yellow banners and flags to welcome the prelate on his last journey.
Ven.
Piyadassi needs hardly an introduction to our BPS readers, who will know him through his classic The Buddha's Ancient Path, The Spectrum of Buddhism, and his many contributions to the Wheel, Bodhi Leaves, and Damsak series.
It was in fact a sermon he gave in late that led to the birth of the BPS on New Year's day in; an edited version of that sermon appeared as Wheel No., The Seven Factors of Enlightenment.
From onward he was the editor of the Damsak series, the Sinhala counterpart of the Wheel, a role he fulfilled amidst a host of other duties so numerous and demanding that they would normally require the talents of three or four monks.
He was the director of the Vajirarama Monastery in Colombo, chief incumbent of the Sambodhi Vihara, and patron of a large number of Buddhist organizations, chiefly those devoted to helping the poor and handicapped.
He was also one of the country's most popular preachers, constantly in demand because of his ability to convey the deep truths of the Dhamma in clear, simple language.
The salient characteristic of Ven.
Piyadassi's life is summed up in the title of his biography, Piyadassi: The Wandering Monk.
This, however, was not a leisurely wandering on foot with bowl and shoulder bag, but a global, airborne wandering that took him on fourteen international Dhamma tours to over fifty countries.
Within Sri Lanka Ven.
Piyadassi was, in his own words, “a shuttle on a loom,” moving back and forth between Colombo and the provinces with hardly a pause.
On his frequent trips to Kandy, once or twice a month, he would stay next door to me in the Udawattakele Forest Reserve, and through this close connection and our shared work for the BPS our friendship became deep, steadfast, and solid.
His loss will be irreparable and his place irreplaceable, throughout Sri Lanka and particularly at the BPS.
May these two great elders, who for so long held aloft the torch of the Dhamma, attain the supreme bliss of Nibbana.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Outside a Buddhist temple, early on a summer Saturday morning, a monk named Bhikkhu Tissa is sweeping the stone walk.
His work is neither slow nor fast, but steady and careful, as if the sweeping of dust and leaves were something important to him.
From the road some yards away comes the hum of an approaching automobile.
In the morning quiet the hum rises to a rumble, and a shiny sports car passes by.
If Bhikkhu Tissa were watching — which he is not — he would notice that the driver momentarily slows down and regards him curiously before disappearing around a curve.
Then there is a slight screech of tires and in a moment the sports car returns and zooms into the driveway by the temple.
Mr.
Carp, a young man in expensive, casual clothes, climbs out and approaches the monk.
MR.
CARP: Hey there, friend.
BHIKKHU TISSA: Good morning.
CARP: My name's Carp.
I'm a friend of Charlie Prentice.
You know him, I think?
BHIKKHU: Oh yes, Mr.
Prentice comes by quite often now.
CARP: You are Bhikkhu Tissa, aren't you?
BHIKKHU: Yes, I am.
CARP: Or Venerable Tissa, Charlie says.
You guys sure have some strange names.
BHIKKHU: Is there anything I can do for you, Mr.
Carp?
CARP: Probably not, to tell the truth.
I'm on my way down to the beach, and anyway I'm not really interested in Buddhism.
But I was reading these books, see.
BHIKKHU: Books on Buddhism?
BHIKKHU: Why were you reading books on Buddhism if you're not interested in it?
It sounds like a terrible waste of time.
CARP: Well, I mean — maybe it was!
Charlie gave me those books, and let me tell you they were pretty annoying.
All that talk about suffering.
I mean, page after page of misery, old age, death, and so on.
It sounds like Buddhism is the most pessimistic religion in the world.
I got to thinking about it, and I was wondering why you Buddhists have such a negative attitude toward life and why you dwell on suffering.
BHIKKHU: You might also say that suffering dwells on us.
CARP: How's that?
Anyhow, I saw you just now, and I thought, why not ask the guy about it?
So I have a few questions.
Unless you're busy, of course.
BHIKKHU: I'd be glad to try to answer questions about the Dhamma.
CARP: “Dhamma.” That's the word that keeps popping up in those books.
What does it mean?
I forget.
BHIKKHU: Usually it means just the teaching of the Buddha.
It also means truth, reality, the way things are, the law of the universe, bare phenomena themselves, the path to deliverance — depending on the context.
CARP: It's pretty important, huh?
BHIKKHU: The word is just a word.
What's behind the word is the most important thing in the world.
CARP: I figured you'd say something like that.
I'd like to hear about it.
Say, could we sit down somewhere?
BHIKKHU: Sure.
How about this nice patch of grass over here?
CARP: I guess you don't have any lawn chairs around here!
BHIKKHU: We make do with what we have.
I find grass very accommodating.
They sit down in a shady spot.
Mr.
Carp uncomfortably inspects the area for ants.
CARP: You know, Bhikkhu Tissa, I never met a Buddhist monk before.
I understand people treat you monks with all kinds of respect.
BHIKKHU: Depends on the person, depends on the monk.
CARP: You get called “venerable sir” and all that.
BHIKKHU: We get called other things too.
CARP: Yes, I bet you do!
But let me get on to my questions.
This business of suffering really bothers me.
Isn't there enough trouble in the world without you Buddhists harping on it?
BHIKKHU: It's precisely because there is trouble in the world that we pay attention to it, or harp on it, if you will.
CARP: Do you think you can do anything about it?
BHIKKHU: Yes.
That's the reason Buddhism exists.
CARP: This I want to hear.
To me, it seems like we should emphasize the happy side of life.
Why should we pay attention to all the misery?
BHIKKHU: If a wasp stings you, do you pay attention to it?
CARP: Well, of course.
BHIKKHU: But what good does that do?
Why dwell on it?
CARP: Because I want to get away from it, because I don't want to be stung again.
BHIKKHU: If you don't want to be stung again it would make sense to learn something about wasps, wouldn't it?
Where they build their nests, what's likely to upset them, how to keep from annoying them, and so on.
There are a great many kinds of suffering in the world, and they all have their own causes and characteristics.
If you feel any of these afflictions, or think that you might be prey to them, wouldn't it be wise to take a good look at them and see what might be done about them?
CARP: Yes, that's so, I suppose.
But any way you go there's some amount of trouble, so I prefer to accent the positive, so to speak.
You've got to take the bitter with the sweet!
BHIKKHU: Would I be wrong in guessing that you have a fair amount of “sweet” in your life?
CARP: It's true, I'm getting along real well.
I work for a real estate development company, organizing some new projects.
And to tell the truth, I'm doing pretty well at it.
Life's good to me, I admit.
That's why I object to Buddhism.
BHIKKHU: Are you completely satisfied with the way things are?
CARP: Not completely.
Who is?
The important thing is to keep totally in command of your life.
BHIKKHU: Permit me to disagree.
Nobody keeps totally in command of his life.
Consider just your body.
You look pretty healthy.
But can you keep your body from ever getting sick?
Can you keep it from getting old and breaking down?
Or from dying?
CARP: No, I can't do that.
BHIKKHU: Or consider your work.
Can you be sure your colleagues will treat you fairly?
CARP: Those guys?
No way!
BHIKKHU: Will your creditors always be tolerant?
Will your customers always pay their bills quickly?
Will your competitors put up no resistance?
CARP: There's a lot of uncertainty in business.
BHIKKHU: There's a lot of uncertainty in social life, in family life, in all spheres of activity.
Am I wrong?
What do you think?
CARP: No, I can't deny it.
BHIKKHU: Or, to get right down to the most important thing, can you keep totally in control of your own mind?
CARP: I'm a pretty cheerful guy.
BHIKKHU: That's not what I asked, Mr.
Carp.
When things go wrong around you, can you keep your mind steady and peaceful?
CARP: Of course not.
How could that be?
BHIKKHU: If you tell your mind not to get upset or angry or distracted, does it obey you?
CARP: That's a funny way to look at it.
But no, I guess my mind pretty much does what it likes.
Thoughts and feelings just come boiling up.
BHIKKHU: Then you certainly aren't in command of your mind, are you?
And if you can't control your body or your mind or the actions of other people, you can hardly say you're in command of your life.
CARP: It was just a figure of speech.
BHIKKHU: Let's examine this a bit further, if you don't mind.
How many people, do you think, can control their lives to any degree?
CARP: Not many probably.
You never know what will happen.
BHIKKHU: Right.
You never know what will happen.
If it's pleasant you will be elated.
If it's unpleasant you will be upset and depressed.
If someone is kind to you, you'll be gratified.
If they cheat you, you'll be angry.
Tell me, Mr.
Carp, do you see any independence or security in this state of affairs?
CARP: Since you put it like that, not much.
I suppose we have to admit we live in insecurity and dependence to a large degree.
BHIKKHU: Would you call this situation pleasant or unpleasant?
CARP: Unpleasant, mostly.
BHIKKHU: The Buddha spoke about sorrow, pain, and insecurity not because he liked them but because he saw them as the key to an understanding of life.
CARP: Pessimistic, like I say.
BHIKKHU: A fact is just a fact.
If you're going to come to a good decision about how to act, you need accurate information about the matter at hand.
So you look, and you take note of the important details you see, regardless of whether or not they are personally appealing to you.
CARP: What was the Buddha looking for?
BHIKKHU: Ah!
A good question.
He was looking for a way out.
CARP: A way out of… dependence and insecurity?
BHIKKHU: Exactly.
The word that describes this situation is dukkha.
This is usually translated as “suffering,” but it means a great deal more than that.
“Unsatisfactoriness” might be a better word.
CARP: Well, excuse me, Bhikkhu Tissa, but when you get right down to it, everything is unsatisfactory to some degree.
BHIKKHU: Indeed?
CARP: Nothing is completely dependable.
You can't expect that.
Everything has flaws.
BHIKKHU: How about permanent?
Are pleasure and security permanent?
CARP: Not in my experience.
You've got to keep chasing them down.
That's what life is all about.
BHIKKHU: Let's see if I can summarize a bit.
Nobody — at least, nobody that we know of — can truly control his own body and make it do exactly what he wants.
Nobody can tell his mind how to behave when disturbing events occur.
Nobody can prevent disasters from happening to him or keep people from doing things he doesn't like.
Nobody can make pleasures last or keep good feelings from fading away.
So we find ourselves always running after something desirable or away from something frightful.
What would you call this state of affairs?
There is a pause while Mr.
Carp fidgets, plucks grass blades, laughs.
CARP: Suffering.
Okay, suffering or unsatisfactoriness or whatever you want to call it.
It goes pretty deep, does it?
BHIKKHU: It is stitched right into the fabric of things.
You could even say it's the thread in the fabric itself.
CARP: What a view of life!
Now, let me ask, the Buddha was looking for a way out.
And he found it, I suppose?
BHIKKHU: He did.
The way out that he found is called Dhamma, the word we began with.
CARP: So this Dhamma that the Buddha created can get us out of suffering?
BHIKKHU: The Buddha didn't create it.
He only discovered it and made it known.
The Dhamma exists whether or not anybody knows it or understands it, just as apples will continue to fall from trees whether or not anyone understands the law of gravity.
CARP: Is Dhamma some kind of god?
BHIKKHU: No.
The Dhamma has many aspects, but basically it is just the way things are, the underlying laws of the universe.
CARP: That sounds simple enough.
Why isn't it self-evident, then?
Why don't people recognize it?
BHIKKHU: Suppose on a dangerous seacoast there were a powerful light, a great beacon in a lighthouse.
Would that be self-evident to sailors?
CARP: Certainly.
BHIKKHU: But what if the sailors never came out of their cabins, or had the odd habit of wearing heavy cloths over their heads, or slept all the time?
CARP: They wouldn't see it, then.
They would run aground.
But what kind of metaphor are you suggesting?
BHIKKHU: Fundamental truth, or Dhamma, is not by its nature hidden or obscure, though countless philosophers have thought so.
But there is something that prevents us from seeing the Dhamma.
It is called ignorance.
This ignorance, this not-knowing, this blankness, covers our minds and distorts our view of reality.
The sailors in the ship may never leave the cabin — they may remain simply sunk in ignorance without trying to get out.
Or they may intentionally blind themselves with the masks of foolish beliefs and delusions.
Or they may sleep all the time, out of laziness and stupidity.
So they will not see the light and may even deny that any such thing exists.
CARP: But suppose somebody does see this Dhamma, or sees enough of it to know it's a good thing.
BHIKKHU: Then, if he's sensible, he'll follow it, he'll seek its protection.
CARP: But what kind of protection can Dhamma offer against all this suffering and uncertainty we were just talking about?
BHIKKHU: Above all, the Dhamma offers relief.
There is relief from doubt, relief from fear, relief from mental anguish, relief from grief.
As we study and practice Dhamma, our ignorance about how the universe works is gradually reduced.
We begin to understand cause and effect.
We see that certain results follow from certain actions and we learn to govern our actions in order to get happy results.
So we gain relief from doubt and begin to have confidence in our ability to make sense of the world.
Right now, we may be subject to all kinds of fears about what may happen to us, thinking that some terrible fate may come crashing down on us at any moment.
But the Dhamma teaches us that fear is one result of clinging to a permanence that does not really exist.
When we are reconciled to the always-changing nature of things, fear can be overcome.
Also, we gain relief from mental anguish, another result of clinging and craving, because we train our minds according to Dhamma merely to pay attention to events and objects, not to clutch them as “me” or “mine.” If we have no obsession with being a “sufferer,” then the suffering itself loses force.
Then, as for grief, we have less to endure because we learn that all life is a constant flow and that grief is, in a sense, simply our own unhappy invention.
To know how life works is a great protection, because it gives us confidence and helps us avoid suffering.
CARP: These are big promises, Bhikkhu Tissa!
BHIKKHU: These are just possibilities, very real possibilities — but not things that will happen simply because someone calls himself a Buddhist.
I don't expect you to believe them.
CARP: You don't?
BHIKKHU: Certainly not.
Buddhism holds out great hope to mankind but it does not expect or advise people to believe a set of doctrines without confirmation.
CARP: And what kind of confirmation is necessary?
BHIKKHU: Why, the confirmation of your own mind, your own reason, your own experience.
Could anything less satisfy you?
CARP: Well, I believe in my own experience, all right.
But why do you bother to tell me about these benefits of the Dhamma?
BHIKKHU: There is a saying that Buddhas only point the way.
The Buddha doesn't “save” anybody.
He only teaches people how to save themselves.
He points out the problems of life and shows how they may be solved.
We who are followers of the Buddha try to observe the same principle — we try to point out the way and encourage people to make the journey for themselves.
CARP: So you think that if people will make this journey they will find confirmation of Buddhist teachings for themselves?
BHIKKHU: Yes.
You see, the truths the Buddha points out are right here in the body and the mind.
Anyone can see them who puts his mind to it, but he has to put his mind to it.
CARP: Can you explain some of these truths?
I assure you there's no danger of my believing them without proof!
BHIKKHU: We've already touched on the truth of suffering.
As we've noted, suffering or unsatisfactoriness is present in all worldly phenomena to one degree or another.
This is one characteristic of existence that the Buddha repeatedly emphasizes.
Then there is the fact of impermanence.
CARP: Well, nothing lasts forever.
Sure, I know that.
BHIKKHU: Excuse me, but the mark of aniccata or impermanence is extremely deep.
Anybody can notice gross physical changes — and these are certainly one aspect of impermanence — but few people realize that everything that exists in the world is whirling in a blur of change, rising and falling every second, flashing in and out of existence, being born and dying, appearing and perishing continually.
CARP: You know, modern physicists describe atoms and sub-atomic particles in almost the same way — as changing with incredible speed all the time.
BHIKKHU: So they do.
But it's not necessary to study physics to understand this.
The best laboratory is the mind itself.
Have you ever known anything to change faster than your own mind?
CARP: Sometimes I think my head will bust wide open, the way my thoughts run on!
BHIKKHU: Sometimes faster and wilder than you would wish?
CARP: I suppose I've already admitted I don't have much control over my mind.
Sometimes it's just a storm of passions, ideas, emotions, memories.
BHIKKHU: Can you remember a time when it wasn't like this?
CARP: No, and that's pretty depressing.
BHIKKHU: It's simply the nature of the mind.
Part of our trouble comes from conceiving the notion that the mind is ours, that it is stable and permanent, a self or an instrument of self.
But mind is just mind, a collection of impersonal functions.
Its nature is continual change.
It isn't you and it isn't I.
CARP: I think we're getting into deep waters here!
BHIKKHU: I hope so.
The point I want to make is that when you look at it — especially when you look at it — the mind is like a pan of popping popcorn.
It just goes on jumping and making a racket and nobody knows what it will do next.
It is the best demonstration of impermanence there is.
It just keeps changing.
No matter how you want it to hold still, it changes.
All the aspects of mind are constantly changing: feelings, perceptions, mental formations, and consciousness itself.
Wouldn't you agree?
CARP: I guess so.
Memories, feelings, all those things keep running on forever.
BHIKKHU: This leads us on to the third mark of existence: non-self, or in Pali, anatta.
CARP: I believe I read about that.
But it seemed paradoxical to me.
I mean, there is no self, but we think there is, only it's just an illusion, and so on.
BHIKKHU: The basic marks of existence aren't obscure in themselves; here again it's our own ignorance, reinforced by craving, that perverts our view.
Let's consider non-self in the light of the other two characteristics I've mentioned — unsatisfactoriness and impermanence.
Everything in the world is changing, impermanent, not lasting, so it is always, to some degree, liable to suffering or unsatisfactoriness.
Anything we like or enjoy we want to keep on enjoying, but we can't because it changes, breaks up, drifts away.
CARP: Like my girl friends!
BHIKKHU: We are always liable to be separated from what we love or united with what we hate.
CARP: If you only knew some of the idiots I have to work with.
BHIKKHU: It's unsatisfactory to be where we don't want to be and it's unsatisfactory to lose what we cherish.
But that is the unstable nature of things.
CARP: Wait a minute.
I thought of something that doesn't cause suffering!
My car.
It's a real beauty, you can see.
BHIKKHU: And it never breaks down?
CARP: Never.
Of course, I just bought it two weeks ago.
But it runs perfectly.
No problems!
BHIKKHU: Really?
CARP: Sure.
Of course, I've got to watch out for it.
The other day in the parking lot some idiot opened his door and banged the side!
Took out a chip of paint.
Unbelievable.
Brand new car!
I was furious.
I could have killed the guy.
BHIKKHU: I see.
Was that a pleasant sensation?
CARP: Actually I felt lousy.
It ruined the afternoon.
My nerves are pretty bad when I get into conflict.
Okay, I know what you'll say.
I admit, that was unsatisfactory, that was suffering.
The car's paint is impermanent and impermanent things are unsatisfactory.
BHIKKHU: Well, then, amid all this unsatisfactoriness and impermanence, do you see any real self?
CARP: A self?
Sure.
I see me.
I see my own self.
BHIKKHU: Be careful now, Mr.
Carp.
What exactly does this self consist of?
CARP: Well, I'd have to say it's my mind.
BHIKKHU: Buddhism analyzes “mind” into feelings, perceptions, mental formations, and consciousness.
Is your self one or all of these?
CARP: Well, I suppose I'd say all.
BHIKKHU: But haven't we established that the mind and its functions are constantly changing?
CARP: Yeah, I guess so.
BHIKKHU: So, if the mind is constantly changing, where is your self from one moment to the next?
CARP: I don't know.
BHIKKHU: Wouldn't it be changing?
But in that case what does this self really amount to?
What makes it “you” if from moment to moment it changes into something else?
When we say “self” we are really talking about some stable identity, aren't we?
But where there is no stability we can't rightly talk about a self.
Furthermore, if the mind is your self, if it is your essence, then why can't you control it at will?
Why can't you force it to be calm or happy or creative?
And if you can't control it, as you admit, if you can't make it stay here or go there, then who does it really belong to?
What sort of self is it?
CARP: A pretty poor sort, I must say.
BHIKKHU: Now, this mind, which changes every moment, every instant, which you cannot control at will — does it make you happy?
Does it please you?
CARP: Mostly it's a pain, the way my mind runs on.
BHIKKHU: Then if it causes pain, if it's unreliable, if it's constantly in flux, can we honestly call it a self?
CARP: Oh.
Wait, now, I'm confused.
Perhaps “self” is just a way of speaking.
BHIKKHU: Indeed it is, but what is behind the word?
Just a flux of uncontrollable, unreliable conditions.
CARP: Well, Bhikkhu Tissa, I don't know what to say.
If you look at it that way, self is a rather flimsy concept.
BHIKKHU: Just so.
It's a concept that doesn't accurately reflect the facts.
Events occur, one after the other, with terrific speed.
We can observe the process.
But “self” is merely a concept imposed on top of it.
When we Buddhists talk about “non-self” or anatta, we mean this bare process of events giving rise to other events.
CARP: Yes, I follow your logic, but still I feel that I am a self or have a self.
BHIKKHU: On a conventional level, “self” is a perfectly useful term.
It's necessary for language and communication.
I am I and you are you — that's true enough in everyday language.
But the trouble arises when we attribute to self a fundamental reality it doesn't possess.
By imagining a precious ego, by believing foolishly that we are permanent and satisfactory “selves,” we set ourselves up for suffering.
CARP: Because the universe is not permanent or satisfactory?
BHIKKHU: Exactly.
Anyone who persists in living contrary to the laws of the universe will continue to experience suffering.
CARP: This is really extraordinary.
I'm going to have to think this over.
But you haven't convinced me, not at all!
BHIKKHU: These three marks of existence — impermanence, unsatisfactori-ness, and non-self — are significant because they indicate the way the universe is, and the sort of conditions we have to deal with.
Unfortunately, most of us, out of ignorance, see things incorrectly.
We take what is changing as stable; we take what is imperfect and unsatisfactory as satisfactory; we take what is without a self as having a self.
CARP: If what you say is true, then most people are living exactly backward to the way they should be living.
BHIKKHU: Yes, and that in itself is another aspect of dukkha or unsatisfactoriness.
CARP: All right, you Buddhists do have some justification for talking about suffering.
But one thing I still don't understand is why people misinterpret the world so grossly.
Is it simply out of ignorance?
BHIKKHU: When we talk about ignorance we mean more than the absence of information.
We mean self-deception and lack of judgment as well.
For example, if we have a problem to solve, we can gather information about the problem and from that information come to a conclusion.
But what if the information is faulty?
What if we have misunderstood the facts to start with?
Then we begin reasoning with false premises, and no matter how clever we are our conclusions will turn out false, too.
The problem of understanding life itself depends on properly understanding facts.
When we are ignorant and uninstructed we tend to take things at face value.
Human nature being what it is, we gravitate toward pleasant objects and shun unpleasant objects.
Because we are fond of pleasure, we try to magnify it wherever we see it, and because we hate pain we magnify that.
Simply speaking, we run to extremes.
We have no special motivation to analyze the objects of our senses as long as they keep us entertained, as they do so well.
Moreover, because we live a fair number of years and because there is a continuity in our experience, we fasten onto the notion that we are selves or souls who experience things and have a definite identity.
We don't know any better, and without investigation we have no particular reason to question this life of loves and hates and quick assumptions.
We rely on our ignorant biases and continue to suffer.
CARP: This ignorance sounds like plain carelessness and stupidity.
BHIKKHU: Yes.
To the Buddha, ignorance is not just a neutral not-knowing; it is a very reprehensible defilement, a dangerous and foolish self-deception.
CARP: Now there's a funny old word.
“Defilement.” It sounds so negative.
Who would want to believe in “defilement” nowadays?
BHIKKHU: Well, I ask you, who would want to escape suffering?
CARP: There is a connection?
BHIKKHU: Of course.
Ignorance is the basic defilement, the source of all greed, hatred, and delusion.
A mind clouded by defilements cannot see reality.
Not understanding, not seeing the marks of impermanence, suffering, and non-self, a person acts as if things were quite the contrary.
Thus arises conflict with the laws of nature, and misery follows.
CARP: But how exactly does this misery come about?
BHIKKHU: Are you familiar with the Four Noble Truths?
CARP: Oh, them.
Yes, I read about them.
They sounded depressing at the time.
BHIKKHU: But not now?
CARP: Well, I'm thinking about it.
BHIKKHU: Sometimes people only hear the first noble truth, which states the universal problem — that life passes away, that it breaks up, that health gives way to sickness and life gives way to death, that all experiences and components of ordinary existence are impermanent and flawed.
Not that they are necessarily suffering all the time — indeed, they are sometimes full of pleasure — but they are always liable to suffering.
CARP: That is a pretty sobering assessment.
BHIKKHU: The second noble truth is the origin of suffering.
Suffering has a cause.
This is a deceptively simple statement that contains much meaning.
Suffering does not happen spontaneously.
It is caused and conditioned by other phenomena.
As the primary cause, the Buddha singled out craving.
Wherever this craving or obsessive desire springs up, suffering is sure to follow.
Why?
Because craving leads to grasping and clinging to what is inherently unstable.
All delightful objects, experiences, and persons break up and disappear, so when ever we indulge in craving we are bound for disappointment and pain.
CARP: All right, I am with you so far.
But how do we get out of this mess?
BHIKKHU: The first two noble truths state the problem.
The second two reveal the solution.
The third noble truth is called the truth of the cessation or ending of suffering.
CARP: Well, it's about time!
BHIKKHU: The Buddha realized that every phenomenon that arises, arises from causes and conditions, and that when those causes and conditions are removed, the phenomenon must disappear.
Suffering has a cause.
The cause is craving.
When craving is brought to an end, suffering is also brought to an end.
CARP: But that's easier said than done, I expect.
BHIKKHU: Yes, and that's where the fourth noble truth comes in.
The Buddha states that there is a problem, namely suffering; there is a cause of the problem; there is the possibility of eliminating the problem; and finally there is a specific way to eliminate the problem.
The fourth noble truth is simply the Noble Eightfold Path, the Buddha's prescription for dealing with the unsatisfactoriness in life.
The eight factors of the path are eight virtues or skills which can gradually weaken and ultimately destroy the craving that oppresses us.
Right Views means having a correct understanding of the way the universe operates, the way suffering springs up in our lives.
Right Intentions means directing our thoughts and intentions toward wholesome things, toward kindness, mental purity, and self-training.
Right Speech means refraining from harsh, false, or useless speech.
Right Action means acting in a virtuous way, carrying out our intentions, and following the moral precepts.
Right Livelihood means earning a living by honest and respectable means, fairly, not cheating anyone, not harming any living creatures.
Right Effort means making an effort to guard the mind, to overcome unwholesome mental states such as greed and hatred and to replace them with generosity and loving-kindness.
Right Mindfulness means developing attention and presence of mind, not being careless or unobservant.
Right Concentration means focusing the mind skillfully on objects so as to know them deeply without being distracted.
These eight factors summarize the training.
CARP: I hate to criticize, Bhikkhu Tissa, but that word “training” has an unpleasant sound.
Life's hard enough.
Who wants any more “training” than he has to endure already?
BHIKKHU: What makes you think this training is disagreeable?
CARP: I mean, all those factors, all that discipline.
I don't think I'd like to take it all on me.
BHIKKHU: Pardon me, but the purpose is to take it all off you.
CARP: I don't understand.
BHIKKHU: Buddhism as a religion — or as a way of life — aims at lightening your burden, not increasing it.
It is the untrained, undisciplined mind that is weighed down and obstructed with woe, just as a person who has no training in finding his way in a jungle is likely to lose the path and struggle miserably through thick vines and thorns.
We are so accustomed to carrying unpleasant burdens that we can only think of taking on new, pleasant burdens, instead of putting them all down.
The Dhamma is a training in putting down.
As such, it liberates and gladdens us.
CARP: Well, now, Bhikkhu Tissa, I've got to say I enjoy some of these “burdens.” Why should I get rid of them when they are really the only things that make my life worthwhile?
BHIKKHU: Here we have arrived at an important point, Mr.
Carp.
Every person has pleasant, unpleasant, and neutral experiences.
Naturally we prefer the pleasant.
But the burdens I refer to are not the experiences themselves.
They are our attachments to those experiences.
CARP: Ah, you're getting subtle on me.
BHIKKHU: Remember, the Buddha identifies craving as the primary cause of our pain, disappointment, and suffering.
This craving or mental hunger is a strain or burden on the mind.
It causes us to struggle against the natural, changing state of things.
For instance, suppose we hunger after some desirable object and try to obtain it.
Then we suffer the strain of longing, the worry about getting the object, the fear that somebody else will get it first, and the uncertainty of whether we really have the means to obtain it.
If we fail to achieve our ends, our inflamed mind suffers disappointment.
If we do get what we want, then we have to protect it, take care of it, see that it is not stolen or destroyed.
So we suffer anxiety on account of our craving and attachment.
Then we have to deal with the unfaithfulness of our own mind.
The mind changes!
We may decide we don't like the object after all, so we have the worry of getting rid of it.
Or the object turns out to cause us problems of one kind or another.
Then our attachment turns to aversion and we suffer the misery of being united with what we don't like.
Or suppose we continue to enjoy the object.
Not only does the mind change, the object changes.
It breaks, it runs away, it rusts, it gets old.
Sooner or later we are separated from it, and then we feel grief.
Then, not knowing any better, to cover up this grief, our insatiable mind goes lurching after some new object, mental or material.
And the wheel keeps turning through the seconds and through the years.
And we do not escape.
CARP: Bhikkhu Tissa, there's a lot of truth in what you say.
I can't deny it.
But how else can a person live, if not by reaching for things?
How can anyone be happy?
BHIKKHU: Indeed, we must reach for things, but the right things and in the right way.
To put down the burden of craving does not mean to stop acting in the world.
It means to cut off our foolish hunger and vanity.
The virtuous man, the happy man, is one who follows the middle way, who is moderate in his desires.
Buddhism teaches that good results follow good actions and evil results follow evil actions.
Events cause and condition other events, so we should act responsibly, knowing that we do, in effect, shape our own future.
When we cut off an impulse of blind craving we gain peace in this very moment because the mind is no longer irritated, and we gain benefit in the future because we have set up no painful cycle of grasping and losing.
It is advantageous to live simply without superfluous possessions and entanglements, but the most important thing is to root out craving itself.
CARP: So I don't necessarily have to give up things?
BHIKKHU: Ah, Mr.
Carp, you must give up what is painful.
You must give up what hurts.
CARP: And craving hurts?
BHIKKHU: Just look at your own mind, that's all.
CARP: Do you think I should meditate?
BHIKKHU: I think you should examine yourself and watch the changes in your mind and body.
CARP: Where does all this lead, Bhikkhu Tissa?
Does it lead to happiness?
BHIKKHU: Yes, but not happiness as most people have been conditioned to think.
True happiness is not the piling up of sense-pleasures.
True happiness comes from liberation from the defilements, from clear sight, from an open, generous heart that does not fear the ceaseless change of things.
CARP: What about all this I've read about “supra-mundane wisdom”?
BHIKKHU: Wisdom arises from the practice of Dhamma.
It is a tool that helps us reach the goal, but it is not the goal itself.
CARP: The goal is the end of suffering, right?
BHIKKHU: Right.
Some people develop what you might call a craving after wisdom — wanting to know the secrets of the workings of things, out of curiosity or pride.
This is knowing for its own sake, and it is not useful.
In fact, the Buddha refused to answer speculative questions about the origin and the future of the universe, because such questions are distractions from the matter at hand — the problem of suffering and the overcoming of suffering.
CARP: You know, I had the idea that Buddhism was only concerned with very lofty, esoteric things — not the everyday existence of ordinary people.
It's somewhat encouraging to hear that Buddhism deals with how to achieve happiness in this world.
Not that I necessary believe it, of course.
BHIKKHU: Sometimes people who are too much caught up in the world turn cynical, thinking that there is nothing higher than the gaining and losing of status, objects, or relationships.
Not seeing that a higher, worthier, and more peaceful everyday life is possible, they become bogged down in entertainments that fail to satisfy.
CARP: I wonder if you're referring to me, Bhikkhu Tissa.
Well, it doesn't matter.
I can testify that lots of my unreligious friends just don't believe that any different kind of life exists.
You're suggesting that it does.
BHIKKHU: The Dhamma suggests that it does.
Now let me return to your charge of pessimism.
CARP: Well, I'm having second thoughts about that.
BHIKKHU: Buddhism deals with the problem of suffering and the cure of suffering.
Once we recognize that a disease exists we can treat the disease if we have the medicine at hand.
Imagine the joy of health to someone who has never before known health.
Imagine the relief of someone who has carried a boulder on his back all his life and now can set it down.
CARP: Yes, I can see that.
But really, Bhikkhu Tissa, I don't want to go live in a cave and meditate all the time.
I've got to make a living in this world.
BHIKKHU: There's no need to live in a cave.
The practice of Dhamma can and should be carried on wherever you find yourself.
It is compatible with any kind of respectable livelihood.
It depends on mindfully observing our actions from moment to moment, whatever we are doing, and so it can benefit the businessman as well as the monk.
CARP: Well, my friend Charlie Prentice sure seems cheerful lately.
But a fellow has got to figure out what is best for him.
Tell me, if I wanted to — if a person wanted to practice Buddhism, to follow the Dhamma, what should he do?
I'm speaking hypothetically, of course.
How does somebody become a Buddhist?
BHIKKHU: Somebody becomes a Buddhist by following the teachings of the Buddha.
CARP: Like the Noble Eightfold Path?
BHIKKHU: Yes.
But there's a brief saying that covers it all: to abstain from all evil, to cultivate the good, and to purify the mind — this is the teaching of all the Buddhas.
CARP: That sounds pretty good.
Could you explain just a bit?
BHIKKHU: To abstain from all evil means to refrain from all actions that cause harm to oneself or others.
It means to follow the Five Precepts: to avoid killing, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, and taking intoxicants.
CARP: I'm afraid I've been known to break a few of those precepts!
Do you mean, for instance, that I shouldn't kill at all?
Like not stepping on these ants crawling all around here?
BHIKKHU: The precepts protect not only all animals; they protect you as well, because they keep you from doing actions which will coarsen your mind and cause you suffering later on.
CARP: But suppose somebody just can't keep all these precepts perfectly?
BHIKKHU: The precepts are not commandments.
The Buddha wasn't a god who laid down absolute rules.
The Buddha did, however, perfectly understand the world, and he simply pointed out that when someone keeps the precepts he is acting according to Dhamma and building up protection and happiness for himself and other beings.
The closer we can live to the precepts the better it is for us.
CARP: Keeping those precepts would certainly make you think.
Now, how about doing good?
BHIKKHU: Avoiding evil is the first step.
But beyond that we have to act virtuously and generously.
A Buddhist is expected to demonstrate his kindness by helping his fellow beings, by making an effort to have a positive effort on his society.
He should show the blessings of the Dhamma in his own conduct.
CARP: And what about purifying the mind?
BHIKKHU: The practitioner restrains his unwholesome impulses by observing the precepts and he becomes a force for good through his own will.
And through it all he should strive to cleanse himself of the defilements of greed, hatred, and delusion, and the ignorance that spawns them.
He should move steadily, at whatever pace is suitable for him, toward deliverance from all suffering, toward enlightenment.
CARP: What you describe is impressive, really.
How can an ordinary guy do such a thing?
I'm not really a strong person, I know.
I am what I am mainly out of weakness, I guess.
BHIKKHU: Mr.
Carp, let me emphasize one thing especially.
The Dhamma is the noble path for everyone, weak or strong or in between.
Do what you can, because every act of kindness or virtue or mindfulness takes you a step closer to deliverance from sorrow.
CARP: You're really serious about this, aren't you?
I wish I could be like that — serious, confident.
You know, the trouble is, I'm so restless, I can't sit still.
So I go racing here and there all the time.
My mind wanders, so I wander too.
BHIKKHU: This wandering is called samsara, the cycle of birth and death.
CARP: That's depressing.
BHIKKHU: Indeed it is.
And that's why the Dhamma is such a relief.
It can free us from that cycle.
CARP: We're all wanderers in a way, aren't we?
BHIKKHU: Yes.
You and I and — and even that big red ant crawling up your leg.
CARP: Yeow!
Mr.
Carp jumps up and dances around wildly, brushing at his pants.
CARP: Ow!
Get off!
Get off!
These things will bite!
BHIKKHU: Easy now, Mr.
Carp.
It dropped off.
CARP: It did?
BHIKKHU: It probably considered you an unsteady surface.
CARP: I am!
I am an unsteady surface!
Bhikkhu Tissa stands up, smiling.
BHIKKHU: And what will you do about that?
CARP: Well, I don't know.
Say, listen, I've taken up enough of your time.
Thanks for explaining things.
I'd better get going.
I'm heading down to the beach to meet some friends.
BHIKKHU: I hope you have a safe drive.
CARP: Oh, I will, I will.
It's a great car, a beauty, you can see.
Oh no!
No!
Did you see that bird?
Did you see what that bird just did to my car?
BHIKKHU: Yes, birds will do that.
CARP: I just had it waxed!
You know, that makes me think — oh, never mind.
Thanks for your time, Bhikkhu Tissa.
Smiling to himself, Bhikkhu Tissa takes his broom in hand again.
BHIKKHU: I'm glad you dropped by, Mr.
Carp.
CARP: Yeah, me too, I guess.
BHIKKHU: If you'll excuse me, I'll get back to my work now.
CARP: Oh sure, sure.
Say, you know, if you need any help around the temple, I wouldn't mind lending a hand sometime.
BHIKKHU: That's kind of you, but we manage pretty well.
CARP: No, I'm serious, I'd be glad to help, anytime.
Really!
BHIKKHU: Well then, would you like to sweep?
The sidewalk out there needs it.
CARP: You mean now?
But you've only got one broom.
BHIKKHU: Oh, there's another one in the tool shed there.
Bhikkhu Tissa turns away and placidly resumes his sweeping.
Mr.
Carp fidgets for a moment, then goes and gets the other broom from the shed.
He returns and waits awkwardly for instructions, but gets none.
Finally he begins sweeping the sidewalk, casting puzzled looks at the monk.
At one point he opens his mouth to say something, but shuts it again.
Bhikkhu Tissa is no longer paying attention to him.
With a bemused expression, Mr.
Carp applies himself to sweeping the sidewalk.
Little puffs of dust and leaves fly out to either side as the broom finds its rhythm.
A morning breeze has now sprung up, swaying the trees above and sending flickers of light and dark, sun and shade, across the sweepers.
It is noon on a winter day.
Bhikkhu Tissa has been a guest for a mid-day meal in the home of a married couple, Leona and Ernest, and now sits with them in the family room, sipping a cup of tea.
The windows of the room look out on a snowy landscape.
A fire leaps and crackles in the fireplace.
LEONA: Was everything all right, Bhikkhu Tissa?
BHIKKHU TISSA: Just fine, thank you.
LEONA: Of course, you know I'm referring to the food, not the state of the universe!
BHIKKHU: Yes, I thought as much.
It was delicious.
LEONA: The universe is quite another question, right?
ERNEST: I've got to apologize for my wife, venerable sir.
She never stops philosophizing!
LEONA: Ernest, my dear husband, I am a woman made for grand ideas!
ERNEST: How well I know.
Are you going to bombard this venerable monk with impossible questions?
LEONA: Oh, I think he can take care of himself.
Anyway, Ernest, you were the one who invited him.
You must have something on that oh-so-serious mind of yours.
ERNEST: Well, I did think it might be useful to have a private little discussion about matters of substance.
LEONA: Do you hear that, Venerable?
My husband talks like an office memo.
Why then do I love him?
BHIKKHU: Wise men refrain from trying to figure out love.
ERNEST: As you know, I've been getting interested in Buddhism over the last year, and sometimes it seems like it raises more questions than it answers!
BHIKKHU: Oh yes, that often happens at first.
I think it's a good sign.
If Buddhism is to have a real effect on somebody it must challenge them, make them think of a hundred problems and puzzles they never considered before.
The average person all too often takes things for granted, has a careless, habitual way of looking at the world, and idly believes in unexamined concepts.
But Buddhism kicks the props entirely out from under such habits and reveals many unanswered questions which have been there all along.
LEONA: Are you referring to big stuff like the meaning of life, and so on?
BHIKKHU: No, just basic laws and relationships that we need to grasp little by little until we can tackle the bigger questions.
Sometimes simple intellectual curiosity can start this process.
Sometimes it's a single provocative incident.
ERNEST: That's sort of what happened to me — an incident.
I've been studying Buddhism for a while, maybe with a little more interest than Leona here…
LEONA: There he goes, bragging already.
EARNEST:…and then just recently a question arose that has no end of implications.
It has to do with a job offer.
LEONA: Oh, you're going into this, are you?
Venerable Tissa, we've talked this over fifty times and I think he's crazy — dear, but crazy.
Well, Ernest, tell our guest.
Maybe he'll straighten you out.
ERNEST: My field is chemistry, Bhikkhu Tissa, and I've been in and out of academia and private industry over the years.
At the moment I've got a teaching position at the college that I like pretty well, though it doesn't pay a lot.
Recently I got a very attractive job offer from the research division of a local chemical company.
It would mean a sizable increase in salary and a chance to do some creative work in my particular specialty.
Professionally it would be a big step up for me, and, as a matter of fact, I know some of the people there and I think we'd get along fine.
But I can't make up my mind to take the job.
And it's all because of something you said.
BHIKKHU: What was that?
ERNEST: You were talking about the Noble Eightfold Path and you mentioned Right Livelihood.
You said one should earn a living without harming others.
Now, does this apply to animals?
BHIKKHU: Yes, it does.
ERNEST: I thought so.
There's the problem.
You see, this company has a research laboratory where they test the effects of their chemicals on animals.
I wouldn't be directly connected with that department, I wouldn't do any experiments on animals, but still I'd feel uncomfortably close.
And that bothers me.
BHIKKHU: What do they do to the animals there?
ERNEST: Toxicity tests, mostly.
That means they poison them — dogs, cats, rabbits, rats, and other animals.
They paint chemicals into the eyes of rabbits and see what concentrations will cause ulcers and blindness.
They force-feed lethal compounds to groups of dogs and see how long it takes for half of them to die.
BHIKKHU: What happens to the other half?
ERNEST: They might use them again in other tests.
More often they kill them all.
They “sacrifice” them, to use the euphemism.
Sometimes they do autopsies.
LEONA: Ernest, please, you're making me ill.
ERNEST: I got a brief look at the lab when they were giving me a tour of the company.
Now, I've known about such labs all my professional life, but I've never worked in one or really paid too much attention.
But after studying Buddhism a little, I found that it really upset me to see the animals in cages and the instruments and so on.
The guy who was giving me the tour must have noticed because he said, “Don't worry, your office is far away, you won't hear anything.” “They make noise?” I said.
And he said, “Oh, not so much” and sort of shrugged.
Since then I literally haven't been able to sleep.
I keep imagining sitting in my office in another part of the building and hearing faint screams coming up through the ventilation ducts or something.
LEONA: This is how he's been going on, Bhikkhu Tissa.
I tell him he doesn't have to have anything to do with animal experiments, so why worry about it?
ERNEST: Thinking about the suffering of animals, Bhikkhu Tissa, I find my mind wandering out in wider and wider circles, trying to make sense of a world that seems, well, pretty horrible in many respects.
But to begin with, I'd just like to have your opinion about whether or not I should take this job.
BHIKKHU: I wonder if you would really be satisfied if I said, yes, you should, or no, you shouldn't.
Sometimes Buddhist teaching has a specific answer to a moral question, sometimes not.
In either case what is important is that the student understand the underlying principles himself so that he doesn't just rely on faith in the teacher.
You began your reflections with Right Livelihood, so let's pick up there.
Right Livelihood means earning a living in a harmless, honest, and inoffensive manner.
The Buddha advised his disciples specifically to refrain from dealing in arms, in living beings, in meat, in intoxicants, and in poisons.
LEONA: You know, that covers a whole lot of occupations, venerable sir!
I mean — making guns, bombs, all kinds of weapons.
And as for living beings and meat, well, you are talking about huge industries there.
And do you mean to say that dealing in all kinds of intoxicants is prohibited — beer, wine, and everything?
And you could include a host of products under the name of “poisons,” everything from nerve gas to bug spray.
Do you really believe that everybody working in all of these industries is necessarily evil?
Are they all going to suffer some terrible karma?
Are they going to hell?
ERNEST: Hold on, Leona, give Bhikkhu Tissa a chance to answer.
BHIKKHU: The Buddha teaches that for our own well-being and the well-being of others we should avoid these classes of occupations.
Dealing in arms means just what you think — all kinds of weapons and instruments for killing.
Dealing in living beings refers to animals, of course, and it also extends into areas like slavery, or prostitution, or the buying and selling of children or adults in one way or another.
“Meat” refers to the bodies of beings after they are killed.
And poisons are just as you say — all kinds of toxic products designed to kill.
LEONA: Those are immense categories.
BHIKKHU: The categories are wide because the principle is wide: not to engage in occupations which cause suffering, destruction, and death.
Now, you ask whether somebody who works in one of these occupations necessarily suffers misfortune as a result.
LEONA: Yes, what about the perfectly honest owner of a liquor store?
Or a sporting goods dealer who sells guns to hunters?
BHIKKHU: Kamma, or karma, means volitional actions by body, speech, or mind.
Kamma produces a result for the doer according to its nature as wholesome, unwholesome, or neutral.
Acts of killing and harming, for instance, will sooner or later bring painful results for the doer.
LEONA: Yes, I understand that.
That's the practical basis for Buddhist moral precepts.
But if one doesn't actually kill or harm or steal, and so on, then it seems that one could be engaged in almost any profession.
BHIKKHU: To sell liquor or guns, assuming one does so honestly, may not in itself bring karmic misfortune.
But with the factor of Right Livelihood the Buddha recognizes the truth that habitual associations strongly influence our thoughts and deeds.
There may be someone, for instance, who works in a slaughterhouse, but whose job is not to kill animals but only to grade meat or operate a conveyor belt.
He may not actually break the precepts or do evil, but this is nevertheless wrong livelihood because his mind is likely to be harmed by the unwholesome atmosphere.
He becomes accustomed to pain and death.
He regards the suffering of living beings as unimportant.
And thus he sinks further into ignorance and becomes easier prey for mental defilements which will definitely cause him sorrow.
The principle is the same for intoxicants or weapons.
Dealing with these, a person becomes indifferent to the delusion and destruction that alcohol and drugs cause, or becomes callous about the killing or maiming of living beings by weapons.
LEONA: But these are popular goods and services.
There will always be somebody to provide them.
BHIKKHU: True, Leona, but it needn't be you.
LEONA: Oh, dear, I can see what you think about Ernest's job offer!
BHIKKHU: Maybe you are guessing a little too quickly.
Let's analyze the question further.
Yes, to do painful experiments on animals in one's work, to wound, poison, or torment them in any way, is certainly a violation of Right Livelihood.
ERNEST: You would condemn such an occupation, then?
BHIKKHU: Yes.
To inflict pain on living beings — even for the supposed advantage of other living beings — is cruel and short-sighted.
ERNEST: Ah, well!
BHIKKHU: But I would not exactly on that account advise you to reject your job offer.
ERNEST: I don't understand.
BHIKKHU: I believe you said your job would not involve experimenting on animals, and you would not be directly connected with it.
ERNEST: Strictly speaking, no.
BHIKKHU: Then strictly speaking you would not be violating the principle of Right Livelihood.
According to Buddhism we are karmically responsible only for what we do intentionally and what we order others to do.
Beyond that, it's up to the individual to decide.
Right Livelihood is a flexible concept that can guide us regarding professions that were unknown in the Buddha's time.
We have to decide how close we can come to occupations that are definitely unwholesome without becoming contaminated.
Ultimately, almost every profession is somehow related to every other, so we would likely go crazy if we looked for a job that was not distantly, theoretically, harmful to somebody.
Take a big company with many divisions or subsidiaries.
Is somebody in one department responsible for what somebody in another department does?
Is the typist in New York implicated in the killing of cattle in Texas?
ERNEST: No, that's unreasonable, in my opinion.
BHIKKHU: So, it comes down to this: you must be quite sure and satisfied in your own mind that you are not willingly doing any harmful deeds and that you are not encouraging or condoning the ill-treatment of living beings.
ERNEST: Oh, That's so hard to know…
LEONA: Well and good, Venerable Tissa.
But don't we have to balance off harm and benefit?
I'm not willing to concede that doing scientific experiments on animals is entirely evil.
Think of the lasting benefits to humanity that come of such experiments.
ERNEST: Uh, Leona, at this lab they're presently testing oven-cleaner and hair-spray.
LEONA: Oh.
Not the most vital products, I grant you.
ERNEST: And before you go on to cite penicillin or some other wonder drug, I think it's fair to note that medicines can be developed and tested without recourse to live animal subjects.
We now have sophisticated techniques of computer-modeling and tissue-culture that are accurate and cause no bloodshed.
The fact that animals have been used so much in the past does not prove that discoveries would have been impossible without them, only that that has been the habit, or conditioned reflex, of scientific researchers.
LEONA: Maybe, maybe.
But, Bhikkhu Tissa, I want to get at the philosophical question here.
If some real benefit to humanity can come about through experimenting on animals, even though they suffer, then why not use them?
Shouldn't we be concerned with the greater good that will result?
BHIKKHU: I'm glad you raise the question of benefit, Leona, because this is where people often go astray when considering Right Livelihood or those troublesome five precepts.
Yes, I agree that we should act for the greater good, but — and here is a question that has sent seekers into the Sangha for centuries — how do we know what the greater good is?
LEONA: It's whatever benefits the most people, I guess.
BHIKKHU: Only people?
What about animals?
LEONA: Well, people are more important.
BHIKKHU: Indeed?
To whom?
LEONA: To people.
Okay, I know it sounds self-serving.
BHIKKHU: Leaving animals out for the moment, suppose some action helps us but harms other people.
How do you evaluate it?
Where is the greater good?
LEONA: I guess you just have to choose.
BHIKKHU: On what basis?
LEONA: Oh, Bhikkhu Tissa, I can see you won't be satisfied with anything less than a moral foundation — a religious foundation!
BHIKKHU: Better to say, a foundation on reality.
And the question remains: How do we know the greater good?
ERNEST: Through study of the Dhamma, I would guess.
BHIKKHU: Through study and practice of the Dhamma.
The Buddha teaches that we should do certain things and avoid other things, but not on his word alone or the words of our teachers or out of respect for tradition.
We are told to test these teachings in our own minds and in our own practice and then put our faith in the Dhamma as we see its effects.
LEONA: Yes, I will say that is one of the attractive qualities of Buddhism.
BHIKKHU: Let me ask you, what do you think is the ultimate goal of Buddhism?
LEONA: I know that: to put an end to suffering.
But we can't really call that the greater good, can we?
We need something more specific.
BHIKKHU: The end of suffering, or Nibbana, is what the entire Dhamma points to.
The Buddha said that just as the great ocean has only one taste, the taste of salt, so the Dhamma has only one taste, the taste of liberation.
In the Buddhist view, every specific goal — to use your word — must be connected to the ultimate goal to be worthwhile.
We have been discussing Right Livelihood.
Now, Right Livelihood is not the ultimate goal but in a sense it recapitulates the whole.
We want to escape the suffering involved with making a living — the disagreements, difficulties, guilt, anxiety, and so on.
To accomplish this we first of all have to place ourselves in conditions where such unpleasantness is least likely to arise; that is, in those occupations which are peaceful, non-threatening, un-disturbing to the conscience, and compatible with high ideals.
Second, we see to it that we conduct our business or perform our job in a scrupulously fair and honest manner.
This frees us from the suffering inherent in trickery and cheating.
It helps us get along with our co-workers and the public at large and gives us the security of a good reputation.
Finally, by getting our livelihood with energy and effort in a lawful, honest, and harmless manner, we liberate ourselves from self-contempt and the disgust of base money-grubbing, so that one large area of our lives is protected from the worst danger — the danger of our own misguided action.
Thus we enjoy the satisfaction of honorable work.
This is purification of the mind with regard to livelihood.
ERNEST: It seems that the Buddha overlooked nothing that might contribute to happiness.
But still, even if we behave in the manner you suggest, we can't be sure that making a living is going to be free of problems.
LEONA: Yes, everybody — good, evil, and average — complains about his or her job.
Even in the most blameless work there's some suffering.
BHIKKHU: Very true.
Right Livelihood has a beneficial ripple-effect we cannot see the end of, but certainly it will not eradicate all suffering.
There are, if you remember, seven more factors of the Noble Eightfold Path to develop.
LEONA: Ah, I might have known!
This Buddhism is nothing if not methodical!
There's a sort of — well, a sort of beauty about the way it fits together — like an exquisite watch.
ERNEST: Or like the molecular structure of DNA!
All three laugh.
LEONA: This business of getting through life is certainly complicated.
We started with rabbits in cages and now where are we?
ERNEST: One eighth of the way to enlightenment?
LEONA: Oh you!
But let's get an answer from the venerable monk.
Okay, I see the need for Right Livelihood in a practical sense, but why do we need to link it with anything else?
Why buy the whole deal, so to speak?
BHIKKHU: I think, Leona, that you've forgotten what you just said.
You noted that even a perfectly blameless livelihood will not remove all suffering.
Now, how much more suffering is there in life?
LEONA: Oh, heaps and heaps!
BHIKKHU: Are you willing to endure it?
Are you ready for it?
LEONA: No, not at all, no, categorically no.
BHIKKHU: Do you think you can escape it simply by wishing to?
Do you think that suffering — disease, old age, loss, grief, and so on — will just pass you by?
LEONA: No, I don't think that.
BHIKKHU: Well, do you believe you have any power in the matter?
LEONA: Maybe.
I don't know.
I'm not sure.
BHIKKHU: Buddhism teaches that we do have power to reduce and ultimately eliminate suffering.
When somebody makes even a small effort to follow the basic precepts he reaps an immediate benefit in the form of a pacified mind.
Good qualities — peace-bringing qualities — are strengthened and bad qualities are ever so slightly weakened.
When somebody makes a really systematic and conscientious effort to avoid killing, stealing, lying, sexual misconduct, and taking intoxicants, he fortifies himself further.
When he pursues the good by acting out of benevolence and compassion he stores up benefit for the future.
Then when he tries to purify his mind as well as his deeds he is moving positively to the greater good — Nibbana, deliverance, the end of sorrow.
ERNEST: I don't doubt what you say, venerable sir, but with all due respect, we are lay people living very much in the world, with many responsibilities and burdens.
How can we realistically concern ourselves with getting to Nibbana?
BHIKKHU: Nibbana isn't a place to get to.
It's not even a state of mind.
The Buddha called it simply the end of suffering.
This is a goal that should concern everybody regardless of his or her worldly station.
The Noble Eightfold Path is a transcendent way that leads out of the world to the inconceivable bliss of Nibbana, but it is also consistent with an active life in the world along the way.
I mean by this that the Dhamma protects us now, in our daily problems and challenges, and later, in the kind of future our deeds will lead us to.
Some people, when they hear the transcendent promise of the Dhamma, are elated.
Others, like you, perhaps, are a little worried, thinking that they are not ready to ascend any spiritual summits.
Really, there is no cause for worry.
If we apply ourselves to solving immediate problems as the Buddha teaches, then higher goals will simply come into focus in their own time.
We need only remind ourselves that there lies ahead of us a greater good which is timeless, steady, and ultimately accessible.
Simple moral restraint and deeds of charity and the practice of mindfulness in the household life cannot fail to build a foundation for wisdom.
ERNEST: I have an instinct that what you say is true.
That's why I'm trying to order my life at least to the extent of giving wisdom a chance to arise.
But I'm not sure.
Life is often mysterious, like a wandering in the dark.
BHIKKHU: You are right.
Life is very mysterious.
But in the Buddhist system even that mystery is a suitable theme for meditation.
For instance, look out the window here.
From where we sit we can't see the ground, only that blank gray sky and a few snowflakes drifting past.
If we didn't know better we might think those snowflakes just appear spontaneously in our field of view and whirl out of it again into some kind of oblivion, without a reason, uncaused, absurdly appearing and disappearing.
LEONA: That would be just delusion, just ignorance.
BHIKKHU: But because we have some experience, because we have at one time or another stuck our heads out the window, we know that snow falls from the clouds overhead and it piles up in drifts on the ground beneath.
We see where it comes from and where it goes.
It's the same with the larger questions of life: investigation destroys ignorance.
Somebody might keep moral precepts just out of fear, or tradition, or habit — and there's nothing really wrong with this, it's still a help and protection.
But sooner or later most people think, “Why am I really following these rules?
Where will they lead me?” If a monk or somebody tells them the purpose is to get rid of suffering, then, if they're intelligent, they want to find out for themselves how and why.
LEONA: Exactly, exactly.
BHIKKHU: The Buddha discovered and made known the path to deliverance.
Now, it's a sorry old world we live in, but that path is still open, friends, it is still open.
ERNEST: Perhaps Leona and I are following it already, even without being fully aware.
But I would hate to think, Bhikkhu Tissa, that all the mystery must go out of life.
BHIKKHU: Ignorance must go, but mystery in the sense I think you mean comes even more alive in the objects of our experience.
Our wonder at the infinite and ineffable is an intuition of Nibbana itself.
Looking here through this plain glass window on emptiness — even though we have no illusions about where those snowflakes come from and where they go, still we find it peaceful and uplifting to gaze out on those random crystals.
ERNEST: Yes, that's true.
But why should that be?
Bhikkhu Tissa smiles, says nothing, gazes thoughtfully out the window.
LEONA: Perhaps because — if I might be so bold — because looking out in that dimensionless space we re reminded of our connections to infinite things.
I mean, the flake that bumps against our windowpane here is connected to the clouds and the clouds to the whole atmosphere and the atmosphere to the space beyond, with its matter and energy and vast laws of generation and destruction.
One can't help feeling part of a cosmic drama, so to speak.
ERNEST: Ah, what a philosopher you are, Leona!
LEONA: And what of it?
I think Venerable Tissa would approve.
That's what Buddhism teaches, isn't it?
Investigation?
BHIKKHU: Yes, and when we investigate we see connections, and when we see connections we are motivated to act in certain ways.
ERNEST: But why act at all?
Isn't passive contemplation enough?
BHIKKHU: No.
The mindful observation of the world that the Buddha recommends reveals that intentional deeds have results for the doer.
We are where we are — in fortune or misfortune, peace or trouble — as a result of what we have done in the past.
Where we go in the future depends on what we do now.
LEONA: Are you talking about rebirth?
Well, that seems to me like a rather weak motivation, since rebirth is not at all apparent to me.
It may very well be true, but I mean to say that I just don't see it in front of me as a reality the same way I see other facts about mind and matter that Buddhism talks about.
I've read that sutta you referred to where the Buddha says we shouldn't accept any teaching until we see for ourselves that it is true.
BHIKKHU: I see you remember the first part of the Kalama Sutta, but do you remember the second part?
LEONA: The second?
BHIKKHU: After giving specific examples of wrong reasons for believing a teaching, the Buddha goes on to lead the skeptical Kalamas into the Dhamma.
He asks them whether greed, hate, and delusion are wholesome or unwholesome and whether they lead to suffering or not.
The Kalamas make the obvious answer that they are unwholesome and lead to suffering.
In response to further questions they agree that the absence of these defilements and the positive cultivation of morality lead to blessing and happiness in this life.
If this is so, the Buddha goes on to say, then there are four consolations for whomever is devoted to virtue.
First, if there is a future world and if good and bad deeds have results for the doer, then the virtuous person knows himself safe and can expect a happy situation.
Second, if there is no rebirth and if deeds have no future effect, then he at least lives happily in this world, without worry.
Third, if evil things happen to evildoers, then he, who does no evil, is secure and free from harm.
Fourth, if no evil things happen to evildoers, then he in any event will not meet with evil fortune.
LEONA: That's well said.
Even a hardened skeptic would have to admire that reasoning.
And if one goes that far one would have to admit that it would be wise to pay more attention to one's behavior and even set out on a more systematic path of spiritual practice.
ERNEST: Such as the Noble Eightfold Path, Leona?
LEONA: Why yes, now that you mention it.
We keep coming back to that, don't we?
BHIKKHU: Well, we should come back to it.
But I hope you understand that this path is a path of practice and self-development and mindful investigation.
It's not necessary at the outset to believe in rebirth or other difficult facets of the Dhamma.
We need only bear these teachings in mind and watch as the evidence accumulates in our own experience.
LEONA: That's fair, that's certainly fair.
I'd say a certain amount has accumulated already.
I can see that good and bad deed have effects here in this present life, and if those effects go beyond, say to a future birth, well, I'm open-minded about the matter.
Tell me this, please.
These connections we were speaking of — do they exist between animals and human beings?
Can human beings be reborn as animals and vice versa?
BHIKKHU: We must first note that according to Buddhism there is no self or soul that is literally born again, but rather a chain of causes or a stream of life that springs up now here, now there, according to conditions.
But in ordinary, conventional language we can certainly say that a human being can be reborn as an animal or vice versa.
It all depends on the individual's kamma, his or her accumulated deeds.
LEONA: Ah, here we have the core of your opposition to cruelty to animals.
We are related to them.
We may even become them.
BHIKKHU: In the Buddhist view all sentient life is related.
The differentiations are temporary, fluctuating, and merely provisional.
Countless living beings go wandering through the endless cycles of samsara, being born high or low, in this world or that, with much suffering or little suffering.
ERNEST: Hence the great Buddhist emphasis on compassion.
Yes, I see.
We are all part of an organic whole.
BHIKKHU: Yes, all sentient life is organic and inter-related, but you should not make the common, romantic mistake of thinking that this “whole” is good.
Samsara is, to one degree or another, suffering throughout, and we beings trapped in samsara are suffering.
ERNEST: All the more reason for compassion, then!
BHIKKHU: Quite so.
And here is a point of Dhamma I want to emphasize especially.
One's own ultimate welfare and the welfare of other beings are perfectly harmonious.
The life of moral restraint is a life of service to others, because it protects others, soothes them, and inspires them to similar effort.
When we follow the path and strive to purify our minds we set incalculable reverberations going in the hearts of other beings.
Never doubt that the Dhamma conduces to the greater good, even when circumstances seem to push us toward shabby expediency.
The law of kamma sees to it that in the long run deeds work out according to their nature, so we should always take the wide view, always strive for detachment in our reflections, so that we can make wise choices.
ERNEST: If one lives as you suggest, being diligent in practicing Dhamma, could one be reborn in a heavenly world, a world of bliss?
BHIKKHU: Yes, that's possible.
ERNEST: Wouldn't unadulterated bliss be as good as Nibbana?
Wouldn't that be the end of suffering?
BHIKKHU: No, the so-called heavenly worlds are not perfect refuges for two reasons.
First, all worldly bliss is adulterated.
There is suffering in even the highest realms.
It is very fine and attenuated, but it exists.
In the ultimate sense, pleasure itself is suffering, a dis-ease, a kind of irritation to the mind that deprives it of peace.
The second reason is that even though life in those planes is said to be very pleasant and long, it is still impermanent: it is going to come to an end; it cannot be relied upon forever; hence there is anxiety and uncertainty even for beings living there.
LEONA: A flawed heaven.
How gloomy!
BHIKKHU: Actually, this human world is considered an especially fortunate place to be born.
The beings in higher realms are so drenched with pleasure that they have little inducement to strive for deliverance.
And the animals and beings in the unhappy lower planes are too unintelligent or too miserable to make spiritual progress.
This human world with its puzzling mixture of pleasure and pain often makes people think.
LEONA: Indeed it does that!
BHIKKHU: We really need not speculate about other planes of life when our own provokes us to search for liberation.
And now, of course, though the world is full of misery, still we have the priceless treasure of the Dhamma, which the Buddha discovered and made known to cure suffering and free beings from the wheel of birth and death.
ERNEST: Bhikkhu Tissa, it seems the Dhamma is a very demanding teaching.
BHIKKHU: And we are demanding people, are we not?
We demand pleasure and security and comfort — and we demand them to be permanent!
This is impossible, of course, because the universe is not under our control.
So we suffer.
And then we demand an end to suffering, preferably through no exertion of our own.
We want an escape from old age and illness and death, but, as the Buddha says, this cannot be got by mere wanting, and not to get what one desires, that is suffering, too.
ERNEST: True, true.
We are indeed contrary creatures!
I see the justice of what you say — we have to make an effort if we really want to accomplish anything.
But the question I ask myself is, how much do I want to accomplish?
BHIKKHU: Nobody can answer that question but you.
ERNEST: Considering my limitations I sometimes wonder if I couldn't sort of stop half-way, as it were — just practice basic morality and try to live a modest life and keep out of trouble.
BHIKKHU: The way of Dhamma is a way that goes against the stream of the world and the world's desires.
If you cease to struggle against the current, do you think you will just remain stationary?
ERNEST: Well, no, considering the nature of my mind.
LEONA: Going with the flow just won't make it, huh?
BHIKKHU: Going with the flow means succumbing to craving and clinging, which pull us down to suffering.
It is said that the Dhamma protects the Dhamma-farer.
This means that one who resists craving and clinging, who makes an effort against the worldly stream, becomes stronger by that very effort, just as when we exercise a muscle we strengthen it.
By overcoming even small problems with mindfulness and detachment we find ourselves increasingly able — and willing — to surmount spiritual obstacles.
I think that if you try to apply the Dhamma in life you will quickly notice within yourself the growth of confidence.
ERNEST: There's something in that.
I do feel some confidence — just a little bit!
BHIKKHU: The Buddha said that a follower should examine his teaching in the way that a goldsmith analyzes gold — carefully inspecting, refining, testing it before concluding that it is real.
So if you have undertaken to practice the Dhamma even a little, then please reflect on the result of that practice and see how you feel about it, see whether you feel cheered and inspired to go a little further.
ERNEST: Here we are — Leona and I — offering a meal to a monk and listening to him preach — something I would have thought ridiculous a year ago!
I guess that says something.
LEONA: To me, Bhikkhu Tissa, the Dhamma is appealing because it seems to satisfy both the intellect and the emotions.
I've never been a religious person, mainly because I couldn't believe passionately in the supernatural.
On the other hand, the materialistic philosophies leave me cold, because they have no understanding of the mind and what for lack of a better word I will call the transcendental.
They are earthbound and infinitely depressing.
Then there is the swarm of cults and quasi-religions which are both hysterical and intellectually incoherent.
Whew!
It's enough to make me an absolute agnostic.
Except… agnosticism is itself a blind belief!
Now I've studied the Dhamma a little bit, and while I don't understand everything, I find it, well, refreshing.
As I said, it fits together intellectually and it gives scope to the desire for transcendence, the impulse to become purer or wiser than we now are.
Just this morning, before you came, I read a passage in one of Ernest's books that summarized the Dhamma as clear, visible, leading onward — something succinct like that.
BHIKKHU: “Well expounded is the Dhamma by the Exalted One, directly visible, immediately effective, calling one to come and see, leading onward, to be personally realized by the wise.
LEONA: That's it.
As clear a statement as I've heard.
Now, if it can fulfill that promise…
BHIKKHU: The truths of the Dhamma are for us to examine and confirm.
We have to remove the obstructions to our understanding by practicing morality and training ourselves in the art of concentration.
When the conscience is clear and the mind can hold steady on the objects of attention, then wisdom arises of its own nature.
We don't create it.
ERNEST: But wisdom is not the end, is it?
BHIKKHU: No.
Wisdom is the sword we use to cut off defilements, to clear a path for ourselves out of the jungle and into the open air.
ERNEST: Buddhism grants us immense freedom of action, doesn't it?
LEONA: And immense responsibility, it seems.
If all planes of existence are somehow tied to suffering then probably we should use that freedom of action to get freedom… of being!
Or I might say, if it is possible to escape suffering and gain enlightenment, then if we don't try, our misery would be really our own fault.
ERNEST: What a predicament.
Bhikkhu Tissa, you were right when you said that Buddhism challenges us.
BHIKKHU: The problem of existence and its solution are both contained within the Four Noble Truths.
The truth of the omnipresence of suffering in samsara and the truth of its arising out of craving point out our plight.
The truth of the cessation of suffering and the truth of the way to accomplish that point out the escape from this plight.
So you see, there is darkness and light — the darkness of pain and ignorance and confusion, and the light of understanding and deliverance.
Life for the intelligent person should be a journey from dark to light.
ERNEST: But how long and how fast?
BHIKKHU: As long as it takes and as fast as you wish.
ERNEST: Well, it's a little frightening, but it's exhilarating, too.
In time I might actually be able to make sense out of the universe!
Already I feel a certain tension between my miserable old habits of mind and my urge to pursue the Dhamma further.
It is sort of dazzling to think that I can walk down the street like anybody else but still be practicing mindfulness, or still be reflecting on impermanence, suffering, and non-self.
I wonder if I shouldn't be living in a cave or a jungle!
BHIKKHU: You'd still be dealing with the same mind in a cave, Ernest.
Better to investigate in your own house — I mean, this very body and mind.
The world is to be found there, and liberation from the world.
Arising and passing away, suffering, and the empty, flickering personality can be seen and examined within.
Wisdom isn't a treasure we can prospect for in the Himalayas; it appears only when conditions are right for it, when the mind is settled, not distracted.
LEONA: When I read the words of the Buddha I get a feeling of immense wisdom, and yet he doesn't answer some questions about the origin of the universe, about what happens to an enlightened person after death, and so on.
Now, I'm sure he had good reasons for not answering what might be extraneous questions, but still…
BHIKKHU: Never forget, Leona, that the Buddha was not out to build a reputation for himself, or to be a human computer spewing information, or to dazzle the ignorant with amazing secrets.
He was out to cure suffering.
He was a supreme genius, but he never lost sight of his practical purpose: to teach suffering and the way to the ending of suffering.
He taught what was necessary.
Whatever else he may have known it is useless to speculate about.
Once, when the Buddha was seated in a forest with a company of monks, he took up a handful of leaves from the ground and showed them to the monks.
He asked them which were more numerous, the leaves in his hand or the leaves in the entire forest.
The monks reasonably noted that the leaves in his hand were very few compared to those in the entire forest.
The Buddha then said that those in his hand were as the truths he had revealed to them, and those in the whole forest were as the truths he knew but had not revealed.
LEONA: And why hadn't he revealed them?
BHIKKHU: Because, the Buddha said, they were not useful, they did not lead to dispassion, to tranquility, to higher knowledge, to enlightenment.
Remember, the Buddha had no need to teach at all.
He had attained enlightenment, he was free, he had vanquished suffering.
There was nothing further he needed to do.
Yet he did act, he did exert himself.
Why?
Simply because of his all-embracing compassion.
He taught his followers everything they needed to know about suffering and how to conquer it themselves.
He held back nothing of value.
Before he died he declared that as a teacher he had never had a “closed fist.” He gave unstintingly of the Dhamma that pointed to liberation, entrusting it to his followers who have preserved it and honored it and offered it as the supreme refuge for a weary world, even to this very day.
ERNEST: That's an encouraging thought.
If the Buddha had no personal need to teach anything to anybody yet did teach for the rest of his life, then surely he thought that the teaching would be effective, that his followers, even though they weren't Buddhas, could still attain enlightenment through their own efforts.
BHIKKHU: Yes, indeed.
The Buddha is sometimes called the great physician for the ills of the world.
He doesn't cure by magic or laying-on of hands or divine power.
He prescribes for us the medicine of the Dhamma and instructs us in how to use it.
LEONA: But the patients have to be willing, don't they?
BHIKKHU: Oh yes.
Some people complain about the emphasis on suffering in Buddhism; they prefer not to think about it.
They suffer, they know they suffer, but they don't realize that suffering is a deep and terrible spiritual disease.
Only when they take a close look at their situation do they fell moved to do something about it.
It's like a man who smells smoke in his house.
If he's intelligent he investigates and sees that his house is on fire.
Rather than waiting to be burned, he looks around for an escape and makes use of it promptly — he climbs out a window and slides down the drain-pipe.
What the Buddha teaches us first of all is that our house is on fire — on fire with greed, with hate, with delusion, burning with sickness, old age, death, lamentation, despair.
ERNEST: The truth of suffering, in short.
BHIKKHU: And then the Buddha points out the reasons for this suffering and what can be done about it and how there might be ease and relief for us instead of anxiety and pain.
And, more than this, the Buddha shows how our lives may become calmer, wiser, and purer, and how we may in fact achieve what we hardly can imagine: enlightenment, a radiant and unassailable security.
LEONA: It's a shame we are not living in the time of the Buddha himself.
BHIKKHU: Ah, but we are, Leona.
We are!
The Buddha says that whoever sees the Dhamma sees the Buddha.
And the Dhamma is not only written in books, it is written in the elements of the world as well.
LEONA: What do you mean?
BHIKKHU: The three characteristics of existence — impermanence, suffering, and non-self — spring up everywhere for the benefit of the diligent meditator.
Look at the flames there in the fireplace, snapping and curling and flickering in front of our eyes.
LEONA: Ah, impermanence, yes, of course.
BHIKKHU: Yes, both an instance and an emblem of the changing nature of reality.
ERNEST: Transience and change.
BHIKKHU: And more than that.
Don't you see in those wavering sheets of fire and those sputtering little flames something futile and weary?
They leap up, they fall back, they smolder and fail.
ERNEST: An incompleteness, a restlessness.
You might call it suffering!
BHIKKHU: And within that chemical reaction we call fire, within that shifting light and heat what's really going on?
Is the fire one stable thing and the log another?
Does the wood stay the same while the fire just happens to it?
LEONA: No, they're both changing, there's only change.
The wood is always changing to something else.
You could say it's not being, it's only becoming.
Therefore…
ERNEST: Therefore it's not a self!
Just non-self.
Well, Bhikkhu Tissa, this is something.
Even my own fireplace can instruct me the Dhamma.
BHIKKHU: And why stop there?
Out the window there we can see that it's snowing a little harder.
There!
See that swirl of wind?
Look at the flakes spinning against the grayness.
What do they suggest to you?
LEONA: Change.
Impermanence.
And the there's the sadness of it — I don't know why, it's just the wandering, the endless unease.
We could call it suffering, sure.
And as before, in that change, in that process, I don't see any persisting element.
No self.
Just like the fire.
BHIKKHU: Just like the fire.
And yet the one is blazing hot and the other is icy cold.
Still the same truths are manifest in both.
Do you see the principle I am getting at?
LEONA: I think I do.
All the world is food for contemplation.
BHIKKHU: And above all, do not neglect your own body and mind.
That's where craving clings the tightest, that's where ignorance resides.
LEONA: You are assuming, of course, that I'll keep investigating the Dhamma.
BHIKKHU: I am assuming it.
LEONA: Well, you're right, I guess.
Can't quit now.
I'll keep going a little further.
ERNEST: Going toward what, Leona?
LEONA: Why… Let's call it the greater good, shall we?
ERNEST: Why not?
LEONA: It seems it's possible to live deliberately, and if so, I think one ought to live for the benefit of oneself and others.
ERNEST: And others, yes.
Speaking of that.
Uh, Leona, talking to this venerable monk has made me sure that I don't want to — I mean, I couldn't possibly accept that job at the chemical company.
LEONA: Oh, Ernest.
As for the job…
ERNEST: No, really, you have to see — I just wouldn't feel…
LEONA: Peace, husband of mine!
There is no dispute.
ERNEST: Say what?
LEONA: Under no circumstances can you accept that job.
You are happy where you are.
You don't want to be even distantly connected to the suffering of animals.
I understand that now.
I respect it.
Venerable Tissa is skillful, I think, in nudging us in the direction of the Dhamma.
ERNEST: But you were so in favor of the job.
LEONA: Ah, well.
Impermanence!
ERNEST: You're a remarkable woman, Leona.
LEONA: It depends on who's doing the remarking!
But enough.
Let's not weary this tolerant monk any more today, all right?
Look, Ernest, the snow is coming down harder.
Maybe you had better drive Venerable Tissa home.
ERNEST: You don't have a “home,” do you, Bhikkhu Tissa?
Just a monastery.
BHIKKHU: There's no real home for any of us short of Nibbana.
But yes, perhaps it's time to go.
ERNEST: Thank you for your time.
BHIKKHU: And thank you for your food.
LEONA: You are the one who's given real food, Bhikkhu Tissa.
ERNEST: We appreciate your teaching.
BHIKKHU: I'm glad you do.
But the fire teaches, too.
And the snow.
And your own hearts.
ERNEST: Shall we go, then?
They rise.
Bhikkhu Tissa, wrapped up in his robes, follows Ernest out the door into the sudden cold and light of the snowy day.
Leona stands on the doorstep and watches them go down to the car.
The wind gusts and the snow falls harder, blurring the landscape and the vanishing figures.
At the car, Bhikkhu Tissa turns, smiles, and waves.
Or does he wave?
She is not sure.
Maybe he has pointed at the chaos of snowflakes, or the invisible clouds, or the ghostly horizon of the rooftops.
Then the car rolls away.
Leona stands gazing after for a moment.
The world seems huge and full of silence.
Snow — dust blows from the limbs of an oak.
Bhikkhu Nyanasobhano, an American from Louisville, Kentucky, was ordained as a Buddhist monk at Wat Mahadhatu in Bangkok in.
He is the author of Radical Buddhism.
To the Cemetery and Back, and Bhikkhu Tissa Dispels Some Doubts, published under his civilian name; and A Buddhist view of Abortion, published under his monastic name.
A book of essays, Living As A Buddhist, awaits publication in the United States.
Bhikkhu Nyanasobhano presently resides at Jetavana Vihara in Washington, D.C.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
In its earliest phase, as represented by the four main collections of the Sutta Pi.taka, the focal concern of Buddhism was the attainment of nibbaana by the practice of the Noble Eightfold Path.
In these collections the Buddha teaches his doctrine as a direct path to deliverance, and perhaps no feature of the presentation is so striking as the urgency he enjoins on his disciples in bringing their spiritual work to completion by reaching the final goal.
Just as a man who discovers his turban to be in flames would immediately seek to extinguish it, so should the earnest disciple strive to extinguish the flames of craving in order to reach the state of security, the consummate peace of nibbaana.
The oldest suttas, however, already mention three types of individuals who attain to the consummate state: a sammaasambuddha or perfectly enlightened Buddha, who realizes the goal without the aid of a teacher and teaches the Dhamma to others, founding a dispensation; a paccekabuddha or solitary enlightened one, who achieves realization unaided but does not establish a dispensation; and a disciple arahat, who realizes the goal through the instruction of a supreme Buddha and then teaches others according to his inclination and capacity.
With the passage of time, quite possibly due to a decline in practice and an increasing rarity of higher attainments, these three types came to be viewed as three alternative ideals toward which a disciple could aspire in the hope of some distant future attainment.
All were identical in their realization of nibbaana, but each was seen to stand for a distinct aspect of the enlightened personality and to presuppose a distinct yaana, a “vehicle” or spiritual career, leading to its actualization.
For the Theravaada, the more conservative of the ancient schools, the emphasis was always placed on the ideal prescribed in the Paali suttas, the attainment of arahatship by following the instructions of the historical Buddha; the other ideals remained in the background, acknowledged but not especially attended to.
Other early schools, such as the Sarvaastivaada and the Mahaasanghika, while upholding the primacy of the disciple's course and the arahat ideal, also gave consideration to the other ideals as possible goals for individuals inclined to pursue them.
Thus they came to admit a doctrine of three yaanas or vehicles to deliverance, all valid but steeply graded in difficulty and accessibility.
Within all the early schools, thinkers and poets alike attempted to fill in the background history to the three enlightened persons, composing stories of their past lives in which they prepared the foundations for their future achievements.
Since it was the figure of the Buddha, as the founder of the Dispensation, who commanded the greatest awe and veneration, gradually a literature began to emerge depicting the evolution of the bodhisattva or “Buddha-to-be” along the arduous path of his development.
In this way the figure of the bodhisattva, the aspirant to Buddhahood, came to claim an increasingly prominent place in the popular Buddhist religious life.
The culmination of these innovations was the appearance, in about the first century B.C., of the Mahaayaana, the self-styled “Great Vehicle,” which proclaimed that of the three vehicles to enlightenment the bodhisattva-vehicle was alone ultimate, the other two being only expedients devised by the Buddha to lead his less competent disciples to perfect Buddhahood, which they held to be the only valid spiritual ideal.
Through its conservative bent and relative insulation from the other schools, the Theravaada managed to resist the metamorphic changes taking place elsewhere in the Buddhist world, preserving the teachings as compiled at the early councils without radical alterations of their doctrinal framework.
Nevertheless, in this school as well, from a period even preceding the rise of the Mahaayaana, the figure of the bodhisattva began to make inroads into both its literature and spiritual atmosphere.
Two elements in the early teaching seem to have provided the germs for this development.
One was the fact that the Buddha had used the word “bodhisattva” to refer to himself in the period preceding his enlightenment, pushing its scope as far back as his existence in the Tusita heaven before his final descent to earth.
The second was the recognition of the multiplicity of Buddhas, which showed the Sakyan Gotama to be, not a unique figure in the cosmic genealogy, but only the most recent member of a series of Buddhas each of whom attains enlightenment, founds a dispensation, and liberates a multitude of beings from the bondage of sa.msaaric suffering.
The Diigha Nikaaya mentions by name the six most recent predecessors of the Buddha Gotama, and predicts as well the advent of Metteyya, the Buddha of the future, who will rekindle the lamp of the true Dhamma after it is extinguished in the dark ages that lie ahead.
These two features jointly implied the existence of “germinal Buddhas” or bodhisattvas toiling to perfect themselves through countless lives in order to reach the summit of supreme enlightenment.
The trials and triumphs of the being who became our own Buddha were recorded in the Jaataka tales, relating the bodhisattva's conduct in his previous births.
Just when and how the bodhisattva entered upon this course is told in the Buddhava.msa, a late addition to the Sutta Pi.taka, in a story which has become the paradigm for all subsequent developments of the bodhisattva ideal.
According to this story, incalculable aeons ago in the far distant past, our bodhisattva made an aspiration at the feet of the Buddha Diipankara, the twenty-fourth Buddha of antiquity, in which he renounced the right to enter nibbaana then open to him, in order that he might become a Buddha in the future and provide salvation for the host of gods and humans.
He then received a prediction from the Buddha confirming his future success, went off into solitude, and reflected on the qualities that had to be perfected to fulfill his goal.
These, the ten paaramiis, became the standard constituents of the bodhisattva's practice, the “requisites of enlightenment” of our present treatise.
But though the existence of a bodhisattva career was thus acknowledged by the Theravaada, the dominant attitude prevailed among the exponents of the school that this path was reserved only for the very rare and exceptional individual.
Since it was not recommended in the oldest authentic records of the Buddha's teaching, those who professed to follow the Buddha were advised to comply with the instructions contained in these documents and aim at the attainment of nibbaana by the practice of the Noble Eightfold Path.
Thus the bulk of literature in the Paali school was devoted to explaining the details of this path and its doctrinal ramifications, while the practice of the paaramiis was treated only in broad and general terms.
As time passed, however, perhaps partly through the influence of the Mahaayaana, the bodhisattva ideal must have come to acquire an increasing appeal for the minds of the Buddhist populace, and the need became felt for a work explaining in a practical manner the factors and phases of the paaramitaa path without deviating from the established doctrinal position of the Theravaada.
Works expounding the bodhisattva career abounded in the Mahaayaana schools, since this was their axial concern, but a comparable work was lacking in Theravaada circles.
To meet this need, apparently, AAcariya Dhammapaala composed his “Treatise on the Paaramiis,” which is found in at least two places in the Paali exegetical literature, in a complete version in the Cariyaapi.taka A.t.thakathaa, and in an abridged version in the.tiikaa or subcommentary to the Brahmajaala Sutta.
The work introduces itself as a treatise composed “for clansmen following the suttas who are zealously engaged in the practice of the vehicle to great enlightenment, in order to improve their skillfulness in accumulating the requisites of enlightenment.” Followers of the suttas are specified probably because those who aspired to follow the bodhisattva course had to work selectively from various suttas to determine the practices appropriate for their aim, as the text itself illustrates in filling out its material.
The mention of the “vehicle to great enlightenment” does not indicate the historical Mahaayaana, but signifies rather the greatness of the bodhisattva career by reason of the loftiness of its goal and its capacity to provide for the emancipation of a great number of beings.
The “requisites of enlightenment” are the paaramiis themselves, the main topic of the treatise.
The word paaramii derives from parama, “supreme,” and thus suggests the eminence of the qualities which must be fulfilled by a bodhisattva in the long course of his spiritual development.
But the cognate paaramitaa, the word preferred by the Mahaayaana texts and also used by Paali writers, is sometimes explained as paaram + ita, “gone to the beyond,” thereby indicating the transcendental direction of these qualities.
The list of paaramiis in the Paali tradition differs somewhat from the more familiar list given in Sanskrit works, which probably antedates the Mahaayaana and provided a ready set of categories for its use.
Our author shows that the two lists can be correlated in section xii, and the coincidence of a number of items points to a central core already forming before the two traditions went their separate ways.
The six paaramiis of the Sanskrit heritage are: giving, virtue, patience, energy, meditation, and wisdom.
Later Mahaayaana texts add four more — resolution, skillful means, power, and knowledge — in order to co-ordinate on a one-to-one basis the list of perfections with the account of the ten stages of the bodhisattva's ascent to Buddhahood.
The Paali works, including those composed before the rise of Mahaayaana, give a different though partly overlapping list of ten: giving, virtue, renunciation, wisdom, energy, patience, truthfulness, determination, loving-kindness, and equanimity.
Unlike the Mahaayaana, the Theravaada never developed a theory of stages, though such may be implicit in the grading of the paaramiis into three degrees as basic, intermediate, and ultimate.
The treatise draws upon various sources for its material, both Theravaada and Mahaayaana, and thus represents perhaps a unique instance of a classical style Theravaada work consciously borrowing from its northern cousin; in matters of philosophical doctrine, however, the work never deviates from the Theravaada perspective.
The set of ten paaramiis itself comes from the Buddhava.msa, as does the discussion of the great aspiration with its eight qualifications.
All of this had become part of the standard Theravaada tradition by the time the work was composed and was easily absorbed.
Other Paali sources — the suttas, Jaatakas, later canonical works, the Visuddhimagga, etc.
— have all contributed to the overall composition of the treatise.
The basic methodology of the commentaries is evident in the explication of the ten paaramiis by way of the fourfold defining device of characteristic, function, manifestation, and proximate cause.
The heritage of the oral traditions of various teachers in later Paali scholasticism is seen in the various views expressed on the three grades of practice for each paaramii, on the correlation of the four foundations with the different stages of the bodhisattva's career, and on the classification of time required for the completion of the paaramiis.
Perhaps the influence of another early school, the Sarvaastivaada, lies behind the dyadic treatment of the six paaramiitas.
The main Mahaayaana work utilized by the author is the Bodhisattvabhuumi, the fifteenth chapter of the Yogaacaarabhuumi, a voluminous text of the Yogaacaara school ascribed to Maitreyanaatha, the teacher of Asanga.
The Bodhisattvabhuumi has contributed to the sections on the practice of the paaramiis, particularly the first, on the four shackles to giving, and on the special accomplishments resulting from the paaramiis.
The originals, however, have all been divested of their specifically Mahaayaana features to make them fully compatible with the Theravaada perspective.
Mahaayaana influence may further be discernible in the emphasis on compassion and skillful means, in the vows to benefit all beings, in the statement that the bodhisattva causes beings “to enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles,” etc.
On points of doctrine, as we mentioned, the work remains well within the bounds of Theravaada orthodoxy.
Its section on the perfection of wisdom has nothing more in common with the Praj~naapaaramitaa literature than the core of Buddhist doctrine shared by all schools.
There is nothing about the identity of nibbaana and sa.msaara, the triple body of the Buddha, the suchness and sameness of all dhammas, mind-only, the provisional nature of the disciple and paccekabuddha vehicles, or any of the other ideas distinctive of the Mahaayaana.
Even the mention of emptiness is restricted to the absence of a self or ego-entity and is not carried through to the radical ontology of the Mahaayaana suutras.
The discussion of wisdom draws entirely upon the Paali suttas and the Visuddhimagga, only with the stipulation that the bodhisattva must balance wisdom with compassion and skillful means and must postpone his entrance upon the supramundane path until his requisites of enlightenment are fully mature.
It should be noted that in established Theravaada tradition the paaramiis are not regarded as a discipline peculiar to candidates for Buddhahood alone but as practices which must be fulfilled by all aspirants to enlightenment and deliverance, whether as Buddhas, paccekabuddhas, or disciples.
What distinguishes the supreme bodhisattva from aspirants in the other two vehicles is the degree to which the paaramiis must be cultivated and the length of time they must be pursued.
But the qualities themselves are universal requisites for deliverance, which all must fulfill to at least a minimal degree to merit the fruits of the liberating path.
The present translation has been based on the version in the Cariyaapi.taka A.t.thakathaa, in the Burmese-script Sixth Council edition.
This has been abridged in places in deference to the size limits of a Wheel booklet.
For a translation of the complete text, the reader is directed to my translation of the Brahmajaala Sutta and its commentaries, The Discourse on the All-Embracing Net of Views, Part IV.
— Bhikkhu Bodhi
We now undertake a detailed explanation of the paaramiis for clansmen following the suttas who are zealously engaged in the practice of the vehicle to great enlightenment, in order to improve their skillfulness in accumulating the requisites for enlightenment.
This is the schedule of the questions: What are the paaramiis?
In what sense are they called paaramiis?
How many are there?
What is their sequence?
What are their characteristics, functions, manifestations, and proximate causes?
What is their condition?
What is their defilement?
What is their cleansing?
What are their opposites?
How are they to be practiced?
How are they analyzed?
How are they synthesized?
By what means are they accomplished?
How much time is required to accomplish them?
What benefits do they bring?
What is their fruit?
The answers follow.
The paaramiis are the noble qualities such as giving, etc., accompanied by compassion and skillful means, and untainted by craving, conceit, and views.
The bodhisattvas, the great beings, are supreme, since they are the highest of beings by reason of their distinguished qualities such as giving, virtue, etc.
The paaramiis — the activities of giving, etc.
— are their character or their conduct.
Or else: he excels, thus he is supreme.
The bodhisattva is the fulfiller and guardian of the noble qualities such as giving, etc.; that which belongs to the supreme — the character or conduct of the one who is supreme — is a paaramii, i.e., the activities of giving, etc.
In brief there are ten.
These have come down in the texts in their specific character.
As it is said:
“How many qualities are there, Lord, issuing in Buddhahood?
“There are, Saariputta, ten qualities issuing in Buddhahood.
What are the ten?
Giving, Saariputta, is a quality issuing in Buddhahood.
Virtue, renunciation, wisdom, energy, patience, truthfulness, determination, loving-kindness, and equanimity are qualities issuing in Buddhahood.
But some say there are six.
This is said by way of their synthesis, which we will explain below.
Here “sequence” means sequence of teaching.
This sequence is rooted in the order in which the paaramiis are initially undertaken, which in turn is rooted in the order in which they are investigated.
The quality which is investigated and undertaken at the beginning is taught first.
Therein, giving is stated first, for giving assists virtue and is easy to practice.
Giving accompanied by virtue is abundantly fruitful and beneficial, so virtue is stated immediately after giving.
Virtue accompanied by renunciation… renunciation by wisdom… wisdom by energy… energy by patience… patience by truthfulness… truthfulness by determination… determination by loving-kindness… and loving-kindness accompanied by equanimity is abundantly fruitful and beneficial; thus equanimity is stated immediately after loving-kindness.
Equanimity is accompanied by compassion and compassion by equanimity.
“How can the bodhisattvas, the great compassionate ones, look upon living beings with equanimity?” Some teachers say: “Sometimes they show equanimity toward living beings when it is necessary to do so.” But others say: “They do not show equanimity toward living beings, but toward the offensive actions performed by beings.
Another method may be given:
Giving is stated at the beginning: because it is common to all beings, since even ordinary people practice giving; because it is the least fruitful; and because it is the easiest to practice.
Virtue is stated immediately after giving: because virtue purifies both the donor and the recipient; to show that, while giving benefits others, virtue prevents the affliction of others; in order to state a factor of abstinence immediately after a factor of positive activity; and in order to show the cause for the achievement of a favorable state of future existence right after the cause for the achievement of wealth.
Renunciation is mentioned immediately after virtue: because renunciation perfects the achievement of virtue; in order to list good conduct of mind immediately after good conduct of body and speech; because meditation succeeds easily for one who has purified his virtue; in order to show that the purification of one's end through the abandoning of the offensive mental defilements follows the purification of one's means by the abandoning of offensive actions; and to state the abandoning of mental obsessions immediately after the abandoning of bodily and verbal transgressions.
Wisdom is mentioned immediately after renunciation: because renunciation is perfected and purified by wisdom; to show that there is no wisdom in the absence of meditation, since concentration is the proximate cause of wisdom and wisdom the manifestation of concentration; in order to list the causal basis for equanimity immediately after the causal basis for serenity; and to show that skillful means in working for the welfare of others springs from meditation directed to their welfare.
Energy is stated immediately after wisdom: because the function of wisdom is perfected by the arousing of energy; to show the miraculous work the bodhisattva undertakes for the welfare of beings after he has reached reflective acquiescence in their emptiness; to state the causal basis for exertion right after the basis for equanimity; and to state the arousing of energy right after the activity of careful consideration, according to the statement: “The activity of those who have carefully considered brings excellent results.
Patience is mentioned immediately after energy: because patience is perfected by energy, as it is said: “The energetic man, by arousing his energy, overcomes the suffering imposed by beings and formations”; because patience is an adornment of energy, as it is said: “The patience of the energetic man shines with splendor”; in order to state the causal basis for serenity immediately after the basis for exertion, for restlessness due to excessive activity is abandoned through reflective acquiescence in the Dhamma; in order to show the perseverance of the man of energy, since one who is patient and free from restlessness perseveres in his work; in order to show the absence of craving for rewards in a bodhisattva diligently engaged in activity for the welfare of others, for there is no craving when he reflects on the Dhamma in accordance with actuality; and to show that the bodhisattva must patiently endure the suffering created by others even when he is working to the utmost for their welfare.
Truthfulness is stated immediately after patience: because the determination to practice patience continues long through truthfulness; having first mentioned the patient endurance of wrongs inflicted by others, to mention next fidelity to one's word to render them help; in order to show that a bodhisattva who through patience does not vacillate in the face of abuse, through truthful speech does not relinquish; and to show the truthfulness of the knowledge developed through reflective acquiescence in the emptiness of beings.
Determination is stated immediately after truthfulness; because truthfulness is perfected by determination, since abstinence becomes perfect in one whose determination is unshakeable; having first shown non-deception in speech, to show next unshakeable commitment to one's word, for a bodhisattva devoted to truth proceeds to fulfill his vows of giving, etc., without wavering; and to show, right after the veracity of knowledge, the complete accumulation of the requisites of enlightenment; for one who knows things as they really are determines upon the requisites of enlightenment and brings them to completion by refusing to vacillate in the face of their opposites.
Loving-kindness is mentioned immediately after determination: because loving-kindness perfects the determination to undertake activity for the welfare of others; in order to list the work of actually providing for the welfare of others right after stating the determination to do so, for “one determined upon the requisites of enlightenment abides in loving-kindness”; and because the undertaking proceeds imperturbably only when determination is unshakeable.
Equanimity is mentioned immediately after loving-kindness: because equanimity purifies loving-kindness; in order to show the indifference one must maintain toward the wrongs inflicted by others when one is providing for their welfare; having mentioned the development of loving-kindness, to state next the development of the quality which evolves from it; and to show the bodhisattva's wonderful virtue of remaining impartial even toward those who wish him well.
Thus the sequence of the paaramiis should be understood as explained.
Firstly, all the paaramiis, without exception, have as their characteristic the benefiting of others; as their function, the rendering of help to others, or not vacillating; as their manifestation, the wish for the welfare of others, or Buddhahood; and as their proximate cause, great compassion, or compassion and skillful means.
Taken separately, the perfection of giving is the volition of relinquishing oneself and one's belongings, accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
The perfection of virtue is good conduct of body and speech, accompanied by compassion and skillful means; in denotation, it is the abstinence from what should not be done, the volition to do what should be done, etc.
The perfection of renunciation is the act of consciousness which occurs renouncing sense pleasures and existence, preceded by the perception of their inherent unsatisfactoriness and accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
The perfection of wisdom is the comprehension of the general and particular characteristics of dhammas, accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
The perfection of energy is bodily and mental work for the welfare of others, accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
The perfection of patience is the endurance of harm imposed by beings and formations, or the act of consciousness occurring in such a mode, predominated by non-aversion and accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
The perfection of truthfulness is non-deceptiveness in speech, analyzed into an abstinence, a volition, etc., accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
The perfection of determination is the unshakeable determination to undertake, accompanied by compassion and skillful means; or it is the act of consciousness occurring in such a mode.
The perfection of loving-kindness is the wish to provide for the welfare and happiness of the world, accompanied by compassion and skillful means; in denotation, it is benevolence.
The perfection of equanimity is the attitude of impartiality toward desirable and undesirable beings and formations, dispelling attraction and repulsion, accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
Giving has the characteristic of relinquishing; its function is to dispel greed for things that can be given away; its manifestation is non-attachment, or the achievement of prosperity and a favorable state of existence; an object that can be relinquished is its proximate cause.
Virtue has the characteristic of composing; co-ordinating and establishing are also mentioned as its characteristic.
Its function is to dispel moral depravity, or its function is blameless conduct; its manifestation is moral purity; shame and moral dread are its proximate cause.
Renunciation has the characteristic of departing from sense pleasures and existence; its function is to verify their unsatisfactoriness; its manifestation is the withdrawal from them; a sense of spiritual urgency is its proximate cause.
Wisdom has the characteristic of penetrating the real specific nature, or the characteristic of sure penetration, like the penetration of an arrow shot by a skillful archer; its function is to illuminate the objective field, like a lamp; its manifestation is non-confusion, like a guide in a forest; concentration, or the Four Truths, is its proximate cause.
Energy has the characteristic of striving; its function is to fortify; its manifestation is indefatigability; an occasion for the arousing of energy, or a sense of spiritual urgency, is its proximate cause.
Patience has the characteristic of acceptance; its function is to endure the desirable and undesirable; its manifestation is tolerance or non-opposition; seeing things as they really are is its proximate cause.
Truthfulness has the characteristic of non-deceptiveness in speech; its function is to verify in accordance with fact; its manifestation is excellence; honesty is its proximate cause.
Determination has the characteristic of determining upon the requisites of enlightenment; its function is to overcome their opposites; its manifestation is unshakeableness in that task; the requisites of enlightenment are its proximate cause.
Loving-kindness has the characteristic of promoting the welfare; its function is to provide for their welfare, or its function is to remove resentment; its manifestation is kindliness; seeing the agreeable side of beings is its proximate cause.
Equanimity has the characteristic of promoting the aspect of neutrality; its function is to see things impartially; its manifestation is the subsiding of attraction and repulsion: reflection upon the fact that all beings inherit the results of their own kamma is its proximate cause.
And here it should be mentioned that accompaniment by compassion and skillful means is the distinguishing feature of the characteristic of each virtue — e.g., of relinquishing in the case of giving, etc.
For the virtues such as giving, etc., which occur in the mental continuities of bodhisattvas are always accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
It is this which makes them paaramiis.
The condition of the paaramiis is, firstly, the great aspiration.
This is the aspiration supported by the eight qualifications, which occurs thus: “Crossed I would cross, freed I would free, tamed I would tame, calmed I would calm, comforted I would comfort, attained to nibbaana I would lead to nibbaana, purified I would purify, enlightened I would enlighten!” This is the condition for all the paaramiis without exception.
The eight qualifications through which the aspiration succeeds are: the human state, the male sex, the cause, the sight of the Master, the going forth, the achievement of noble qualities, extreme dedication, and strong desire.
The human state: The aspiration for Buddhahood only succeeds when made by one who has attained to the human state of existence, not when made by one existing as a naaga, supa.n.na, etc.
Why?
Because these other states do not correspond with the state of a Buddha.
The male sex: For one who has attained to the human state, the aspiration only succeeds when made by a man, not when made by a woman, eunuch, neuter, or hermaphrodite.
Why?
For the aforesaid reason, and because there is no fulfillment of the required characteristics.
As it is said: “This is impossible, bhikkhus, this cannot come to pass, that a woman might become a perfectly enlightened Buddha”.
The cause: the achievement of the necessary supporting conditions.
Even for a man, the aspiration only succeeds for one endowed with the necessary supporting conditions, one who has achieved the requisite causal foundation, not for anyone else.
The sight of the Master: the personal presence of the Master.
The aspiration only succeeds when made by one aspiring in the presence of a living Buddha.
When made after the Exalted One has passed into parinibbaana — before a shrine, at the foot of the Bodhi-tree, in front of an image, or in the presence of paccekabuddhas or the Buddha's disciples — the aspiration does not succeed.
Why?
Because the recipient lacks the power.
The aspiration only succeeds when made in the presence of the Buddhas, for they alone possess spiritual power adequate to the loftiness of the aspiration.
The going forth: The aspiration succeeds only when made in the presence of the Exalted Buddha by one who has gone forth, either as a bhikkhu or as an ascetic who maintains the doctrine of kamma and the moral efficacy of action; it does not succeed for one living in the household state.
Why?
Because the household state does not correspond with that of a Buddha.
The great bodhisattvas attain the supreme enlightenment only after they have gone forth into homelessness, not while they are still householders.
Therefore, at the time of making the resolution, it is only one who has gone forth, endowed with the appropriate qualities and determination, who can succeed.
The achievement of noble qualities: the achievement of such noble qualities as the direct knowledges, etc.
For the aspiration only succeeds when made by one who has gone forth and gained the eight meditative attainments and the five mundane types of direct knowledge; it does not succeed for one devoid of these qualities.
Why?
Because one devoid of them is incapable of investigating the paaramiis.
It is because he possesses the necessary supporting conditions and the direct knowledges that the Great Man, after he has made the aspiration, is able to investigate the paaramiis by himself.
Extreme dedication: extreme devotion.
The aspiration only succeeds for one endowed with the aforesaid qualities who at the time has such strong devotion for the Buddhas that he is prepared to relinquish his very life for them.
Strong desire: wholesome desire, the wish for accomplishment.
One possessed of the aforesaid qualities must have strong desire, yearning, and longing to practice the qualities issuing in Buddhahood.
Only then does his aspiration succeed, not otherwise.
The following similes illustrate the magnitude of the desire required.
If he were to hear: “He alone can attain Buddhahood who can cross a whole world-system filled with water and reach the further shore by the bare strength of his arms” — he would not deem that difficult to do, but would be filled with desire for the task and would not shrink away.
If he were to hear: “He alone can attain Buddhahood who can tread across a whole world-system filled with flameless, smokeless red-hot coals, cross out, and reach the other side,” etc….
If he were to hear: “He alone can attain Buddhahood who can tread across a whole world-system that has become a solid mass of sharp-pointed sword-stakes, cross out, and reach the other side,” etc….
If he were to hear: “He alone can attain Buddhahood who can cut through a whole world-system that has become a jungle of thorny creepers covered by a solid thicket of bamboo, cross out, and reach the other side,” etc….
If he were to hear: “Buddhahood can only be attained after being tortured in hell for four incalculables and a, aeons” — he would not deem that difficult to do, but would be filled with desire for the task and would not shrink away.
Such is the magnitude of the desire required.
The aspiration, made by one endowed with these eight factors, is in denotation the act of consciousness occurring together with the collection of these eight factors.
Its characteristic is rightly resolving to attain the supreme enlightenment.
Its function is to yearn, “Oh, may I awaken to the supreme perfect enlightenment, and bring well-being and happiness to all beings!” It is manifest as the root-cause for the requisites of enlightenment.
Its proximate cause is great compassion, or the achievement of the necessary supporting conditions.
Since it has as its object the inconceivable plane of the Buddhas and the welfare of the whole immeasurable world of beings, it should be seen as the loftiest, most sublime and exalted distinction of merit, endowed with immeasurable potency, the root-cause of all the qualities issuing in Buddhahood.
Simultaneous with its arising, the Great Man enters upon the practice of the vehicle to great enlightenment.
He becomes fixed in his destiny, irreversible, and therefore properly gains the designation “bodhisattva.” His mind becomes fully devoted to the supreme enlightenment in its completeness, and his capacity to fulfill the training in the requisites of enlightenment becomes established.
For when their aspiration succeeds, the Great Men correctly investigate all the paaramiis with their self-evolved knowledge which prefigures their future attainment of omniscience.
Then they undertake their practice, and fulfill them in due order, as was done by the wise Sumedha when he made his great aspiration.
Like the aspiration, great compassion and skillful means are also conditions for the paaramiis.
Therein, “skillful means” is the wisdom which transforms giving into requisites of enlightenment.
Through their great compassion and skillful means, the Great Men devote themselves to working uninterruptedly for the welfare of others without any concern for their own happiness and without any fear of the extremely difficult course of conduct that great bodhisattvas must follow.
And their nature is such that they are able to promote the welfare and happiness of beings even on occasions when they are merely seen, heard of, or recollected, inspires confidence.
Through his wisdom the bodhisattva perfects within himself the character of a Buddha, through his compassion the ability to perform the work of a Buddha.
Through wisdom he brings himself across, through compassion he leads others across.
Through wisdom he understands the suffering of others, through compassion he strives to alleviate their suffering.
Through wisdom he becomes disenchanted with suffering, through compassion he accepts suffering.
Through wisdom he aspires for nibbaana, through compassion he remains in the round of existence.
Through compassion he enters sa.msaara, through wisdom he does not delight in it.
Through wisdom he destroys all attachments, but because his wisdom is accompanied by compassion he never desists from activity that benefits others.
Through compassion he shakes with sympathy for all, but because his compassion is accompanied by wisdom his mind is unattached.
Through wisdom he is free from “I-making” and “mine-making,” through compassion he is free from lethargy and depression.
So too, through wisdom and compassion respectively, he becomes his own protector and the protector of others, a sage and a hero, one who does not torment himself and one who does not torment others, one who promotes his own welfare and the welfare of others, fearless and a giver of fearlessness, dominated by consideration for the Dhamma and by consideration for the world, grateful for favors done and forward in doing favors for others, devoid of delusion and devoid of craving, accomplished in knowledge and accomplished in conduct, possessed of the powers and possessed of the grounds of self-confidence.
Thus wisdom and compassion, as the means for attaining each of the specific fruits of the paaramiitaas, is the condition for the paaramiis.
And the same pair is a condition for the resolution as well.
The four factors — zeal, adroitness, stability, and beneficent conduct — are likewise conditions for the paaramiis.
Because they serve as the basis for the arising of Buddhahood, these factors are called “grounds for Buddhahood”.
Herein, “zeal” means energy in striving for the requisites of enlightenment.
“Adroitness” is wisdom in applying skillful means to the requisites of enlightenment.
“Stability” is determination, an unshakeable determination of the will.
“Beneficent conduct” is the development of loving-kindness and compassion.
Another set of conditions is the six inclinations — the inclinations toward renunciation, solitude, non-greed, non-hatred, non-delusion, and escape.
For bodhisattvas, seeing the fault in sense pleasures and in household life, incline to renunciation.
Seeing the fault in company, they incline to solitude.
Seeing the faults in greed, hatred, and delusion, they incline to non-greed, non-hatred, and non-delusion.
Seeing the fault in all the realms of existence, bodhisattvas incline to escape.
Therefore these six inclinations of bodhisattvas are conditions for the paaramiis.
For the paaramiis do not arise without seeing the danger in greed, etc., and the superiority of non-greed, etc.
The inclination to non-greed, etc., is the slanting of the mind toward relinquishing, etc., because of the superiority of non-greed, etc.
So too, for bodhisattvas striving for enlightenment, the inclination toward each of the ten paaramiis is a condition for the practice of each.
For bodhisattvas, through their inclination toward giving, see the fault in its opposite, i.e., in stinginess, and therefore fulfill the perfection of giving.
Through their inclination toward virtue, they see the fault in moral depravity, and therefore fulfill the perfection of virtue.
Through their inclination toward renunciation, they see the fault in sense pleasures and in household life; through their inclination toward knowing things as they really are, they see the faults in ignorance and perplexity; through their inclination toward energy, they see the fault in laziness; through their inclination toward patience, they see the fault in impatience; through their inclination toward truthfulness, they see the fault in deceptive speech; through their inclination toward determination, they see the fault in lack of determination; through their inclination toward loving-kindness, they see the fault in ill-will; and through their inclination toward equanimity, they see the danger in the vicissitudes of the world.
Thus they fulfill the perfection of renunciation and the other perfections down to equanimity.
In this way, the inclination toward giving and the other nine virtues, by bringing about the achievement of all the paaramiis, serves as their condition.
Reviewing the danger in their opposites and the benefit in their practice is another condition for the paaramiis; e.g., in the case of the perfection of giving, the danger in non-relinquishing and the benefit in relinquishing.
This is the method of reviewing:
The perfection of giving should be reflected upon thus: “Possessions such as fields, land, bullion, gold, cattle, buffaloes, slaves, children, wives, etc., bring tremendous harm to those who become attached to them.
Because they stimulate desire they are wanted by many people; they can be confiscated by kings and thieves; they spark off disputes and create enemies; they are basically insubstantial; to acquire and protect them one has to harass others; when they are destroyed, many kinds of calamities, such as sorrow, etc., follow; and because of attachment to these things, the mind becomes obsessed with the stain of stinginess, and as a result one is reborn in the plane of misery.
On the other hand, one act of relinquishing these things is one step to safety.
Hence one should relinquish them with diligence.
Further, when a suppliant asks for something, a bodhisattva should reflect: “He is my intimate friend, for he divulges his own secret to me.
He is my teacher, for he teaches me: 'When you go you have to abandon all.
Going to the world beyond, you cannot even take your own possessions!' He is a companion helping me to remove my belongings from this world which, like a blazing house, is blazing with the fire of death.
In removing this he helps me to get rid of the worry it costs me.
He is my best friend, for by enabling me to perform this noble act of giving, he helps me to accomplish the most eminent and difficult of all achievements, the attainment of the plane of the Buddhas.
He should further reflect: “He honors me with a lofty task; therefore I should acknowledge that honor faithfully.” And: “Since life is bound to end I should give even when not asked, much more when asked.” And: “Those with a lofty temperament search for someone to give to, but he has come to me on his own accord because of my merit.” And: “Bestowing a gift upon a suppliant will be beneficial to me as well as to him.” And: “Just as I would benefit myself, so should I benefit all the world.” And: “If there were no suppliants, how would I fulfill the perfection of giving?” And: “Everything I acquire should be obtained only to give to others.” And: “When will beggars feel free to take my belongings on their own accord, without asking?” And: “How can I be dear and agreeable to beggars, and how can they be dear and agreeable to me?
How can I give and, after giving, be elated, exultant, filled with rapture and joy?
And how can beggars be so on my account?
How can my inclination to giving be lofty?
How can I give to beggars even without being asked, knowing their heart's desire?” And: “Since there are goods, and beggars have come, not to give them something would be a great deception on my part.” And: “How can I relinquish my own life and limbs to those who ask for them?
He should arouse a desire to give things away without concern by reflecting: “Good returns to the one who gives without his concern, just as the boomerang returns to the one who threw it without his concern.” If a dear person asks for something, he should arouse joy by reflecting: “One who is dear is asking me for something.” If an indifferent person asks for something, he should arouse joy by reflecting: “Surely, if I give him something he will become my friend, since giving to those who ask wins their affection.” And if a hostile person asks for something, he should be especially happy, thinking: “My foe is asking me for something; though he is hostile toward me, by means of this gift he will surely become my dear friend.” Thus he should give to neutral and hostile people in the same way he gives to dear people, having first aroused loving-kindness and compassion.
If, due to their cumulative force, states of greed should arise for things which can be given away, the bodhisattva-aspirant should reflect: “Well now, good man, when you made the aspiration for full enlightenment, did you not surrender this body as well as the merit gained in relinquishing it for the sake of helping all beings?
Attachment to external objects is like the bathing of an elephant; therefore you should not be attached to anything.
Suppose there is a great medicine-tree, and someone in need of its roots takes away its roots; someone in need of its shoots, bark, trunk, limbs, heartwood, branches, foliage, flowers, or fruits takes away its shoots, bark, trunk, etc.
The tree would not be assailed by such thoughts as: 'They are taking away my belongings.' In the same way, when I have undertaken to exert myself for the welfare of all the world, I should not arouse even the subtlest wrong thought over this wretched, ungrateful, impure body, which I have entrusted to the service of others.
And besides, what distinction can be made between the internal material elements and the external material elements?
They are both subject to inevitable breaking-up, dispersal, and dissolution.
This is only confused prattle, the adherence to this body as 'This is mine, this am I, this is my self.' I should have no more concern over my own hands, feet, eyes, and flesh than over external things.
Instead I should arouse the thought to surrender them to others: 'Let those who need them take them away.' As he reflects in this way, resolved upon full enlightenment without concern for his body or life, his bodily, vocal, and mental actions will easily become fully purified.
When his bodily, vocal, and mental actions, along with his livelihood, become purified, he abides in the practice of the true way, and through his skillful means in regard to gain and loss, he is able to benefit all beings to an even greater extent by relinquishing material gifts and by giving the gift of fearlessness and the gift of the true Dhamma.
This is the method of reflecting on the perfection of giving.
The perfection of virtue should be reflected upon as follows: “Even the waters of the Ganges cannot wash away the stain of hatred, yet the water of virtue is able to do so.
Even yellow sandalwood cannot cool the fever of lust, yet virtue is able to remove it.
Virtue is the unique adornment of the good, surpassing the adornments cherished by ordinary people, such as necklaces, diadems, and earrings.
It is a sweet-scented fragrance superior to incense as it pervades all directions and is always in place; a supreme magical spell which wins the homage of deities and of powerful khattiyas, etc., a staircase ascending to the world of the gods, to the heaven of the Four Great Kings, etc., a means for achieving the jhaanas and the direct knowledges; a highway leading to the great city of nibbaana; the foundation for the enlightenment of disciples, paccekabuddhas, and perfectly enlightened Buddhas.
And as a means for the fulfillment of all one's wishes and desires, it surpasses the tree of plenty and the wish-fulfilling gem.
Virtue should be reflected upon as the basis for rapture and joy; as granting immunity from fear of self-reproach, the reproach of others, temporal punishment, and an evil destination after death; as praised by the wise; as the root-cause for freedom from remorse; as the basis for security; and as surpassing the achievements of high birth, wealth, sovereignty, long life, beauty, status, kinsmen, and friends.
For great rapture and joy arise in the virtuous man when he reflects on his own accomplishment in virtue: “I have done what is wholesome, I have done what is good, I have built myself a shelter from fear.” The virtuous man does not blame himself, and other wise men do not blame him, and he does not encounter the dangers of temporal punishment or an evil destination after death.
To the contrary, the wise praise the noble character of the virtuous man, and the virtuous man is not subject to the remorse which arises in the immoral man when he thinks: “I have committed evil, wicked, sinful deeds.” And virtue is the supreme basis for security, since it is the foundation for diligence, a blessing, and a means for achieving great benefits, such as preventing the loss of wealth, etc.
Accomplishment in virtue surpasses birth in a good family, since a virtuous man of low birth deserves to be worshipped even by great, powerful khattiyas.
Virtue surpasses material wealth, for it cannot be confiscated by thieves, follows one to the world beyond, produces great fruit, and acts as the foundation for such qualities as serenity, etc.
Because it enables one to achieve supreme sovereignty over one's own mind, virtue surpasses the sovereignty of khattiyas, etc.
And because of their virtue, beings attain sovereignty in their respective orders.
Virtue is superior even to life, for it is said that a single day in the life of the virtuous is better than a hundred years of life devoid of virtue; and there being life, the disavowal of the training is called death.
Virtue surpasses the achievement of beauty, for it makes one beautiful even to one's enemies, and it cannot be vanquished by the adversities of aging and sickness.
As the foundation for distinguished states of happiness, virtue surpasses such distinguished dwellings as palaces, mansions, etc., and such distinguished social positions as that of a king, prince, or general.
Because it promotes one's highest welfare and follows one to the world beyond, virtue surpasses kinsmen and friends, even those who are close and affectionate.
Again, in accomplishing the difficult task of self-protection, virtue is superior to troops of elephants, horses, chariots, and infantry, as well as to such devices as mantras, spells, and blessings, for it depends on oneself, does not depend on others, and has a great sphere of influence.
Hence it is said: “Dhamma protects the one who lives by Dhamma”.
When one reflects in this way upon the numerous noble qualities of virtue, one's unfulfilled achievement of virtue will become fulfilled, and one's unpurified virtue will become purified.
If, due to their cumulative force, states antithetical to virtue such as aversion should arise from time to time, the aspirant should reflect: “Did you not make the resolution to win full enlightenment?
One defective in virtue cannot even succeed in mundane affairs, much less in supramundane matters.
You should reach the peak of virtue, for virtue is the foundation for supreme enlightenment, the foremost of all achievements.
You should always be well behaved, safeguarding your virtue perfectly, more carefully than a hen safeguarding its eggs.
Further, by teaching the Dhamma you should help beings to enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles.
But the word of a morally dubious man is no more reliable than the remedy of a doctor who does not consider what is suitable for his patients.
How can I be trustworthy, so that I can help beings to enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles?
I must be pure in character and in virtue.
How can I acquire the distinguished attainments such as the jhaanas, etc., so that I will be capable of helping others and of fulfilling the perfection of wisdom, etc.?
The distinguished attainments such as the jhaanas, etc., are not possible without purification of virtue.
Therefore virtue should be made perfectly pure.
The perfection of renunciation should be reflected upon by first discerning the dangers in household life, according to the text “household life is constricting, a path for the dust of passions,” etc.; in sense pleasures, according to the text, “sense pleasures are like a chain of bones,” etc.; and in sensual desire, according to the text “suppose a man borrowed a loan and undertook work,” etc..
Then, in the opposite way, one should reflect upon the benefits in going forth, according to the text “going forth is like open space,” etc..
This is a brief statement.
For details one should consult such suttas as “The Great Mass of Suffering” or “The Simile of the Venomous Snakes”.
For the perfection of wisdom, the noble qualities of wisdom should be considered, as follows: “Without wisdom, the virtues such as giving do not become purified and cannot perform their respective functions.
Just as, without life, the bodily organism loses its luster and cannot perform its proper activities, and as without consciousness the sense faculties cannot exercise their functions in their respective spheres, just so, without wisdom the faculties such as faith, etc., cannot perform their functions.
Wisdom is the chief cause for the practice of the other paaramii.
For when their wisdom-eyes open up, the great bodhisattvas give even their own limbs and organs without extolling themselves and disparaging others.
Like medicine-trees they give devoid of discrimination, filled with joy throughout the three times.
By means of wisdom, the act of relinquishing, exercised with skillful means and practiced for the welfare of others, attains the status of a paaramii; but giving for one's own benefit is like an investment.
Again, without wisdom virtue cannot be severed from the defilements of craving, etc., and therefore cannot even reach purification, much less serve as the foundation for the qualities of an omniscient Buddha.
Only the man of wisdom clearly recognizes the dangers in household life, in the strands of sense pleasure, and in sa.msaara, and sees the benefits in going forth, in attaining the jhaanas, and in realizing nibbaana; and he alone goes forth into homelessness, develops the jhaanic attainments, and, directed toward nibbaana, establishes others therein.
“Energy devoid of wisdom does not accomplish the purpose desired since it is wrongly aroused, and it is better not to arouse energy at all than to arouse it in the wrong way.
But when energy is conjoined with wisdom, there is nothing it cannot accomplish if equipped with the proper means.
Again, only the man of wisdom can patiently tolerate the wrongs of others, not the dull-witted man.
In the man lacking wisdom, the wrongs of others only provoke impatience; but for the wise, they call his patience into play and make it grow even stronger.
The wise man, having understood as they really are three noble truths, their causes and opposites, never speaks deceptively to others.
So too, having fortified himself with the power of wisdom, the wise man in his fortitude forms an unshakeable determination to undertake all the paaramiis.
Only the man of wisdom is skillful in providing for the welfare of all beings, without discriminating between dear people, neutrals, and enemies.
And only by means of wisdom can he remain indifferent to the vicissitudes of the world, such as gain and loss, without being affected by them.
In this way one should reflect upon the noble qualities of wisdom, recognizing it to be the cause for the purification of all the paaramiis.
Furthermore, without wisdom there is no achievement of vision, and without the achievement of vision there can be no accomplishment in virtue.
One lacking virtue and vision cannot achieve concentration, and without concentration one cannot even secure one's own welfare, much less the lofty goal of providing for the welfare of others.
Therefore a bodhisattva, practicing for the welfare of others, should admonish himself: “Have you made a thorough effort to purify your wisdom?” For it is by the spiritual power of wisdom that the Great Beings, established in the four foundations, benefit the world with the four bases of beneficence, help beings enter the path to emancipation, and bring their faculties to maturity.
Through the power of wisdom, again, they are devoted to the investigation of the aggregates, sense bases, etc., fully comprehend the processes of origination and cessation in accordance with actuality, develop the qualities of giving, etc., to the stages of distinction and penetration, and perfect the training of bodhisattvas.
Thus the perfection of wisdom should be reinforced by determining the noble qualities of wisdom with their numerous modes and constituents.
The perfection of energy should be reflected upon thus: “Without energy a man cannot even achieve success in worldly works directed to visible ends.
But there is nothing the energetic, indefatigable man cannot achieve.
One lacking energy cannot undertake to rescue all beings from the great flood of sa.msaara; even if his energy is only moderate he will give up in the middle.
But one bristling with energy can achieve perfection in all he undertakes.
The noble qualities of energy should be further reviewed as follows: “One intent on rescuing himself alone from the mire of sa.msaara cannot fulfill his ideal if he relaxes his energy; how much less one who aspires to rescue the entire world.” And: “Through the power of energy such wrong thoughts as the following are kept away: 'It is quite right for you to escape from the suffering of sa.msaara by yourself alone; for so long as you are a foolish worldling the host of defilements is as difficult to restrain as a herd of mad elephants, the kamma caused by them is like a murderer with drawn sword, the evil destinations based on these actions stand constantly before you with open doors, and evil friends are always around to enjoin you in those actions and admonish you to practice them.'” And: “If even full enlightenment can be achieved by one's own energy, what can be difficult?
The perfection of patience should be considered next: “Patience is the unimpeded weapon of the good in the development of noble qualities, for it dispels anger, the opposite of all such qualities, without residue.
It is the adornment of those capable of vanquishing the foe; the strength of recluses and brahmans; a stream of water extinguishing the fire of anger; the basis for acquiring a good reputation; a mantra for quelling the poisonous speech of evil people; the supreme source of constancy in those established in restraint.
Patience is an ocean on account of its depth; a shore bounding the great ocean of hatred; a panel closing off the door to the plane of misery; a staircase ascending to the worlds of the gods and Brahmaas; the ground for the habitation of all noble qualities; the supreme purification of body, speech and mind.
Patience should be further fortified by reflection: “Those who lack patience are afflicted in this world and apply themselves to actions which will lead to their affliction in the life to come.” And: “Although this suffering arises through the wrong deeds of others, this body of mine is the field for that suffering, and the action which is its seed was sown by me alone.” And: “This suffering will release me from the debt of that kamma.” And: “If there were no wrong-doers, how could I accomplish the perfection of patience?” And: “Although he is a wrong-doer now, in the past he was my benefactor.” And: “A wrong-doer is also a benefactor, for he is the basis for developing patience.” And: “All beings are like my own children.
Who becomes angry over the misdeeds of his own children?” And: “He wrongs me because of some residue of anger in myself; this residue I should remove.” And: “I am just as much the cause as he for the wrong on account of which this suffering has arisen.” And: “All those phenomena by which wrong was done, and those to whom it was done — all those, at this very moment, have ceased.
With whom, then, should you now be angry, and by whom should anger be aroused?
When all phenomena are non-self, who can do wrong to whom?
If, due to its cumulative force, anger caused by the wrongs of others should continue to overpower the mind, one should reflect: “Patience is the contributive cause for rendering help to others in return for their wrong.” And: “This wrong, by causing me suffering, is a condition for faith, since suffering is said to be the decisive support for faith, and it is also a condition for the perception of discontent with all the world.” And: “This is the nature of the sense-faculties — to encounter desirable and undesirable objects.
How then is it possible not to encounter undesirable objects?” And: “Under the control of anger, a person becomes mad and distraught, so why retaliate?” And: “All these beings are watched over by the Buddha as if they were his own dear children.
Therefore I should not be angry with them.” And: “When the wrong-doer is endowed with noble qualities, I should not be angry with him.
And when he does not have any noble qualities, then I should regard him with compassion.” And: “Because of anger my fame and noble qualities diminish, and to the pleasure of my enemies I become ugly, sleep in discomfort, etc.” And: “Anger is the only real enemy, for it is the agent of all harm and the destroyer of all good.” And: “When one has patience one has no enemies.” And: “Because of his wrong, the wrong-doer will meet suffering in the future, but so long as I remain patient I will not.” And: “Enemies are the consequence of my angry thought.
When I vanquish anger by patience, my foe, who is the by-product of my anger, will also be vanquished.” And: “I should not relinquish the noble quality of patience because of a little anger.
Anger is the antithesis and obstruction to all noble qualities, so if I become angry, how can my virtue, etc., reach fulfillment?
And when those qualities are absent, how can I devote myself to helping other beings and attain the ultimate goal in accordance with my vows.” And: “When there is patience, the mind becomes concentrated, free from external distraction.
With the mind concentrated, all formations appear to reflection as impermanent and suffering, all phenomena as non-self, nibbaana as unconditioned, deathless, peaceful, and sublime, and the Buddha-qualities as endowed with inconceivable and immeasurable potency.
Then, established in acquiescence in conformity, the groundlessness of all 'I-making' and 'mine-making' becomes evident to reflection thus: 'Mere phenomena alone exist, devoid of self or of anything pertaining to a self.
They arise and pass away in accordance with their conditions.
They do not come from anywhere, they do not go anywhere, they are not established anywhere.
There is no agency in anything whatsoever.' In this way a bodhisattva becomes fixed in destiny, bound for enlightenment, irreversible.
This is the method of reflecting upon the perfection of patience.
The perfection of truthfulness should be reviewed thus: “Without truthfulness, virtue, etc., is impossible, and there can be no practice in accordance with one's vows.
All evil states converge upon the transgression of truth.
One who is not devoted to truth is unreliable and his word cannot be accepted in the future.
On the other hand, one devoted to truth secures the foundation of all noble qualities.
With truthfulness as the foundation, he is capable of purifying and fulfilling all the requisites of enlightenment.
Not deceived about the true nature of phenomena, he performs the functions of all the requisites of enlightenment and completes the practice of the bodhisattva path.
The perfection of determination should be reviewed thus: “Without firmly undertaking the practice of giving, maintaining an unshakeable determination in the encounter with their opposites, and practicing them with constancy and vigor, the bases of enlightenment — i.e., the requisites such as giving, etc.
— do not arise.
The noble qualities of loving-kindness should be reflected upon as follows: “One resolved only upon his own welfare cannot achieve success in this world or a happy rebirth in the life to come without some concern for the welfare of others; how then can one wishing to establish all beings in the attainment of nibbaana succeed without loving-kindness?
And if you wish to ultimately lead all beings to the supramundane achievement of nibbaana, you should begin by wishing for their mundane success here and now.” And: “I cannot provide for the welfare and happiness of others merely by wishing for it.
Let me put forth effort to accomplish it.” And: “Now I support them by promoting their welfare and happiness; afterward they will be my companions in sharing the Dhamma.” And: “Without these beings, I could not acquire the requisites of enlightenment.
Since they are the cause for the manifestation and perfecting of all the Buddha-qualities, these beings are for me a supreme field of merit, the incomparable basis for planting wholesome roots, the ultimate object of reverence.
Thus one should arouse an especially strong inclination toward promoting the welfare of all beings.
And why should loving-kindness be developed toward all beings?
Because it is the foundation for compassion.
For when one delights in providing for the welfare and happiness of other beings with an unbounded heart, the desire to remove their affliction and suffering becomes powerful and firmly rooted.
And compassion is the first of all the qualities issuing in Buddhahood — their footing, foundation, root, head and chief.
The perfection of equanimity should be considered thus: “When there is no equanimity, the offensive actions performed by beings cause oscillation in the mind.
And when the mind oscillates, it is impossible to practice the requisites of enlightenment.” And: “Even though the mind has been softened with the moisture of loving-kindness, without equanimity one cannot purify the requisites of enlightenment and cannot dedicate one's requisites of merit along with their results to furthering the welfare of beings.
Moreover, the undertaking, determination, fulfillment, and completion of all the requisites of enlightenment succeed through the power of equanimity.
For without equanimity, the aspirant cannot relinquish something without making false discriminations over gifts and recipients.
Without equanimity, he cannot purify his virtue without always thinking about the obstacles to his life and to his vital needs.
Equanimity perfects the power of renunciation, for by its means he overcomes discontent and delight.
It perfects the functions of all the requisites to examine them according to their origin.
When energy is aroused to excess because it has not been examined with equanimity, it cannot perform its proper function of striving.
Forbearance and reflective acquiescence are possible only in one possessed of equanimity.
Because of this quality, he does not speak deceptively about beings or formations.
By looking upon the vicissitudes of worldly events with an equal mind, his determination to fulfill the practices he has undertaken becomes completely unshakeable.
And because he is unconcerned over the wrongs done by others, he perfects the abiding in loving-kindness.
Thus equanimity is indispensable to the practice of all the other paaramiis.
Such is the reflection on the perfection of equanimity.
Thus reviewing the danger in their opposites and the benefits in their practice is a condition for the paaramiis.
In general, being misapprehended by craving, etc., is the defilement of all the paaramiis.
Taken separately, discriminating thoughts over gifts and recipients are the defilement of the perfection of giving.
Discriminating thoughts over beings and times are the defilement of the perfection of virtue.
Discriminating thoughts of delight in sense pleasures and existence, and of discontent with their pacification, are the defilement of the perfection of renunciation.
Discriminating thoughts of “I” and “mine” are the defilement of the perfection of wisdom; discriminating thoughts leaning to listlessness and restlessness, of the perfection of energy; discriminating thoughts of oneself and others, of the perfection of patience; discriminating thoughts of avowing to have seen what was not seen, etc., of the perfection of truthfulness; discriminating thoughts perceiving flaws in the requisites of enlightenment and virtues in their opposites, of the perfection of determination; discriminating thoughts confusing what is harmful with what is beneficial, of the perfection of loving-kindness; and discriminating thoughts over the desirable and undesirable, of the perfection of equanimity.
Thus the defilements should be understood.
Their cleansing is the removal of the taints of craving, etc., and the absence of the aforementioned discriminations.
For the paaramiis become pure and luminous when untainted by such defilements as craving, conceit, views, anger, malice, denigration, domineering, envy, stinginess, craftiness, hypocrisy, obstinacy, presumption, vanity, and negligence, and when devoid of the discriminating thoughts over gifts and recipients, etc.
In general, all the defilements and all unwholesome qualities are their opposites.
Taken separately, stinginess is the opposite of giving, and so on, as mentioned earlier.
Further, giving is opposed to greed, hatred, and delusion, since it applies the qualities of non-greed, non-hatred, and non-delusion to gifts, recipients, and the fruits of giving, respectively.
Virtue is opposed to greed, hatred, and delusion, since it removes crookedness and corruption in bodily conduct, etc.
Renunciation is opposed to these three corruptions since it avoids indulgence in sense pleasures, the affliction of others, and self-mortification.
Wisdom opposes them in so far as greed, etc., create blindness, while knowledge restores sight.
Energy opposes them by arousing the true way free from both listlessness and restlessness.
Patience opposes them by accepting the desirable, the undesirable, and emptiness.
Truthfulness is their opposite because it proceeds in accordance with fact whether others render help or inflict harm.
Determination is the opposite of these three defilements since, after vanquishing the vicissitudes of the world, it remains unshakeable in fulfilling the requisites of enlightenment in the way they have been undertaken.
Loving-kindness is the opposite of greed, hatred, and delusion, through its seclusion from the hindrances.
And equanimity is their opposite by dispelling attraction and repulsion toward desirable and undesirable objects, respectively, and by proceeding evenly under varying circumstances.
The perfection of giving, firstly, is to be practiced by benefiting beings in many ways — by relinquishing one's own happiness, belongings, body, and life to others, by dispelling their fear, and by instructing them in the Dhamma.
Herein, giving is threefold by way of the object to be given: the giving of material things, the giving of fearlessness, and the giving of the Dhamma.
Among these, the object to be given can be twofold: internal and external.
The external gift is tenfold: food, drink, garments, vehicles, garlands, scents, unguents, bedding, dwellings, and lamps.
These gifts, again, become manifold by analyzing each into its constituents; e.g., food into hard food, soft food, etc.
The external gift can also become sixfold when analyzed by way of sense object: visible forms, sounds, smells, tastes, tangibles, and non-sensory objects.
The sense objects, such as visible forms, become manifold when analyzed into blue, etc.
So too, the external gift is manifold by way of the divers valuables and belongings such as gems, gold, silver, pearls, coral, etc.; fields, lands, parks, etc.; slaves, cows, buffaloes, etc.
When the Great Man gives an external object, he gives whatever is needed to whomever stands in need of it; and knowing by himself that someone is in need of something, he gives it even unasked, much more when asked.
He gives generously, not ungenerously.
He gives sufficiently, not insufficiently, when there is something to be given.
He does not give because he expects something in return.
And when there is not enough to give sufficiently to all, he distributes evenly whatever can be shared.
But he does not give things that issue in affliction to others, such as weapons, poisons, and intoxicants.
Nor does he give amusements which are harmful and lead to negligence.
And he does not give unsuitable food or drink to a person who is sick, even though he might ask for it, and he does not give what is suitable beyond the proper measure.
Again, when asked, he gives to householders things appropriate for householders, and to monks things appropriate for monks.
He gives to his mother and father, kinsmen and relatives, friends and colleagues, children, wife, slaves, and workers, without causing pain to anyone.
Having promised an excellent gift, he does not give something mean.
He does not give because he desires gain, honor, or fame, or because he expects something in return, or out of expectation of some fruit other than the supreme enlightenment.
He does not give detesting the gift or those who ask.
He does not give a discarded object as a gift, not even to unrestrained beggars who revile and abuse him.
Invariably he gives with care, with a serene mind, full of compassion.
He does not give through belief in superstitious omens; but he gives believing in kamma and its fruit.
When he gives he does not afflict those who ask by making them do homage to him, etc.; but he gives without afflicting others.
He does not give a gift with the intention of deceiving others or with the intention of injuring; he gives only with an undefiled mind.
He does not give a gift with harsh words or a frown, but with words of endearment, congenial speech, and a smile on his face.
Whenever greed for a particular object becomes excessive, due to its high value and beauty, its antiquity, or personal attachment, the bodhisattva recognizes his greed, quickly dispels it, seeks out some recipients, and gives it away.
And if there should be an object of limited value that can be given and a suppliant expecting it, without a second thought he bestirs himself and gives it to him, honoring him as though he were an uncelebrated sage.
Asked for his own children, wife, slaves, workers, and servants, the Great Man does not give them while they are as yet unwilling to go, afflicted with grief.
But when they are willing and joyful, then he gives them.
But if he knows that those who ask for them are demonic beings — ogres, demons, or goblins — or men of cruel disposition, then he does not give them away.
So too, he will not give his kingdom to those intent on the harm, suffering, and affliction of the world, but he would give it away to righteous men who protect the world with Dhamma.
This, firstly, is the way to practice the giving of external gifts.
The internal gift should be understood in two ways.
How?
Just as a man, for the sake of food and clothing, surrenders himself to another and enters into servitude and slavery, in the same way the Great Man, wishing for the supreme welfare and happiness of all beings, desiring to fulfill his own perfection of giving, with a spiritually-oriented mind, for the sake of enlightenment, surrenders himself to another and enters into servitude, placing himself at the disposal of others.
Whatever limbs or organs of his might be needed by others — hands, feet, eyes, etc.
— he gives them away to those who need them, without trembling and without cowering.
He is no more attached to them, and no more shrinks away, than if they were external objects.
Thus the Great Man relinquishes an internal object in two ways: for the enjoyment of others according to their pleasure; or, while fulfilling the wishes of those who ask, for his own self-mastery.
In this matter he is completely generous, and thinks: “I will attain enlightenment through non-attachment.” Thus the giving of the internal gift should be understood.
Herein, giving an internal gift, he gives only what leads to the welfare of the recipient, and nothing else.
The Great Man does not knowingly give his own body, limbs, and organs to Maara or to the malevolent deities in Maara's company, thinking: “Let this not lead to their harm.” And likewise, he does not give to those possessed by Maara or his deities, or to madmen.
But when asked for these things by others, he gives immediately, because of the rarity of such a request and the difficulty of making such a gift.
The giving of fearlessness is the giving of protection to beings when they have become frightened on account of kings, thieves, fire, water, enemies, lions, tigers, other wild beasts, dragons, ogres, demons, goblins, etc.
The giving of the Dhamma is an unperverted discourse on the Dhamma given with an undefiled mind; that is, methodical instruction conducive to good in the present life, in the life to come, and to ultimate deliverance.
By means of such discourses, those who have not entered the Buddha's Dispensation enter it, while those who have entered it reach maturity therein.
This is the method: In brief, he gives a talk on giving, on virtue, and on heaven, on the unsatisfactoriness and defilement in sense pleasures, and on the benefit in renouncing them.
In detail, to those whose minds are disposed toward the enlightenment of disciples, he gives a discourse establishing and purifying them by elaborating upon the noble qualities of whichever among the following topics is appropriate: going for refuge, restraint by virtue, guarding the doors of the sense-faculties, moderation in eating, application to wakefulness, the seven good qualities; application to serenity by practicing meditation on one of the thirty-eight objects; application to insight by contemplating the objects of insight-interpretation such as the material body; the progressive stages of purification, the apprehension of the course of rightness, the three kinds of clear knowledge, the six direct knowledges, the four discriminations, and the enlightenment of a disciple.
So too, for beings whose minds are disposed toward the enlightenment of paccekabuddhas and of perfectly enlightened Buddhas, he gives a discourse establishing and purifying them in the two vehicles by elaborating upon the greatness of the spiritual power of those Buddhas, and by explaining the specific nature, characteristic, function, etc., of the ten paaramiis in their three stages.
Thus the Great Man gives the gift of the Dhamma to beings.
When he gives a material gift, the Great Man gives food thinking: “May I, by this gift, enable beings to achieve long life, beauty, happiness, strength, intelligence, and the supreme fruit of unsullied bliss.” He gives drink wishing to allay the thirst of sensual defilements; garments to gain the adornments of shame and moral dread and the golden complexion; vehicles for attaining the modes of psychic potency and the bliss of nibbaana; scents for producing the sweet scent of virtue; garlands and unguents for producing the beauty of the Buddha-qualities; seats for producing the seat on the terrace of enlightenment; bedding for producing the bed of a Tathaagata's rest; dwellings so he might become a refuge for beings; lamps so he might obtain the five-eyes.
He gives visible forms for producing the fathom-wide aura; sounds for producing the Brahmaa-like voice; tastes for endearing himself to all the world; and tangibles for acquiring a Buddha's elegance.
He gives medicines so he might later give the ageless and deathless state of nibbaana.
He gives slaves the gift of freedom so he might later emancipate beings from the slavery of the defilements.
He gives blameless amusements and enjoyments in order to produce delight in the true Dhamma.
He gives his own children as a gift in order that he might adopt all beings as his children by granting them a noble birth.
He gives his wives as a gift in order that he might become master over the entire world.
He gives gifts of gold, gems, pearls, coral, etc., in order to achieve the major marks of physical beauty, and gifts of the diverse means of beautification in order to achieve the minor features of physical beauty.
He gives his treasuries as a gift in order to obtain the treasury of the true Dhamma; the gift of his kingdom in order to become the king of the Dhamma; the gift of monasteries, parks, ponds, and groves in order to achieve the jhaanas, etc.; the gift of his feet in order that he might approach the terrace of enlightenment with feet marked with the auspicious wheels; the gift of his hands in order that he might give to beings the rescuing hand of the true Dhamma to help them across the four floods; the gift of his ears, nose, etc., in order to obtain the spiritual faculties of faith, etc.; the gift of his eyes in order to obtain the universal eye; the gift of his flesh and blood with the thought: “May my body be the means of life for all the world!
May it bring welfare and happiness to all beings at all times, even on occasions of merely seeing, hearing, recollecting, or ministering to me!” And he gives the gift of his head in order to become supreme in all the world.
Giving thus, the Great Man does not give unwillingly, nor by afflicting others, nor out of fear, moral shame, or the scolding of those in need of gifts.
When there is something excellent, he does not give what is mean.
He does not give extolling himself and disparaging others.
He does not give out of desire for the fruit, nor with loathing for those who ask, nor with lack of consideration.
Rather, he gives thoroughly, with his own hand, at the proper time, considerately, without discrimination, filled with joy throughout the three times.
Having given, he does not become remorseful afterward.
He does not become either conceited or obsequious in relation to the recipients, but behaves amiably toward them.
Bountiful and liberal, he gives things together with a bonus.
For when he gives food, thinking: “I will give this along with a bonus,” he gives garments, etc., as well.
And when he gives garments, thinking: “I will give this along with a bonus,” he gives food, etc., as well.
The same method with gifts of vehicles, etc.
And when he gives a gift of one of the sense objects, such as visible forms, he gives the other sense objects also as a bonus.
This entire accomplishment in giving he dedicates to the welfare and happiness of the whole world, and to his own unshakeable emancipation through supreme enlightenment.
He dedicates it to the attainment of inexhaustible desire, inexhaustible concentration, ingenuity, knowledge, and emancipation.
In practicing the perfection of giving the Great Being should apply the perception of impermanence to life and possessions.
He should consider them as shared in common with many, and should constantly and continuously arouse great compassion toward beings.
Just as, when a house is blazing, the owner removes all his property of essential value and himself as well without leaving anything important behind, so does the Great Man invariably give, without discrimination and without concern.
This is the method of practicing the perfection of giving.
Now comes the method of practicing the perfection of virtue.
Since the Great Man desires to adorn beings with the adornment of the virtue of the omniscient, at the beginning he must first purify his own virtue.
Herein, virtue is purified in four modes: by the purification of one's inclinations; by the undertaking of precepts; by non-transgression; and by making amends for transgressions.
For someone who is dominated by personal ideals is naturally disgusted with evil through the purity of his own inclinations and purifies his conduct by arousing his inward sense of shame.
Someone else, who is dominated by a consideration for the world, afraid of evil, purifies his conduct by receiving precepts from another person and by arousing his sense of moral dread.
Both establish themselves in virtue through non-transgression.
But if, due to forgetfulness, they sometimes break a precept, then through their sense of shame and moral dread, respectively, they quickly make amends for it by the proper means of rehabilitation.
Virtue is twofold as avoidance and performance.
Herein, this is the method by which virtue as avoidance should be practiced.
A bodhisattva should have such a heart of sympathy for all beings that he does not feel any resentment toward anyone, even in a dream.
Because he is dedicated to helping others, he would no more misappropriate the belongings of others than he would take hold of a poisonous water snake.
If he is a monk, he should live remote from unchastity, abstaining from the seven bonds of sexuality, not to speak of adultery.
If he is a householder, he should never arouse even an evil thought of lust for the wives of others.
When he speaks, his statements should be truthful, beneficial, and endearing, and his talk measured, timely, and concerned with the Dhamma.
His mind should always be devoid of covetousness, ill-will, and perverted views.
He should possess the knowledge of the ownership of kamma and have settled faith and affection for recluses and brahmans who are faring and practicing rightly.
Because he abstains from unwholesome states and from the unwholesome courses of kamma leading to the four planes of misery and the suffering of the round, and because he is established in the wholesome courses of kamma leading to heaven and liberation, through the purity of his end and the purity of his means the Great Man's wishes for the welfare and happiness of beings succeed immediately, exactly in the way they are formed, and his paaramiis reach fulfillment, for such is his nature.
Since he desists from injuring others, he gives the gift of fearlessness to all beings.
He perfects the meditation on loving-kindness without trouble, and enjoys the eleven benefits of loving-kindness.
He is healthy and robust, attains longevity, abundant happiness, and distinguished characteristics, and eradicates the mental impression of hatred.
So too, because he desists from taking what is not given, his possessions cannot be confiscated by thieves, etc.
He is unsuspicious to others, dear and agreeable, trustworthy, unattached to prosperity and success, inclined to relinquishing, and he eradicates the mental impression of greed.
By desisting from unchastity he becomes unexcitable, peaceful in body and mind, dear and agreeable, unsuspicious to beings.
A good report circulates concerning him.
He is without lust or attachment to women, is devoted to renunciation, achieves distinguished characteristics and eradicates the mental impression of greed.
By desisting from false speech his word comes to be authoritative for others.
He is regarded as reliable and trustworthy, one whose statements are always accepted.
He is dear and agreeable to deities.
His mouth gives off a sweet fragrance and his bodily and vocal conduct are protected.
He achieves distinguished characteristics and eradicates the mental impression of defilements.
By desisting from slander he obtains a retinue and a following that cannot be divided by the attacks of others.
He possesses unbreakable faith in the true Dhamma.
He is a firm friend, as exceedingly dear to beings as though they were acquainted with him in the last existence.
And he is devoted to non-defilement.
By desisting from harsh speech he becomes dear and agreeable to beings, pleasant in character, sweet in speech, held in esteem.
And he develops a voice endowed with eight factors.
By desisting from idle chatter he becomes dear and agreeable to beings, revered, held in esteem.
His statements are accepted and his talk measured.
He acquires great influence and power, and becomes skillful in answering the questions of others with the ingenuity that creates opportunities.
And when he reaches the plane of Buddhahood, he becomes capable of answering the numerous questions of beings, speaking numerous languages all with a single reply.
Through his freedom from covetousness he gains what he wishes and obtains whatever excellent possessions he needs.
He is honored by powerful khattiyas.
He can never be vanquished by his adversaries, is never defective in his faculties, and becomes the peerless individual.
Through his freedom from ill-will he gains a pleasant appearance.
He is esteemed by others, and because he delights in the welfare of beings, he automatically inspires their confidence.
He becomes lofty in character, abides in loving-kindness, and acquires great influence and power.
Through his freedom from wrong view he gains good companions.
Even if he is threatened with a sharp sword, he will not perform an evil deed.
Because he holds to the ownership of kamma, he does not believe in superstitious omens.
His faith in the true Dhamma is established and firmly rooted.
He has faith in the enlightenment of the Tathaagatas, and no more delights in the diversity of outside creeds than a royal swan delights in a dung heap.
He is skillful in fully understanding the three characteristics, and in the end gains the unobstructed knowledge of omniscience.
Until he attains final enlightenment he becomes the foremost in whatever order of beings and acquires the most excellent achievements.
Thus, esteeming virtue as the foundation for all achievements — as the soil for the origination of all the Buddha-qualities, the beginning, footing, head, and chief of all the qualities issuing in Buddhahood — and recognizing gain, honor, and fame as a foe in the guise of a friend, a bodhisattva should diligently and thoroughly perfect his virtue as a hen guards its eggs: through the power of mindfulness and clear comprehension in the control of bodily and vocal action, in the taming of the sense-faculties, in purification of livelihood, and in the use of the requisites.
This, firstly, is the method of practicing virtue as avoidance.
The practice of virtue as performance should be understood as follows: Herein, at the appropriate time, a bodhisattva practices salutation, rising up, respectful greetings, and courteous conduct toward good friends worthy of reverence.
At the appropriate time he renders them service, and he waits upon them when they are sick.
When he receives well-spoken advice he expresses his appreciation.
He praises the noble qualities of the virtuous and patiently endures the abuse of antagonists.
He remembers help rendered to him by others, rejoices in their merits, dedicates his own merits to the supreme enlightenment, and always abides diligently in the practice of wholesome states.
When he commits a transgression he acknowledges it as such and confesses it to his co-religionists.
Afterward he perfectly fulfills the right practice.
He is adroit and nimble in fulfilling his duties toward beings when these are conducive to their good.
He serves as their companion.
When beings are afflicted with the suffering of disease, etc., he prepares the appropriate remedy.
He dispels the sorrow of those afflicted by the loss of wealth, etc.
Of a helpful disposition, he restrains with Dhamma those who need to be restrained, rehabilitates them from unwholesome ways, and establishes them in wholesome courses of conduct.
He inspires with Dhamma those in need of inspiration.
And when he hears about the loftiest, most difficult, inconceivably powerful deeds of the great bodhisattvas of the past, issuing in the ultimate welfare and happiness of beings, by means of which they reached perfect maturity in the requisites of enlightenment, he does not become agitated and alarmed, but reflects: “Those Great Beings were only human beings.
But by developing themselves through the orderly fulfillment of the training they attained the loftiest spiritual power and the highest perfection in the requisites of enlightenment.
I, too, should practice the same training in virtue, etc.
In that way I, too, will gradually fulfill the training and in the end attain the same state.” Then, with unflagging energy preceded by this faith, he perfectly fulfills the training in virtue, etc.
Again, he conceals his virtues and reveals his faults.
He is few in his wishes, content, fond of solitude, aloof, capable of enduring suffering, and free from anxiety.
He is not restless, puffed up, fickle, scurrilous, or scattered in speech, but calm in his faculties and mind.
Avoiding such wrong means of livelihood as scheming, etc., he is endowed with proper conduct and a suitable resort.
He sees danger in the slightest faults, and having undertaken the rules of training trains himself in them, energetic and resolute, without regard for body or life.
He does not tolerate even the slightest concern for his body or life but abandons and dispels it; how much more then excessive concern?
He abandons and dispels all the corruptions such as anger, malice, etc., which are the cause for moral depravity.
He does not become complacent over some minor achievement of distinction and does not shrink away, but strives for successively higher achievements.
In this way the achievements he gains do not partake of diminution or stagnation.
The Great Man serves as a guide for the blind, explaining to them the right path.
To the deaf he gives signals with gestures of his hands, and in that way benefits them with good.
So too for the dumb.
To cripples he gives a chair, or a vehicle, or some other means of conveyance.
He strives that the faithless may gain faith, that the lazy may generate zeal, that those of confused mindfulness may develop mindfulness, that those with wandering minds may become accomplished in concentration, and that the dull-witted may acquire wisdom.
He strives to dispel sensual desire, ill-will, sloth-and-torpor, restlessness-and-worry, and perplexity in those obsessed by these hindrances, and to dispel wrong thoughts of sensuality, ill-will, and aggression in those subjugated by these thoughts.
Out of gratitude to those who have helped him, he benefits and honors them with a similar or greater benefit in return, congenial in speech and endearing in his words.
He is a companion in misfortune.
Understanding the nature and character of beings, he associates with whatever beings need his presence, in whatever way they need it; and he practices together with whatever beings need to practice with him, in whatever way of practice is necessary for them.
But he proceeds only by rehabilitating them from the unwholesome and establishing them in the wholesome, not in other ways.
For in order to protect the minds of others, bodhisattvas behave only in ways which increase the wholesome.
So too, because his inclination is to benefit others, he should never harm them, abuse them, humiliate them, arouse remorse in them, or incite them to act in ways which should be avoided.
Nor should he place himself in a higher position than those who are of inferior conduct.
He should be neither altogether inaccessible to others, nor too easily accessible, and he should not associate with others at the wrong time.
He associates with beings whom it is proper to associate with at the appropriate time and place.
He does not criticize those who are dear to others in front of them, nor praise those who are resented by them.
He is not intimate with those who are not trustworthy.
He does not refuse a proper invitation, or engage in persuasion, or accept excessively.
He encourages those endowed with faith with a discourse on the benefits of faith; and he encourages as well those endowed with virtue, learning, generosity, and wisdom with a discourse on the benefits of those qualities.
If the bodhisattva has attained to the direct knowledges, he may inspire a sense of spiritual urgency in the negligent by showing them the fate of those in hell, etc., as is fit.
Thereby he establishes the faithless in faith.
He makes them enter the Buddha's Dispensation and brings to maturity those already endowed with these qualities.
In this way, through his virtuous conduct, the Great Man's immeasurable flood of merit and goodness ascends to ever increasing heights.
The detailed explanation of virtue is given in diverse ways in the Visuddhimagga, in the passage beginning: “Virtue is the states beginning with volition present in one who abstains from the destruction of life, etc., or in one who fulfills the practice of the duties.” All that should be brought in here.
Only there is this distinction: in that work the discussion of virtue has come down for beings who seek the enlightenment of disciples; but here, because the discussion is intended for great bodhisattvas, it should be explained making compassion and skillful means the forerunners.
Just as the Great Man does not dedicate the merits from his practice of virtue to his own release from affliction in the unfortunate destinations, or to his own achievement of kingship in the fortunate destinations, or to becoming a world-ruling monarch, a god, Sakka, Maara, or Brahmaa, so too he does not dedicate it to his own attainment of the threefold knowledge, the six direct knowledges, the four discriminations, the enlightenment of a disciple, or the enlightenment of a paccekabuddha.
But rather he dedicates it only for the purpose of becoming an omniscient Buddha in order to enable all beings to acquire the incomparable adornment of virtue.
This is the method of practicing the perfection of virtue.
The perfection of renunciation is the wholesome act of consciousness which occurs renouncing sense pleasures and existence, preceded by the perception of their unsatisfactoriness and accompanied by compassion and skillful means.
The bodhisattva should practice the perfection of renunciation by first recognizing the unsatisfactoriness in sense pleasures, etc., according to the following method: “For one dwelling in a home there is no opportunity to enjoy the happiness of renunciation, etc., because the home life is the dwelling place of all the defilements, because a wife and children impose restrictions, and because the diverse crafts and occupations such as agriculture and trade lead to numerous entanglements.
And sense pleasures, like a drop of honey smeared over the blade of a sword, give limited satisfaction and entail abundant harm.
They are fleeting like a show perceived in a flash of lightning; enjoyable only through a perversion of perception like the adornments of a madman; a means of vengeance like a camouflaged pit of excrement; unsatisfying like a thin drink or the water moistening the fingers; afflictive like food which is inwardly rotten; a cause for calamity like a baited hook; the cause of suffering in the three times like a burning fire; a basis for bondage like monkey's glue; a camouflage for destruction like a murderer's cloak; a place of danger like a dwelling in an enemy village; food for the Maara of the defilements like the supporter of one's foes; subject to suffering through change like the enjoyment of a festival; inwardly burning like the fire in the hollow of a tree; fraught with danger like a ball of honey suspended from the bulrushes in an old pit; intensifying thirst like a drink of salt water; resorted to by the vulgar like liquor and wine; and giving little satisfaction like a chain of bones.
Having recognized the unsatisfactoriness in sense pleasures in accordance with this method, he should then, by the reverse method, contemplate the benefits in renunciation, with a mind slanting, sloping, and inclining toward the happiness of renunciation, solitude, and peace.
Since renunciation is rooted in the going forth, the going forth should be undertaken.
If the Great Being is living at a time when no Buddha has arisen in the world, he should go forth under ascetics or wanderers who maintain the doctrine of kamma and the moral efficacy of action.
But when the perfectly enlightened Buddhas appear in the world, he should go forth only in their Dispensation.
Having gone forth, he should establish himself in virtue, as described above, and in order to cleanse his virtue, should undertake the ascetic practices.
For Great Men who undertake the ascetic practices and maintain them properly become few in their wishes and content.
The stains of their defilements get washed off in the waters of such noble qualities as effacement, solitude, aloofness from society, the arousal of energy, and ease of maintenance, and all their conduct becomes purified through their blameless rules, observances, and noble qualities.
Established in three of the ancient traditions of the ariyans, they are able to achieve the fourth of the ariyan traditions, i.e., delight in meditation, entering and abiding in jhaana, both access and absorption, through whichever among the forty subjects of meditation are appropriate.
Thus they completely fulfill the perfection of renunciation.
At this point it would be proper to explain in detail the thirteen ascetic practices and the forty meditation subjects for the development of concentration — i.e., the ten kasi.na-devices, the ten impurities, the ten recollections, the four Brahmavihaaras, the four immaterial states, the one perception, and the one analysis.
But since all these are explained in complete detail in the Visuddhimagga, it should be understood in the way stated there.
Only there is this distinction: in that work the subject is explained for beings who seek the enlightenment of disciples.
But here, because it is intended for great bodhisattvas, it should be explained making compassion and skillful means the forerunners.
This is the method of practicing the perfection of renunciation.
Just as light cannot coexist with darkness, wisdom cannot coexist with delusion.
Therefore a bodhisattva wishing to accomplish the perfection of wisdom should avoid the causes of delusion.
These are the causes of delusion: discontent, languor, drowsiness, lethargy, delight in company, attachment to sleep, irresoluteness, lack of enthusiasm for knowledge, false over-estimation of oneself, non-interrogation, not maintaining one's body properly, lack of mental concentration, association with dull-witted people, not ministering to those possessed of wisdom, self-contempt, false discrimination, adherence to perverted views, athleticism, lack of a sense of spiritual urgency, and the five hindrances; or, in brief, any states which, when indulged in, prevent the unarisen wisdom from arising and cause the arisen wisdom to diminish.
Avoiding these causes of confusion, one should apply effort to learning as well as to the jhaanas, etc.
This is an analysis of the sphere of learning: the five aggregates, the twelve sense bases, the eighteen elements, the four truths, the twenty-two faculties, the twelve factors of dependent origination, the foundations of mindfulness, etc., the various classifications of phenomena such as the wholesome, etc., as well as any blameless secular fields of knowledge which may be suitable for promoting the welfare and happiness of beings, particularly grammar.
Thus, with wisdom, mindfulness, and energy preceded by skillful means, a bodhisattva should first thoroughly immerse himself in this entire sphere of learning — through study, listening, memorization, learning, and interrogation; then he should establish others in learning.
In this way the wisdom born of learning can be developed.
So too, out of his wish for the welfare of others, the bodhisattva should develop the wisdom of ingenuity in creating opportunities to fulfill his various duties to his fellow beings and the skillful means in understanding their happiness and misery.
Then he should develop wisdom born of reflection by first reflecting upon the specific nature of the phenomena such as the aggregates, and then arousing reflective acquiescence in them.
Next, he should perfect the preliminary portion of the wisdom born of meditation by developing the mundane kinds of full understanding through the discernment of the specific and general characteristics of the aggregates, etc.
To do so, he should fully understand all internal and external phenomena without exception as follows: “This is mere mentality-materiality, which arises and ceases according to conditions.
There is here no agent or actor.
It is impermanent in the sense of not being after having been; suffering in the sense of oppression by rise and fall; and non-self in the sense of being unsusceptible to the exercise of mastery.” Comprehending them in this way, he abandons attachment to them, and helps others to do so as well.
Entirely out of compassion, he continues to help his fellow beings enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles, assists them to achieve mastery over the jhaanas, deliverances, concentrations, attainments, and mundane direct knowledges, and does not desist until he reaches the very peak of wisdom and all the Buddha-qualities come within his grasp.
The wisdom born of meditation may be divided into two groups.
The first comprises the mundane direct knowledges, together with their accessories; namely, the knowledge of the modes of psychic power, the knowledge of the divine ear-element, the knowledge of penetrating other minds, the knowledge of recollecting past lives, the knowledge of the divine eye, the knowledge of kammic retribution, and the knowledge of the future.
The second comprises the five purifications — purification of view, purification by overcoming doubt, purification by knowledge and vision of what is and what is not the path, purification by knowledge and vision of the way, and purification by knowledge and vision.
The first four of these are mundane, the last is supramundane.
After acquiring through study and interrogation a knowledge of the phenomena such as the aggregates, etc., constituting the soil of wisdom, he should establish himself in the two purifications constituting its roots, purification of virtue and purification of mind, and then accomplish the five purifications just mentioned which constitute the trunk of wisdom.
Since the method for accomplishing these, along with the analysis of their objective sphere, is explained in complete detail in the Visuddhimagga, it should be understood in the way given there.
Only in that work the explanation of wisdom has come down for beings seeking the enlightenment of disciples.
But here, because it is intended for the great bodhisattvas, it should be explained making compassion and skillful means the forerunners.
One further distinction must also be made: here insight should be developed only as far as purification by knowledge and vision of the way, without attaining purification by knowledge and vision.
A Great Being who has formed his aspiration for supreme enlightenment should, for the sake of fulfilling his paaramiis, always be devoted to what is proper and intent upon service.
Thus he should be zealous in providing for the welfare of beings, and from time to time, day by day, should reflect: “Have I accumulated any requisites of merit and of knowledge today?
What have I done for the welfare of others?” In order to help all beings he should surrender some possession of his with a mind unconcerned with body or life.
Whatever action he does, bodily or vocal, all should be done with a mind slanting toward full enlightenment; all should be dedicated to enlightenment.
He should turn his mind away from sense pleasures, whether superior or inferior, and should apply skillful means to the fulfillment of his various duties.
He should work energetically for the welfare of beings, be capable of enduring everything whether desirable or undesirable, and should speak without deception.
He should suffuse all beings with universal loving-kindness and compassion.
Whatever causes suffering for beings, all that he should be ready to take upon himself; and he should rejoice in the merits of all beings.
He should frequently reflect upon the greatness of the Buddhas and the greatness of their spiritual power.
Whatever action he does by body or speech, all should be preceded with a mind slanting toward full enlightenment.
In this way, the Great Being, the bodhisattva, devoted to what is proper, endowed with strength, firm in striving, day by day accumulates immeasurable requisites of merit and of knowledge through the practice of the paaramiis.
Further, having relinquished his own body and life for the use and protection of beings, the bodhisattva should seek out and apply the antidotes to the various kinds of suffering to which beings are exposed — hunger, thirst, cold, heat, wind, sun, etc.
And whatever happiness he himself gains by alleviating these kinds of suffering, and the happiness he gains when his own bodily and mental afflictions subside in delightful parks, gardens, mansions, pools, and forest abodes, and the happiness of the blissful jhaanic attainments he hears are experienced by the Buddhas, their enlightened disciples, paccekabuddhas, and great bodhisattvas, established in the practice of renunciation — all that he seeks to procure universally for all beings.
This, firstly, is the method for a bodhisattva not yet established on the plane of concentration.
One established on the plane of concentration bestows upon beings the rapture, tranquility, happiness, concentration, and true knowledge produced in the achievements of distinction as they are experienced by himself.
He procures them and dedicates them to all.
Such a bodhisattva should contemplate the whole world of sentient beings immersed in the great suffering of sa.msaara and in the sufferings of the defilements and kamma-formations at its base.
He should see the beings in hell experiencing violent, racking, agonizing pains uninterruptedly over long periods, produced as they are cut up, dismembered, split, pulverized, and roasted in scorching fires; the great suffering of the animals due to their mutual hostility, as they afflict, harass, and kill one another, or fall into captivity at the hands of others; and the suffering of the various classes of ghosts, going about with their bodies aflame, consumed and withered by hunger, thirst, wind, and sun, weeping and wailing as their food turns into vomit and spittle.
He should contemplate as well the suffering experienced by human beings, which is often indistinguishable from the suffering in the plane of misery: the misery and ruin they encounter in their search; the various punishments they may meet, such as the cutting off of their hands, etc.; ugliness, deformity, and poverty; affliction by hunger and thirst; being vanquished by the more powerful, pressed into the service of others, and made dependent upon others; and when they pass away, falling over into the hells, the realm of ghosts, and the animal kingdom.
He should see the gods of the sense-sphere being consumed by the fevers of lust as they enjoy their sense objects with scattered minds; living with their fever unextinguished like a mass of fire stoked up with blasts of wind and fed with a stock of dry wood; without peace, dejected, and dependent on others.
And he should see the gods of the fine-material and immaterial spheres, after so long a life-span, in the end succumb to the law of impermanence, plunging from their heights back down into the round of birth, aging, and death, like birds swooping swiftly down from the heights of the sky or like arrows shot by a strong archer descending in the distance.
And having seen all this, he should arouse a sense of spiritual urgency and suffuse all beings universally with loving-kindness and compassion.
Accumulating the requisites of enlightenment in this way by body, speech, and mind without interruption, he should fulfill the perfection of energy, arousing zeal while working thoroughly and perseveringly and acting without cowering, in order that all the paaramiis may reach fulfillment.
While striving for the state of Buddhahood — the store and repository of inconceivable, immeasurable, vast, lofty, stainless, incomparable, undefiled qualities — he should encourage the arising of energy; for such energy is endowed with inconceivable spiritual power, which common people cannot even hear about, much less practice.
It is entirely through the spiritual power of energy that the practice of all the requisites of enlightenment succeeds — the threefold arising of the great aspiration, the four grounds for Buddhahood, the four bases of beneficence, the single flavor of compassion, the reflective acquiescence which is the specific condition for the realization of the Buddha-qualities, being untainted amidst all things, the perception of all beings as his own dear children, not being fatigued by all the sufferings of sa.msaara, the relinquishing of everything that may be given away, delight in so giving, the determination upon the higher virtue, etc., unshakeableness therein, rapture and exultation in wholesome actions, the inclination toward seclusion, application to the jhaanas, being insatiable in blameless states, teaching the Dhamma to others as he has learned it out of the wish for their welfare, firm initiative in setting beings upon the true path, sagacity and heroism, being imperturbable in the face of the abusive speech and wrongs of others, the determination upon truth, mastery over the meditative attainments, the attainment of power through the direct knowledges, the comprehension of the three characteristics, the accumulation of the requisites for the supramundane path by practicing meditation in the foundations of mindfulness, etc., and the descent on to the nine supramundane states.
Thus from the time of forming the aspiration until the great enlightenment, a bodhisattva should perfect his energy thoroughly and uninterruptedly, without surrendering, so that it might issue in higher and higher states of distinction.
And when this energy succeeds, all the requisites of enlightenment — patience, truthfulness, determination, etc., as well as giving, virtue, etc.
— will succeed; for all these occur in dependence on energy.
The practice of patience and the rest should be understood in accordance with the same method.
Thus through giving, relinquishing his own happiness and belongings to others, he practices the benefiting of others in many ways; through virtue, the protection of their lives, property, and wives, the non-breach of his word, endearing and beneficial speech, non-injury, etc.; through renunciation, many kinds of beneficial conduct such as giving the gift of the Dhamma in return for their material gifts; through wisdom, skillful means in providing for their welfare; through energy, the arousing of zeal in his work without slacking off; through patience, the enduring of the wrongs of others; through truthfulness, not breaking his pledge to help others without deception; through determination, remaining unshakeable in rendering them help even when encountering difficulties; through loving-kindness, concern for their welfare and happiness; and through equanimity, remaining imperturbable whether others render help or inflict harm.
This is the practice which the great bodhisattva, compassionate for all beings, undertakes for the sake of incalculable beings, by means of which he accumulates immeasurable requisites of merit and knowledge not shared by worldlings.
Their condition has been stated.
They should be accomplished thoroughly.
They are analyzed into thirty paaramiis: ten paaramiis, ten intermediate paaramiis, and ten ultimate paaramiis.
Herein, some teachers say that the ten basic paaramiis are the intermingled bright and dark qualities practiced by a bodhisattva who has just formed his aspiration, whose end is the welfare of others, and whose means are directed toward working for this end; the intermediate paaramiis are the bright qualities untainted by any darkness; and the ultimate paaramiis are the qualities which are neither dark nor bright.
Others say that the basic paaramiis are being filled at the commencement; the intermediate paaramiis are filled on the plane of bodhisattvahood: and the ultimate paaramiis reach perfect fulfillment in all modes on the plane of Buddhahood.
Or alternatively, the basic paaramiis involve working for the welfare of others on the plane of bodhisattvahood; the intermediate paaramiis, working for one's own welfare; and the ultimate paaramiis, the fulfillment of the welfare of both oneself and others with the achievement of the Tathaagata's powers and grounds of self-confidence on the plane of Buddhahood.
Thus they analyze the paaramiis according to the beginning, middle, and consummation by way of the resolution, the undertaking, and their completion, respectively.
The basic perfection of giving is the relinquishing of one's children, wives, and belongings such as wealth; the intermediate perfection of giving, the relinquishing of one's own limbs; and the ultimate perfection of giving, the relinquishing of one's own life.
The three stages in the perfection of virtue should be understood as the non-transgression on account of the three — children and wife, limbs, and life; the three stages in the perfection of renunciation, as the renunciation of those three bases after cutting off attachment to them; the three stages in the perfection of wisdom, as the discrimination between what is beneficial and harmful to beings, after rooting out craving for one's belongings, limbs, and life; the three stages in the perfection of energy, as striving for the relinquishing of the aforementioned things; the three stages in the perfection of patience, as the endurance of obstacles to one's belongings, limbs, and life; the three stages in the perfection of truthfulness, as the non-abandoning of truthfulness on account of one's belongings, limbs, and life; the three stages in the perfection of determination, as unshakeable determination despite the destruction of one's belongings, limbs, and life, bearing in mind that the paaramiis ultimately succeed through unflinching determination; the three stages in the perfection of loving-kindness, as maintaining loving-kindness toward beings who destroy one's belongings, etc.; and the three stages in the perfection of equanimity, as maintaining an attitude of impartial neutrality toward beings and formations whether they are helpful or harmful in regard to the aforementioned three bases.
In this way the analysis of the paaramiis should be understood.
Just as the ten paaramiis become thirtyfold through analysis, so they become sixfold through their specific nature: as giving, virtue, patience, energy, meditation, and wisdom.
When this set is considered, the perfection of renunciation, as the going forth into homelessness, is included in the perfection of virtue; as seclusion from the hindrances, in the perfection of meditation; and as a generally wholesome quality, in all six paaramiis.
One part of the perfection of truthfulness, i.e., its aspect of truthful speech or abstinence from falsehood, is included in the perfection of virtue, and one part, i.e., its aspect of truthful knowledge, in the perfection of wisdom.
The perfection of loving-kindness is included in the perfection of meditation, and the perfection of equanimity in the perfections of meditation and wisdom.
The perfection of determination is included in all.
These six paaramiis fall into at least fifteen pairs of complementary qualities which perfect fifteen other pairs of qualities.
How?
The triad of giving, virtue, and patience perfects the abandoning of greed, hatred, and delusion.
The triad of giving, virtue, and energy perfects the giving of wealth, life, and bodily vitality.
The triad of giving, virtue, and meditation perfects the three bases of meritorious deeds.
The triad of giving, virtue, and wisdom perfects the triad of giving material gifts, fearlessness, and the Dhamma.
In the same way, the other triads and tetrads may be applied to each other as is appropriate in each case.
These six paaramiis are also included in the four foundations, which provide a synthesis of all the paaramiis.
What are they?
The foundation of truth, the foundation of relinquishment, the foundation of peace, and the foundation of wisdom.
Therein, taking them first without distinction: after making his aspiration for the supramundane qualities, the Great Being, filled with compassion for all beings, establishes the foundation of truth by acquiring all the paaramiis in conformity with his vow; the foundation of relinquishment by relinquishing their opposites; the foundation of peace by pacifying their opposites with all the qualities of the paaramiis; and the foundation of wisdom by skillful means in promoting the welfare of others through those same qualities.
Taken separately, giving is a proximate cause for the four foundations of wholesome qualities as follows: since one vows to give to those who ask without deceiving them, gives without violating one's vows, and rejoices without deceiving them about the gift; through the relinquishing of the opposite qualities such as stinginess, etc.; through the pacification of greed, hatred, delusion, and fear, in regard to the objects to be given, the recipients, the act of giving, and the loss of the objects to be given, respectively; through giving according to deserts, at the proper time, in the appropriate manner, and through the pre-eminence of wisdom.
Virtue is a proximate cause for the four foundations thus: through non-transgression of the restraint undertaken; through the relinquishing of moral depravity; through the pacification of misconduct; and through the pre-eminence of wisdom.
Patience is a proximate cause for the four foundations thus: through patient acceptance in accordance with one's vow; through the relinquishing of discrimination against others on account of their wrongs; through the pacification of the obsession of anger; and through the pre-eminence of wisdom.
Energy is a proximate cause for the four foundations: through working for the welfare of others in accordance with one's vows; through the relinquishing of dejection; through the pacification of unwholesome qualities; and through the pre-eminence of wisdom.
Meditation is a proximate cause for the four foundations: through concern for the welfare of the world in accordance with one's vow; through the relinquishing of the hindrances; through the pacification of the mind; and through the pre-eminence of wisdom.
And wisdom is a proximate cause for the four foundations: through skillful means in promoting the welfare of others in accordance with one's vow; through the relinquishing of unskillful activity; through the pacification of the fevers springing from delusion; and through the attainment of omniscience.
The foundation of truth is practiced by acting in accordance with one's vow and understanding; the foundation of relinquishment by relinquishing objects of sense enjoyment and the defilement of sensuality; the foundation of peace by the pacification of hatred and suffering; and the foundation of wisdom by understanding and penetration.
The foundation of truth is embraced by the threefold truth and opposed to the three corruptions.
The foundation of relinquishing is embraced by the threefold relinquishment and opposed to the three corruptions.
The foundation of peace is embraced by the threefold pacification and opposed to the three corruptions.
And the foundation of wisdom is embraced by the threefold knowledge and opposed to the three corruptions.
The foundation of truth embraces the foundations of relinquishment, peace, and wisdom through non-deceptiveness and through acting in accordance with one's vow.
The foundation of relinquishment embraces the foundations of truth, peace, and wisdom through the relinquishing of their opposites and as the fruit of relinquishing everything.
The foundation of peace embraces the foundations of truth, relinquishment, and wisdom through the pacification of the fever of defilement and the fever of kamma.
And the foundation of wisdom embraces the foundations of truth, relinquishment, and peace, since they are all preceded and accompanied by knowledge.
Thus all the paaramiis are grounded in truth, clarified by relinquishment, intensified by peace, and purified by wisdom.
For truth is the cause for their genesis, relinquishment the cause for their acquisition, peace the cause for their growth, and wisdom the cause for their purification.
In the beginning truth is the foundation, since his vow is made in accordance with truth.
In the middle, relinquishment is the foundation, since after forming his aspiration the bodhisattva relinquishes himself for the welfare of others.
In the end, peace is the foundation, since the consummation is the attainment of perfect peace.
And in every phase — the beginning, the middle, and the end — wisdom is the foundation, since the entire career originates when wisdom is present, does not exist when it is absent, and because the nature accords with the vow.
Thus it should be understood how the aggregation of the paaramiis is included in the four foundations, which are adorned with numerous noble qualities.
And just as the paaramiis are all included in the four foundations, they are also included in wisdom and compassion.
For all the requisites of enlightenment can be included in wisdom and compassion, and the noble qualities such as giving, accompanied by wisdom and compassion, are the requisites for the great enlightenment culminating in the perfection of Buddhahood.
The means by which the paaramiis are accomplished is the four-factored method: the accumulation without omission of all the requisites of merit, etc., for the sake of supreme enlightenment, by performing them without deficiency; performing them thoroughly with respect and high esteem; performing them perseveringly without interruption; and enduring effort over a long period without coming to a halt half-way.
We will explain the length of time later.
For the sake of the supreme enlightenment, the Great Being, striving for enlightenment, should first of all surrender himself to the Buddhas thus: “I offer myself up to the Buddhas.” And whenever he obtains any possession, he should first of all resolve upon it as a potential gift: “Whatever requisite of life comes my way, that I will give to those who need it, and I myself will only use what remains over from this gift.
When he has made a mental determination to completely relinquish whatever possessions come his way, whether animate or inanimate, there are four shackles to giving, namely: not being accustomed to giving in the past, the inferiority of the object to be given, the excellence and beauty of the object, and worry over the loss of the object.
When the bodhisattva possesses objects that can be given and suppliants are present, but his mind does not leap up at the thought of giving and he does not want to give, he should conclude: “Surely, I have not been accustomed to giving in the past; therefore a desire to give does not arise now in my mind.
So that my mind will delight in giving in the future, I will give a gift.
With an eye for the future let me now relinquish what I have to those in need.” Thus he gives a gift — generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishing, one who gives when asked, delighting in giving and in sharing.
In this way the Great Being destroys, shatters, and eradicates the first shackle to giving.
Again, when the object to be given is inferior or defective, the Great Being reflects: “Because I was not inclined to giving in the past, at present my requisites are defective.
Therefore, though it pains me, let me give whatever I have as a gift even if the object is low and inferior.
In that way I will, in the future, reach the peak in the perfection of giving.” Thus he gives whatever kind of gift he can — generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishing, one who gives when asked, delighting in giving and in sharing.
In this way the Great Being destroys, shatters, and eradicates the second shackle to giving.
When a reluctance to give arises due to the excellence or beauty of the object to be given, the Great Being admonishes himself: “Good man, haven't you made the aspiration for the supreme enlightenment, the loftiest and most superior of all states?
Well then, for the sake of enlightenment, it is proper for you to give excellent and beautiful objects as gifts.” Thus he gives what is excellent and beautiful — generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishing, one who gives when asked, delighting in giving and in sharing.
In this way the Great Man destroys, shatters, and eradicates the third shackle to giving.
When the Great Being is giving a gift, and he sees the loss of the object being given, he reflects thus: “This is the nature of material possessions, that they are subject to loss and to passing away.
Moreover, it is because I did not give such gifts in the past that my possessions are now depleted.
Let me then give whatever I have as a gift, whether it be limited or abundant.
In that way in the future I shall reach the peak in the perfection of giving.” Thus he gives whatever he has as a gift — generous, open-handed, delighting in relinquishing, one who gives when asked, delighting in giving and in sharing.
In this way the Great Being destroys, shatters, and eradicates the fourth shackle to giving.
Reflecting upon them thus in whatever way is appropriate is the means for dispelling the harmful shackles to the perfection of giving.
The same method used for the perfection of giving also applies to the perfection of virtue and the other perfections.
Further, self-surrender to the Buddhas is also a means for the complete accomplishment of the paaramiis.
For when the Great Man, straining and striving for the fulfillment of the requisites of enlightenment, encounters troubles difficult to endure, depriving him of happiness and his means of support, or when he encounters injuries imposed by beings and formations — difficult to overcome, violent, sapping the vitality — then, since he has surrendered himself to the Buddhas, he reflects: “I have relinquished my very self to the Buddhas.
Whatever comes, let it come.” For this reason he does not waver, does not quake, does not undergo the least vacillation, but remains absolutely unshaken in his determination to undertake the good.
In brief, the destruction of self-love and the development of love for others are the means for the accomplishing of the paaramiis.
For by fully understanding all things in accordance with their nature, the Great Being who has formed the resolution to attain the supreme enlightenment remains untainted by them, and his self-love thereby becomes eliminated and exhausted.
Then, since through the repeated practice of great compassion he has come to regard all beings as his dear children, his loving-kindness, compassion, and affection for them increase.
In conformity with this stage the Great Man, having expelled the defilements such as stinginess, etc., that are opposed to the requisites of enlightenment, and having dispelled greed, hatred, and delusion in regard to himself and others, further causes people to enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles by benefiting them to the utmost with the four bases of beneficence which accompany the four foundations, namely: giving, loving speech, beneficent conduct, and equality of treatment.
For the great compassion and the great wisdom of the Great Beings are adorned by giving.
Their giving is adorned and accompanied by loving speech, loving speech by beneficent conduct, and beneficent conduct by equality of treatment.
When the bodhisattvas are practicing the requisites of enlightenment, they treat all beings without exception as equal to themselves and perfect their sense of equality by remaining the same under all circumstances, pleasant or painful.
And when they become Buddhas, their ability to train people is perfected by benefiting them to the utmost with these same four bases of beneficence brought to fulfillment by the four foundations.
For the perfectly enlightened Buddhas, the base of giving is brought to fulfillment by the foundation of relinquishment, the base of loving speech by the foundation of truth, the base of beneficent conduct by the foundation of wisdom, and the base of equal treatment by the foundation of peace.
For in regard to parinibbaana, all the disciples and paccekabuddhas are completely equal to the Tathaagatas; they are identical, without any distinction.
Thus it is said: “There is no diversity among them in regard to emancipation.
As a minimum, four incalculables and a hundred thousand great aeons; as a middle figure, eight incalculables and a hundred thousand great aeons; and as a maximum, sixteen incalculables and a hundred thousand great aeons.
This threefold division obtains by way of those in whom wisdom is predominant, those in whom faith is predominant, and those in whom energy is predominant, respectively.
For those in whom wisdom is predominant, faith is weakest and wisdom keenest; for those in whom faith is predominant, wisdom is middling; and for those in whom energy is predominant, wisdom is weakest.
But supreme enlightenment must be achieved by the power of wisdom; so it is said in the commentary.
But others say that the classification of the time required for bodhisattvas obtains by way of the keen, middling, and tender quality of their energy.
Still others say that without distinction the three divisions of time correspond to the time required for their requisites of enlightenment to reach fulfillment, which in turn is determined by the keen, middling, and tender quality of their factors maturing toward emancipation.
Bodhisattvas also become threefold at the moment they form the aspiration, according to their division into those who comprehend through a condensed teaching, those who comprehend through an elaborated teaching, and those who are capable of training.
Among these, one who comprehends through a condensed teaching has such supporting conditions that, if he were disposed toward the enlightenment of a disciple, he could attain arahatship together with the four discriminations and the six direct knowledges while listening to a four-line stanza from the lips of a perfectly enlightened Buddha, even while the third line is as yet unconcluded.
The second has such supporting conditions that, if he were disposed toward the enlightenment of a disciple, he could attain arahatship together with the six direct knowledges while listening to a four-line stanza from the lips of the Exalted One, even while the fourth line is as yet unconcluded.
And the third has the supporting conditions to attain arahatship together with the six direct knowledges when the four-line stanza he hears from the Exalted One is concluded.
These three types, who form their aspirations without any allotted division of time, receive predictions directly from the Buddhas.
Then they fulfill the paaramiis in order and reach the supreme enlightenment according to the aforementioned time allotted to each type.
But that these Great Beings, day by day giving great gifts like those given by Vessantara, accumulating all the other paaramiis in the same way, making the five great relinquishings, reaching the summit in conduct for the good of kinsmen, conduct for the good of the world, and conduct developing intelligence — that they should become perfectly enlightened Buddhas before the time allotted to their respective types is fulfilled, this is not possible.
Why?
Because their knowledge is not yet mature enough and their accumulation of the factors issuing in Buddhahood not yet complete.
For just as grain ripens only after the lapse of the time required, so too the supreme enlightenment is perfected only after the lapse of the aforementioned periods of time.
Before then, even though striving with all his might, the bodhisattva cannot attain enlightenment.
The paaramiis are fulfilled according to the aforementioned distinction of time.
Thus it should be understood.
The benefits obtained by bodhisattvas who have formed their aspirations are explained thus:
Some other benefits of the paaramiis are the following: The sixteen wonderful and marvelous qualities that begin: “Mindful and clearly comprehending, AAnanda, the bodhisattva passes away from the Tusita heaven and descends into his mother's womb”; the thirty-two portents, such as “cold disappears and heat is allayed,” and “when the bodhisattva is born, this ten thousandfold world-system shakes, trembles, and quakes,” etc.; and the other qualities shown here and there in the Jaatakas, the Buddhava.msa, etc., such as the fulfillment of the bodhisattva's wishes, his mastery over kamma, and so forth.
Other benefits are the pairs of complementary qualities such as non-greed and non-hatred already discussed.
Moreover, from the time that he makes the aspiration, the bodhisattva becomes like a father to all beings, wishing for their welfare.
By reason of his distinguished qualities he is worthy of offerings, worthy of reverence, worthy of esteem, a supreme field of merit.
He is generally dear to humans and to non-humans alike, and is protected by deities.
Because his mind is grounded in loving-kindness and compassion, he cannot be harmed by wild beasts, etc.
Whatever order of beings he is reborn in, on account of his distinguished merit, he surpasses the other beings there in his superior beauty, fame, happiness, strength, and dominion.
He is healthy and robust.
His faith is very pure and lucid.
His energy, mindfulness, concentration, and wisdom are also very pure and lucid.
His defilements, disturbances, and passions are weak.
Because his defilements are weak, he is easy to admonish, adroit, patient, meek, congenial and hospitable.
He is free from anger, malice, denigration, domineering, envy, stinginess, craftiness, hypocrisy, obstinacy, pride, presumption and negligence.
He endures torments at the hands of others but never torments anyone himself.
Whenever he enters a village area, the unarisen dangers and calamities facing the beings there generally do not arise, and those which have arisen subside.
And whenever he is reborn in the planes of misery, unlike the common inhabitants there he is not oppressed by excessive suffering but acquires an even greater sense of spiritual urgency.
Therefore these distinguished qualities of the Great Man — such as being like a father to beings, being worthy of offerings, etc.
— found in this or that state of existence, are the benefits of the paaramiis.
Further, the accomplishment of life-span, the accomplishment of form, the accomplishment of family, the accomplishment of sovereignty, credibility, and greatness of spiritual power are also benefits of the Great Man's paaramiis.
Therein, the “accomplishment of life-span” is length of life or longevity in whatever state of existence he takes rebirth in; by this means he concludes whatever wholesome undertakings he began and accumulates many wholesome qualities.
The “accomplishment of form” is beauty of form, comeliness, or loveliness; by this means he inspires confidence and esteem in beings who take physical form as their standard.
The “accomplishment of family” is rebirth in excellent families; by this means he is to be worth approaching and ministering to by beings who are intoxicated with the vanity of birth, etc.
The “accomplishment of sovereignty” is greatness of power, greatness of influence, and greatness of retinue; by means of these he is able to benefit with the four bases of beneficence those who need to be benefited and to restrain with Dhamma those who need to be restrained.
“Credibility” means trustworthiness, reliability; by this means he becomes an authority for beings, and his command cannot be disregarded.
“Greatness of spiritual power” means magnitude of spiritual power; by this means he cannot be vanquished by others, but he himself invariably vanquishes them — by Dhamma, by righteousness, and by his genuine noble qualities.
Thus the accomplishment of life-span and so forth are benefits of the Great Man's paaramiis.
These are the causes for the growth of his own boundless requisites of merit, and the means by which he leads other beings to enter and reach maturity in the three vehicles.
Their fruit is, in brief, the state of perfect Buddhahood.
In detail, it is the acquisition of the form-body resplendent with the multitude of meritorious qualities such as the thirty-two characteristics of a Great Man, the eighty minor marks of physical beauty, the fathom-wide aura, etc.; and, founded upon this, the glorious Dhamma-body radiant with its collection of infinite and boundless meritorious qualities — the ten powers, the four grounds of self-confidence, the six kinds of knowledge not held in common with others, the eighteen unique Buddha-qualities, and so forth.
And so numerous are the Buddha-qualities that even a perfectly enlightened Buddha could not finish describing them, even after many aeons.
This is their fruit.
And it is said:
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Parts of this analysis of the Triple Gem were originally used to teach new monks here at the temple and have been printed twice in book form.
Now that a group of people who feel that the book would be beneficial to Buddhists at large have pooled their resources and asked permission to print it a third time, I have decided to expand it into a handbook for all Buddhist adherents — i.e., for all who have declared the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha to be their refuge.
Once we have made such a declaration, we are duty-bound to learn exactly what the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha are.
Otherwise, we will follow our religion blindly, without realizing its aims or the benefits — called 'puñña,' or merit — that come from its practice, inasmuch as Buddhism is a religion of self-help.
Furthermore, we as Thai people are known throughout the world as Buddhists, but my feeling is that there are very few of us who know the standards of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha.
Although many of us are 'Buddhist,' we are Buddhist mostly through custom, not through informed awareness.
Altogether, there are two ways of adhering to the religion: rationally and irrationally.
To adhere to the religion irrationally means to adhere to it blindly, following one's teachers or companions, holding to whatever they say is good without showing any interest as to whether it really is good or not.
This is like a person of no discernment who uses whatever paper money comes his way: If it turns out to be counterfeit, he'll be punished and fined in a variety of ways.
This is what it means to adhere to the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha irrationally.
To adhere to the religion rationally means not to follow one's own prejudices or those of one's teachers or companions, but to follow the principles of the texts; holding to the Dhamma-Vinaya as one's standard, like a legal document affixed with the government seal, carrying the force of law throughout the land, making exceptions for no one.
Whoever then transgresses the law can't be regarded as a good citizen.
So it is with the religion: If we want to know if a practice is good or bad, right or wrong, worthy of respect or not, we should check it against the standards established by the Buddha, which are eight in number: Any behavior that —
None of these eight forms of behavior qualify as the doctrine or discipline of Buddhism.
Once we know that these forms of behavior are not what the Buddha intended, we should abandon them completely.
Thus, all of us who respect the Buddha's teachings should — instead of working at cross-purposes — join our hearts to cleanse and correct the practice of the religion.
Monks, novices, lay men, and lay women should make a point of helping one another in the area of reform.
Whatever is already good, we should maintain with respect.
Whatever isn't, we should exert pressure to improve.
We'll then meet with what's truly good, like rice: If you cook good, clean, husked white rice, you'll eat with pleasure.
If you cook unhusked rice, or a potful of husks, they'll stick in your own throat.
If we let any bad factions go uncorrected, they will burden the hearts of their supporters, who will become like people who cook rice husks to eat.
Are we going to let one another be so stupid as to eat rice husks?
By and large, though, most lay people don't see this as their duty.
As for the monks and novices, they throw the responsibility on the lay people, and so we do nothing but keep throwing it back and forth like this.
When things have a bearing on all of us, we should by all means unite our hearts and accept joint responsibility.
Only things that have no bearing on us should we leave to others.
Unless we act in this way, what is good — the religion — will fall from our grasp.
And when the religion falls from our grasp, lay men will become obstacles, i.e., they'll keep creating obstacles in the way of finding merit.
Lay women will become the color of crows, i.e., dark and evil in their behavior.
Novices will become sham novices, careless, spattered, and filthy; and monks will become goats, missing out on the flavor of the Dhamma, like the nanny goat who has to go hungry because her milk has been taken and drunk by people more intelligent than she.
In India, for instance, there are hardly any monks left to make merit with.
Monks are the important faction, because they are the front-line troops or standard-bearers in the fight with the enemy — evil.
Ordinarily, soldiers have to adhere to the code of their army and to be sincere in performing their duties.
As for the duties enjoined by the religion, they are two:
Vipassana-dhura: the practice of tranquillity and insight meditation.
These two practices are our primary duties as monks and novices.
If we don't devote ourselves to these two lines of practice, we'll become a fifth column within the religion, enemies of the good standards of the Dhamma and Vinaya.
Monks will become political monks, war-making monks, loudspeaker monks — loudspeaker monks are those who can teach others but can't teach themselves.
They can speak Dhamma, but their hearts have no Dhamma, and so they become the enemies of those who practice the Dhamma and Vinaya rightly and well.
Thus I ask all Buddhists not to turn a deaf ear or a blind eye to these problems.
If we hold that it's none of our business, the consequences could well flare up and spread to burn us.
For this reason, I ask that we all help one another to look after the religion.
Actually, all human beings born need a set of customs and traditions — called religion — to which they give special respect.
Otherwise, we will have no principles of good and evil or of moral virtue.
Whatever religion this may be is up to the individual adherents.
I ask only that they respect their religion sincerely and rightly, for the sake of true purity.
If we were to use only worldly knowledge to keep order, it would work only in public places.
In private or secret places, order wouldn't last.
But as for religion, once people have studied so that they really know good and evil, they wouldn't dare do evil, either in public or in private.
Religion is thus one of the important mainstays of the world.
If we human beings had no moral virtue imbedded in our hearts, even the greatest power on earth would be able to keep us in line only temporarily, and even then it wouldn't be able to influence our minds the way the moral virtue that comes from religion can.
For this reason, the practice of moral virtue is one way of helping the religion and the world.
Now, I'm not claiming to be a heavenly being or anyone special.
I'm simply a person who wishes the religion well.
So if anything in this book is defective — in terms of the expression or the Pali — I hope that knowledgeable people will forgive me, for it's not the case that I'm expert in a wide range of matters.
Ordinarily, for the world to experience happiness and harmony, there has to be a teaching or tradition generally respected as good.
This being the case, Bodhisattvas arise — people who develop goodness on the grand scale for the sake of attaining right self-awakening.
Once they have reached this goal, they are termed 'Buddhas,' Awakened Ones.
For Bodhisattvas to succeed in this direction, they have to devote themselves to perfecting ten virtues —
These ten perfections are the factors that enable a Bodhisattva to succeed in becoming an arahant, a Pure One.
Once he attains this state, three qualities — called 'actualized virtues' — arise in his heart:
These qualities enable the Buddha to teach the Dhamma in a beneficial way.
His conduct in this area is of three sorts: Having achieved his own purposes, he acts for the benefit of living beings throughout the world and teaches the Dhamma to his own circle of relatives.
There are three aspects to the Buddha:
) The good practices he followed — such as virtue, concentration, and discernment, which are aspects of his activity.
These are called 'dhamma-nimitta' of the Buddha, symbols of his inner quality.

) Vimutti — release from ignorance, craving, attachment, and kamma; attaining nibbana, the supreme quality, a quality that does not die.

A person of little intelligence will use bark to build himself a home; a person of medium intelligence will use sapwood; while a person of sharp intelligence will build his home of heartwood.
So it is with those of us who take refuge in the Buddha.
But in any case we're better off than people without a home.
Like rats or lizards who have to live in the hollows of trees and are in for trouble if people set the trees on fire: If we place our trust in our life, our bodies, or our worldly possessions, we'll have no refuge when the fires of death reach us.
Or as when a boat sinks in the middle of the ocean: A person without a life-vest is in serious danger.
For this reason, we should educate ourselves so as to find a refuge that will benefit us both in this life and in lives to come.
Another comparison: The sages of the past used the term 'Buddha-ratana,' comparing the Buddha to a jewel.
Now, there are three sorts of jewels: artificial gems; gemstones, such as rubies or sapphires; and diamonds, which are held to be the highest.
The aspects of the Buddha might be compared to these three sorts of jewels.
To place confidence in the external aspect — the body of the Buddha or images made to represent him — is like dressing up with artificial gems.
To show respect for the practices followed by the Buddha by giving rise to them within ourselves is like dressing up with rubies and sapphires.
To reach the quality of deathlessness is like dressing in diamonds from head to toe.
But no matter what sort of jewels we use to dress up in, we're better off than savages who go around hanging bones from their necks, who look unkempt and — what's more — are bound to be haunted by the bones they wear.
The bones, here, stand for the body, i.e., our attachment to the body as really being ours.
Actually, our body comes for the most part from the bodies of other animals — the food we've eaten — so how can we seriously take it to be our own?
Whoever insists on regarding the body as his or her own is like a savage or a swindler — and, as a swindler, is bound to receive punishment in proportion to the crime.
Thus, we should regard the body as money borrowed for the span of a lifetime, to be used as capital.
And we should search for profits so as to release ourselves from our debts, by searching for another, better form of goodness: the qualities of the Buddha that he left as teachings for all of his followers.
These qualities, briefly put, are —
Pañña: the intuitive discernment that comes from developing mental concentration.
Vimutti: release from defilement
These are qualities that all Buddhists should develop within themselves so as to gain Awakening, following the example of the Buddha, becoming Savaka Buddhas, an opportunity open — without exception and with no restrictions of time or place — to all who follow his teachings.
Buddhists who revere the Buddha in the full sense of the word should have two sorts of symbols with them, to serve as reminders of their tradition —
Buddha-guna: the qualities that form the inner symbol of the Buddha, i.e., the proper practice of his teachings.
Whoever takes a stand in this manner is bound to be victorious both within and without, safe from such enemies as temptation and mortality.
Our nation's flag and the people of our nation are two different things.
Just as our flag will have value only if the people of our nation are good and preserve the fullness of the nation's qualities; so too, we Buddhists have to respect both our flag — images of the Buddha — and the qualities of the Buddha if we are to be good Buddhists.
Otherwise, we will suffer from not having fulfilled our responsibilities.
To take an example, we Thai people, in order to be Thai in the full sense, have to possess a number of qualifications: the ability to speak and to read Thai, acquaintance with Thai customs and traditions, the ability to benefit ourselves and to spread those benefits to help care for the needs of our parents, spouses, and children.
And not only that: If we have the ability and the energy — physical, mental, financial, or the energy of our virtues — we should expand those benefits to help our fellow human beings in general throughout the nation.
This is what it means to be Thai in the full sense of the word.
In the same way, we who revere the image of the Buddha and the Buddha's good qualities should have them with us at all times if we are to receive the full benefits that come from being Buddhist and to maintain the peace and well-being of Buddhists at large.
There are three levels to the Dhamma, the teachings of the Buddha —
B.
Patipatti: following the practice of moral virtue, concentration, and discernment as derived from one's study of the Canon.
Pativedha: Liberation.
A.
The study of the Dhamma can be done in any of three ways —
Nissaranattha-pariyatti: studying for the sake of emancipation.
Bhandagarika-pariyatti: studying to be a storehouse keeper.
Studying like a water viper means to study the words of the Buddha without then putting them into practice, having no sense of shame at doing evil, disobeying the monastic code, making oneself like a poisonous snake-head, full of the fires of greed, anger, and delusion.
Studying for the sake of emancipation means to study the Buddha's teachings out of a desire for merit and wisdom, with a sense of conviction and high regard for their worth — and then, once we have reached an understanding, bringing our thoughts, words, and deeds into line with those teachings with a high sense of reverence and respect.
To try to bring the Buddha's teachings into line with ourselves is the wrong approach — because, for the most part, we are full of defilements, cravings, views, and conceits.
If we act in this way we are bound to be more at fault than those who try to bring themselves into line with the teachings: Such people are very hard to find fault with.
Studying to be a storehouse keeper refers to the education of people who no longer have to be trained, i.e., of arahants, the highest level of the Noble Ones.
Some arahants, when they were still ordinary, run-of-the-mill people, heard the Dhamma directly from the Buddha once or twice and were able immediately to reach the highest attainment.
This being the case, they lacked a wide-ranging knowledge of worldly conventions and traditions; and so, with an eye to the benefit of other Buddhists, they were willing to undergo a certain amount of further education.
This way of studying the Dhamma is called 'sikkha-garavata': respect for the training.
B.
The practice of the Dhamma means to conduct oneself in line with the words of the Buddha as gathered under three headings:
— Concentration: intentness of mind, centered on one of the themes of meditation, such as the breath.
— Discernment: insight and circumspection with regard to all fashioned things, i.e., physical properties, aggregates, and sense media.
To conduct oneself in this manner is termed practicing the Dhamma.
By and large, though, Buddhists tend to practice the Dhamma in a variety of ways that aren't in line with the true path of practice.
If we were to classify their ways of practice, there would be three:
To put the world first means to practice for the sake of such worldly rewards as prestige, material gains, praise, and sensual pleasures.
When we practice this way, we are actually torturing ourselves, because undesirable things are bound to occur: Having attained prestige, we can lose it.
Having acquired material gains, we can lose them.
Having received praise, we can receive censure.
Having experienced pleasure, we can see it disintegrate.
Far from the paths, fruitions, and nibbana, we torture ourselves by clinging to these things as our own.
To put the self first means to practice in accordance with our own opinions, acting in line with whatever those opinions may be.
Most of us tend to side with ourselves, getting stuck on our own views and conceits because our study of the Dhamma hasn't reached the truth of the Dhamma, and so we take as our standard our own notions, composed of four forms of personal bias —
b Bhayagati: fearing certain forms of power or authority, and thus not daring to practice the Dhamma as we truly should.

c Dosagati: acting under the power of anger, defilement, craving, conceits, and views.
d Mohagati: practicing misguidedly, not studying or searching for what is truly good; assuming that we're already smart enough, or else that we're too stupid to learn; staying buried in our habits with no thought of extracting ourselves from our sensual pleasures.
All of these ways of practice are called 'putting the self first.'
To put the Dhamma first means to follow the Noble Eightfold Path —
b.
Right Resolve: thinking of how to rid ourselves of whatever qualities we know to be wrong and immoral, i.e., seeing the harm in sensual desires in that they bring on suffering and stress.
c.
Right Speech: speaking the truth; not saying anything divisive or inciteful; not saying anything coarse or vulgar in situations where such words would not be proper; not saying anything useless.
Even though what we say may be worthwhile, if our listener isn't interested then our words would still count as useless.
d.
Right Action: being true to our duties, not acting in ways that would be corrupt or bring harm to ourselves or others.
e.
Right Livelihood: obtaining wealth in ways that are honest, searching for it in a moral way and using it in a moral way.
f.
Right Effort: persisting in ridding ourselves of all that is wrong and harmful in our thoughts, words, and deeds; persisting in giving rise to what would be good and useful to ourselves and others in our thoughts, words, and deeds, without a thought for the difficulty or weariness involved; acting persistently so as to be a mainstay to others.
g.
Right Mindfulness: being mindful and deliberate, making sure not to act or speak through the power of inattention or forgetfulness, making sure to be constantly mindful in our thoughts.
h.
Right Concentration: keeping the mind centered and resilient.
No matter what we do or say, no matter what moods may strike the heart, the heart keeps its poise, firm and unflinching in the four levels of jhana.
These eight factors can be reduced to three — virtue, concentration, and discernment — called the middle way, the heart of the Buddha's teachings.
The 'middleness' of virtue means to be pure in thought, word, and deed, acting out of compassion, seeing that the life of others is like your own, that their possessions are like your own, feeling benevolence, loving others as much as yourself.
When 'you' and 'they' are equal in this way, you are bound to be upright in your behavior, like a well-balanced burden that, when placed on your shoulders, doesn't cause you to tip to one side or the other.
But even then you are still in a position of having to shoulder a burden.
So you are taught to focus the mind on a single preoccupation: This can be called 'holding in your hands' — i.e., holding the mind in the middle — or concentration.
The middleness of concentration means focusing on the present, not sending your thoughts into the past or future, holding fast to a single preoccupation.
As for the middleness of discernment: No matter what preoccupations may come passing by, you are able to rid yourself of all feelings of liking or disliking, approval or rejection.
You don't cling, even to the one preoccupation that has arisen as a result of your own actions.
You put down what you have been holding in your hands; you don't fasten onto the past, present or future.
This is release.
When our virtue, concentration, and discernment are all in the middle this way, we're safe.
Just as a boat going down the middle of a channel, or a car that doesn't run off the side of the road, can reach its destination without beaching or running into a tree; so too, people who practice in this way are bound to reach the qualities they aspire to, culminating in the paths and fruitions leading to nibbana, which is the main point of the Buddha's teachings.
So in short, putting the Dhamma first means to search solely for purity of heart.
The attainment of the Dhamma refers to the attainment of the highest quality, nibbana.
If we refer to the people who reach this attainment, there are four sorts —
Tevijjo: those who attain the three skills.
Chalabhiñño: those who attain the six intuitive powers.
Catuppatisambhidappatto: those who attain the four forms of acumen.
To explain sukha-vipassako: Vipassana and asavakkhaya-ñana differ only in name.
In actuality they refer to the same thing, the only difference being that vipassana refers to the beginning stage of insight, and asavakkhaya-ñana to the final stage: clear and true comprehension of the four Noble Truths.
To explain tevijjo: The three skills are —
b Cutupapata-ñana: knowledge of where living beings are reborn — on refined levels or base — after they die.
c Asavakkhaya-ñana: the awareness that enables one to do away with the fermentations in one's character.
To explain chalabhiñño: The six intuitive powers are —
b Dibbasota: clairaudience; the ability to hear far distant sounds, beyond ordinary human powers.
c Cetopariya-ñana: the ability to know the thoughts of others.
d Pubbenivasanussati-ñana: the ability to remember previous lives.
e Dibba-cakkhu: clairvoyance; the ability to see far distant objects, beyond ordinary human powers.
Some people can even see other levels of being with their clairvoyant powers.
f Asavakkhaya-ñana: the awareness that does away with the fermentation of defilement.
To explain catuppatisambhidappatto: The four forms of acumen are —
b Dhamma-patisambhida: acumen with regard to all mental qualities.
c Nirutti-patisambhida: acumen with regard to linguistic conventions.

d Patibhana-patisambhida: acumen in speaking on the spur of the moment, knowing how to answer any question so as to clear up the doubts of the person asking.
This ends the discussion of the virtues of the four classes of people — called arahants — who have reached the ultimate quality, nibbana.
As for the essence of what it means to be an arahant, though, there is only one point — freedom from defilement: This is what it means to attain the Dhamma, the other virtues being simply adornment.
The three levels of Dhamma we have discussed are, like the Buddha, compared to jewels: There are many kinds of jewels to choose from, depending on how much wealth — discernment — we have.
All of the qualities we have mentioned so far, to put them briefly so as to be of use, come down to this: Practice so as to give rise to virtue, concentration, and discernment within yourself.
Otherwise, you won't have a refuge or shelter.
A person without the qualities that provide refuge and shelter is like a person without a home — a delinquent or a vagrant — who is bound to wander shiftlessly about.
Such people are hollow inside, like a clock without any workings: Even though it has a face and hands, it can't tell anyone where it is, what time it is, or whether it's morning, noon, or night.
People who aren't acquainted with the Dhamma within themselves are like people blind from birth: Even though they are born in the world of human beings, they don't know the light of the sun and moon that enables human beings to see.
They get no benefit from the light of the sun and moon or the light of fire; and being blind, they then go about proclaiming to those who can see, that there is no sun, no moon, and no brightness to the world.
As a result, they mislead those whose eyes are already a little bleary.
In other words, some groups say that the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha don't exist, that they were invented to fool the gullible.
Now, the Dhamma is something subtle and fine, like the fire-potential that exists in the air or in various elements and that, if we have enough common sense, can be drawn out and put to use.
But if we're fools, we can sit staring at a bamboo tube from dawn to dusk without ever seeing fire at all.
Anyone who believes that there is no Buddha, Dhamma, or Sangha, no series of paths or fruitions leading to nibbana, no consciousness that experiences death and rebirth, is like the fool sitting and staring at the bamboo tube.
Here I would like to tell a story as an allegory of those who aren't acquainted with the Dhamma.
There once was a man living in the woods who, with his five sons, started growing crops in a clearing about a mile from their home village.
He built a small shack at the clearing and would often take his sons to stay there.
One morning he started a fire in the shack and told his sons to look after the fire, for he was going out to hunt for food in the forest.
'If the fire goes out,' he told them, 'get some fire from my bamboo tube and start it up again.' Then he set out to search for food for his sons.
After he had left, his sons got so wrapped up in their play that when they finally took a look at the fire, they found that it was completely out.
So they had the first son go get some fire to start it up again.
The first son walked over and tried knocking on the bamboo tube but didn't see any fire.
So they had the second son get some fire from the tube: He opened it up but didn't see any fire inside.
All he saw were two bamboo chips but he didn't know what to do with them.
So the third son came over for a look and, since he didn't see any fire, he took a knife to cut the tube in half but still didn't see any fire.
The fourth son went over and, seeing the two halves lying there, shaved them down into thin strips to find the fire in them but didn't see any fire at all.
Finally the fifth son went over to look for fire, but before he went he said to his brothers, 'What's the matter with you guys that you can't get any fire from the bamboo tube?
What a bunch of fools you are!
I'll go get it myself.' With that, he went to look at the bamboo tube and found it split into strips lying in pile.
Realizing what his brothers had done, and thinking, 'What a bunch of hare-brains,' he reached for a mortar and pestle and ground up the bamboo strips to find the fire in them.
By the time he ran out of strength, he had ground them into a powder, but he still hadn't found any fire.
So he snuck off to play by himself.
Eventually, toward noon, the father returned from the forest and found that the fire had gone out.
So he asked his sons about it, and they told him how they had looked for fire in the bamboo tube without finding any.
'Idiots,' he thought, 'they've taken my fire-starter and pounded it to bits.
For that, I won't fix them any food.
Let 'em starve!' As a result, the boys didn't get anything to eat the entire day.
Those of us who aren't acquainted with the brightness of the Dhamma — 'Dhammo padipo' — lying within us, who don't believe that the Dhamma has value for ourselves and others, are lacking in discernment, like the boys looking for fire in the bamboo tube.
Thus we bring about our own ruin in various ways, wasting our lives: born in darkness, living in darkness, dying in darkness, and then reborn in more darkness all over again.
Even though the Dhamma lies within us, we can't get any use from it and thus will suffer for a long time to come, like the boys who ruined their father's fire-starter and so had to go without food.
The Dhamma lies within us, but we don't look for it.
If we hope for goodness, whether on a low or a high level, we'll have to look here, inside, if we are to find what is truly good.
But before we can know ourselves in this way, we first have to know — through study and practice — the principles taught by the Buddha.
Recorded Dhamma is simply one of the symbols of the Buddha's teachings.
The important point is to actualize the Dhamma through the complete practice of virtue, concentration, and discernment.
This is an essential part of the religion, the part that forms the inner symbol of all those who practice rightly and well.
Whether the religion will be good or bad, whether it will prosper or decline, depends on our practice, not on the recorded doctrine, because the recorded doctrine is merely a symbol.
So if we aim at goodness, we should focus on developing our inner quality through the Dhamma of practice.
As for the main point of Buddhism, that's the Dhamma of attainment, the transcendent quality: nibbana.
The word Sangha, if translated as a substantive, refers to those who have ordained and are wearing the yellow robe.
Translated as a quality, it refers to all people in general who have practiced correctly in line with the Buddha's teachings.
Members of the monastic order, however, are of all sorts, and so we have two groups —
Membership in the conventional Sangha is attained through consent of the Order, in a formal ceremony with witnesses, following the procedures set out in the Vinaya.
Membership in the Noble Sangha is attained when the quality of transcendence appears in one's heart as a result of one's own behavior and practice, with no formalities of any sort whatsoever.
All Buddhists — whether formally ordained or not, no matter what their sex, color, or social position — can become members of this Sangha.
This is termed being ordained by the Dhamma, or being self-ordained in a way that cannot be faulted.
To speak in abstract terms, the qualities of transcendence, stable and sure, that appear in the hearts of those who practice — leading them solely to the higher realms and closing off the four states of destitution — are, taken together, called the Noble Sangha.
A.
Members of the conventional Sangha, with regard to the way they conduct themselves, fall into four groups —
Upakilika: those who become ordained without any respect for the training, looking simply for pastimes for their own enjoyment — collecting plants, playing chess, gambling, buying lottery tickets, betting on horses — looking for gain in ways forbidden by the Vinaya, disobeying the words of the Buddha, disregarding the virtues set out in the scriptures, undermining the religion.
Upamuyuhika: those who are close-minded and misguided, unwilling to train themselves in heightened virtue, concentration, or discernment.
Even though they may have some education and knowledge, they still keep themselves closed-minded, making excuses based on their teachers, the time, the place, and their accustomed beliefs and practices.
Stuck where they are, such people are unwilling to change their ways so as to accord with the principles of the doctrine.
Upanissarana: those who desire merit and wisdom; who search for the true principles of the Dhamma and Vinaya; who set their hearts on studying with reverence and respect, and conduct themselves in line with what they have learned; who aim for the merit and wisdom offered by Buddhism, for the path leading to release from suffering; who rightly follow the Lord Buddha's teachings, i.e., —
b Anupaghato: They aren't vindictive.
c Patimokkhe ca samvaro: They stay well within the precepts of the Patimokkha and don't disobey the injunctions of the Vinaya — like good citizens, desired by the nation, who stay within the bounds of the government's laws.

d Mattaññuta ca bhattasmim: They have a sense of moderation in searching for and using the four necessities of life.
They understand how to make the best use of things — knowing what's beneficial and what's harmful, what is and what isn't of use to the body, considering things carefully before making use of them.
e Pantañca sayanasanam: They favor quiet, secluded places to stay.
To quote from the Canon, these include:
— Suññagaragato va: or to uninhabited dwellings, in places far off the beaten track.
— Rukkhamulagato va: or living under the shade of a tree, in a cave, or under an overhanging cliff face, so as to aid the heart in attaining concentration.
f Adhicitte ca ayogo: They make a persistent effort, through the practice of concentration, to cleanse the heart, freeing it from such Hindrances as sensual desire.
Etam buddhana sasanam: All of these factors are the teachings of the Buddhas.
How can a person who harms himself and others be a good monk?
These, then are the attributes of the Sangha.
In broad terms, they come down to two sorts:
Guna-sampatti: the inner qualifications — virtue and truth — of those worthy meditators who are held to be the field of merit for the world.
Those with the necessary resources — i.e., discernment — will obtain a good field.
Whatever seed they plant will give a yield well worth the effort involved, just as an intelligent person who puts his savings in a safe national bank will protect his capital from loss and even earn a profit.
Just as a good rice field has four characteristics — the ground is level and even, the dike has a water gate that is easy to open and close, the soil is rich in nutrients, the rainfall comes at the proper season — in the same way, members of the Sangha who are to be a field of merit for the world have to be endowed with the four following qualities:
b Dosagati — or under the power of ill will or anger towards others;
c Mohagati — or under the power of delusion;
d Bhayagati — or under the power of fear or apprehension of any sort whatsoever.
They aim at what is right and true as their major concern, both in the presence of others and in private, keeping themselves always on a par with their principles.
As for the analogy of a water gate that is easy to open and close, 'closing' refers to exercising restraint so that evil doesn't arise within us.
Restraint has four aspects —
b Indriya-samvara-sila: exercising restraint over our senses of sight, hearing, smell, taste, feeling, and ideation so as to keep the mind quiet, unagitated, and in good order.
c Ajiva-parisuddhi-sila: searching for the necessities of life — food, clothing, shelter, and medicine — only in ways that are proper.
d Paccaya-paccavekkhana-parisuddhi-sila: considering the necessities of life before using them so as not to use them out of desire or craving.
To exercise restraint in these ways is called 'closing.' 'Closing,' however, can be understood in another way, i.e., exercising restraint so that corruption doesn't arise in the three areas of our thoughts, words, and deeds.
b.
To close our words means not to tell lies, either to others people's faces or behind their backs; not to speak divisively, i.e., in a way that would lead to a needless falling-out between people; not to speak coarsely or abusively, not cursing, swearing or being vulgar; and not to engage in useless chatter, saying things that are of no real use to ourselves or our listeners.
To be intent on restraining ourselves in this way is called closing off evil words so that they don't have a chance to arise.
c.
To close off evil thoughts means:
— Abyapada: not storing up feelings of ill will to the point where anger takes over and we let jealousy and displeasure show,
— Sammaditthi: keeping our views correct in line with right principles, eliminating views that arise from the mind's being clouded and untrained — i.e., overpowered by ignorance and delusion — to the point of believing that there is no good or evil, and from there to deeply ingrained unwise mental states.
If we take care to ward off these unwise mental qualities so that they can't arise in our hearts, they will give way to Right View: seeing that there really is good, there really is evil; that virtue, generosity, and meditation really give results; that the paths and fruitions leading to nibbana really exist.
When we see things in this way, we have in effect closed off evil, preventing it from penetrating our hearts, just as rice farmers close their dykes to prevent salt water from flowing into their fields.
As for 'opening,' it refers to practicing the five forms of unselfishness —
b Kulamacchariya: not being possessive of our families.
On the external level, this refers to the families who support us.
We don't prevent them from making offerings to other individuals and we don't prevent capable individuals from teaching and advising them.
Some monks stand in the way of such interchanges, creating barriers with their thoughts, words, and deeds.
Sometimes if their supporters make merit with other individuals, they even make reprisals, such as refusing to allow that family to make merit with their own groups or factions.
These worthless attitudes shouldn't be allowed to arise in our hearts.
On the internal level, being possessive of our 'family' refers to the heart's attachment to sensations and mental acts, which form the family line of unawakened people.
We should abandon this attachment so that we can enter the lineage of the Noble Ones.
c Labhamacchariya: not being possessive of the material gains we have attained through proper means, not regarding them as being our own.
Material gains, as classified by the Vinaya, are of four sorts: food, clothing, shelter, and medicine.
We should see that when people present us with offerings of this sort, they have abandoned an enemy — their own stinginess and selfishness — and have gained in worth and wisdom through the power of their sacrifice.
Anyone who receives such an offering and clings to it as really being his own is like a person who collects coconut pulp or sugar cane pulp from which others have already squeezed and drunk the juice.
For this reason, people of wisdom and discernment aren't possessive of their belongings.
They are always willing to relinquish and share their gains — in proportion to the amount they have received — so that others can make use of them.
This is external relinquishment.
As for internal relinquishment: Whereas we once ate as we liked, many times a day, we now eat less, only one meal a day.
We use only one set of robes.
We relinquish our comfortable lodgings and undertake the ascetic practice of living in the forest or under the shade of a tree.
If we become ill, we search for medicine and treat our disease with moderation, in a way that doesn't create burdens for others.
In other words, we relinquish ourselves as an offering to the religion by putting it into practice.
This is classed as the internal relinquishment of material gain through the power of our practice and conduct.
d Vannamacchariya: not being possessive of our 'color'.
'Vanna,' here, can be interpreted in two ways.
In one sense, it refers to social caste or class.
For example, the ruling class, the religious elite, property owners, and laborers are held to be unequal in status, and the members of one group are unwilling to let other groups mix with theirs.
If such mixing occurs, they regard it as something base and disgraceful and so they continually put up barriers to prevent it from happening.
In this case, we can infer that we shouldn't make distinctions based on faction, nationality, color, or race, because the Buddha taught that a person's worth comes not from his or her birth, but from the goodness of his or her own actions; or, as we say, 'Those who do good will meet with good, those who do evil will meet with evil.' For example, we worship and respect the Buddha even though he wasn't Thai as we are.
We respect him through the power of his goodness.
If we were to be close-minded and nationalistic, we Thai's wouldn't have any religion to worship at all aside from the religion of spirits and ghosts.
The second sense of 'vanna' refers to the complexion of our skin.
This, too, we cling to, unwilling to sacrifice it for what is worthy and good.
We hesitate to observe the precepts, to meditate, or to undertake the ascetic practices for fear that we'll spoil our looks and complexion.
e Dhammamacchariya: not being possessive of the Buddha's teachings we have learned.
Possessiveness in this case can mean not wanting to teach unless we are reimbursed, not wanting to preach unless there is an offering, or complaining if the offering is small.
On another level, being possessive of the dhamma can refer to holding on to the unskillful qualities within us; being unwilling to rid ourselves of such evils as greed, anger, delusion, pride, conceit, or any of the other fermentations of defilement; clinging to these things without searching for the techniques, called the Path, for relinquishing them, i.e.:
— the practice of concentration that, when it is developed in our hearts, can eliminate intermediate defilements, i.e., such Hindrances as sensual desire;
— the discernment that, when it arises within us, can eliminate such subtle defilements from our hearts as avijja — mental murkiness; tanha — craving; and upadana — attachment to false assumptions.
When we develop these five forms of unselfishness, we can be classed as open — and our eyes will be open to perceiving the highest quality, the transcendent.
The analogy of soil rich in nutrients refers to our putting four qualities into practice —
b Karuna: compassion for ourselves and others, which induces us to be helpful in various ways.
c Mudita: appreciation for ourselves for having cultivated goodness; appreciation for the goodness cultivated by others.
d Upekkha: equanimity in cases beyond our control.
For instance, when death has come to a person we know, we see that it is beyond our help and so we keep our hearts neutral, not allowing feelings of sadness or gladness to arise.
For these four qualities to arise in fully mature form, they have to appear in our thoughts, words, and deeds.
Whatever we may do in thought, word, or deed should not be done through the power of anger.
We should regard anger as an ogre — and when anger takes over, our body becomes an ogre's tool: his bludgeon.
To see the drawbacks of anger in this way can give rise to good will in thought, word, and deed, extending without partiality to all people and living beings throughout the world.
Even with our enemies we should try to develop these same thoughts of good will, by looking for their good side, in one way or another, instead of looking just at their bad side, which can cause hatred to invade and consume our hearts.
Anger is a fire that can't burn other people; it burns only ourselves.
This is why we should develop good will within our hearts.
The power of good will brings good to everyone — just as food that contains the nutrients needed by people brings health and contentment to all who eat it; or as fertilizer with the proper nutrients can cause plants and trees to grow, give fruit, and so be of use to people and other living beings.
Good will is thus a form of goodness that can be classed as nourishment.

The analogy of seasonable rain refers to our establishing ourselves in the four bases of success —
b Viriya: being persistent, audacious, and persevering in cultivating goodness within ourselves.
c Citta: being intent on whatever we set about to do.
d Vimansa: being discriminating and circumspect at all times in whatever we set about to do.
These four qualities can lead to two kinds of success: iddhiriddhi — success through the power of thought; and puññariddhi — success that comes on its own.
Both of these forms of success, on the level of the world or the Dhamma, have to be based on the four qualities mentioned above.
These four qualities are like preservatives: Whoever is saturated with them won't go sour or stale.
And when we're free from going stale, our work is bound not to stagnate and so is sure to succeed.
Another comparison: These four qualities are 'sacca-kamma' — actions that give rise to truth, achieving our purposes.
Those who bring these qualities into themselves will become true people.
Truth can be compared to salt: If we try to keep food, like vegetables or fish, without salting it, it soon turns rotten and wormy, making it unfit for human consumption.
But if we salt it, it can keep for a long time.
A good example of this is our Lord Buddha, whose actions gave rise to truth and who thus was able to establish the religion so as to benefit people at large.
Even the body he left behind still serves a purpose for human and divine beings.
For instance, his bones, which have become relics, are still with us even though he gained total liberation a long time ago.
As for his teachings, they have lasted for more than, years.
And he himself is deathless, i.e., he has entered total nibbana.
All of this was achieved by means of truth, i.e., the four bases of success.
Those of us who have no truth, though, are like unsalted fish or meat, and are bound to go wormy.
The worms, here, refer to our various defilements and are of three main species: The first species is composed of affection, anger, and delusion; these feed on us from our feet to our waists.
The second species — sensual desire, ill-will, torpor, restlessness, and uncertainty — latch on and bore into us from our waists to our necks.
And the third species — the fermentation of sensuality, states of being, views, and ignorance — eats us up whole: ears, eyes, nose, mouth, body, and mind.
Whoever is all wormy like this is classed as a person gone rotten and stale, who hasn't reached any qualities of substance.
And for this reason, the bones of such a person after death are no match for the bones of chickens and pigs, for no one wants them.
If the bones and meat of such a person were put up for sale, no one would buy.
And furthermore, such a person will have to come back as an angry ghost, lolling its tongue and rolling its eyes, to frighten its children and grandchildren.
Thus, whoever develops the four qualities mentioned above will reach deathlessness — amata dhamma — which is like a crystalline shower that comes from distilling away all impurities, just as rain water, which is distilled from the sea, rises into the air and returns to the earth, nourishing the grasses, crops, and trees, giving refreshment to people and other living beings.
These, then, are some of the characteristics of those who form the field of merit for the world both on the mundane and on the transcendent levels, who conduct themselves in keeping with the phrase in the chant of the virtues of the Sangha:
'The field of merit for the world.'
Now we will discuss the chant of the virtues of the Sangha further as a path to practice, because the virtues of the Sangha are open to all Buddhists in general, without excluding any individual, race, or social class at all.
Whoever puts these principles into practice is capable of becoming a member of the Noble Sangha without having to go through the formalities of the Vinaya.
In other words, this is a community and a state of worthiness open to all who put the following principles into practice —
b.
When a meeting of the group disperses, we should all disperse at the same time and not act at variance with the group.
On the internal level, we should all as a group disperse shoddiness from our thoughts, words, and deeds.
c.
We should neither establish new rules that were not established by the Buddha nor abandon those that were.
For example, don't make a practice of doing things the Buddha declared to be worthless, evil, or wrong; develop within yourself the things he taught to be good, right, and worthwhile.
d.
Be respectful of your elders, teachers, parents, etc.
e.
Whatever you do in thought, word, or deed, don't act under the influence of craving, anger, or delusion.
f.
Make a point of searching out virtuous people.
g.
Take pleasure in solitude.
This is what is meant by good conduct.
Uju-patipanno: being a person whose conduct is straightforward, firmly established in the threefold training — virtue, concentration, and discernment — which leads straight to nibbana; being fair and just, unswayed by any of the four forms of personal bias.
This is what is meant by straightforward conduct.
Ñaya-patipanno: being a person whose conduct leads to higher knowledge.
This refers to following fifteen procedures —
b Indriya-samvara: keeping watch over your senses of sight, hearing, smell, taste, feeling, and ideation so as to keep the mind collected and at peace.
c Bhojane mattaññuta: knowing moderation in the requisites of life, i.e., eating only just enough food.
d Jagariyanuyoga: being persistent in cleansing the mind so that it is pure and bright, not allowing lapses in mindfulness or alertness to occur.
e Saddha: conviction, i.e., being convinced of the truth of good and evil, of the paths and their fruitions; having conviction in people who merit it.
f Hiri: feeling shame at the thought of doing evil, not doing evil either in public or in private.
g Ottappa: having a sense of dread at the thought of doing evil.
h Bahusacca: being well-educated and always willing to learn.
i Viriya: being persistent, unflagging, and courageous in performing your duties.
j Sati: being mindful before doing anything in thought, word, or deed.
k Pañña: developing discernment as to what should and should not be done, as to what is and isn't beneficial.
l Pathama-jhana: the first jhana, composed of five factors — directed thought, evaluation, rapture, pleasure, and singleness of preoccupation.

m Dutiya-jhana: the second jhana, composed of three factors — rapture, pleasure, and singleness of preoccupation.
n Tatiya-jhana: the third jhana, composed of two factors — pleasure and singleness of preoccupation.
o Catuttha-jhana: the fourth jhana, composed of two factors — equanimity and pure mindfulness, which is the single preoccupation of your concentration.
This is what is meant by conduct leading to higher knowledge.
Here we will discuss how to give rise to the first jhana.
Directed thought: Think of the breath until you can recognize it both as it comes in and as it goes out.
Singleness of preoccupation: Let the mind become one, at rest with the breath, not straying away to other objects.
Watch over your thoughts so that they deal only with the breath until the breath becomes comfortable.
Evaluation: Focus exclusively on issues connected with the breath and acquaint yourself with how to let this comfortable breath-sensation spread and co-ordinate with the other breath-sensations in the body.
Let these breath-sensations spread until they all merge.
Once the body has been soothed by the breath, feelings of pain will grow calm.
The body will be filled with good breath energy.
For jhana to arise, these three factors have to be brought to bear on the same breath sensation.
This breath sensation can lead all the way to the fourth jhana, the level of refinement depending on the act of focusing through the power of mindfulness: Sometimes the focus is broad, sometimes narrow, in accordance with the different factors on the different levels.
But to be really beneficial, you should let the breath spread as broadly as possible, being constantly aware throughout the body of the various aspects of the breath.
You will then get excellent results from your practice of jhana.
You might even gain liberating insight on this level, because the first jhana is what constitutes threshold concentration.
If you want to go on to fixed penetration, you should keep practicing this level until you are skilled, i.e., skilled at fixing the mind on a single object, at adjusting and expanding the object, and at staying in place.
When you want your concentration to have energy, make the breath light and refined — but keep your mindfulness broad.
Otherwise, the mind might go into arupa jhana, where it has no sense of the form of the body; or you might sit absolutely still, without any awareness of the body at all, while the mind pays attention to another area, such as simple awareness, completely disregarding the body or sitting unconscious, like a log.
This is bahira-jhana, concentration outside of the Buddha's teachings, incapable of giving rise to liberating insight.
So when you begin, you should develop the three above-mentioned factors as much as possible, and the mind will then be able to go on to the second jhana.
When you fix the mind on the breath repeatedly using these three beginning factors, they give rise to two more factors:
Rapture: a sense of fullness and refreshment of body and mind, going straight to the heart, independent of all else.
Pleasure: a sense of ease arising from the body's being still and undisturbed, and from the mind's being at rest on its own, placid and serene.
The factors of the first jhana, then, are of two sorts: cause and result.
The causes are directed thought, evaluation, and singleness of preoccupation; the results, rapture and pleasure,.
As for the second jhana, with its three factors of rapture, pleasure, and singleness of preoccupation: This refers to the state of mind that has tasted the results coming from the first jhana.
The sense of fullness becomes more powerful, as does the sense of pleasure, allowing the mind to abandon its thinking and evaluating, so that the singleness of the preoccupation takes the lead from here on in.
Make the mind still in the refined sense of the breath.
Body and mind are full and at ease; the mind is more firmly implanted in its object than before.
After a while, as you keep focusing in, the sense of fullness and pleasure begins to move.
Focus the mind down to a more refined level and you will enter the third jhana.
The third jhana has two factors — pleasure and singleness of preoccupation: The mind is solitary; the body, solitary and still.
The breath is refined and broad, with a white glow like cotton-wool throughout the body, stilling all painful feelings in body and mind.
Not a single Hindrance arises to interfere.
The four properties — earth, water, fire, and wind — are at peace with one another in every part: You could almost say that they're pure throughout the entire body.
The mind is completely still — steady, solid, and sure — reaching oneness in a solitary sense of ease.
Body and mind are in solitude.
Even if you're with a group of people, you feel as if you were alone.
The mind is strong, ardent, and expansive.
Mindfulness is broad — spreading throughout the body, focused exclusively on the present, not affected by any allusions to past or future.
The breath gives rise to an energy that is pure white.
The mind has power.
The focus is strong, and the light brilliant.
Energy is unwavering, so that you are no longer concerned with your sense of pleasure, which dilates somewhat.
This causes the mind to focus on into the fourth jhana.
The fourth jhana has two factors — equanimity and singleness of preoccupation.
The breath energy is still, with no ripples or gaps.
The properties of the body are undisturbed.
As for the mind, it is undisturbed with regard to all three time periods: uninvolved with the past, uninvolved with the future, undisturbed by the present.
When the mind stays with this undisturbed sense of equanimity, this is the true meaning of 'singleness of preoccupation.' The breath is at peace, the body at peace in every part.
There is no need to use the in-and-out breath.
The breath energy has reached saturation point.
The four properties are equal, all with the same characteristics.
The mind is completely at peace, with a brilliance streaming in all directions.
The brilliance of the breath at peace reaches full strength.
The brilliance of the mind arises from the power of mindfulness focused on all four of the great frames of reference: body, feelings, mind, and mental qualities.
The question of their being four doesn't arise, for in this mental moment they coalesce in perfect unity.
The brilliance of the mind and of the body, which arises from the power of their solitary stillness, shines as jagariyanuyoga, the purifying inner fire that can dispel darkness thoroughly.
The bright light of the mind reaches full strength.
The purity of the different parts of the breath energy keeps the other properties in good order.
The body is completely at peace, like a factory at rest.
In other words, you don't have to use the in-and-out breath.
The body develops potency; the mind, resilient power.
When these reach saturation point, if you then want to give rise to knowledge, shift your awareness so that it dilates slightly, and the important skills that arise from the power of the mind — such as the Eight Skills — will appear, i.e.,:
Manomayiddhi: the ability to achieve one's aims through the power of thought.
Iddhividhi: the ability to display a variety of supra-normal powers.
Dibba-sota: clairaudience, the ability to hear far distant sounds.
Cetopariya-ñana: the ability to know the mental states of other people.
Pubbe-nivasanussati-ñana: the ability to remember past lives.

Dibba-cakkhu: clairvoyance, the inner eye that arises from the power of the mind, relying to some extent on the optic nerves.
Asavakkhaya-ñana: knowing how to eliminate the fermentations of defilement as they relate to your various forms of knowledge.
If you want to give rise to supernormal powers, formulate an intention at that point, and it will appear openly, so that ordinary people will be able to see it.
Both of these aspects — knowledge and power — can lead to mastery on the level of the world and of the Dhamma.
The properties in the body acquire potency; the mind becomes a potent center of consciousness.
This is the science of the mind on an advanced level, giving rise to an advanced form of Buddhist learning: lokavidu, wide-ranging knowledge of the cosmos.
To develop the factors discussed here is to warrant the name, ñaya-patipanno, one whose conduct leads to higher knowledge.
Samici-patipanno: being a person whose conduct is masterful.
This refers to our conduct in developing two qualities: tranquillity and insight.
b.
The practice of insight means seeing clearly and truly into the nature of all conditioned things, e.g., seeing that they are inconstant, stressful, and not-self; gaining discernment that sees distinctly in terms of the four Noble Truths; seeing conditioned things from both sides, i.e., the side that is inconstant, stressful, and not-self, and the side that is constant, pleasant, and self; giving rise to the state of pure knowledge and vision termed 'gotarabhu-ñana,' escaping from the assumption that things are either constant or inconstant; knowing both the side that arises and disbands, as well as the side that doesn't arise and doesn't disband, without making assumptions about or being attached to either side.
Theories, views, and conceits disappear.
The mind doesn't fasten onto anything, past, present, or future.
This is termed 'asesa-viraga-nirodha,' utter disbanding and dispassion.
This is the way of insight.
Insight, analyzed in detail in terms of the Doctrine in line with the conventions of the sages of the past, means knowledge of the four Noble Truths:
— Samudaya: the cause of stress — i.e., tanha, craving or thirst — which includes kama-tanha, insatiable craving for sensual pleasures; bhava-tanha, the desire to be or have certain states of being; and vibhava-tanha, the desire not to be or have certain states of being.
— Nirodha: the disbanding of stress; the extinguishing of the fires of defilement.
— Magga: the path of practice that puts an end to craving, the cause of stress.
All four of these Noble Truths already exist in the world, but ordinarily are hard to perceive because they show us only their images or reflections.
On this level, we can't yet see them for what they really are.
But for the Buddha to know them, he had to start out with the reflections that appear, before he was able to trace them back to the real thing.
This is why they are termed Noble Truths: They are the possessions of noble people; only those who search and explore can know them.
Thus, the Noble Truths have two aspects: their first aspect, which is the way they are found in the experience of ordinary people in general; and their second aspect, which is more subtle and can be known only by people of wisdom who explore in the area of the heart and mind.
An example of the four Truths on the ordinary level, as experienced by ordinary people: Physical discomfort, such as illness or disease, can be called the truth of stress.
Knowing enough to buy the right medicine, or being a doctor who knows the medicine for curing that particular kind of disease, is the truth of the path.
As the symptoms of the disease disappear, that is termed conditional disbanding.
When the disease is cured, that is the truth of disbanding.
If, however, we suffer from a disease, such as a wound, but don't know how to treat it — simply wanting it to heal and using whatever medicine we can lay our hands on, without knowing whether it's right or wrong — the wound will only worsen, for the medicine we take isn't right for the disease.
This is the truth of the cause of stress.
If we want to go deeper than the ordinary level, we have to practice correctly in line with the way of the Path, developing our virtue, concentration, and discernment, before we will be able to perceive the four Truths on the noble level.
The essence of the Dhamma, by its nature, lies mixed with its outer accretions.
If we don't have the right knowledge and skill, we won't get very much use from the Dhamma.
Whatever benefits we do get will be only on the mundane level.
We can make a comparison with diamond or gold ore buried in the ground: If a person doesn't have enough knowledge to extract the ore, he will get only the traces that come flowing out in spring water or that adhere to rocks along the surface of the ground.
These will earn him only a meager profit, which won't be enough for a living.
A person with knowledge and skill, though, can use the gold to make a living without having to search for any other occupations, but he'll have to follow the traces down into the earth until he meets with the real thing, i.e., the genuine ore.
Even just a single hunk — if it's large and of high quality, weighing a ton — will enable him to rest secure for the rest of his life.
In the same way, those who are wise in Buddhism see stress as a noble treasure and so go digging down into stress; they see the cause of stress as a noble treasure and so dig down into it; they see the Path as a noble treasure; they see disbanding and liberation as noble treasures and so dig on down until they meet with the genuine ore.
Only then can they be called noble sages.
Those of us who are dauntless enough to unearth our inner resources in this way will be able to use those resources to protect ourselves throughout time, gaining release from the cycle of rebirth, the jail for imprisoning foolish and ignorant people.
We who like to explore in general should be glad that we've come across a good mine with genuine ore whose traces lie scattered about for us to see.
If we don't disregard the things we see, we'll meet the four Truths mentioned above.
If we were to summarize the four Noble Truths briefly, we could do so as follows: The objects or preoccupations of the mind that arise and disappear are the truth of stress.
The mental act that enters into and takes possession of those objects is the truth of the cause of stress.
The mental act that focuses in on those objects and examines them as they arise and disappear is the truth of the Path; and the mental act that lets go of those objects as they arise and disappear is the truth of disbanding, or release — i.e., that which knows the reality that doesn't arise and doesn't disappear.
These, then, are the four Noble Truths.
Those who see these four Truths directly for themselves will give rise to the noble path and fruition termed 'stream-entry.' Such people are a field of merit for the world: worthy of respect, worthy of welcome, worthy of offerings and veneration.
Whoever possesses the qualities mentioned here qualifies rightly as a member of the Sangha in line with the Doctrine and Discipline taught by the Buddha, and may be called, samici-patipanno, one whose conduct is masterful, reaching the apex of the mundane level and becoming transcendent.
B.
Now we will discuss the second main heading, the Noble Sangha, the family of the Noble Ones, which may be joined by virtue of having developed one's inner qualities, with no need to go through the formalities of the Vinaya.
The Noble Sangha, like the conventional Sangha, is composed of four groups:
b Vicikiccha: doubt and uncertainty about the practices one is following.
Stream-winners have no such doubts, because they have reached the quality attained by the Buddha.
c Silabbata-paramasa: attachment to customs or traditions that are held to be good in this way or that.
Stream-winners are not attached to any external practices dealing with actions or manners.
These three Fetters, stream-winners have cut absolutely, once and for all.
They have attained the noble quality of having closed off completely the four states of deprivation.
In other words, they are destined never again to be born in hell, on the level of the angry demons, the level of the hungry ghosts, or the level of common animals.
This is what it means to close off all four states of deprivation.
Once-returners: those who have gained the second level of Awakening, who will attain nibbana after being born once more in the world.
Once-returners have cut three Fetters, like stream-winners, but have also reduced the amount of desire, anger, and delusion in their hearts.

Non-returners: those who have awakened to the third level and who will never again return to the human world.
After they die they will be born in the Brahma worlds on the levels of the Pure Abodes, there to attain nibbana.
They have absolutely abandoned five of the Fetters —
b Vicikiccha.
c Silabbata-paramasa.
d Kamaraga: passion and delight caused by the power of sensual desires and sensual objects.
e Patigha: irritation and displeasure caused by the power of anger.
Arahants: those who have awakened to the ultimate level of the four Noble Truths and have reached the quality of deathlessness, free from all the fermentations of defilement; whose ignorance, craving, attachments, and kamma have ended.
Arahants have abandoned their Fetters by means of the factors of the highest of the noble paths.
The Fetters they have abandoned are ten:
b Vicikiccha.
c Silabbata-paramasa.
d Kamaraga.
f Ruparaga: passion for the sense of form that can act as the object of rupa jhana.
g Aruparaga: passion for formless phenomena, such as the feeling of pleasure that comes from seclusion.
h Mana: conceiving or construing oneself to be like this or that.
i Uddhacca: restlessness and distraction, being carried away with one's thoughts.
The thoughts on this level deal with the activity of discernment, which is something good, but they go out of bounds.
j Avijja: ignorance, i.e., not recognizing stress, its cause, its disbanding, and the path to its disbanding — in short, not being acquainted with the conditioned phenomena that exist within each of us; not being acquainted with the unconditioned, which is a genuine property, existing naturally.
This, briefly, is what avijja means.
Another meaning for avijja is not being acquainted with the way we are — e.g., not recognizing our concepts of the past and thus becoming immersed in them; not recognizing our concepts of the future; not recognizing the present, which is the important aspect of all physical and mental phenomena.
Thus, delusion with regard to all three time periods is called avijja: counterfeit knowledge, falling short of the four genuine Truths.
These ten Fetters, arahants — both men and women — have cut absolutely, freeing themselves from every sort of bond or domination, so that their hearts are brilliant and dazzling, like the full moon in a cloudless sky.
This is samici-patipanno — one whose conduct is masterful — on the transcendent level.
The four groups mentioned here are termed the Ariya Sangha, the Noble Community, which can be found only in Buddhism.
Therefore, all Buddhists who daily pay homage to the Sangha should make themselves aware of what the Sangha is, of how genuine or counterfeit the members of the Sangha are.
Otherwise, our respect will be blind and misguided, ignorant of the true nature of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha.
We should use our judgment and reason to be selective so that we can help one another look after the state of the religion, bringing it into proper line with the principles of the Buddha's teachings.
The Sangha can be compared to a tree: Some members are like the heartwood, others are like the sapwood, others are like the outer bark, and still others are like parasitic creepers.
Another popular analogy is to compare the Sangha to a jewel.
Now, there are many kinds of jewels, just as there are many parts to a tree: artificial gems, zircons, rubies, amethysts, sapphires, emeralds, and diamonds.
Just as all of these are called jewels, and are all of differing value, so it is with the members of the Sangha.
Whoever is rich in discernment will obtain a valuable jewel as an adornment.
Whoever is poor in discernment will end up with nothing but artificial gems or bits of gravel: Some people believe that all who wear the yellow robe are alike.
They 'make donations to the yellow robe,' or 'pay respect to the yellow robe,' or 'make donations to the virtuous'… Thus I ask that all Buddhists make a point of learning where the gems of the religion that we as a nation revere may be found.
A person who doesn't know what the Sangha is, is like a child who doesn't know his family and relatives — who doesn't know who his father is, who his mother is, who his elder brothers and sisters are.
When this is the case, he has no one to rely on.
If he tries to rely on others, he can do so only as long as he has money in his pockets.
As soon as he runs out of money, he's in for trouble: His friends and companions are sure to act as if they don't recognize him; and he can't turn to his family and relatives because he doesn't know who they are.
So in the end he'll meet with nothing but suffering.
This is why we're taught that, as long as we still have life, we shouldn't rest complacent.
We should urgently make the virtues of the Sangha our guardians — because our friend, the body, can be relied on only as long as it doesn't die.
And when the time comes, who will care for us aside from our guardians, the virtues of the Sangha?
We shouldn't waste our time engrossed simply with the life of the body for, as far as I can see, there's nothing to the life of the body but eating and then sleeping, sleeping and then eating again.
If we let ourselves get stuck simply on the level of sleeping and eating, we're headed for trouble.
This can be illustrated with a story:
Once in a village by the seaside, there came a time of unbalance in the natural elements, and large numbers of the livestock — the water buffaloes — died of the plague.
The men of the village, fearing that the disease would spread, took the buffalo carcasses and threw them into the sea.
As the carcasses floated away from shore, a flock of crows came to feed on them for many days.
Each day, when the crows had eaten their fill, they would fly back to spend the night in the trees by the shore; and then would fly out the following dawn to continue eating.
As days passed, and the carcasses floated further and further out to sea, some of the crows — seeing the hardships in flying back to shore — decided to spend the night floating on the carcasses; others of the flock, though, didn't mind the hardships and continued flying back to shore every evening.
Finally, when the carcasses had floated so far out to sea that flying back and forth was no longer possible, the flock decided to abandon that source of food and to search for a new source of food on land.
One of the crows, though, had stayed with the carcasses; when he saw that his fellows were no longer coming to claim a share of the food, he became overjoyed, thinking that the food he had would last him a long time.
He became so engrossed in his eating that he never thought of looking back to shore.
As the carcasses went floating further and further out, swarms of fish came from below to devour them until there was nothing left to eat.
Finally, the remains of the carcasses sank deep into the sea; and at that point, the crow decided that the time had come to fly back to shore.
With this in mind, he flew to the north, but didn't see land.
He flew to the south, to the east and west, but didn't see land.
Finally, he ran out of strength and could fly no further, and so lowered his wings and dropped into the sea, where he became food for the fishes.
This is human life.
If we let ourselves become engrossed only with eating and sleeping and physical pleasures, without searching for virtue — i.e., if we don't practice the virtues of the Sangha as we've been taught — we're sure to reap the rewards — suffering — just like the crow who fell to his death in the sea.
This story is about us: The sea stands for the world, the flood of rebirth; the buffalo carcasses stand for the body; the trees on the shore stand for the Dhamma, and the crows stand for the heart — i.e., sometimes we feel like practicing the Dhamma and sometimes we don't.
The virtues of the Sangha are subtle, deep, and hard to perceive.
If we don't have knowledge of ourselves, we won't be able to see them, just as a mute person doesn't know how to speak his native tongue.
Here I would like to tell another story to illustrate what it means not to know the virtues of the Sangha.
Once there was a mute person who made his living by playing a conch shell trumpet.
Now, the way he played the conch shell was to make it sound like human voices or animal calls.
When he had perfected his skill, he wandered about the cities and country towns, playing his conch.
One day he went to play in a village deep in the countryside.
As he was about to reach the village, he stopped to rest under the shade of a tree and picked up his conch to practice for a moment.
Within minutes a swarm of people, hearing the sound of the conch, came bursting from the village to see what it was.
They came across the mute man sitting under the tree and so asked him, 'What was that beautiful sound we heard a moment ago?' The mute man pointed to the conch shell lying nearby.
The people, thinking that they had heard the cry of the conch, ran over to tap on it to make it cry again, but it didn't make a sound.
Some of them picked it up and tried shaking it, but still no sound, so they put it back down.
Others turned it over to see exactly where its cry came from, but no matter what they did, the sound of the conch wouldn't come out.
So they ran back to the mute person.
The mute person didn't know what to say, but he could tell from their actions that they wanted to know what made the sound of the conch come out in such a variety of calls, so he pointed to his mouth.
The villagers ran to take a look.
They had him open his mouth and looked up and down inside, but didn't see how it could be made to sound.
So the mute man flickered his tongue for them to see.
With this, they realized that the sound came from the mute man's tongue; and so they tried flickering their own tongues, but no beautiful sounds came out.
So they ran back to the mute man, who blew air out of his mouth, meaning that the sound came from the breath.
They tried blowing air from their own mouths, but still no beautiful sounds.
Finally, the mute man reached for the conch, put it to his lips — and out came the beautiful sounds: the sounds of people crying, people laughing, people wailing and mourning, the sounds of birds, mice, and forest beasts.
So it is with us: If we don't know how to train ourselves so as to attain the virtues of the Sangha, we won't know how beneficial to us the Sangha can be.
We'll become uncivilized savages, not knowing whether the Sangha is good or bad, and we'll end up like the villagers who didn't know where the sound of the conch came from.
This story doesn't refer to anything distant: The mute man, producing various sounds from his conch shell, stands for preaching monks.
For example, sometimes they try to be correct, proper, and principled in their preaching; sometimes they preach like animals, i.e., using a song-like voice or cracking jokes that go beyond the bounds of the Dhamma and Vinaya.
In this way, they are like the man blowing the conch.
As for the villagers who came running wide-eyed to hear the sound of the conch, they stand for Buddhist lay people who don't understand the virtues of the Sangha and thus are destined not to find the Sangha, just as the villagers couldn't find the sound of the conch.
When this is the case, they will simply shell out money to hear the sound of conch trumpets, without any thought of the practices taught by the Buddha.
Monks will be deluded into blowing conch shells for their living, without any thought of the qualities of the Sangha; and so our religion will degenerate day by day, becoming ultimately a theater or playhouse for the world.
This has been an extended discussion of the Triple Gem.
If we were to put it briefly, there wouldn't be a great deal to say.
We've kept the discussion drawn-out in this way so as to show the general usefulness of the Triple Gem for those who revere it.
If you want to go for refuge in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha in a way that will reach their genuine benefits, then you should gather their main points into yourself, training yourself so as to give rise to the virtues of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha in your heart.
This is where the value of the Triple Gem lies.
The gist of our discussion of the Triple Gem comes down simply to this:
A.
'Buddha' can be divided into a number of levels.
The 'Buddha' of his physical representatives refers to Buddha images, stupas, and places worthy of veneration such as his birthplace, the place of his Awakening, the place where he delivered his first sermon, and the place where he entered total nibbana, which at present lie within the boundaries of India and Nepal.
All of these things qualify on the physical level as symbols of the Buddha for those who revere them, but they may be disqualified if the people who revere them lack the necessary inner qualifications.
Take Buddha images as an example: You should understand Buddha images as having three characteristic types —
In other words, Buddha images can be beneficial or harmful depending on how they are used by those who revere them.
Even people who use them as charms in committing robbery, casting spells, or performing black magic may get results because of the power of their conviction.
But if we can be selective and use these images in ways that are right, the potency they contain will benefit us, bringing us blessings and protecting us from danger.
Thus, the symbols of the Buddha can function in various ways.
There is much more to this topic, but if we were to discuss it here, it would draw things out even further.
These images can either qualify or be disqualified as symbols of the Buddha, depending on the people who revere them, but the images in themselves are neutral.
The important point for people who hope for true welfare, though, is to invest themselves with the qualities that serve on the inner level as symbols of reverence for the Buddha.
These qualities are three —
Pañña: the intuitive discernment and cognitive skill that come from concentrating the mind.
Vimutti: purity and release from mental defilement: This is the essence of 'Buddha-ratanam,' the gem of the Buddha.
B.
Dhamma: Good Dhamma is of three sorts —
But if we revere the Dhamma and make use of it through the power of our conviction, memorizing passages of Pali for the sake of what is good and pure, and then putting them into use, they will give rise to merit.
For example, if we repeat the phrase, 'Dhammam saranam gacchami,' or 'Namo buddhaya,' with heartfelt conviction, giving rise to a sense of joy, this mental state can then serve to protect us from certain kinds of accidents and harm.
We may reap real benefits from the phrase we repeat.
This is something that people who have respect for the Dhamma should investigate carefully.
These passages, then, can qualify as symbols of the Dhamma — or be disqualified, if we don't know their true aims.
Patipatti: This refers to behaving sincerely in line with the Buddha's teachings:
b Samadhi: keeping the mind firmly intent in the four levels of jhana, free from the mental Hindrances.
Pativedha: This refers to extinguishing defilement completely, releasing the mind from all suffering and stress.
This qualifies as the essence of the Dhamma.
All three of the levels mentioned here form the inner qualifications of those who truly revere and follow the Dhamma.
Sangha: If we translate this as a substantive, it refers to those who shave their heads and wear the yellow robe as a sign of having been ordained.
These people can qualify on the external level as symbols of the Sangha or they may be disqualified.
To qualify, they have to meet three criteria:
Sangha-sampatti: The monks who gather to witness the ordination constitute a legitimate quorum.
Sima-sampatti: The place in which the ordination is held has had its boundaries properly defined.
When an individual ordains in line with these criteria, he qualifies as a symbol of the Sangha.
But viewed from another angle, if the individual has met these criteria and becomes a monk but doesn't behave in line with the Dhamma and Vinaya — disobeying the training rules established by the Buddha, committing major and minor offenses with no sense of shame — he becomes disqualified on the personal level, just as a Buddha image that has been properly consecrated but is then put to improper uses by evil or lowminded people is bound to lead to harm.
A monk with no sense of conscience or shame is like a Buddha image inhabited by an angry demon.
Normally, when an angry demon takes possession of a person, it reveals itself by its behavior.
For example, when some angry demons take possession, they like to run around naked, harassing other people.
If a person has no sense of conscience or shame, it's as if he were possessed by an angry demon.
In other words, if he doesn't have any moral restraint, it's as if he lacked the clothing needed to hide his nakedness.
And when this is the case, he is disqualified as a symbol of the Sangha.
A person who meets the three external qualifications mentioned above has to behave in line with the inner virtues of the Sangha —
b.
Sila: keeping one's words and deeds in proper order.
To have these two qualities is to qualify as a human being.
b.
Ottappa: having a sense of dread at the thought of the results of doing evil.
If a monk has these qualities, it's as if he were inhabited by a celestial being.
Pañña, vijja, vimutti: gaining release from the mundane level, abandoning the three Fetters beginning with self-identification, reaching the Dhamma of the Buddha, attaining the state where we are guaranteed by the Buddha as being upright, dependable, honest, and sincere toward the Dhamma and Vinaya; gaining Awakening following his example, becoming a reliable member of the Sangha.
Such people are termed 'ariya sotapanna' — Noble Ones who have reached the stream — and deserve to be called 'visuddhi-deva,' divinities through purity, whose virtues are higher than those of human beings, deities, Indra, or Brahma.
Even though such people are still subject to death and rebirth, they are not like other human beings.
The pure aspect of their heart will never again become defiled.
Thus they deserve to be called, in a partial sense, divinities through purity.
All four of these qualities form the inner qualifications of the Sangha.
Speaking in terms of these inner qualifications, every person can become a member of the Sangha.
But if we don't develop these qualities within ourselves and then take refuge in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha only on the external level, how will we get the full benefits?
We're taught that if we can't depend on ourselves, there is no way we can hope to depend on others.
For example, if an evil person breaks the law, commits robbery, and then asks the government to give him help, you can rest assured that the only help the government will give him will be to build a place for him to live in discomfort — a jail.
In the same way, if we don't behave in line with the virtues of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha, how can we go around taking refuge in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha?
The Buddha taught:
Thus we should develop the inner qualifications of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha within ourselves.
Then we will belong to the company of the Buddha's followers.
If we belong to the religion as lay women, we are called 'upasika.' If we belong as lay men, we are called 'upasaka.' If we observe the ten precepts and are endowed with the virtues of the Sangha, we are termed 'samanera.' If we take a vow to join the community of those who fully observe the precepts, we are termed 'bhikkhu.' When we join the company of the Buddha's followers in this way, all people in general who practice and revere the teachings will benefit — just as when we meet the qualifications of a good citizen as set out by the government: If we are trained and educated to be good, we are bound to help the nation progress and prosper.
But if we don't view ourselves as part of the nation and don't think of making a living to support ourselves, and instead simply go around looking for pleasure or for help from others, the results are bound to be bad.
Therefore, we as Buddhists have to study and practice before we can be Buddhists of virtue and value.
We will then reap rewards in the visible present.
And even if we are no longer able to live in this world, then when our bodies die and we head for another world, we have a good bourn awaiting us, as in the verse from the Maha-samaya Sutta:
'Those who reach the refuge of the Buddha will close off all four of the lower realms.
When they leave this life they are bound for a good bourn, there to fill the ranks of the gods.'
'I go to the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha as my life and refuge till reaching nibbana.'
The Theragaathaa, the Verses of the Elders, is a work found in the Khuddaka Nikaaya of the Sutta Pi.taka of the Paali Canon.
As its name indicates, this is a collection of verses ascribed to various elder monks, mostly celebrating their attainment of arahantship.
As with a number of other works in the Paali Canon, such as the Anguttara Nikaaya and the Itivuttaka, the Theragaathaa is divided into sections with progressively increasing numbers of verses.
It begins with a section of single verses, then continues with pairs, triplets, and so forth.
In the later sections this system breaks down and the number of verses which the poems actually contain only approximate to the number of the section.
The present work is a translation accompanying the original Paali text of the final and longest section of the Theragaathaa, the Mahaanipaata or “Great Section.” This is a self-contained anthology of fourteen poems with seventy-one verses, composed by a single elder, the Venerable Vangiisa.
Although not indicated in the text, the various occasions for the composition and recitation of these poems is to be found in the commentary.
These in turn are a summary of the information supplied by the Vangiisa-sa.myutta of the Sa.myutta Nikaaya, where we find a parallel version of these poems embedded in a series of short suttas giving the circumstances of their composition.
Interestingly, the two versions of the poems are not identical, though the differences are mostly slight.
They consist mainly of dialectical variants from a time when Paali was an oral literature being collected from the several dialects of Maagadhii, the actual spoken language of that region of Northern India in which the Buddha and his early followers lived and preached the Dhamma.
The author of these poems, the Venerable Vangiisa, was designated by the Buddha as the foremost of his disciples with respect to spontaneity of speech.
This gift is evidently a reference to the Parosahassa Sutta where, after reciting a poem, the Buddha asked Vangiisa whether it had been devised by him beforehand or had occurred to him “on the spot”.
When Vangiisa affirmed the latter, the Buddha invited him to compose some more verses, and the result was the next poem.
Apart from what we can glean from the poems themselves and the suttas of the Vangiisa-sa.myutta, we know very little about the Venerable Vangiisa himself.
The commentary says he was a brahmin by birth and that, prior to meeting the Buddha, he made a living by tapping the skulls of deceased people and telling thereby where the owners had been reborn.
The Buddha tested him by presenting him with several skulls, including that of an arahant.
He was successful with his first few guesses, but when he came to the arahant's skull he was mystified, for an arahant is not reborn anywhere.
He decided to enter the Order to discover the secret.
He was ordained by the Elder Nigrodhakappa and later became an arahant.
The commentary adds that after composing some verses in praise of the Buddha he gained a reputation as a poet.
According to the Apadaana Vangiisa was so called both because he was born in the country of Vanga and also because he was a “master of the spoken word.” In Buddhist Sanskrit works, such as the Mahaavastu, his name appears unambiguously as Vaagiisa, “Lord of Speech.” This is, of course, an assumed name and we do not know his actual personal name, as is common with individuals in this early Buddhist literature.
“Lord of Speech,” or perhaps better, “Master of Words,” is an apt title for a poet.
The poems themselves give us the picture of a man of sensitive and artistic temperament who found it difficult to control his innate sensuality, manifest in his attachment to the opposite sex.
He would have appreciated this passage from the Anguttara Nikaaya: “They fetter him who has forgotten mindfulness, with gaze and smile, disordered dress, sweet blandishments…”.
Furthermore, he was proud of his gift of poetic invention, but recognized this pride as a fault to be overcome.
The sole reference in the poems to his life before he met the Buddha says only that he was obsessed by the poetic art.
All of this tends to cast doubt on the authenticity of the bizarre tale of the skull-tapping brahmin.
In the absence of any evidence to the contrary it is perhaps best to be noted as a curiosity.
The importance of Vangiisa lies in his talent as a poet, a gift that must have been nurtured and developed over a period of time before the present poems were composed.
We might also conclude that for someone able to compose verse spontaneously, as Vangiisa could, his output might well have been enormous.
The few “religious” poems that have survived may be only a small fraction of an opus that is now lost forever.
After these preliminary remarks I ought to discuss some points arising from the poems themselves, but first I wish to make a general observation concerning the translation.
My aim has been to convey the exact verbal meaning of the poems, and for this purpose I felt a literal prose translation would be more suitable than one in verse.
Moreover, a verse translation could be positively misleading if it made a pretense of conveying the “feel” of the original poems; hence also the decision to reproduce the Paali text alongside the translation.
In recent decades much scholarly work has been done in restoring and correcting the text of the Theragaathaa and I took the opportunity to incorporate the results of such research into this edited version of Vangiisa's verses.
I leave the assessment of Vangiisa as a poet to those better qualified to judge.
Paali meter and Indian poetics in general are difficult subjects of which the present translator has little knowledge.
My aim in both the text and the translation has been to adhere as closely as possible to what was originally intended by the poet and to the meaning understood by his contemporaries.
With this in view the translation occasionally departs from the interpretations of particular words and phrases proposed by the commentaries.
For instance, in v.
we find the term maggajina.
The commentary interprets this as “a path-victor” or “conqueror of the path.” In the Cunda Sutta maggajina is the first of the four kinds of sama.na listed there.
According to the commentary, “One who has overcome all defilements by means of the path is called a path-victor”.
However, as K.R.
Norman has pointed out, the suffix -jina is unlikely to mean “conqueror” here, but was a dialect form from Skt.
j~naa.
Hence it is probable that the commentary is mistaken and that the word originally meant “a path-knower.” I have translated it in this way on the assumption that this was what Vangiisa himself intended by the expression.
Another innovation is my translation of the term puthujjana as “outsiders”.
This term is usually translated “ordinary persons,” “worldlings,” “manyfolk,” etc., taking puthu in its sense of “numerous,” “various”.
However, another meaning of puthu is “separate,” “apart”.
Although this sense was deemed inappropriate for puthujjana by earlier translators and the PTS Dictionary, there is no real reason why it could not be so understood.
The term refers to those people who are apart from, separate from, those in possession of the Dhamma of the noble ones, the Buddha and his disciples.
The commentaries use puthujjana to refer to anyone and everyone who has not yet reached at least the path of stream-entry; thereafter they become noble disciples and lose their designation as puthujjana.
It is possible, however, that the term was originally used in a still more restricted sense, as referring to those incapable of understanding the Dhamma, in contrast to the vi~n~nuu who could do so when it was taught to them.
Being apart from Dhamma, the puthujjana are established in what is not-Dhamma.
They are unable to relate to the Buddha's Teaching because they are attached to and blinded by the many wrong and speculative views that are at variance with the Dhamma.
I decided to use “Fortunate One” as a translation of bhagavaa.
This seems to be closer to what was intended than the common rendering “Blessed One,” which could give rise to the query, “Blessed by whom?” Again, “Lord” or even “Exalted One” is suggestive of dominance over others by a god-like being, which is surely not intended here.
All such renderings have strong theistic overtones and so can be misleading.
In Hinduism Bhagavaan is used as a term for God, and thus in that context “Lord,” e.g.
“Lord Krishna,” is appropriate.
In translating Vangiisa's verses my guiding principle has been to leave as few words as possible untranslated.
With this aim “monk” is used for bhikkhu and “god” for deva, words which I had left in the original Paali in an earlier translated work.
I decided to retain Dhamma and Tathaagata, which are generally held to elude satisfactory rendering into English.
But the occurrence of the word naaga in v.
became an exception to the rule.
One meaning of naaga is “bull elephant.” Naaga is used as an epithet of the Buddha and his arahant disciples, and I had first thought to translate v.
thus: “You are called an elephant, Fortunate One…” However, in English, instead of suggesting the intended feelings of reverence and awe, on initial encounter this might well be taken in a pejorative sense; hence I decided to leave it untranslated.
In Thag - various attributes of the Buddha are equated with parts of the elephant — feet, tusks, trunk, and so forth.
The word naaga is also used for the serpent and a class of semi-divine beings, depicted in art as half-human and half-snake; perhaps it originally referred to certain indigenous tribal peoples who worshipped the cobra.
A naaga cult still exists in India today.
The subject matter of the poems is diverse.
The first four poems show Vangiisa articulating his inner struggle to overcome various failings and elementary obstacles: sensual thoughts, doubt, attachment, views, pride and conceit, ways of thinking not to be entertained by one who has gone forth into homelessness.
Foremost among these failings is sensual desire, which arises through unguarded contact with desirable sights, sounds, etc.
In the first poem these objects of desire are conceived as devices of Maara, the Evil One, to overpower the mind and prevent progress upon the path.
The fourth poem shows how arisen sensual desires can be extinguished and dispelled by appropriate attitudes and meditation practices.
In this latter poem it may be questioned whether it is actually the Venerable AAnanda who is here addressed as “Gotama” or the Buddha himself.
However, there is no problem if we understand that Vangiisa's query is being answered by the Buddha, whose word was memorized and transmitted through his disciple AAnanda.
The fifth poem is unique in being a verse summary of a sermon by the Buddha on truth as the “well-spoken word.” This poem is also to be found in the Suttanipaata, and the fact that the three versions hardly differ may indicate that it enjoyed wide popularity.
The sixth is the first of three sketches of the Buddha's disciples.
Here it is Saariputta; the others are Ko.n.da~n~na and Mahaamoggallaana.
This poem gives a rare glimpse of Saariputta as a skilled teacher and speaker able to captivate the monks with his pleasant voice.
“All are the Fortunate One's sons…”: that the Buddha's arahant disciples are regarded as his “sons” is a recurrent idea in the Theragaathaa and elsewhere.
In the Itivuttaka the Buddha says: “Monks,… you are my own legitimate sons, born from my mouth, born of Dhamma, fashioned by Dhamma, heirs of Dhamma, not heirs of material things”.
In v.
Vangiisa calls the Elder Ko.n.da~n~na “the Awakened One's heir” and Nigrodhakappa in v.
“a true son of the naaga”.
The idea is extended in Thag, where Kaaludaayin actually addresses Suddhodana, the Buddha's natural father, as his grandfather!
It is the tradition that the Buddha had a son named Raahula who became a monk.
But the Venerable Raahula found in the Sutta Pi.taka, when called the Buddha's son, has no special claim to that position over and above that of any other disciple.
In the suttas Raahula is portrayed as the ideal novice monk, eager for instruction in the Teaching.
Poems VIII and IX extol the Buddha and his Teaching and in v.
the poet actually refers to himself by name.
No.
XII consists of just a single verse praising the Buddha.
No.
XIII is Vangiisa's declaration of a~n~naa, the attainment of final knowledge or arahantship.
Up to this point the differences between the versions of the poems in the Theragaathaa and the Vangiisa-sa.myutta have been quite minor.
But the verses of this poem are so different from those of the Vangiisa Sutta in the Sa.myutta Nikaaya that it should be regarded as a separate poem.
It is therefore inserted here as Poem XIV for the sake of completeness and for purposes of comparison.
Although the subject matter of both poems is the same, the Sa.myutta version is half the length of the other, with only five stanzas, in contrast to the ten of the Theragaathaa version.
Circumstantial evidence suggests the shorter poem was the original, which was later expanded, either by Vangiisa himself or someone else, to create the longer poem.
The Vangiisa Sutta concludes the Sa.myutta collection and is in keeping with what has gone before, in as much as none of the poems exceed five stanzas in length.
Also the Vangiisa-sa.myutta is found in the first and probably the most ancient division of the Sa.myutta Nikaaya, the Sagaathaavagga.
In contrast, the longer poem comes almost at the end of the Theragaathaa and is followed by yet one more, the final and inordinately long Nigrodhakappa poem of seventeen stanzas, which concludes this entire collection.
It is known that the Theragaathaa grew over a long period of time and received additional material even up to the time of Emperor Asoka.
It is therefore more than likely that these final two poems came into existence after the Sa.myutta anthology was finalized.
How the longer poem was constructed from the shorter is best seen by analyzing each of the Paali gaathaa into their constituent four paada.
Thus the first three stanzas of the shorter poem were expanded to five by the insertion of extra paada.
All the original paada were retained, but not in the same order.
Stanzas six and seven of the longer poem, referring to the Four Noble Truths, have nothing corresponding to them in the shorter poem and are therefore new material.
Three paada from the last two stanzas of the shorter poem were discarded, but the rest utilized to make the final three stanzas of the longer poem.
The final poem in this anthology, as already indicated, is missing from the Sa.myutta collection.
However, a corresponding version is found at Sn -, called there variously the Vangiisa Sutta, Kappa Sutta, or Nigrodhakappa Sutta.
Apart from its much greater length, this poem differs from the preceding poems in a number of other ways.
The fact that it directly addresses the Buddha and is in a more ornate, even extravagant style sets it apart from the simpler, unvarnished verse of the earlier poems.
Expressions such as that in v.
referring to “the thousand-eyed Sakka,” are characteristic of a late period of Paali composition.
And indeed, the comparison of the Buddha's voice to the honking of a goose is a device suggestive of the highly ornate poetry of a much later age.
That the elder is variously called Nigrodhakappa, Kappa, Kappiya, Kappaayana, is, of course, to conform to the requirements of the meter.
Although the Nigrodhakappa poem is ostensibly a request to the Buddha for information about the attainment of the deceased elder, Vangiisa's teacher, the manner and persistence of the “urge to speak Dhamma” and other such expressions point to a deeper meaning.
An underlying idea is that the Buddha alone, when proclaiming the Dhamma, is capable of producing a profound effect upon his hearers.
He is able to establish them on the noble path of the sotaapanna, etc., at least those who are ready to receive it, by the Dhamma-words issuing forth through his speech and apparently without any prior practice on the part of the recipients.
This is a special gift exercised by the Buddha alone and not by his disciples.
Although this idea is not taken up to any extent by the Theravaada, which stresses the human side of the Buddha, it was a factor affecting other Indian schools of Buddhism and the so-called Mahaayaana, which tended to emphasize the Buddha's transcendental nature.
Both the Theragaathaa and the first volume of the Sa.myutta Nikaaya, where these verses are found, were first translated by Mrs.
Rhys Davids under the respective titles Psalms of the Brethren and Kindred Sayings I.
The Theragaathaa was re-translated more recently by K.R.
Norman as Elders' Verses I.
The present translator has relied heavily upon Norman's erudite translation and his copious notes to the original Paali text.
As a new monk, recently gone forth, lustful passion was aroused in the Venerable Vangiisa when he saw a number of women adorned in all their finery who had come to visit the monastery.
He dispelled this lust, recording the experience in these verses:
Alas!
Now that I have departed from home to the homeless state, these reckless thoughts from the Dark One come upon me.
Mighty warriors, great archers, trained, steady bowmen, one thousand fearless men, might surround me on all sides.
Even if more women than these will come, they will not cause me to waver, for I am firmly established in the teaching.
In his presence I heard from the Awakened One, the Kinsman of the Sun, of this path leading to nibbaana; it is there that my mind is attached.
Evil One, while I am living thus, if you assail me, so shall I act, O Death, that you will not see my path.
While staying at Alavi the Venerable Vangiisa's teacher, the Elder Nigrodhakappa, after returning from the alms round, remained in seclusion for long periods.
On one occasion, when discontent arose in the mind of the Venerable Vangiisa and his mind was tormented by lust, he composed these verses to reprove himself and to dispel the conflicting emotions that harassed him:
Entirely giving up disliking and liking, and the thinking associated with the life of a householder, one should not have craving for anything.
He indeed is a monk who is wholly without craving.
Whatever there is here of form, inhabiting the earth and the sky, immersed in the world, all is impermanent and decaying.
So understanding, the wise live their lives.
Regarding objects of attachment, people are greedy for what is to be seen and heard and touched and otherwise experienced.
Being unmoved, dispel desire for them, for they call him a sage who does not cling to them.
Then, caught in the sixty, full of thoughts, because of being outsiders, they are established in wrong teaching.
But one who is a monk would not take up a sectarian viewpoint, much less seize upon what is bad.
Intelligent, for a long time composed, not deceitful, wise, not envious, the sage has experienced the peaceful state, depending on which, attained to quenching, he awaits his time.
On another occasion, full of conceit because of his gift for composing extemporaneous verse, the Venerable Vangiisa caught himself despising the other monks who were not so gifted.
Repenting these thoughts, he composed the following poem:
Abandon conceit, Gotama, get rid of the way of conceit completely.
Because of being infatuated by the way of conceit, for a long time you have been remorseful.
Soiled by contempt, destroyed by conceit, people fall into hell.
Persons destroyed by conceit grieve for a long time upon being reborn in hell.
A monk never grieves who is a knower of the path, one who has practiced it properly.
He experiences fame and happiness; truthfully they call him “a seer of Dhamma.
Therefore be without barrenness here, energetic, purified by abandoning the hindrances.
Having completely abandoned conceit, be an ender through knowledge and become one who dwells at peace.
Once, soon after his ordination, Vangiisa accompanied the Venerable AAnanda on a visit to the house of one of the king's ministers.
A number of women of the household came and paid reverence to the elder, asked questions, and listened to his preaching.
But at the sight of these women sensual desire was aroused in Venerable Vangiisa, which he immediately confessed to the Venerable AAnanda.
He recorded the incident in this poem:
“I burn with sensual desire, my mind is enflamed.
Out of pity please tell me, Gotama, the effective extinguishing of it.
“Your mind is enflamed because of distorted perception.
Shun the aspect of beauty associated with passion.

“See constructions as other, as painful, not as self, extinguish strong passion; do not burn again and again.

“Devote the mind, one-pointed and well-composed, to the contemplation of foulness.
Let mindfulness be directed towards the body and be full of disenchantment for it.
“Contemplate the signless and cast out the underlying tendency to conceit.
Then by the penetration of conceit you will go about at peace.
These verses came to the Venerable Vangiisa while he was listening to a talk delivered by the Buddha on the “well-spoken word.” Having received permission from the Teacher, he then recited this poem in his presence:
One should speak only that word by which one would not torment oneself nor harm others.
That word is indeed well spoken.
One should speak only pleasant words, words which are acceptable.
What one speaks without bringing evils to others is pleasant.
Truth is indeed the undying word; this is an ancient verity.
Upon truth, the good say, the goal and the teaching are founded.
The sure word the Awakened One speaks for the attainment of nibbaana, for making an end of suffering, is truly the best of words.
Verses spoken in praise of the Venerable Saariputta:
Of profound wisdom, intelligent, skilled in knowledge of the right and wrong path, Saariputta of great wisdom teaches Dhamma to the monks.
He teaches in brief, he speaks with detailed explanation, his voice is like that of the mynah bird; he demonstrates readiness of speech.
Listening to his sweet utterance while he is teaching with a voice that is captivating, pleasing, and lovely, the monks give ear, with minds elated and joyful.
Verses spoken in praise of the Buddha on an occasion of the Invitation Ceremony:
Today on the fifteenth five hundred monks have gathered for the ceremony of purification, cutters of fetters and bonds, untroubled, seers finished with renewed existence.
-.
As a wheel-turning monarch, surrounded by his ministers, tours all around this ocean-girt earth, so do the disciples with the threefold knowledge, who have left death behind, attend upon the victor in battle, the unsurpassed caravan leader.
All are the Fortunate One's sons; there is no chaff found here.
I pay homage to the destroyer of the dart of craving, the Kinsman of the Sun.
A poem composed on the occasion of a Dhamma-talk concerning nibbaana, delivered by the Buddha to a large company of monks:
More than a thousand monks attend upon the Happy One as he is teaching the stainless Dhamma concerning nibbaana, where no fear can come from any quarter.
They hear the taintless Dhamma taught by the Fully Awakened One.
The Awakened One is truly resplendent as he is revered by the community of monks.
You are called a naaga, Fortunate One; of seers, you are the best of seers.
Like a great rain-cloud, you rain down upon the disciples.
Leaving his daytime abode, wishing to see the Teacher, your disciple Vangiisa pays homage at your feet, Great Hero.
Further verses composed by the Venerable Vangiisa when the Buddha, after hearing the previous poem, invited him to speak more extemporaneous verses:
Overcoming the devious ways and range of Maara, he walks, having broken up the things that make for barrenness of mind.
See him producing release from bonds, unattached, separating into its constituent parts.
He has shown the path in a variety of ways with the aim of guiding us across the flood.
Since the undying has been shown, the Dhamma-seers stand immovable.
The light-maker, having penetrated, saw the overcoming of all standpoints.
Having understood and experienced it, he taught the topmost to the five.
When the Dhamma has been thus well taught, what indolence could there be in those who know the Dhamma?
Therefore, vigilant and ever revering, one should follow the training in the Fortunate One's dispensation.
Verses composed on an occasion when the Elder A~n~naata Ko.n.da~n~na came to pay his respects to the Teacher:
The Elder Ko.n.da~n~na, strong in energy, who was enlightened after the Awakened One, is repeatedly the obtainer of pleasurable abidings and seclusions.
Whatever is to be attained by a disciple who does the instruction of the Teacher, all that has been attained by him, vigilant and disciplined.
Having great power and the threefold knowledge, skilled in knowing the thoughts of others, Ko.n.da~n~na, the Awakened One's heir, pays homage at the Teacher's feet.
Verses in praise of the Elder Mahaamoggallaana:
Disciples, possessors of the threefold knowledge who have left death behind, attend upon the sage seated on the mountain side, who has gone to the far shore beyond suffering.
Moggallaana, of great supernormal powers, encompasses with his mind, seeking their minds, completely freed, without attachments.
Thus do they attend upon Gotama endowed with so many virtuous qualities, the sage possessed of all the attributes and gone to the far shore beyond suffering.
Once when the Buddha was seated by the Gaggaraa Lotus-pond near the town of Campaa, surrounded by a large assembly, the Venerable Vangiisa composed this verse in his praise:
As the moon shines in the sky free from clouds, as also the spotless sun, even so, Resplendent One, Great Sage, do you outshine the whole world with your fame.
This, the Venerable Vangiisa's “autobiographical” poem, was composed shortly after he attained arahantship:
Intoxicated with skill in the poetic art, formerly we wandered from village to village, from town to town.
Then we saw the Awakened One gone to the far shore beyond all phenomena.
The sage gone to the far shore beyond suffering taught me the Dhamma.
On hearing the Dhamma we gained confidence in him; faith arose in us.
Having heard his word and learnt of the aggregates, bases, and elements, I went forth into homelessness.
Indeed Tathaagatas appear for the good of the many men and women who practice their teaching.
Indeed the sage attained enlightenment for the good of those monks and nuns who see the course to be undergone.
Well taught are the Four Noble Truths by the Seeing One, the Awakened One, the Kinsman of the Sun, out of compassion for living beings.
Suffering, the origin of suffering, the overcoming of suffering, and the noble eightfold path leading to the allaying of suffering.
Thus these things, thus spoken of, have been seen by me as they really are.
The true goal has been reached by me; the Awakened One's instruction has been done.
It was good indeed for me, my coming into the presence of the Awakened One.
Among things shared out I obtained the best.
I have attained the perfection of the direct knowledges, I have purified the element of hearing, I have the threefold knowledge and obtained supernormal powers and am skilled in knowing the minds of others.
The shorter version of the previous poem:
Intoxicated with skill in the poetic art, formerly we wandered from village to village, from town to town.
Then we saw the Awakened One and faith arose in us.
He taught me the Dhamma concerning the aggregates, bases, and elements.
Having heard his Dhamma, I went forth into homelessness.
Indeed the sage attained enlightenment for the good of the many monks and nuns who see the course to be undergone.
It was good indeed for me, my coming into the presence of the Awakened One.
The three knowledges have been attained; the Awakened One's instruction has been done.
I know my former abodes, the purified divine eye, I have the threefold knowledge and obtained supernormal powers and am skilled in knowing the minds of others.
In this, the longest of the poems, the Venerable Vangiisa asks the Buddha whether his deceased preceptor, the Elder Nigrodhakappa, had attained final nibbaana.
This provides an opportunity for Vangiisa to sing the praises of the Buddha himself:
“I ask the teacher of superior wisdom, one who in this very life is the cutter-off of doubts: The monk, well known and famous, who has died at Aggaa.lava, was he completely quenched in mind?
“Nigrodhakappa was the name given to that brahmin by you, Fortunate One.
Looking for release, strenuously energetic, he went about revering you, O seer of the secure state.
“Sakka, All-seeing One, we all wish to know concerning that disciple.
Our ears are ready to hear.
You are the teacher, you are unsurpassed.
“Sever our doubt.
Tell me this, you of extensive wisdom, that he experienced quenching.
Speak in our very midst, All-seeing One, like the thousand-eyed Sakka in the midst of the gods.
“Whatever bonds exist here, ways of delusion, on the side of ignorance, bases for doubt, they no longer exist on reaching the Tathaagata, for that vision of his is supreme among men.
“If no man were ever to disperse the defilements as the wind disperses a mass of clouds, the whole world, enveloped, would surely be darkness, and even illustrious men would not shine forth.
“But the wise are light-makers.
O Wise One, I think you are just such a one.
We have come upon him who knows and is gifted with insight.
Make evident to us, within the companies, the fate of Kappa.
“Quickly enunciate your beautiful utterance, O beautiful one!
Like a goose stretching forth, honk gently with your melodious and well-modulated voice; we are all listening to you attentively.
“Pressing the one who has completely abandoned birth and death, I shall urge the purified one to speak Dhamma.
For among outsiders there is no acting as they wish, but among Tathaagatas there is acting with discretion.
“This full explanation of yours, one with upright wisdom, is well learnt.
This last salutation is proferred.
You of superior wisdom, knowing, do not keep us in ignorance.
“Having known the noble Dhamma in its full extent, you of superior energy, knowing, do not keep us in ignorance.
I long for your word as one overcome by heat in the hot season longs for water.
Rain down on our ears.
“Surely the purpose for which Kappaayana practiced the holy life was not in vain.
Was he quenched or had he a residue remaining?
Let us hear in what way he was released.
“He cut off craving here for mind-and-materiality”, said the Fortunate One, “the stream of craving which for a long time had lain latent within him.
He has crossed beyond birth and death completely.” So spoke the Fortunate One, the foremost of the five.
“On hearing your word, O best of seers, I believe.
My question was truly not in vain; the brahmin did not deceive me.
“As he spoke, so he acted.
He was a disciple of the Awakened One.
He cut through the strong, spread-out net of Death the deceiver.
“Kappiya saw the starting point of grasping, O Fortunate One.
Kappaayana has certainly gone beyond the realm of Death, so difficult to cross.
“I pay homage to you, the god of gods, and to your son, O best of bipeds, to the great hero born in your tracks, a naaga, a true son of the naaga.
The Theragaathaa, with the Vangiisa-sa.myutta and the Suttanipaata, does not exhaust the verses ascribed to the Venerable Vangiisa.
Another pair of verses is attributed to him in the post-canonical Milindapa~nha, “The Questions of King Milinda”:
This work also contains verses ascribed to other elders, such as Saariputta and Anuruddha, that are not to be found elsewhere.
The Milindapa~nha records a dialogue between the Elder Naagasena and King Milinda, the Indic form of the Greek name Menander.
He is identified with a Greco-Bactrian king of the nd century B.who exercised rule in Northwest India.
The work was probably composed originally in Prakrit or Sanskrit — even Greek has been suggested — and was subsequently translated into Paali.
It is therefore possible that these verses came from the Tipi.taka of another Buddhist school, possibly the Sarvaastivaada.
There are also some verses extolling the virtues of the Buddha attributed to Vangiisa in the Buddhist Hybrid Sanskrit work the Mahaavastu, which formed part of the Vinaya of the Lokuttaravaadin school.
Among these is the following:
As the glorious sun shines in the sky, and the full moon when the sky is clear, so dost thou, O Man, firm in concentration, shine forth like burnished gold.
This is reminiscent of Thag.
Then we find:
Since through thine own understanding, thou has apprehended the truth and knowledge unheard of before, O Foremost Man, who shinest like thousand-eyed Maghavan, pray give utterance to it.
This may be compared with Thag.
In the Mahaavastu itself the words, “pray give utterance to it,” have no obvious connection with what has gone before or what follows, but they do have a significance in the Theragaathaa context, where the poet questions the Buddha about the fate of Nigrodhakappa.
Another reference to Vangiisa is found in the Mahaavastu when the Buddha addresses him thus, “Let there come to your mind, Vaagiisa, the recollection of a former association of yours with the Tathaagata.” Vaagiisa then proceeds to tell in verse a story of a former life when the bodhisattva or Buddha-to-be, as a wise brahmin, was his teacher.
The Vimaanavatthu of the Khuddaka Nikaaya is a collection of stories in verse describing the vimaana — a kind of personal heavenly mansion — inhabited by beings reborn as gods or goddesses as a reward for meritorious deeds performed by them as human beings.
All the stories follow a similar pattern.
They begin with an introductory verse in which the god or goddess is asked about the cause for his or her rebirth within that particular mansion.
The deva thereupon relates his or her previous good deeds.
Usually the Venerable Mahaamoggallaana is the questioner, but occasionally another elder plays this role.
Generally, it is only in the commentary that the questioner is named and the background supplied; otherwise the verses are anonymous.
In four stories Vangiisa is identified as the interlocutor: No., No., No., and No..
In No.
it is Sakka the ruler of the gods who questions the goddess.
However, at the conclusion the commentary states that Sakka related it to Vangiisa, who in turn told it to the compilers of the Canon.
We cannot be certain whether the ascription of these verses to Vangiisa is authentic.
There is nothing notable in the verses of the two Naaga mansion stories that can link them to the poet.
If Vangiisa did recite the verses of No., although allegedly receiving them from Sakka, could they be regarded as his own composition?
The introductory verses of Sesavatii are, interestingly enough, unique in the Vimaanavatthu as constituting a seven-verse descriptive poem in its own right.
There is none other comparable to it in length, and as it is ascribed to Vangiisa, a translation of it is appended here.
However, it is the Sirimaa poem that is the most interesting of all the mansion stories, for it has a doctrinal content lacking elsewhere in the work.
In it Sirimaa describes how she became a disciple of the Buddha and a sotaapanna, one who has entered the stream leading to final emancipation.
A translation of it is therefore presented as possibly a poetical work of Vangiisa.
“I see this delightful and beautiful mansion, its surface of many a color, ablaze with crystal and roofed with silver and gold.
A well-proportioned palace, possessing gateways, and strewn with golden sand.
As the thousand-rayed sun in the autumn shines in the sky in the ten directions, dispelling the dark, so does this your mansion glow, like a blazing smoke-crested fire in the darkness of the night.
It dazzles the eye like lightning, beautiful, suspended in space.
Resounding with the music of lute, drum, and cymbals, this mansion of yours rivals Indra's city in glory.
White and red and blue lotuses, jasmine, and other flowers are there; blossoming sal trees and flowering asokas, and the air is filled with a variety of fragrances.
Sweet-scented trees, breadfruits, laden branches interlaced, with palm trees and hanging creepers in full bloom, glorious like jeweled nets; also a delightful lotus pool exists for you.
Whatever flowering plants there are that grow in water, and trees that are on land, those known in the human world and heavens, all exist in your abode.
Of what calming and self-restraint is this the result?
By the fruit of what deed have you arisen here?
How did this mansion come to be possessed by you?
Tell it in full, O lady with thick eyelashes.
“How it come to be possessed by me, this mansion with its flocks of herons, peacocks, and partridges; and frequented by heavenly water-fowl and royal geese; resounding with the cries of birds, of ducks and cuckoos;
containing divers varieties of creepers, flowers and trees; with trumpet-flower, rose-apple, and asoka trees — now how this mansion came to be possessed by me, I will tell you.
Listen, venerable sir.
In the eastern region of the excellent country of Magadha there is a village called Naalaka, venerable sir.
There I lived formerly as a daughter-in-law and they knew me there as Sesavatii.
Scattering flower-blossoms joyfully I honored him skilled in deeds and worshipped by gods and men, the great Upatissa who has attained the immeasurable quenching.
Having worshipped him gone to the ultimate bourn, the eminent seer bearing his last body, on leaving my human shape I came to the thirty and inhabit this place.
“Your yoked and finely caparisoned horses, strong and swift, are heading downward through the sky.
And these five hundred chariots, magically created, are following, the horses urged on by charioteers.
You stand in this excellent chariot, adorned, radiant and shining, like a blazing star.
I ask you of lovely slender form and exquisite beauty, from which company of gods have you come to visit the Unrivalled One?
“From those who have reached the heights of sensual pleasures, said to be unsurpassed; the gods who delight in magical transformation and creation.
A nymph from that company able to assume any desired appearance has come here to worship the Unrivalled One.
“What good conduct did you formerly practice here?
How is it that you live in immeasurable glory and have gained such pleasures?
Due to what have you acquired the unrivalled power to travel through the sky?
Why does your beauty radiate in the ten directions?
You are surrounded and honored by the gods.
From where did you decease before you came to a heavenly bourn, goddess?
Or of what teaching were you able to follow the word of instruction?
Tell me if you were a disciple of the Awakened One.
“In a fine well-built city situated between hills, an attendant of a noble king endowed with good fortune, I was highly accomplished in dancing and singing.
As Sirimaa I was known in Raajagaha.
But then the Awakened One, the leader among seers, the guide, taught me of origination, of suffering and impermanence; of the unconditioned, of the cessation of suffering that is everlasting; and of this path, not crooked, straight, auspicious.
When I had learnt of the undying state, the unconditioned, through the instruction of the Tathaagata, the Unrivalled One, I was highly and well restrained in the precepts and established in the Dhamma taught by the most excellent of men, the Awakened One.
When I knew the undefiled place, the unconditioned, taught by the Tathaagata, the Unrivalled One, I then and there experienced the calm concentration.
That supreme certainty of release was mine.
When I gained the distinctive undying, assured, eminent in penetrative insight, not doubting, I was revered by many people and experienced much pleasure and enjoyment.
Thus I am a goddess, knowing the undying, a disciple of the Tathaagata, the Unrivalled One; a knower of Dhamma established in the first fruit, a stream-enterer.
Henceforth there is no bad bourn for me.
I came to revere the Unrivalled One and the virtuous monks who delight in what is skilled; to worship the auspicious assembly of ascetics and the respectworthy Fortunate One, the Dhamma-king.
I am joyful and gladdened on seeing the sage, the Tathaagata, the outstanding trainer of men capable of being trained, who has cut off craving, who delights in what is skilled, the guide.
I worship the supremely merciful Compassionate One.
References are by verse number and paada.
Page numbers in braces refer to the original print edition of this book.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The Tipitaka, the Buddhist canon, is replete with references to the factors of enlightenment expounded by the Enlightened One on different occasions under different circumstances.
In the Book of the Kindred Sayings, V we find a special section under the title Bojjhanga Samyutta wherein the Buddha discourses on the bojjhangas in diverse ways.
In this section we read a series of three discourses or sermons recited by Buddhists since the time of the Buddha as a protection against pain, disease, and adversity.
The term bojjhanga is composed of bodhi + anga.
Bodh denotes enlightenment — to be exact, insight concerned with the realization of the four Noble Truths, namely: the Noble Truth of suffering; the Noble Truth of the origin of suffering; the Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering and the Noble Truth of the path leading to the cessation of suffering.
Anga means factors or limbs.
Bodhi + anga, therefore, means the factors of enlightenment, or the factors for insight, wisdom.
“Bojjhanga!
Bojjhanga!
Is the saying, Lord.
Pray, Lord, how far is this name applicable?” queried a monk of the Buddha.
“Bodhaya samvattantiti kho bhikkhu tasma bojjhanga ti vuccanti” — “They conduce to enlightenment, monk, that is why they are so called,” was the succinct reply of the Master.
Further says the Buddha, “Just as, monks, in a peaked house all rafters whatsoever go together to the peak, slope to the peak, join in the peak, and of them all the peak is reckoned chief: even so, monks, the monk who cultivates and makes much of the seven factors of wisdom, slopes to Nibbana, inclines to Nibbana, tends to Nibbana.
The seven factors are:
One of the discourses on the Bojjhangas may be mentioned here.
It begins:
Thus I heard: At one time the Buddha was living at Rajagaha, at Veluvana, in the squirrel's feeding-ground.
At that time the Venerable Maha Kassapa, who was living in Pipphali Cave, was sick, stricken with a severe illness.
Then the Buddha, rising from his solitude at eventide, visited the Venerable Maha Kassapa, took his seat, and spoke to the Venerable Maha Kassapa in this wise:
“Well, Kassapa, how is it with you?
Are you bearing up; are you enduring?
Do your pains lessen or increase?
Are there signs of your pains lessening and not increasing?
“No, Lord, I am not bearing up, I am not enduring.
The pain is very great.
There is a sign not of the pains lessening but of their increasing.
“Kassapa, these seven factors of enlightenment are well expounded by me, cultivated and much developed by me, and when cultivated and much developed, they conduce to full realization, perfect wisdom, to Nibbana.
What are the seven?
“Mindfulness.
This, O Kassapa, is well expounded by me, cultivated and much developed by me, and when cultivated and much developed, it conduces to full realization, perfect wisdom, to Nibbana.
“Investigation of the dhamma…
“Rapture…
“Concentration…
“Equanimity, O Kassapa, is well expounded by me…
“These seven factors of enlightenment, verily, Kassapa, are well expounded by me, cultivated and much developed by me, and when cultivated and much developed they conduce to full realization, perfect wisdom, to Nibbana.
“Verily, Blessed One, they are factors of enlightenment!
Verily, O Welcome One, they are factors of enlightenment!” uttered Maha Kassapa.
Thus spoke the Buddha, and the Venerable Maha Kassapa, rejoicing, welcomed the utterances of the Worthy One.
And the Venerable Maha Kassapa rose from that illness.
There and then that ailment of the Venerable Maha Kassapa vanished.
Another discourse of the three mentioned above reveals that once, when the Buddha himself was ill, the Venerable Maha Cunda recited the bojjhangas, factors of enlightenment, and the Buddha's grievous illness vanished.
Man's mind tremendously and profoundly influences and affects the body.
If allowed to function viciously and entertain unwholesome and harmful thoughts, mind can cause disaster, nay even kill a being; but mind also can cure a sick body.
When concentrated on right thoughts with right understanding, the effects mind can produce are immense.
Mind not only makes sick, it also cures.
An optimistic patient has more chance of getting well than a patient who is worried and unhappy.
The recorded instances of faith healing include cases in which even organic diseases were cured almost instantaneously.
— Aldous Huxley, Ends and Means, p.

Buddhism is the teaching of enlightenment.
One who is keen on attaining enlightenment, should first know clearly the impediments that block the path to enlightenment.
Life, according to the right understanding of a Buddha, is suffering; and that suffering is based on ignorance or avijja.
Ignorance is the experiencing of that which is unworthy of experiencing — namely evil.
Further, it is the non-perception of the conglomerate nature of the aggregates; non-perception of sense-organ and object in their respective and objective natures; non-perception of the emptiness or the relativity of the elements; non-perception of the dominant nature of the sense-controlling faculties; non-perception of the thus-ness — the infallibility — of the four Truths.
And the five hindrances are the nutriment of this ignorance.
They are called hindrances because they completely close in, cut off, and obstruct.
They hinder the understanding of the way to release from suffering.
These five hindrances are: sensuality, ill-will, obduracy of mind and mental factors, restlessness and flurry, and doubt.
And what is the nutriment of these hindrances?
The three evil modes of life, bodily, vocal, and mental wrong-doing.
This threefold nutriment is in turn nourished by non-restraint of the senses, which is explained by the commentator as the admittance of lust and hate into the six sense-organs of eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind.
The nutriment of non-restraint is shown to be lack of mindfulness and of complete awareness.
In the context of nutriment, the drifting away of the object — the lapsing, from the mind, of the knowledge of the lakkhanas or characteristics of existence, and forgetfulness of the true nature of things — is the reason for non-restraint.
It is when one does not bear in mind the transience and the other characteristics of things that one allows oneself all kinds of liberties in speech and deed, and gives rein to full thought imagery of an unskillful kind.
Lack of complete awareness is lack of these four: complete awareness of purpose, of suitability, of resort, and of non-delusion.
When one does a thing without a right purpose; when one looks at things or does actions which do not help the growth of the good; when one does things inimical to improvement; when one forgets the dhamma, which is the true resort of one who strives; when one deludedly lays hold of things, believing them to be pleasant, beautiful, permanent, and substantial — when one behaves thus, then too non-restraint is nourished.
And below this lack of mindfulness and complete awareness lies unsystematic reflection.
The books say unsystematic reflection is reflection that is off the right course; that is, taking the impermanent as permanent, the painful as pleasure, the soulless as a soul, the bad as good.
The constant rolling-on that is samsara, is rooted in unsystematic thinking.
When unsystematic thinking increases it fulfils two things: nescience and lust for becoming.
Ignorance being present, the origination of the entire mass of suffering comes to be.
Thus a person who is a shallow thinker, like a ship drifting at the wind's will, like a herd of cattle swept into the whirl pools of a river, like an ox yoked to a wheel-contraption, goes on revolving in the cycle of existence, samsara.
And it is said that imperfect confidence in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha is the condition that develops unsystematic reflection; and imperfect confidence is due to non-hearing of the True Law, the dhamma.
Finally, one does not hear the dhamma through lack of contact with the wise, through not consorting with the good.
Thus, want of kalyanamittata, good friendship, appears to be the basic reason for the ills of the world.
And conversely, the basis and nutriment of all good is shown to be good friendship.
That furnishes one with the food of the sublime dhamma, which in turn produces confidence in the Triple Gem: the Buddha, Dhamma, and the Sangha.
When one has confidence in the Triple Gem there come into existence profound or systematic thinking, mindfulness and complete awareness, restraint of the senses, the three good modes of life, the four arousings of mindfulness, the seven factors of enlightenment and deliverance through wisdom, one after another, in due order.
Let us now deal with the enlightenment factors one by one.
The first is sati, mindfulness.
It is the instrument most efficacious in self-mastery, and whosoever practices it has found the path to deliverance.
It is fourfold: mindfulness consisting in contemplation of the body, feeling, mind, and mental objects.
The man lacking in this all-important quality of mindfulness cannot achieve anything worthwhile.
The Buddha's final admonition to his disciples on his death bed is this: “Transient are all component things.
Work out your deliverance with heedfulness!”.
And the last words of the Venerable Sariputta, the foremost disciple of the Buddha, who predeceased the Master, were this: “Strive on with Heedfulness!
This is my advice to you!”.
In both these injunctions the most significant and pregnant word is appamada, which literally means incessant heedfulness.
Man cannot be heedful unless he is aware of his actions — whether they are mental, verbal, or physical — at every moment of his waking life.
Only when a man is fully awake to and mindful of his activities can he distinguish good from bad and right from wrong.
It is in the light of mindfulness that he will see the beauty or the ugliness of his deeds.
The word appamada, throughout the Tipitaka, is used to denote sati, mindfulness; pamada is defined as absence of mindfulness.
Says the Buddha in the Anguttara Nikaya:
Monks, I know not of any other single thing of such power to cause the arising of good thoughts if not yet arisen, or to cause the waning of evil thoughts if already arisen, as heedfulness.
In him who is heedful, good thoughts not yet arisen, do arise, and evil thoughts, if arisen, do wane.
Constant mindfulness and vigilance are necessary to avoid ill and perform good.
The man with presence of mind, who surrounds himself with watchfulness of mind, the man of courage and earnestness, gets ahead of the lethargic, the heedless, as a racehorse outstrips a decrepit hack.
The importance of sati, mindfulness, in all our dealings is clearly indicated by the following striking words of the Buddha:
Mindfulness, O disciples, I declare is essential in all things everywhere.
It is as salt is to the curry.
— MA, Satipatthana commentary
The Buddha's life is one integral picture of mindfulness.
He is the sada sato, the ever-mindful, the ever-vigilant.
He is the very embodiment of mindfulness.
There was never an occasion when the Buddha manifested signs of sluggish inactivity or thoughtlessness.
Right mindfulness or complete awareness, in a way, is superior to knowledge, because in the absence of mindfulness it is just impossible for a man to make the best of his learning.
Intelligence devoid of mindfulness tends to lead man astray and entice him from the path of rectitude and duty.
Even people who are well informed and intelligent fail to see a thing in its proper perspective when they lack this all-important quality of mindfulness.
Men of good standing, owing to deeds done and words spoken thoughtlessly and without due consideration to their consequences, are often subjected to severe and justified criticism.
Mindfulness is the chief characteristic of all wholesome actions tending to one's own and others' profit.
Appamado mahato atthaya sanvattati: “Mindfulness is conducive to great profit” — that is, highest mental development — and it is through such attainment that deliverance from the sufferings of samsara is possible.
The man who delights in mindfulness and regards heedlessness with dread, is not liable to fall away.
He is in the vicinity of Nibbana.
The second enlightenment factor is dhammavicaya, keen investigation of the Dhamma.
It is the sharp analytical knowledge of understanding the true nature of all constituent things animate or inanimate, human or divine.
It is seeing things as they really are; seeing things in their proper perspective.
It is the analysis of all component things into their fundamental elements, right down to their ultimates.
Through keen investigation one understands that all compounded things pass through the inconceivably rapid moments of uppada, thiti, and bhanga, or of arising, reaching a peak, and ceasing, just as a river in flood sweeps to a climax and fades away.
The whole universe is constantly changing, not remaining the same for two consecutive moments.
All things in fact are subjected to causes, conditions, and effects.
Systematic reflection comes naturally through right mindfulness, and it urges one to discriminate, to reason and investigate.
Shallow thinking, unsystematic investigation makes men muddle-headed; and then they fail to investigate the nature of things.
Such people cannot see cause and effect, seed and fruit, the rise and fall of compounded things.
Says the Buddha: “This doctrine is for the wise and not for the unwise.
Buddhism is free from compulsion and coercion and does not demand of the follower blind faith.
At the very outset the skeptic will be pleased to hear of its call for investigation.
Buddhism from beginning to end is open to all those who have eyes to see and minds to understand.
The Buddha never endeavored to wring out of his followers blind and submissive faith in him and his teaching.
He tutors his disciples in the ways of discrimination and intelligent inquiry.
To the inquiring Kalamas the Buddha answered: “Right is it to doubt, right is it to question what is doubtful and what is not clear.
In a doubtful matter wavering does arise.
We find this dialogue between the Master and his disciples:
“If, now knowing this and perceiving this, would you say: 'We honor our Master and through respect for him we respect what he teaches?' “Nay, Lord.
“That which you affirm, O disciples, is it not only that which you yourselves have recognized, seen and grasped?
“Yes, Lord.
And in conformity with this thoroughly correct attitude of true inquiry the philosophers of later times observed: “As the wise test the purity of gold by burning, cutting and examining it by means of a piece of touchstone, so should you accept my words after examining them and not merely out of regard and reverence for me.” Thus blind belief is condemned in the analytic teaching of the Buddha.
The truth of the dhamma can be grasped only through calm concentrative thought and insight and never through blind faith.
One who goes in quest of truth is never satisfied with surface knowledge.
He wants to delve deep and see what is beneath.
That is the sort of search encouraged in Buddhism.
That type of search yields right understanding.
We read in the texts the following story: On one occasion Upali, a fervent follower of Nigantha Nathaputta, the Jain, visited the Buddha, thoughtfully listened to the dhamma, gained saddha and forthwith manifested his readiness to become a follower of the Master.
Nevertheless the Master said: “Of a truth, Upali, make thorough investigation,” and thus discouraged him.
This clearly shows that the Buddha was not keen on converting people to his way of thinking, and to his fold.
He did not interfere with another man's freedom of thought; for freedom of thought is the birthright of every individual.
It is wrong to force someone out of the way of life which accords with his outlook and character, spiritual inclinations and tendencies; compulsion in every form is bad.
It is coercion of the blackest kind to make a man gulp down beliefs for which he has no relish.
Such forced feeding cannot be good for anybody, anywhere.
He that cultivates dhammavicaya, investigation of the dhamma, focuses his mind on the five aggregates of grasping, the pañcupadanakkhandha, and endeavors to realize the rise and fall or the arising and passing away of this conglomeration of bare forces, this conflux of mind and matter.
It is only when he fully realizes the evanescent nature of his own mind and body that he experiences happiness, joyous anticipation.
Therefore, it is said:
Whenever he reflects on the rise and fall of the aggregates, he experiences unalloyed joy and happiness.
To the discerning one that is deathless, Nibbana.
What is impermanent and not lasting he sees as sorrow-fraught.
What is impermanent and sorrow-fraught, he understands as void of a permanent and everlasting soul, self, or ego entity.
It is this grasping, this realization of the three characteristics, or laws of transience, sorrow, and non-self — anicca, dukkha, and anatta — that is known to Buddhists as vipassana-ñana or penetrative insight, which, like the razor-edged sword, entirely eradicates all the latent tendencies; and with it all the varied ramifications of sorrow's cause are finally destroyed.
A man who ascends to this summit of vision is an arahat, a perfect one, whose clarity of vision, whose depth of insight, penetrates into the deepest recesses of life and cognizes the true nature that underlies all appearance.
No more can he be swept off his feet by the glamour of things ephemeral.
No more can he be confused by fearful and terrible appearances.
No more is it possible for him to have a clouded view of phenomena; for he has transcended all capacity for error through the perfect immunity which penetrative insight alone can give.
The third enlightenment factor is viriya, energy.
It is a mental property and the sixth limb of the Noble Eightfold Path, there called samma-vayama, right effort.
The life of the Buddha clearly reveals that he was never subjected to moral or spiritual fatigue.
From the hour of his enlightenment to the end of his life, he strove tirelessly to elevate mankind, regardless of the bodily fatigue involved, and oblivious to the many obstacles and handicaps that hampered his way.
He never relaxed in his exertion for the common weal.
Though physically he was not always fit, mentally he was ever vigilant and energetic.
Of him it is said:
Buddhism is for the sincerely zealous, strong and firm in purpose, and not for the indolent.
The Buddha has not proclaimed himself a savior willing and able to take upon himself the evil of mankind.
On the contrary, he declares that each person has to bear the burden of his ill deeds.
In the words of the Buddha, each individual has himself to put forth the necessary effort and work out his own deliverance with diligence.
The Buddha is only a path-revealer and not a savior who endeavors to save 'souls' by means of a revealed religion.
The idea that another raises a man from lower to higher levels of life, and ultimately rescues him, tends to make a man indolent and weak, supine and foolish.
Others may lend us a helping hand indirectly, but deliverance from suffering must be wrought out and fashioned by each one for himself upon the anvil of his own actions.
“Be ye islands unto yourselves, be ye your own refuge.” Thus did the Master exhort his followers to acquire self-reliance.
A follower of the Buddha should not under any circumstances relinquish hope and effort; for the Buddha was one who never gave up hope and courage even as a Bodhisatta.
As an aspirant for Buddhahood, he had as his motto the following inspiring words: ma nivatta, abhikkhama — “Falter not; advance.” The man who is mindful and cultivates keen investigation should next put forth the necessary effort to fight his way out.
The function of energy is four-fold: the effort to eradicate evils that have arisen in the mind; the effort to prevent the arising of unarisen evil; the effort to develop unarisen good; the effort to promote the further growth of good already arisen.
“Just,” says the Vitakka Santhana Suttanta of the Majjhima Nikaya, “as a competent carpenter or carpenter's apprentice with a slender pin will knock out, remove and dispose of a thicker one, so also, when through dwelling on some idea that has come to him, evil, unsalutary considerations connected with desire, hate, and delusion arise in the monk, then he should engender in his mind an idea other than that former idea and connected with salutary things, whereupon the evil unsalutary considerations will disappear, and with their disappearing his mind will become settled, subdued, unified, concentrated.
Thus the path of purification is impossible for an indolent person.
The aspirant for enlightenment should possess unflinching energy coupled with fixed determination.
Enlightenment and deliverance lie absolutely and entirely in his own hands.
“Man must himself by his own resolute efforts rise and make his way to the portals of liberty, and it is always, in every moment, in his power so to do.
Neither are those portals locked and the key in possession of someone else from whom it must be obtained by prayer and entreaty.
That door is free of all bolts and bars save those the man himself has made.
By precept and example, the Buddha was an exponent of the strenuous life.
Hear these words of the Buddha: “The idler who does not strive, who, though young and strong, is full of sloth, who is weak in resolution, that lazy and idle man will not find the way to wisdom, the way to enlightenment.
Following in the footsteps of the Buddha the disciple thinks: “Though only my skin, sinews and bones remain, and my blood and flesh dry up and wither away, yet never will I give up my quest and swerve from the path of rectitude and enlightenment.
The fourth enlightenment factor is piti, rapture or happiness.
This, too, is a mental property and is a quality which suffuses both the body and mind.
The man lacking in this quality cannot proceed along the path to enlightenment.
There will arise in him a sullen indifference to the dhamma, an aversion to the practice of meditation, and morbid manifestations.
It is, therefore, very necessary that a man striving to attain enlightenment and final deliverance from the fetters of samsara, that repeated wandering, should endeavor to cultivate the all-important factor of happiness.
No one can bestow on another the gift of happiness; each one has to build it up by effort, reflection, and concentrated activity.
As happiness is a thing of the mind it should be sought not in external and material things though they may in a small way be instrumental.
Contentment is a characteristic of the really happy individual.
The ordinary worldling seems to think that it is difficult to cultivate and develop contentment; but by dint of courage, determination, systematic attention, and thought about the things one meets with in everyday life, by controlling one's evil inclinations, and by curbing the impulses —  the sudden tendencies to act without reflection — one can keep the mind from being soiled and experience happiness through contentment.
In man's mind arise conflicts of diverse kinds, and if these conflicts are to be controlled, while still not eliminated, man must give less rein to inclinations and longings — in other words, he must cultivate contentment.
Hard it is to give up what lures and holds us in thrall; and hard it is to exorcise the evil spirits that haunt the human heart in the shape of ugly and unwholesome thoughts.
These evils are the manifestations of lust, hate, and delusion.
Until one attains to the very crest of purity and peace by constant training of the mind one cannot defeat these hosts completely.
The mere abandoning of outward things, fasting, bathing in rivers and hot springs, and so forth, these do not tend to purify a man, these things do not make a man happy, holy, and harmless.
Hence the need to develop the Buddha's path of purification: morality, meditation and insight.
When discussing happiness, in the context of sambojjhangas, we must bear in mind the vast difference between pleasure and happiness.
Pleasure — pleasant feeling — is something very momentary and fleeting.
Is it wrong to say that pleasant feelings are the prelude to pain?
What people hug in great glee this moment, turns to be a source of pain in the next moment.
“The desired is no longer there when the outstretched hand would grasp it, or, being there and grasped, it vanishes like a flake of snow.
In the words of Robert Burns:
Seeing a form, hearing a sound, perceiving an odor, tasting a flavor, feeling some tangible thing, cognizing an idea, people are moved; and from those sense objects and mental objects they experience a certain degree of pleasure.
But it is all a passing show of phenomena.
Unlike the animal whose sole purpose is to derive a feeling of pleasure from any source, at any cost, man should endeavor to gain real piti or happiness.
Real happiness or rapture comes not through grasping or clinging to things animate or inanimate but by giving up.
It is the detached attitude toward the world that brings about true happiness.
The Satipatthana Sutta, the Discourse on the Foundations of Mindfulness, speaks of pleasant worldly feeling and pleasant unworldly feeling.
Niramisa sukha is far superior to samisasukha.
Once the Buddha did not receive even a single morsel of food when he went on his alms round, and an intruder remarked that the Master was apparently afflicted with hunger.
Thereupon the Supreme Buddha breathed forth the following verse:
Unalloyed joy comes to a man who ponders thus: “Others may harm, but I will become harmless; others may slay living beings, but I will become a non-slayer; others may live unchaste, but I will live pure.
Others may utter falsehood; I, however, will speak the truth.
Others may slander, talk harshly, indulge in gossip, but I will talk only words that promote concord, harmless words agreeable to the ear, full of love, heart-pleasing, courteous, worthy of being borne in mind, timely, fit and to the point.
Others may be covetous; I will not covet.
Energetic, steeped in modesty of heart, unswerving as regards truth and rectitude, peaceful, honest, contented, generous, and truthful in all things will I be.” Thus conducive to full realization, perfect wisdom, to Nibbana is this fourth enlightenment factor piti, happiness.
Passaddhi — calm or tranquility — is the fifth factor of enlightenment.
Passaddhi is two-fold.
Kaya passaddhi is calm of body.
Kaya here means all the mental properties rather than the physical body; in other words, calm of the aggregates of feeling, perception, and the volitional activities or conformations.
Citta passaddhi is the calm of the mind — that is, the aggregate of consciousness.
Passaddhi is compared to the happy experience of a weary walker who sits down under a tree in a shade, or the cooling of a hot place by rain.
Hard it is to tranquillize the mind; it trembles and it is unsteady, difficult to guard and hold back; it quivers like a fish taken from its watery home and thrown on the dry ground.
It wanders at will.
Such is the nature of this ultra-subtle mind.
It is systematic reflection that helps the aspirant for enlightenment to quieten the fickle mind.
Unless a man cultivates tranquility of mind, concentration cannot be successfully developed.
A tranquillized mind keeps away all superficialities and futilities.
Many a man today thinks that freedom and unrestraint are synonyms and that the taming of the self is a hindrance to self-development.
In the teaching of the Buddha, however, it is quite different.
The self must be subdued and tamed on right lines if it is to become truly well.
The Tathagata, the Tamed, teaches the Dhamma for the purpose of taming the human heart.
It is only when the mind is tranquillized and is kept to the right road of orderly progress that it becomes useful for the individual possessor of it and for society.
A disorderly mind is a liability both to the owner of it and for others.
All the havoc wrought in the world is wrought by men who have not learned the way of mental calm, balance, and poise.
Calmness is not weakness.
The calm attitude at all times shows a man of culture.
It is not too hard a task for a man to be calm when all things around him are favorable.
But to be composed in mind in the midst of unfavorable circumstances is hard indeed, and it is this difficult quality that is worth achieving; for by such control one builds up strength of character.
The most deceptive thing in the world is to imagine that they alone are strong who are noisy, or that they alone possess power who are fussily busy.
The man who cultivates calm of the mind does not get upset, confused or excited when confronted with the eight vicissitudes of the world.
He endeavors to see the rise and fall of all things conditioned, how things come into being and pass away.
Free from anxiety and restlessness he will see the fragility of the fragile.
A story in our books tells us how when a mother was asked why she did not lament and feel pain over the death of her beloved son, said: “Uninvited he came, uninvited he passed away, as he came so he went, what use is there in lamenting, weeping, and wailing?” Such is the advantage of a tranquillized mind.
It is unshaken by loss or gain, blame and praise, and undisturbed by adversity.
This frame of mind is brought about by viewing the sentient world in its proper perspective.
Thus calm or passaddhi leads man to enlightenment and deliverance from suffering.
The sixth enlightenment factor is samadhi, concentration.
It is only the tranquillized mind that can easily concentrate on a subject of meditation.
The calm concentrated mind sees things as they really are.
The unified mind brings the five hindrances under subjugation.
Concentration is the intensified steadiness of the mind comparable to an unflickering flame of a lamp in a windless place.
It is concentration that fixes the mind aright and causes it to be unmoved and undisturbed.
Correct practice of samadhi maintains the mind and the mental properties in a state of balance like a steady hand holding a pair of scales.
Right concentration dispels passions that disturb the mind, and brings purity and placidity of mind.
The concentrated mind is not distracted by sense objects; concentration of the highest type cannot be disturbed under the most adverse circumstances.
One who is intent on samadhi should develop a love of virtue, sila, for it is virtue that nourishes mental life, and makes it coherent and calm, equable and full of rich content.
The unrestrained mind dissipates itself in frivolous activity.
Many are the impediments that confront a yogi, an aspirant for enlightenment, but there are five particular hindrances that hinder concentrative thought, samadhi, and obstruct the way to deliverance.
In the teaching of the Buddha they are known as pañca nivarana, the five hindrances.
The Pali term nivarana denotes that which hinders or obstructs mental development.
They are called hindrances because they completely close in, cut off and obstruct.
They close the doors to deliverance.
The five hindrances are:
Kamacchanda or sensual desires or intense thirst for either possessions or the satisfaction of base desires, is the first that binds man to samsara, repeated wandering, and closes the door to final deliverance.
What is sensuality?
Where does this craving arise and take root?
According to the Discourse on the Foundations of Mindfulness, “where there is the delightful and the pleasurable, there this craving arises and takes root.” Forms, sounds, smell, taste, bodily contacts, and ideas are delightful and pleasurable; there this craving arises and takes root.
Craving when obstructed by some cause is transformed to frustration and wrath.
As the Dhammapada says:
The next hindrance is vyapada, ill-will, hatred, or aversion.
Man naturally revolts against the unpleasant and the disagreeable, and also is depressed by them.
To be separated from the loved is painful, and equally painful is the union with the loathed.
Even a disagreeable dish, an unpleasant drink, an unlovely demeanor, and a hundred other trifles, may cause indignation.
It is wrong thinking, unsystematic reflection, that brings about hatred.
Hatred on the other hand breeds hatred and clouds the vision; it distorts the entire mind and its properties and thus hinders awakening to truth, blocks the way to freedom.
This lust and hatred based on ignorance, the crowning corruption of all our madness, indeed are the root causes of strife and dissension between man and man and nation and nation.
The third hindrance consists of a pair of evils, thina and middha.
Thina is lassitude or morbid state of the mind, and middha is a morbid state of the mental properties.
Thinamiddha, as some are inclined to think, is certainly not sluggishness of the body; for even the arahats, the perfect ones, who are free from this pair of evils, also experience bodily fatigue.
Thinamiddha retards mental development; under its influence mind is inert like butter too stiff to spread or like molasses sticking to a spoon.
Laxity is a dangerous enemy of mental development.
Laxity leads to greater laxity until finally there arises a state of callous indifference.
This flabbiness of character is a fatal block to righteousness and freedom.
It is through viriya or mental effort that one overcomes this pair of evils.
The fourth hindrance also comprises twin drawbacks: uddhacca and kukkucca, restlessness and brooding, or flurry and worry.
As a rule, anyone who commits evil is mentally excited and restless; the guilty and the impatient suffer from this hindrance.
The minds of men who are restless and unstable are like flustered bees in a shaken hive.
This mental agitation impedes meditation and blocks the upward path.
Equally baneful is mental worry.
Often people repent over the evil actions they have committed.
This is not praised by the Buddha; for it is useless to cry over spilt milk.
Instead of brooding over such shortcomings one should endeavor not to repeat such unwholesome deeds.
There are others who worry over the good deeds omitted and duties left undone.
This, too, serves no purpose.
It is as futile as to ask the further bank of a river to come over that we may get to the other side.
Instead of uselessly worrying over what good one has failed to do, one should endeavor to perform wholesome deeds.
This mental unsteadiness also hinders mental progress.
The fifth and the last hindrance is vicikiccha, doubt.
The Pali term vi + cikiccha literally means medicineless.
One who suffers from perplexity is really suffering from a dire disease, and until and unless one sheds one's doubts one will continue to suffer from it.
So long as man is subject to this mental itching, so long will he continue to take a cynical view of things which is most detrimental to mental development.
The commentators explain this hindrance as the inability to decide anything definitely; it also comprises doubt with regard to the possibility of attaining the jhanas, concentrative thought.
In this connection, one may add that even non-Buddhists and yogis who are not concerned with the Buddha-Dhamma and the Sangha at all, can inhibit doubt and gain the jhanas.
The yogi who attains the jhanas inhibits all five hindrances by the five jhanangas, characteristics or factors of jhanas; kamacchanda is inhibited by ekaggata; vyapada by piti; thinamiddha by vitakka; uddhacca-kukkucca by sukha and vicikiccha by vicara.
The attainment of jhanas, however, is not the end aimed at.
Jhanas should be made to lead to vipassana, intuitional insight.
It is through insight that the yogi eradicates the latent corruptions and attains perfect purity.
So long as impurities or taints exist in man's mind latent, so long will the arising of papa in him continue.
The practitioner of jhana whose purpose is to attain vipassana, commits no ill action because the hindrances are inhibited, but he has the impurities latent in his make-up and, therefore, he is not yet in a state of absolute security.
But the Arahat, the perfect one, wipes out all the latent impurities with their rootlets and brings this repetitive wandering, samsara, to a standstill.
He is one whose samsara is indubitably ended; for by him the noble life has been perfected and the task done.
For him there is no more rebirth.
A sincere student who is bent on deep study, cuts himself off from sense attractions and, retiring to a congenial atmosphere, holds fast to his studies.
Thus steering through all disturbing factors he attains success in his examinations.
In the same way, seated in a cloister-cell or some other suitable place “far from the madding crowd's ignoble strife,” the yogi, the meditator, fixes his mind on a subject of meditation and by struggle and unceasing effort inhibits the five hindrances, and washing out the impurities of his mind-flux, gradually reaches the first, the second, the third and the fourth jhana.
Then by the power of samadhi, concentrative thought, thus won, he turns his mind to the understanding of reality in the highest sense.
It is at this stage that the yogi cultivates vipassana, intuitional insight.
It is through vipassana that one understands the real nature of all component and conditioned things.
Vipassana aids one to see things as they truly are.
One sees truth face to face and comprehends that all tones are just variations struck on the one chord that runs through all life — the chord which is made up of anicca, dukkha and anatta: impermanence, sorrow, and soullessness.
The yogi gains insight into the true nature of the world he has clung to for so long.
He breaks through the egg shell of ignorance to the Hypercosmic.
With that final catharsis he reaches the state where dawns for him the Light of Nibbana, the Calm beyond words, the unshakable deliverance of the mind, and the world holds nothing more for him.
Says the Dhammapada, “To the bhikkhu who has retired to a secluded spot, whose mind is calmed, and who clearly discerns the dhamma, there comes unalloyed joy and happiness transcending that of humans.
The seventh and the last factor of enlightenment is upekkha, equanimity.
In the Abhidhamma, upekkha is indicated by the term tatramajjhattata, neutrality.
It is mental equipoise and not hedonic indifference.
Equanimity is the result of a calm concentrative mind.
It is hard, indeed, to be undisturbed when touched by the vicissitudes of life, but the man who cultivates this difficult quality of equanimity is not upset.
Amidst the welter of experience — gain and loss, good-repute and ill-repute, praise and censure, pain and happiness — he never wavers.
He is firm as a solid rock.
Of course, this is the attitude of the Arahat, the perfect one.
Of him it is said: “Truly the good give up longing for everything.
The good prattle not with thoughts of craving.
Touched by happiness or by pain, the wise show neither elation nor depression.
Refraining from intoxicants and becoming heedful, establishing themselves in patience and purity, the wise train their minds; it is through such training that a quiet mind is achieved.
Can we also achieve it?
Lord Horder answers the question thus: “'Yes.' But how?
Well, not by doing 'some great thing.' 'Why were the saints saints?' someone asked.
And the answer came: 'Because they were cheerful when it was difficult to be cheerful and patient when it was difficult to be patient.
They pushed on when they wanted to stand still, and kept silent when they wanted to talk.' That was all.
So simple, but so difficult.
A matter of mental hygiene… The poet says:
Mention is made in our books of four wrong paths.
The path of greed, of hate, of cowardice, of delusion.
People commit evil being enticed along one or more of these wrong paths, but the man who has reached perfect neutrality through the cultivation of equanimity always avoids such wrong paths.
His serene neutrality enables him to see all beings impartially.
A certain understanding of the working of kamma, and how kamma comes into fruition is very necessary for one who is genuinely bent on cultivating equanimity.
In the light of kamma one will be able to have a detached attitude toward all beings, nay even inanimate things.
The proximate cause of equanimity is the understanding that all beings are the result of their actions.
Santideva writes in Bodhicaryavatara:
I have here made an attempt to give a glimpse of the seven enlightenment factors, expounded over years ago by the Supreme Buddha, for the attaining of full realization and perfect wisdom, of Nibbana, the Deathless.
The cultivation or the neglect of these factors of enlightenment is left to each one of us.
With the aid of the teaching of the Buddha each one of us has the power to detect and destroy the cause of suffering.
Each one individually can put forth the necessary effort to work out his deliverance.
The Buddha has taught us the way to know life as it is, and has furnished the directions for such research by each of us individually.
Therefore, we owe it to ourselves to find out for ourselves the truth about life and to make the best of it.
We cannot say justifiably that we do not know how to proceed.
There is nothing vague in the teaching of the Buddha.
All the necessary indications are clear as clear could be.
Buddhism from beginning to end is open to all those who have eyes to see, and minds to understand.
“So clear is his teaching that it can never be misunderstood.” The only thing necessary on our part for the full realization of the truth is firm determination, endeavor and earnestness to study and apply the teaching, each working it out for himself, to the best of his ability.
The dhamma yet beckons the weary pilgrim to the happy haven of Nibbana's security and peace.
Let us, therefore, cultivate the seven enlightenment factors with zest and unflagging devotion, and advance:
— Psalms of the Brethren 
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
Each time you choose one course of action over another, you're making a wager as to the consequences of your choice.
This is especially true if the choice is between something easy that promises pleasant short-term rewards, and something hard that promises great rewards but only after a long time.
Will the harder choice be worth the effort?
Will the easier one be irresponsible in the long run?
As a person embedded in time, there's no way you can know for sure.
To begin with, there are the particulars of your own personal future: Will you or those you love live long enough to experience the results of your choices?
Will disaster interfere to wipe out everything you've done?
Then there are the larger uncertainties of life in general: Do we even have choices in our actions, or are all our choices predetermined by some past or outside power beyond our control?
If we do have choices, is it worthwhile to struggle over difficult ones?
Do they really matter?
And even if our choices do matter, how far into the future should we calculate the consequences?
Do they shape only this life, or can they shape lives after death?
Arguments based on logic or reason have never been able to settle these issues conclusively, the world's great religions don't agree on their answers, and the empirical sciences have no way of answering these questions at all.
Yet we all keep having to grapple with these questions.
We don't leave it at, “I don't know,” and refuse to entertain them, for even the refusal to think about these things is a wager: that ultimately they won't matter.
The Buddha taught, however, that they do matter a great deal, and that awakening — in going beyond the dimensions of space and time — gives perspective on how choices operate within those dimensions.
You see that choices are real, that they do make a difference, and that the consequences of your choices can shape not only this life but also many lifetimes in the future — as long as the mind still has the craving that leads to rebirth after death.
Prior to awakening, you can't know these things for sure, but as the Buddha states, if you want to gain awakening and to minimize suffering in the meantime, it's wisest to assume these principles as working hypotheses.
Of course, that's taking the Buddha at his word — which as long as you haven't gained awakening, is a wager, too.
The purpose of this small book on the Buddha's teachings about rebirth is to show why, as you engage repeatedly in the wagers of action, the wisest course is to place your bets with him.
Rebirth has always been a central teaching in the Buddhist tradition.
The earliest records in the Pali Canon indicate that the Buddha, prior to his awakening, searched for a happiness not subject to the vagaries of repeated birth, aging, illness, and death.
One of the reasons he left his early teachers was because he recognized that their teachings led, not to the goal he sought, but to rebirth on a refined level.
On the night of his awakening, two of the three knowledges leading to his release from suffering focused on the topic of rebirth.
The first showed his own many previous lives; the second, depicting the general pattern of beings dying and being reborn throughout the cosmos, showed the connection between rebirth and karma, or action.
When he did finally attain release from suffering, he recognized that he had achieved his goal because he had touched a dimension that not only was free from birth, but also had freed him from ever being reborn again.
After he had attained release, his new-found freedom from rebirth was the first realization that occurred spontaneously to his mind.
When teaching the path to awakening to others, he defined the four stages of awakening achieved by the path in terms of how many rebirths remained for those who reached them: up to seven for those reaching the first stage; one return to the human world for those reaching the second; rebirth followed by total liberation in the Pure Abodes for those reaching the third; and no rebirth for those reaching the fourth.
On occasion, when one of his disciples who had not reached full awakening passed away, he would comment on the disciple's rebirth — as when Anathapindika the householder, after his passing, appeared to the Buddha as a heavenly being.
When any of the Buddha's fully awakened disciples passed away, he would state that one of the amazing features of their passing was that their consciousness could no longer be found in the cosmos.
Rebirth, he said, happened to those who still had clinging, but not to those who didn't.
And one of his own amazing attainments as Buddha, he said, was that after the end of this life, the world would see him no more.
When discussing more mundane topics, such as the rewards of generosity and virtue, he would cite the rewards they brought not only in this life but also in future ones.
Even in cases where he was asked specifically to confine his discussion to the present life, he would end the discussion by referring to the rewards of these skillful actions after death.
So the theme of rebirth is woven inextricably throughout the Buddha's teachings.
And freedom from rebirth has been a central feature of the Buddhist goal from the very beginning of the tradition.
All of the various Buddhist religions that later developed in Asia, despite their other differences, were unanimous in teaching rebirth.
Even those that didn't aim at putting an end to rebirth still taught rebirth as a fact.
Yet as these Buddhist religions have come to the West, they have run into a barrier from modern Western culture: Of all the Buddha's teachings, rebirth has been one of the hardest for modern Westerners to accept.
Part of this resistance comes from the fact that none of the dominant world-views of Western culture, religious or materialistic, contain anything corresponding to the idea of repeated rebirth.
Plato taught it, but — aside from an esoteric fringe — few in the modern West have treated this side of his teaching as anything more than a myth.
For people who have felt burned or repelled by the faith demands of Western religion, there is the added barrier that the teaching on rebirth is something that — for the unawakened — has to be taken on faith.
They would prefer a Buddhism that makes no faith demands, focusing its attention solely on the benefits it can bring in this life.
So for many Westerners who have profited from the Buddha's psychological insights and meditational tools, the question arises: Can we strip the Buddha's teachings of any mention of rebirth and still get the full benefits of what he had to teach?
In other words, can we drop the Buddha's worldview while keeping his psychology and still realize everything it has to offer?
We in the West have done this sort of thing before.
In the late eighteenth and early nineteenth centuries, many European Romantics and American Transcendentalists found that they couldn't accept the worldview of the Bible because they were born in an era of new scientific discoveries — of geological deep time and astronomical deep space — that called the biblical worldview into question.
Nevertheless, they valued many of the psychological teachings the Bible contained.
So they developed an historical approach to the Bible, stating that its worldview may have fit in with the cultural presuppositions of the time when it was written, but that that worldview had to be discarded as science advanced.
Only then could the Bible's psychological insights survive in the modern world.
And not only survive: actually develop to a higher level.
By dropping its out-of-date worldview and leaving cosmology to the scientists, the Judeo-Christian tradition could focus more precisely and effectively on the proper sphere of all religions: the development of the human psyche.
This approach formed the basis of liberal Christianity and Reform Judaism.
Inspired by this approach, many modern Buddhist teachers have argued that the teaching on rebirth should be treated in the same way.
In their eyes, rebirth was simply a cultural presupposition of the Buddha's time and — because it no longer fits in with our cultural presuppositions and scientific beliefs — the time has come to discard it so as to help the Buddhist tradition advance.
To support their argument, these teachers cite the works of historical scholars who state that everyone in India in the Buddha's time believed in the idea of rebirth and in the metaphysical assumptions about karma and personal identity on which the idea is based: that there's something within each of us that survives the death of the body, and that our actions shape where that “something” will be reborn.
Thus, they argue, the Buddha, in teaching karma and rebirth, was simply going along with the crowd.
A stronger version of this argument holds that the teaching on rebirth was not merely irrelevant to the Buddha's essential message; it was actually antithetical.
Just as all great thinkers have their lapses, he — or whoever, in compiling the Pali Canon, put the teaching on rebirth into his mouth — didn't realize that his culture's assumptions about karma, rebirth, and personal identity were at odds with his central teachings on not-self and the four noble truths.
Now that we no longer hold to those assumptions — and have replaced them with more reliable, scientific notions of human action and the metaphysics of personal identity — we're in a better position to drop the idea of rebirth and reshape the Buddhist tradition so that it focuses more clearly on the Buddha's central insight and the main purpose of his teaching: the ending of suffering in the here-and-now.
The irony of this argument is that, when we check it against the actual historical evidence, we find that it has everything backwards.
The actual facts are these:
) The idea of rebirth was far from universally accepted in India during the Buddha's time.
Some schools of thought actively rejected it; others affirmed it.
And thinkers on both sides offered widely differing metaphysical ideas about personal identity in support of their positions.
In other words, even those who agreed that rebirth did or didn't happen disagreed as to what was or wasn't reborn.
At the same time, those who did agree in teaching rebirth disagreed on the role played by karma, or action, in the process of rebirth.
Some maintained that action influenced the course of one's lives after death; others, that it played no role at all.
) Thus the Buddha, in teaching rebirth and its relation to karma, was actually addressing one of the hot topics of the time.
Because he didn't always take up controversial topics, he must have seen that the issue passed the criterion he set for which topics he would address: that it be conducive to putting an end to suffering.
And, in fact, he made rebirth an integral part of his explanation of mundane right view — the level of right view that provides an understanding of the powers and consequences of human action that allows for the possibility that human action can put an end to suffering.
) He also made rebirth an integral part of his explanation of the four noble truths and the understanding of causality — dependent co-arising — on which those truths are based.
Because dependent co-arising contains many feedback loops — in which one factor reproduces the factors that feed it — it's a self-sustaining process with the potential to maintain itself indefinitely.
This is why birth has the potential to keep repeating as rebirth until something is actively done to cut the feedback loops that keep the process going.
At the same time, because dependent co-arising operates on many scales — from the micro level of events in the mind, to the macro level of lifetimes across time in the cosmos — it shows how micro events can lead to rebirth on the macro scale, and, conversely, how the practice of training the mind can put an end to all forms of suffering — including rebirth — on every level.
What this means in practice is that no matter how much you observe the events of dependent co-arising in the present moment, if you don't appreciate their potential to sustain one another indefinitely, you don't fully comprehend them.
And if you don't fully comprehend them, you can't gain full release from them.
) In discussing rebirth, the Buddha differed from the other schools of the time in that he didn't base his position on a metaphysical view of personal identity — that is, on defining what it is that gets reborn.
By placing rebirth in the context of dependent co-arising, he was presenting it in a phenomenological context — i.e., one that focused on phenomena as they can be directly experienced and that refused to take a stand on whether there is a reality of “things” underlying them.
His purpose in taking this sort of position was pragmatic and strategic: By focusing on events and processes as they're directly experienced, you can redirect them — through the power of attention and intention — away from the suffering they normally cause and toward a deathless happiness.
In this way, the Buddha's approach, instead of being metaphysical, bears similarities to modern schools of philosophy — phenomenology and pragmatism — that avoid getting involved in metaphysical assumptions about a reality behind direct experience.
) The fact that the Buddha suggested that his contemporaries drop their metaphysical assumptions about personal identity if they wanted to practice the path suggests that he would make the same suggestion to people in the modern world.
To get the most out of his teachings, it's necessary to recognize that we have metaphysical assumptions about personal identity and the world; and that — unless we put them aside — those assumptions will prevent us from looking deeply enough at immediate experience in the terms described in dependent co-arising.
To see experience in terms of dependent co-arising means identifying the mental events and choices that lead to rebirth and other forms of suffering, and developing the knowledge that can put them to an end.
In other words, part of the practice even today lies in confirming that the Buddha was right about the connection between karma and rebirth, and that his rightness was timeless: These teachings are integral to the four noble truths, and in particular to the path of practice leading to the end of suffering.
To discard these teachings won't help Buddhism to advance.
It will prevent the teachings from fulfilling their purpose.
Although it's possible to gain some benefit from the Buddha's teachings without accepting what he said about rebirth, if we want to get the most out of his teachings, we owe it to ourselves to give his statements on rebirth a fair hearing.
Because rebirth is such an important working hypothesis in following the path all the way to the end of suffering, and because misinformation on these points is so widespread, it's necessary to discuss the Buddha's actual teachings, and their context, in some detail.
In addition, because Buddhist thinkers in the centuries after the Buddha's passing often abandoned the Buddha's position on point number four — they let themselves get drawn into metaphysical discussions about what does or doesn't take birth — we have to focus on the early Pali discourses to gain an accurate picture of the Buddha's own position on these issues.
It's hard to understand why modern scholars keep repeating the idea that everyone in India during the Buddha's time believed in rebirth.
Actually, the Pali discourses provide clear evidence to the contrary, evidence that has been available in Western languages for more than a century.
The Buddha frequently referred to two extremes of wrong view that blocked progress on the path: eternalism and annihilationism.
“Annihilationism” is the term he used to describe those who denied rebirth.
Apparently he didn't invent the term himself, as MN reports that other teachers sometimes accused him of being an annihilationist as well.
Other passages in the Canon depict some of the more colorful ways in which annihilationism was taught in his time.
In particular, they mention two people who were famous for their annihilationist views.
One was Ajita Kesakambalin, the leader of a materialist sect.
DN reports him saying this:
“'There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing sacrificed.
There is no fruit or result of good or bad actions.
There is no this world, no next world, no mother, no father, no spontaneously reborn beings; no contemplatives or brahmans who, faring rightly and practicing rightly, proclaim this world and the next after having directly known and realized it for themselves.
“'A person is a composite of four primary elements.
At death, the earth returns to and merges with the earth-substance.
The fire returns to and merges with the external fire-substance.
The liquid returns to and merges with the external liquid-substance.
The wind returns to and merges with the external wind-substance.
The sense-faculties scatter into space.
Four men, with the bier as the fifth, carry the corpse.
Its eulogies are sounded only as far as the charnel ground.
The bones turn pigeon-colored.
The offerings end in ashes.
Generosity is taught by idiots.
The words of those who speak of existence after death are false, empty chatter.
With the breakup of the body, the wise and the foolish alike are annihilated, destroyed.
They do not exist after death.'
Another famous annihilationist was a prince named Payasi.
DN states that he held a materialist view similar to Ajita Kesakambalin, and that he used his power to execute criminals as an opportunity to conduct gruesome, quasi-scientific experiments to test whether any part of a human being survived death.
He reported these experiments to one of the Buddha's followers, a monk named Kumara Kassapa, and two of the experiments were these:
“There is the case, Master Kassapa, where my men — having caught a thief, a wrong-doer — present him to me, 'Here is a thief, a wrong-doer for you, lord.
Decree for him whatever punishment you wish.' And I say, 'Very well, then, masters, having placed this man while still alive in a clay jar, having sealed the mouth, having covered it with a damp skin, having plastered it with a thick layer of damp clay, having set it in a furnace, light the fire.'
“They — responding, 'Very well,' to me — having placed the man while still alive in a clay jar, having sealed the mouth, having covered it with a damp skin, having plastered it with a thick layer of damp clay, having set it in a furnace, light the fire.
When we know, 'The man has died,' then — removing the jar, breaking through the seal, opening the mouth — we look carefully, 'Maybe we'll see his soul escaping.' But we don't see his soul escaping…'
“There is the case, Master Kassapa, where my men — having caught a thief, a wrong-doer — present him to me, 'Here is a thief, a wrong-doer for you, lord.
Decree for him whatever punishment you wish.' And I say, 'Very well, then, masters, having weighed this man with a scale while still alive, having strangled him to death with a bowstring, weigh him with the scale again.'
“They — responding, 'Very well,' to me — having weighed the man with a scale while still alive, having strangled him to death with a bowstring, weigh him with the scale again.
When he is alive, he is lighter, more flexible, and more malleable.
But when he has died, he is heavier, stiffer, and less malleable.
“This is the reason, Master Kassapa, for which I believe, 'There is no other world, there are no spontaneously reborn beings, there is no fruit or result of good or bad actions.'
DN gives a more comprehensive picture of annihilationist views current at the time, classifying them by how they define the self annihilated at death.
There were seven types in all.
Three of them defined the self as a body: either the physical body composed of the four material elements, a divine physical body, or an astral body.
The view espoused by Ajita Kesakambalin and Prince Payasi would fall under the first of the three.
Four other annihilationist views, however, defined the self as formless: experiencing the dimension of infinite space, of infinite consciousness, of nothingness, or of neither perception nor non-perception.
In each of the seven cases, these doctrines state that the self, however defined, perishes and is annihilated at death.
As for the non-Buddhist schools that affirmed the idea of rebirth, the Pali Canon explicitly names at least four: Brahmans, Jains, and two contemplative schools — one led by Makkhali Gosala, and the other by Pakudha Kaccayana.
We know from other sources that the Jains and some Brahmans affirmed that action played a role in shaping rebirth; the Canon shows, however, that the other two teachers denied that action played any role in rebirth at all.
” 'Though one might think, “Through this morality, this practice, this austerity, or this holy life I will ripen unripened karma and eliminate ripened karma whenever touched by it” — that is impossible.
Pleasure and pain are measured out; the wandering-on is fixed in its limits.
There is no shortening or lengthening, no accelerating or decelerating.
Just as a ball of string, when thrown, comes to its end simply by unwinding, in the same way, having transmigrated and wandered on, the wise and the foolish alike will put an end to pain.'
” 'There are these seven substances — unmade, irreducible, uncreated, without a creator, barren, stable as a mountain-peak, standing firm like a pillar — that do not alter, do not change, do not interfere with one another, are incapable of causing one another pleasure, pain, or both pleasure and pain.
Which seven?
The earth-substance, the liquid-substance, the fire-substance, the wind-substance, pleasure, pain, and the soul as the seventh.
These are the seven substances — unmade, irreducible, uncreated, without a creator, barren, stable as a mountain-peak, standing firm like a pillar — that do not alter, do not change, do not interfere with one another, and are incapable of causing one another pleasure, pain, or both pleasure and pain.'
In addition to these named exponents of rebirth, DN provides an overview of the different types of views it attributes to “eternalists” and “partial eternalists.” Eternalists, like Pakudha Kaccayana, maintained that the soul was not changed in the least as it went through the round of rebirth.
Partial eternalists held that some souls changed their position in the cosmos — and thus their experience of pleasure and pain as they went through different lives — whereas others never changed their position in the cosmos at all.
Although the Pali Canon doesn't discuss these rebirth theories in great detail, we know from other contemporary sources that the Jains and Brahmans took great pains to define what sort of self or essence was reborn — and it's likely that Makkhali Gosala and Pakudha Kaccayana did as well, for their theories of rebirth require a soul or substance in a person that takes birth after death.
The most detailed discussions of what a soul might be are the Brahmanical Upanisads, which advance many theories about what is reborn: The self becomes consciousness and leaves the body; the self is bodiless, immortal breath-energy, and is identical with Brahman, the underlying force of the cosmos; one's supreme self is an astral body that can be detected by the faculty of the mind.
The Upanisads also record many different descriptions of the soul's progress after death, the most interesting being the account in ChU V.-, which divides living beings into three classes.
Those in the most developed class gain union with Brahman after death.
Those in the intermediate class go stage by stage to the moon, on which they feed.
Then they return to earth as rain, becoming plants and then being reborn as the sort of animal that eats the plants: Those with good karma get to be eaten by human beings; those with worse karma, by lower sorts of animals.
The lowest class of beings — which includes tiny insects — suffers a fate that the Upanisad doesn't even describe.
So it's clear that when discussing rebirth, both sides of the issue felt called upon to take a stand on two issues.
The first was the nature of what a person is, and, from there, an explanation of how that person is or is not annihilated at death.
In other words, both sides assumed that they had to explain their positions by taking a stand on the metaphysics of personal identity.
The second issue — among those who accepted rebirth — was the relationship between human action and rebirth: whether the course of rebirth was affected by human action or not.
Given such a wide variety of views on both sides of these questions, it's obvious that the idea of rebirth was not an unexamined assumption in Indian culture.
It was one of the most controversial issues of the Buddha's time.
And the controversy wasn't confined only to the philosophers.
In one of his most famous discourses, the Buddha addresses the Kalamas, a skeptical group of villagers, telling them that by avoiding unskillful actions and developing a mind free from ill will, a person gains four assurances in the here-and-now.
“'If there is a world after death, if there is the fruit of actions rightly & wrongly done, then this is the basis by which, with the breakup of the body, after death, I will reappear in a good destination, a heavenly world.' This is the first assurance one acquires.
“'But if there is no world after death, if there is no fruit of actions rightly & wrongly done, then here in the present life I look after myself with ease — free from hostility, free from ill will, free from trouble.' This is the second assurance one acquires.
“'If evil is done through acting, still I have willed no evil for anyone.
Having done no evil action, from where will suffering touch me?' This is the third assurance one acquires.
“'But if no evil is done through acting, then I can assume myself pure in both respects.' This is the fourth assurance one acquires.
If the idea of rebirth — and its connection with karma — had been universally accepted in ancient India, the Buddha wouldn't have had to offer these assurances to the Kalama villagers.
This means that we can't write off the Buddha's teachings on karma and rebirth simply as an undigested remnant from his culture.
In teaching rebirth, he was consciously addressing an issue that was hotly debated, in a culture that expected him to articulate clearly his explanation for how and why rebirth did or didn't happen.
There is still the question, though, of why the Buddha felt compelled to discuss the issue of karma and rebirth.
We know that he refused to take a position on other issues that were hotly contested at the time — such as whether the cosmos was eternal or not — so what led him to take a position here?
The first part of the answer is that knowledge of rebirth formed an integral part of his awakening experience, playing a role in all three knowledges that led to his attainment of total release.
Knowledge about karma played a role in the second and third.
In the first knowledge, he recollected many eons of his own previous lives:
“When the mind was thus concentrated, purified, bright, unblemished, rid of defilement, pliant, malleable, steady, & attained to imperturbability, I directed it to the knowledge of recollecting my past lives.
I recollected my manifold past lives, i.e., one birth, two… five, ten… fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand, many eons of cosmic contraction, many eons of cosmic expansion, many eons of cosmic contraction & expansion: 'There I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure & pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I reappeared there.
There too I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure & pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I reappeared here.' Thus I remembered my manifold past lives in their modes & details.
“This was the first knowledge I attained in the first watch of the night.
Ignorance was destroyed; knowledge arose; darkness was destroyed; light arose — as happens in one who is heedful, ardent, & resolute.
In the second watch of the night, he gained his second knowledge, vision of how living beings at large are reborn after death:
“When the mind was thus concentrated, purified, bright, unblemished, rid of defilement, pliant, malleable, steady, & attained to imperturbability, I directed it to the knowledge of the passing away & reappearance of beings.
I saw — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — beings passing away & re-appearing, and I discerned how they are inferior & superior, beautiful & ugly, fortunate & unfortunate in accordance with their karma: 'These beings — who were endowed with bad conduct of body, speech, & mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong views and undertook actions under the influence of wrong views — with the breakup of the body, after death, have re-appeared in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
But these beings — who were endowed with good conduct of body, speech, & mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right views and undertook actions under the influence of right views — with the breakup of the body, after death, have re-appeared in a good destination, a heavenly world.' Thus — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — I saw beings passing away & re-appearing, and I discerned how they are inferior & superior, beautiful & ugly, fortunate & unfortunate in accordance with their karma.
“This was the second knowledge I attained in the second watch of the night.
Ignorance was destroyed; knowledge arose; darkness was destroyed; light arose — as happens in one who is heedful, ardent, & resolute.
In the third knowledge of the night, the Buddha took the insights gained from the second knowledge on the macro level of experience — concerning the role of actions and views in shaping events throughout the cosmos over time — and applied them to the micro level: events immediately present in his own mind.
He found that the same causal pattern operated on both levels — one of the most important insights leading to his awakening.
He investigated the micro level even further to discover which intentions and views might lead to an end of intentions and an end of views, and so to an end of rebirth.
And he discovered his answer in views that were expressed in terms of the four noble truths about stress:
“When the mind was thus concentrated, purified, bright, unblemished, rid of defilement, pliant, malleable, steady, & attained to imperturbability, I directed it to the knowledge of the ending of the effluents.
I discerned, as it had come to be, that 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress… These are effluents… This is the origination of effluents… This is the cessation of effluents… This is the way leading to the cessation of effluents.'
“My heart, thus knowing, thus seeing, was released from the effluent of sensuality, released from the effluent of becoming, released from the effluent of ignorance.
With release, there was the knowledge, 'Released.' I discerned that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“This was the third knowledge I attained in the third watch of the night.
Ignorance was destroyed; knowledge arose; darkness was destroyed; light arose — as happens in one who is heedful, ardent, & resolute.
In this way, the ending of birth realized through the third knowledge affirmed the truth of the first two knowledges.
By employing the right view that leads to actions that put an end to birth, the third knowledge showed that the act of intention is what fuels the process of repeated birth to begin with.
This means that knowledge about rebirth, and its connection with action, was an integral part of the knowledge that precipitated and followed his full release.
Still, the fact that his awakening included knowledge about rebirth doesn't fully explain why, when he began teaching, he addressed the topic.
After all, on his own testimony, there were many other things he learned in the course of his awakening that he didn't see fit to include in his teaching because they weren't conducive in leading his listeners to their own release.
He limited himself to teaching the four noble truths because “they are connected with the goal, relate to the rudiments of the holy life, and lead to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding”.
This suggests that he saw an intimate connection between the topic of rebirth and the four noble truths.
And it turns out that, when we examine these truths, we find that rebirth does play a prominent role in the understanding of stress that forms the first noble truth; in the understanding of the causes of stress — craving and clinging — that form the second noble truth; and in the transcendent right view that guides the path of practice to the end of stress, the fourth noble truth.
It also plays a prominent role in the mundane level of right view that provides the context for understanding the meaning and purpose of the four noble truths.
The relationship between the two levels of right view — mundane and transcendent — parallels the relationship between the first and second knowledges on the night of his awakening on the one hand, and the third knowledge on the other.
Both serve a strategic purpose.
Mundane right view, framed in terms of “beings” and “worlds,” asserts the efficacy of action: the principle that actions really do have results.
This principle opens the possibility that transcendent right view, as a guide to action, can put an end to suffering.
Transcendent right view then drops terms of “beings” and “worlds” to focus directly on the actions within the mind that cause suffering so that those actions can be abandoned.
This brings suffering to an end — at which point all views are put aside as well.
To assert the efficacy of action, mundane right view makes the point that there is such a thing as action, and that it actually engenders results.
Because the four noble truths teach that suffering and stress are the results of actions and can be brought to an end through actions, this understanding of action is necessary to explain why the four noble truths offer a realistic picture of what a human being can do to bring suffering to an end.
In a direct negation of the annihilationist view that Ajita Kesakambalin expounded, the standard definition of mundane right view states:
“There is what is given, what is offered, what is sacrificed.
There are fruits & results of good & bad actions.
There is this world & the next world.
There is mother & father.
There are spontaneously reborn beings; there are contemplatives & brahmans who, faring rightly & practicing rightly, proclaim this world & the next after having directly known & realized it for themselves.
The phrase “next world” in this passage refers to life after death.
The reference to what is given, etc., asserts that these actions actually are the results of conscious choices and do bear fruit as well-being and happiness.
The reference to contemplatives and brahmans who know both worlds is a statement of conviction: One may not know the next world on one's own, but one is convinced that there are those who have trained their minds to the point where they know it directly.
Because “contemplatives and brahmans” — in the context of this passage — are those who have successfully followed the path to awakening, and because anyone is potentially capable of doing the same, this statement of conviction functions as a working hypothesis.
You take these matters on faith until you can confirm them for yourself.
One reason the Buddha recommended conviction in rebirth as a useful working hypothesis is that, as we have noted, he had to teach that skillful human action was powerful and reliable enough to put an end to suffering; and his teaching on the consequences of skillful and unskillful action would be incomplete — and therefore indefensible — without reference to rebirth.
This is because the distinction he draws between skillful and unskillful is based on the consequences of the actions: The working-out of karma may be complex, but skillful actions always lead in the direction of happiness and well-being; unskillful actions always lead in the direction of suffering and harm.
This distinction provides not only the definition of these concepts, but also the motivation for abandoning unskillful actions and developing skillful ones in their place.
This motivation is necessary, for while people are not innately bad, they are also not innately good.
When heedless of the consequences of their actions, they behave unskillfully.
This is why, as the Buddha noted, heedfulness lies at the root of all skillfulness.
To develop skillful qualities, people need to see the dangers of unskillful behavior and the advantages of skillful behavior.
Because actions can sometimes take many lifetimes to yield their results, a complete and convincing case that unskillful actions should always be avoided, and skillful ones always developed, requires the perspective that comes only from seeing the results of actions over many lifetimes.
Of course, some of the results of actions often do appear in this lifetime:
As Ven.
Ananda was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “I say categorically, Ananda, that bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct should not be done.
“Given that the Blessed One has declared that bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct should not be done, what drawbacks can one expect when doing what should not be done?
“… One can fault oneself; observant people, on close examination, criticize one; one's bad reputation gets spread about; one dies confused; and — with the breakup of the body, after death — one reappears in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell…
“I say categorically, Ananda, that good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct should be done.
“Given that the Blessed One has declared, that good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct should be done, what rewards can one expect when doing what should be done?
“… One doesn't fault oneself; observant people, on close examination, praise one; one's good reputation gets spread about; one dies unconfused; and — with the breakup of the body, after death — one reappears in a good destination, a heavenly world.
For people who have trouble assuming a life after death, the consequences of action that are visible in this lifetime might seem enough to engender heedfulness.
However, the Buddha notes that misconduct often leads to rewards in the present life, and he heaps ridicule on those who insist that the results of good and bad actions always appear in the here-and-now.
“There are, headman, some contemplatives & brahmans who hold a doctrine & view like this: 'All those who kill living beings experience pain & distress in the here-&-now.
All those who take what is not given… who engage in illicit sex… who tell lies experience pain & distress in the here-&-now.'
“Now there is the case where a certain person is seen garlanded & adorned, freshly bathed & groomed, with hair & beard trimmed, enjoying the sensualities of women as if he were a king.
They ask about him: 'My good man, what has this man done that he has been garlanded & adorned… as if he were a king?' They answer: 'My good man, this man attacked the king's enemy and took his life.
The king, gratified with him, rewarded him.
That is why he is garlanded & adorned… as if he were a king.'
“Then there is the case where a certain person is seen bound with a stout rope with his arms pinned tightly against his back, his head shaved bald, marched to a harsh-sounding drum from street to street, crossroads to crossroads, evicted through the south gate, and beheaded to the south of the city.
They ask about him: 'My good man, what has this man done that he is bound with a stout rope… and beheaded to the south of the city?' They answer: 'My good man, this man, an enemy of the king, has taken the life of a man or a woman.
That is why the rulers, having had him seized, inflicted such a punishment upon him.'
“Now, what do you think, headman: Have you ever seen or heard of such a case?
“I have seen this, lord, have heard of it, and will hear of it.
“So, headman, when those contemplatives & brahmans who hold a doctrine & view like this say: 'All those who kill living beings experience pain & distress in the here-&-now,' do they speak truthfully or falsely?
“Falsely, lord.
“And those who babble empty falsehood: Are they moral or immoral?
“Immoral, lord.
“And those who are immoral and of evil character: Are they practicing wrongly or rightly?
“Wrongly, lord.
“And those who are practicing wrongly: Do they hold wrong view or right view?
“Wrong view, lord.
“And is it proper to place confidence in those who hold wrong view?
“No, lord.
To avoid wrong view — and the ridicule it deserves — the Buddha found it necessary to disclose his knowledge that there are lives after death.
And he had to include the perspective not just of one lifetime after death, but of many.
This is because there are cases where a person behaves unskillfully in this lifetime but gains a pleasant rebirth immediately after death, and others where a person behaves skillfully in this lifetime but, immediately after death, gains a painful rebirth.
A meditator capable of seeing only one lifetime after death, seeing cases like these, would misunderstand the consequences of action.
Only when we take into account the overall picture of the complexity of karma — and the length of time sometimes needed for actions to bear fruit — can we accept that the Buddha's categorical assertions about skillful and unskillful actions might possibly be accurate.
So, from the perspective of his awakening, the Buddha saw that the only true understanding of the consequences of actions had to include a full perspective of lives after death.
This is why he used this perspective when trying to induce a sense of heedfulness in others, so that they would be motivated to adopt the skillful path.
In some cases, this involved describing how skillful and unskillful actions bring comforts and discomforts in future human lives.
In other cases, it involved describing the pleasures of heaven and the horrors of hell.
Sometimes he would add the observation that rebirth in the lower realms is much more common than rebirth in the higher realms.
In all cases, he would state that his descriptions and observations came, not from hearsay, but his own direct experience.
He knew, however, that — until they had gained experience for themselves through the practice — his listeners could take his statements on the efficacy of action and the truth of rebirth only on faith.
But faith, for him, was not an insistence that you knew what you couldn't really know, or that you accepted unreasonable ideas.
It was an admission of ignorance about issues for which you don't have empirical proof, combined with a willingness to adopt the assumptions needed to follow a path to happiness that seems reasonably likely to offer results.
This is why the Buddha never claimed to offer proof for either the efficacy of action or for rebirth, for he knew that the evidence for these teachings lay beyond the ken of most of his listeners.
Concerning the efficacy of action, the best he could do was to point out that those who denied that present action had a role in shaping present experience — because they attributed all experience to past action, to the act of a creator god, or to total randomness — were undercutting any rationale they might claim for teaching others or for following a path of practice.
In other words, if present experience is not at least partly due to present actions, there is no way that a path of practice could have any effect.
Teaching a path of practice would be a futile activity.
The Buddha's argument here was no proof that skillful and unskillful actions actually have consequences both in the present and on into the future.
It simply pointed out the contradiction in teaching otherwise.
On the other hand, when you assume both the efficacy of action and its effect on rebirth, you are more likely to behave skillfully.
To assume otherwise makes it easy to find excuses for lying, killing, or stealing when faced with poverty or death.
And from there it's easy to extend the excuses to cover times when it's simply more convenient to lie, etc., than to not.
But if you assume that your actions have results, and those results will reverberate through many lifetimes, it's easier to stick to your principles not to lie, kill, or steal even under severe duress.
And even though you may not know whether these assumptions are true, you cannot plan an action without implicitly wagering on the issue.
This is why simply stating, “I don't know,” is not an adequate response to the questions of rebirth and the efficacy of karma.
The attitude behind it may be honest on one level, but it's dishonest in thinking that this is all that needs to be said, for it ignores the fact that you have to make assumptions about the possible results of your actions every time you act.
It's like having money: Regardless of what you do with it — spending it, investing it, or just stashing it away — you're making an implicit wager on how to get the best use of it now and into the future.
Your investment strategy can't stop with, “I don't know.” If you have any wisdom at all, you have to consider future possibilities and take your chances with what seems to be the safest and most productive use of the resources you've got.
So it is with all of our actions.
Given that we have to wager one way or another all the time on how to find happiness, the Buddha stated that it's a safer wager to assume that actions bear results that can affect not only this lifetime but also lifetimes after this than it is to assume the opposite.
In MN, for instance, he pointed out that anyone who adheres to the annihilationist view espoused by Ajita Kesakambalin would not be expected to avoid unskillful behavior, whereas those who hold to the opposite — mundane right view — would be expected to avoid unskillful behavior.
Then he said of the first group:
“With regard to this, an observant person considers thus: 'If there is no next world, then — with the breakup of the body, after death — this venerable person has made himself safe.
But if there is the next world, then this venerable person — with the breakup of the body, after death — will reappear in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
Even if we didn't speak of the next world, and there weren't the true statement of those venerable contemplatives & brahmans, this venerable person is still criticized in the here-&-now by the observant as a person of bad habits & wrong view: one who holds to a doctrine of non-existence.' If there really is a next world, then this venerable person has made a bad throw twice: in that he is criticized by the observant here-&-now, and in that — with the breakup of the body, after death — he will reappear in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
Thus this safe-bet teaching, when poorly grasped & poorly adopted by him covers one side, and leaves behind the possibility of the skillful.
As for the second group — those who hold to mundane right view and act on it — he said this:
“With regard to this, an observant person considers thus: 'If there is the next world, then this venerable person — with the breakup of the body, after death — will reappear in a good destination, a heavenly world.
Even if we didn't speak of the next world, and there weren't the true statement of those venerable contemplatives & brahmans, this venerable person is still praised in the here-&-now by the observant as a person of good habits & right view: one who holds to a doctrine of existence.' If there really is a next world, then this venerable person has made a good throw twice, in that he is praised by the observant here-&-now, and in that — with the breakup of the body, after death — he will reappear in a good destination, a heavenly world.
Thus this safe-bet teaching, when well grasped & well adopted by him, covers both sides and leaves behind the possibility of the unskillful.
These arguments don't prove the efficacy of action or the truth of rebirth, but they do show that it is a safer, more reasonable, and more honorable policy to assume the truth of these teachings than it would be to assume otherwise.
The Buddha didn't press these arguments beyond that point.
In other words, he left it to his listeners to decide whether they wanted to recognize that action is an investment that, like all investments, incurs risks.
And he left it to them to decide how they wanted to calculate the risks and potentials that action might involve now and into the future.
He didn't ask that his listeners all commit themselves to an unquestioning belief in the possibility that their actions might lead to rebirth, but he wasn't interested in teaching anyone who rejected that possibility outright.
As we've already noted, he saw that heedfulness lay at the root of all skillful qualities.
If a listener couldn't be persuaded to develop an appropriate level of heedfulness around the risks of action, any further teaching would be a waste of time.
To move his listeners from mundane right view to transcendent right view, the Buddha used the teaching on rebirth to inspire not only a sense of heedfulness in his listeners, but also a sense of samvega: dismay and terror at the prospect of not gaining release from rebirth.
“Long have you experienced the death of a mother.
The tears you have shed over the death of a mother while transmigrating & wandering this long, long time — crying & weeping from being joined with what is displeasing, being separated from what is pleasing — are greater than the water in the four great oceans.
“Long have you experienced the death of a father… the death of a brother… the death of a sister… the death of a son… the death of a daughter… loss with regard to relatives… loss with regard to wealth… loss with regard to disease.
The tears you have shed over loss with regard to disease while transmigrating & wandering this long, long time — crying & weeping from being joined with what is displeasing, being separated from what is pleasing — are greater than the water in the four great oceans.
“Why is that?
From an inconceivable beginning comes transmigration.
A beginning point is not evident, though beings hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving are transmigrating & wandering on.
Long have you thus experienced stress, experienced pain, experienced loss, swelling the cemeteries — enough to become disenchanted with all fabricated things, enough to become dispassionate, enough to be released.
The relationship between heedfulness and samvega parallels the relationship between the second knowledge of the night of the Buddha's awakening and the third.
Seeing the way in which rebirth depends on one's views and actions, he saw the need for heedfulness in one's thoughts, words, and deeds.
Seeing the precarious complexity and pointlessness of the whole process of repeated death and rebirth, he developed the sense of samvega that inspired him to look for a way out.
The way he chose — and that gave results — was to take the lessons about rebirth obtained in his first two knowledges, and to apply them to the actions of the mind in the present moment and to their effects both in the present and over time.
In doing so, he arrived at the four noble truths as the form of right view that would lead to total release and the end of rebirth.
The connection between rebirth and the first noble truth is reflected in the fact that this truth lists birth as one of the forms of suffering that the fourth noble truth brings to an end.
In fact, birth stands at the beginning of the list:
“Now this, monks, is the noble truth of stress: Birth is stressful, aging is stressful, death is stressful; sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair are stressful; association with the unbeloved is stressful, separation from the loved is stressful, not getting what is wanted is stressful.
In short, the five clinging-aggregates are stressful.
The connection between rebirth and the second noble truth is reflected in the fact that this truth defines the cause of suffering as any form of craving or clinging that leads to “further becoming,” which is the condition for further birth:
“And this, monks, is the noble truth of the origination of stress: the craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now here & now there — i.e., craving for sensuality, craving for becoming, craving for non-becoming.
Writers who reject the idea that the Buddha is talking about the rebirth of a person in these two noble truths tend to argue in one of two ways: Either that the references to birth don't imply rebirth; or that they refer to rebirth on the micro level of momentary mind-states, and not on the macro level of beings or persons over time.
Neither interpretation, however, does full justice to what the Buddha had to say.
Writers in the first group have made much of the fact that the Buddha used the word “birth” rather than “rebirth” in the first noble truth, concluding that rebirth is not necessarily meant here.
This conclusion, though, ignores the relationship of the first truth to the others.
All the forms of suffering listed in the first truth are caused by the second truth, and brought to an end by the fourth.
If birth were a one-shot affair, there would be — for a person already born — no point in looking for the causes of the suffering of birth, and no way that the fourth truth could put an end to them.
This point is especially clear when we look at the Buddha's own account of how he explored the causes of suffering after having seen, in his first two knowledges, the sufferings caused by repeated birth.
He looked into the possible causes of birth and traced them deep into the mind:
“Monks, before my awakening, when I was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, the realization came to me: 'How this world has fallen on difficulty!
It is born, it ages, it dies, it falls away & rearises, but it does not discern the escape from this stress, from this aging & death.
O when will it discern the escape from this stress, from this aging & death?'
“Then the thought occurred to me, 'Aging & death exist when what exists?
From what as a requisite condition come aging & death?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Aging & death exist when birth exists.
From birth as a requisite condition comes aging & death.'
Then the thought occurred to me, 'Birth exists when what exists?
From what as a requisite condition comes birth?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Birth exists when becoming exists.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth…
“Becoming exists when what exists?…
“Clinging/sustenance exists when what exists?…
“Craving exists when what exists?…
“Feeling exists when what exists?…
“Contact exists when what exists?…
“The six sense media exist when what exists?…
'Name-&-form exists when what exists?
From what as a requisite condition is there name-&-form?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Name-&-form exists when consciousness exists.
From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.' Then the thought occurred to me, 'Consciousness exists when what exists?
From what as a requisite condition comes consciousness?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Consciousness exists when name-&-form exists.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness.'
“Then the thought occurred to me, 'This consciousness turns back at name-&-form, and goes no farther.
It is to this extent that there is birth, aging, death, falling away, & reappearing, i.e., from name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness, from consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media… Thus is the origination of this entire mass of stress.
Origination, origination.' Vision arose, clear knowing arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before.
Had the Buddha assumed that birth were a one-time affair, he wouldn't have explored its causes through becoming, clinging, and on down to name-&-form.
He would have stopped his analysis of the causes of suffering at the realization: 'Aging & death exist when birth exists.
From birth as a requisite condition comes aging & death.' He thus would have limited his analysis of the origination of suffering to what happens after birth.
Only because he saw that birth was a repeated process did he probe into the causes of birth and trace them through the factors that he later taught in his description of dependent co-arising.
In other words, if the Buddha hadn't assumed rebirth, he never would have discovered or taught the central tenets of his teaching: the four noble truths and dependent co-arising.
His analysis of suffering and its causes would have been much more limited in scope.
And as we will see, the Buddha discovered that the processes leading to suffering are self-sustaining, meaning that unless they are deliberately starved they will continue repeating indefinitely.
In this way, not only birth, but also every factor in dependent co-arising is prefixed with an implicit “re-”, from re-ignorance to re-death.
As for the argument that the “birth” mentioned in the first noble truth could be a repeated process, but only on the micro scale of the momentary arising of mental states: The fact that the Buddha discovered the four noble truths and the factors of dependent co-arising by examining mental events in the present moment would seem to lend credence to this interpretation.
But it ignores two important points.
The first is that when the Buddha himself explained birth, aging, and death in the context of these teachings, he did so with reference to birth on the macro scale — i.e., the birth, aging, and death of a person:
“Now which aging and death?
Whatever aging, decrepitude, brokenness, graying, wrinkling, decline of life-force, weakening of the faculties of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called aging.
Whatever deceasing, passing away, breaking up, disappearance, dying, death, completion of time, breakup of the aggregates, casting off of the body, interruption in the life faculty of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called death.
“And which birth?
Whatever birth, taking birth, descent, coming-to-be, coming-forth, appearance of aggregates, & acquisition of media of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called birth.
The second point is that to insist on limiting the four noble truths and the factors of dependent co-arising to one scale or the other is to miss a crucial feature of these teachings.
Remember that the Buddha's third knowledge came from applying to the micro level lessons learned on the macro level in the first two knowledges.
The lesson he learned as a result is that the level of scale is a relative affair: The process is the constant.
To compare this to modern physics, it was like Einstein's proposal that the dimensions of space and time are not constants; the constant is the speed of light.
The fact that the Buddha gained release by discovering a process that held constant across many levels of scale was reflected in the way he taught, often switching scales in the course of his discussions and refusing to be pinned down to one scale or another.
Sometimes he talked about “beings” in the standard sense of the word, and sometimes as attachments, i.e., as processes on the mental level.
And in particular with dependent co-arising: The teaching is always presented as a process without a fixed reference to where — on the level of scale in the world or in the individual — the factors of the process are playing out.
In this way it's like a photograph of erosion patterns.
Without an extraneous object such as a tree or an insect to indicate scale, it's difficult to know whether the range of the photograph covers two miles or two inches, whether the erosion runs through a vast plateau or a small patch of sand by the side of a road, and whether the eroded bits in the photograph are boulders or grains of sand.
Either way, the photograph can be studied to understand the complex causal patterns underlying erosion; and — more to the point — we can learn more about the processes of erosion by studying it on multiple levels than by limiting ourselves to just one.
In the same way, it's a mistake to limit the Buddha's teachings on birth/rebirth to just one level of scale.
To limit them just to the micro level is to underestimate the potential for mental events in the present to create long-term suffering, and the radical nature of the cure needed to put an end to that suffering.
To limit his teachings just to the macro level makes it impossible to observe directly in the present how birth and its attendant sufferings come about and can be brought to an end.
To get the most out of these teachings, it's best to drop any insistence, in line with one's metaphysical assumptions, that they apply to one level and not another.
Instead, it's better to look at the processes as processes — true across many scales — and use this way of framing the issue as part of the strategy to put an end to suffering.
As part of his policy of not getting pinned down on issues of scale when presenting the process of rebirth, the Buddha was careful to avoid an issue that animated his contemporaries when they discussed rebirth: the metaphysics of what a person is, and what does or doesn't get reborn after death.
In other words, he refused to explain whether any “what” underlay the experience of rebirth.
He simply talked about how the experience happened and what could be done to end it.
In modern philosophy this approach is called phenomenology: talking about the phenomena of experience simply in terms of direct experience, without making reference to any underlying reality that may or may not stand behind that experience.
The Buddha was a radical phenomenologist in that he dealt with experience on its own terms.
He was a pragmatist in that he adopted this approach because he saw that it worked in bringing suffering to an end.
The Canon reports that the members of the other schools — and even some of his own monks — often expressed frustration over this aspect of the Buddha's approach.
In their eyes, the whole question of rebirth revolved around the “what” that did or didn't get reborn.
Either the life force was identical with the body, thus allowing no way for rebirth to occur after the body dies; or else there was a soul or life force separate from the body, which either died along with the body or else survived death.
Yet when the Buddha's contemporaries pressed him to take sides on this question and related questions, he consistently put them aside.
The Blessed One said, “From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications… From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
When this was said, a certain monk said to the Blessed One: “Which is the birth, lord, and whose is the birth?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
“If one were to ask, 'Which is the birth, and whose is the birth?' and if one were to say, 'Birth is one thing, and the birth is that of something/someone else,' both of them would have the same meaning, even though their words would differ.
When there is the view that the soul is the same as the body, there is no leading the holy life.
And when there is the view that the soul is one thing and the body another, there is no leading the holy life.
Avoiding these two extremes, the Tathagata teaches the Dhamma via the middle: From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
“Monks, there are these four nutriments for the maintenance of beings who have come into being or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
Which four?
Physical food, gross or refined; contact as the second; intellectual intention the third; and consciousness the fourth.
These are the four nutriments for the maintenance of beings who have come into being or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
When this was said, Ven.
Moliya Phagguna said to the Blessed One, “Lord, who feeds on the consciousness-nutriment?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
“I don't say 'feeds.' If I were to say 'feeds,' then 'Who feeds on the consciousness-nutriment?' would be a valid question.
But I don't say that.
When I don't say that, the valid question is, 'Consciousness-nutriment for what?' And the valid answer is, 'Consciousness-nutriment for the production of future coming-into-being.
When that has come into being and exists, then the six sense media.
From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.'
The tendency to read a “thing” or “no thing” behind the processes of dependent co-arising is still alive with us today.
Many people have assumed that the Buddha taught that there is no self — which means that there would be no thing behind the process of dependent co-arising, and nothing to be reborn.
Many others have assumed that he taught a True Self underlying our false sense of an individual self, and therefore underlying the process.
Both assumptions, however, are misinformed.
The Buddha actually refused to state whether a self of any kind does or doesn't exist.
The one recorded time he was asked point-blank whether the self exists, he declined to answer.
This was because he saw that questions of this sort interfere with the path of practice leading to the end of suffering.
As he said in MN, to focus on such questions as — “Am I?
Am I not?
What am I?
What was I in the past?
What will I be in the future?” — is a form of inappropriate attention: the kind of attention that ignores the four noble truths and actually leads to further suffering.
So if a worldview demands an explanation of the “what” behind rebirth — as we find not only in the worldviews of ancient India but also in many modern worldviews as well — it's simply a form of inappropriate attention that perpetuates suffering.
If you want to put an end to suffering, you have to put the metaphysical demands of your worldview aside.
The Buddha found it more appropriate and fruitful to focus instead on the process of how birth is repeatedly generated by factors immediately present to awareness throughout life, and directly experienced by factors in the present moment.
This is because these factors lie enough under your control to turn them toward the ending of repeated rebirth.
An understanding of the process as process — and in particular, as an example of the process of dependent co-arising — can actually contribute to the end of suffering.
It gives guidance in how to apply the tasks appropriate for the four noble truths to the process of birth: i.e., comprehending suffering, abandoning its cause, realizing its cessation, and developing the path to its cessation.
When these duties have been completely mastered, they can bring birth to an end by abandoning its causes, thus opening the way to the ultimate happiness that comes when the mind is no longer entangled in the process of birth.
The Buddha used several models for explaining the process of dependent co-arising, with each model listing a sequence of interdependent factors.
In the most standard model, the factors are these:
fabrications,
consciousness,
name-&-form,
the six sense media,
becoming, and
— followed by the suffering of aging, illness, and death.
This list has many complications, with certain factors appearing at several points in the sequence.
For example, the factor of ignorance is identical with the sub-factor of inappropriate attention, under name-&-form.
The list also contains many feedback loops, sequences where an effect returns to influence the next instance of its cause.
As we will see, the existence of feedback loops in the process is what makes it self-sustaining and gives it the potential to continue indefinitely.
For the moment, however, we can focus on one of dependent co-arising's most obvious features: its lack of outside context.
It avoids any reference to the presence or absence of a self or a world around the processes it describes.
Instead, it forms the context for understanding “selves” and “worlds.” In other words, it shows how ideas of such metaphysical contexts are created and clung to, and what happens as a result.
In particular, it shows in detail how the acts of creating and clinging to metaphysical assumptions about the existence or non-existence of the self or the world actually lead to birth and suffering.
This means that dependent co-arising, instead of existing in a metaphysical context, provides the phenomenological context for showing why metaphysical contexts are best put aside.
The important factors leading from metaphysical assumptions to rebirth are “name,” “contact,” “clinging,” and “becoming.
Under “name” is the sub-factor of attention, which MN — as we have seen — depicts as the act of choosing which questions to ask.
When attention is inappropriately directed to questions of the metaphysics of identity — about what you are or whether you exist — it entangles you in a “thicket of views, a writhing of views” that keep you trapped in suffering and stress.
As for views of what the world is and where it came from, the Buddha shows that these all derive from contact at the six senses.
These views about self and world then become objects of clinging, which in turn gives rise to becoming: the act of taking on an identity within a particular world of experience defined around the craving underlying that clinging.
Becoming, in turn, is the condition for repeated birth.
The antidote to this process is to direct attention appropriately to identifying the four noble truths as they're experienced.
This form of attention enables you to see the act of view-formation as a process, to see the drawbacks of the process, and so to abandon any clinging to the content of those views.
This removes the conditions for further becoming and birth.
Even though the four noble truths count as a type of view, their ability to see all views — even themselves — as part of this process, means that they contain the seeds for their own transcendence.
So if you want to get the most use out of dependent co-arising, then rather than viewing dependent co-arising as occurring within the context of self and world, you'd do better to view ideas of self and world as occurring within the context of dependent co-arising.
The advantage of adopting this approach is that it focuses attention away from things for which you aren't responsible — metaphysical entities that may or may not underlie experience — and points instead to events for which you are: acts of attention and the various forms of intention under “fabrications” and “name.” This is why, even though the Buddha didn't take a stand on the issues of the metaphysics of rebirth, he devoted a lot of time to explaining the connection between rebirth and action.
Action is what leads to rebirth, but action — skillful action — can also bring it to an end.
When you adopt this perspective, you focus directly on actions as they are experienced as factors: parts of a causal sequence.
And this, in turn, makes it easier to apply the duties of the four noble truths with greater precision.
In other words, it helps you notice which factors — such as ignorance — cause suffering and so should be abandoned by replacing them with right view; which ones — such as attention and intention, under “name” — can be converted to the path to the end of suffering and so should be developed before they, too, are abandoned; and which ones — such as clinging, becoming, and birth — constitute suffering and so should be comprehended to the point of disenchantment and dispassion, leading to the realization of the end of suffering: release.
What does it mean to “comprehend” birth as an instance of suffering?
And what is accomplished by viewing it in that way?
The Buddha often compared all suffering to the acts of clinging and feeding: acts inherently stressful not only for those clung to and fed upon, but also for those who, through the disease of hunger, keep needing to cling and feed.
In fact, for the Buddha, feeding and clinging are virtually one and the same.
The Pali word for clinging — upadana — also means fuel or sustenance and the act of taking sustenance from fuel.
In his explanation of how a fire burns, for instance, the fire feeds itself by clinging to its fuel — an image he also used to illustrate how rebirth happens through the process of clinging to craving:
“But, Master Gotama, at the moment a flame is being swept on by the wind and goes a far distance, what do you designate as its clinging/sustenance then?
“Vaccha, when a flame is being swept on by the wind and goes a far distance, I designate it as wind-sustained, for the wind is its clinging/sustenance at that time.
“And at the moment when a being sets this body aside and is not yet born in another body, what do you designate as its clinging/sustenance then?
“Vaccha, when a being sets this body aside and is not yet born in another body, I designate it as craving-sustained, for craving is its clinging/sustenance at that time.
By introducing a “being” into this passage, the Buddha might be suspected of introducing a “what” into his discussion of birth.
And this is not the only place where he talks about a being-to-be-born in this context.
“Monks, the descent of the embryo occurs with the union of three things.
There is the case where there is no union of the mother & father, the mother is not in her season, and a gandhabba is not present, nor is there a descent of an embryo.
There is the case where there is a union of the mother & father, and the mother is in her season, but a gandhabba is not present, nor is there a descent of an embryo.
But when there is a union of the mother & father, the mother is in her season, and a gandhabba is present, then with this union of three things the descent of the embryo occurs.
However, on the level of dependent co-arising, the Buddha did not treat the concept of a being as a “what.” His definition of a “being” shows that he recommended that it, too, be regarded as a process:
As he was sitting there, Ven.
Radha said to the Blessed One: “'A being,' lord.
'A being,' it's said.
To what extent is one said to be 'a being'?
“Any desire, passion, delight, or craving for form, Radha: When one is caught up there, tied up there, one is said to be 'a being.'
“Any desire, passion, delight, or craving for feeling… perception… fabrications…
“Any desire, passion, delight, or craving for consciousness, Radha: When one is caught up there, tied up there, one is said to be 'a being.'
So the Buddha advocated viewing a “being” simply as a process of attachment to desire, passion, delight, and craving.
A being in this sense can take birth, die, and be reborn many times in the course of a day — as attachment develops for one desire, ends, and then develops for another one — to say nothing of how often it occurs during the lifetime of a physical body.
This is why the processes leading to rebirth can be observed and redirected in the present moment, for — as we have already noted — the mental processes that move from moment to moment on the micro level are identical with the mental processes that move from body to body on the macro level.
Once born on either the micro or the macro level, the being-process is maintained by the four nutriments of consciousness: physical food, sensory contact, sensory consciousness, and the intentions of the mind.
“Where there is passion, delight, & craving for the nutriment of physical food, consciousness lands there and increases.
Where consciousness lands and increases, there is the alighting of name-&-form.
Where there is the alighting of name-&-form, there is the growth of fabrications.
Where there is the growth of fabrications, there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
Where there is the production of renewed becoming in the future, there is future birth, aging, & death, together, I tell you, with sorrow, affliction, & despair…
There is a complex relationship between craving and nutriment in sustaining this process.
On the one hand, as the above passage shows, craving has to be actively present before consciousness will land on any of the forms of nutriment.
On the other hand, had there been no past craving, none of these forms of nutriment would even exist:
“These four nutriments have craving as their cause, craving as their origination, are born from craving, are brought into being from craving.
This means that craving produces the food that it then feeds on — a fact that allows for the processes leading to birth to lead to repeated rebirth.
The role of craving here is closely connected with that of consciousness, which — like craving — produces the food on which it feeds.
Because these processes are self-sustaining, any attempt to map them has to be complex.
One of the primary complaints about dependent co-arising is that it is overwhelmingly complicated.
This, however, is like complaining about the complexity of a city map that shows all the streets.
You put up with the complexity so that you can find precisely the street you want.
In the same way, once you accept the fact that the processes leading to suffering are complex, you appreciate the usefulness of the maps provided by dependent co-arising: They point out precisely where in the processes you can make a difference, so that causal patterns can be directed away from suffering and toward its end.
We can see this clearly in the way the two prime models of dependent co-arising depict the self-sustaining pattern by which consciousness produces the food on which consciousness can then continue to feed.
This pattern is most obvious in the model that traces the causes of birth back to a mutual causality between consciousness on the one hand, and name-&-form — the mental and physical dimensions of experience — on the other.
“'From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.' Thus it has been said.
And this is the way to understand how from consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
If consciousness were not to descend into the mother's womb, would name-&-form take shape in the womb?
“No, lord.
“If, after descending into the womb, consciousness were to depart, would name-&-form be produced for this world?
“No, lord.
“If the consciousness of the young boy or girl were to be cut off, would name-&-form ripen, grow, and reach maturity?
“No, lord.
“Thus this is a cause, this is a reason, this is an origination, this is a requisite condition for name-&-form, i.e., consciousness.
In playing a part in the process of birth and growth, consciousness also depends on the phenomena it sustains:
“If consciousness were not to gain a foothold in name-&-form, would a coming-into-play of the origination of birth, aging, death, and stress in the future be discerned?
“No, lord.
“Thus this is a cause, this is a reason, this is an origination, this is a requisite condition for consciousness, i.e., name-&-form.
In this way, consciousness directly feeds the factors that it, in turn, feeds upon.
So this model for mapping dependent co-arising focuses on one place to break the sequence: the mutual dependence between consciousness and name-&-form.
“It's as if two sheaves of reeds were to stand leaning against one another.
In the same way, from name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness, from consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form…
“If one were to pull away one of those sheaves of reeds, the other would fall; if one were to pull away the other, the first one would fall.
In the same way, from the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of consciousness, from the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
The more standard model for dependent co-arising gives a more precise picture of what it means to “pull away” consciousness and name-&-form.
This model — whose factors we listed in the preceding chapter — traces the causes of suffering back to ignorance, and in so doing provides a more complex picture of the way in which consciousness produces its own food.
At first glance, the pattern of a self-sustaining consciousness-process is less obvious in this model because consciousness appears as a factor only once.
However, it functions as a sub-factor at two other points in the process, where it feeds off the factors it sustains.
Because the picture here is more complex, it's more explicit in showing where to focus your attempts to deprive the process of food.
Consciousness first appears in the process as the factor of consciousness itself.
This factor follows on ignorance and fabrication, and acts as the condition for name-&-form.
The fact that consciousness occurs immediately after fabrication emphasizes that it is driven by intention.
As SN.
notes, the element of intention is what turns the potential for sensory consciousness into an actual experience of sensory consciousness.
“For the sake of consciousness-hood, fabrications fabricate consciousness as a fabricated thing.
Thus every act of sensory consciousness is purposeful.
As long as ignorance drives fabrication, there is no such thing as a totally passive or pure state of consciousness.
Every act of consciousness is colored by the intentional element that shapes it.
The fact that the factor of consciousness appears before name-&-form emphasizes the fact that consciousness has to be present for all the remaining factors — including “intention” under “name” — to occur.
And because both consciousness and name-&-form depend on fabrication, which in turn depends on ignorance of the stressful nature of fabrication, this model shows that one way to deprive the consciousness-process of food is to develop right view about the intentional element of fabrication underlying that process.
The second point where consciousness appears in the process of dependent co-arising is as a component of the factor of contact at the six senses.
Its role here carries over from its dependence on fabrication, emphasizing the fact that sensory contact is never purely passive.
Even the barest contact already contains an element of intentional fabrication that colors it with ignorance.
“It's in dependence on a pair that consciousness comes into play.
And how does consciousness come into play in dependence on a pair?
In dependence on the eye & forms there arises eye-consciousness.
The eye is inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
Forms are inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
Thus this pair is both wavering & fluctuating — inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
“Eye-consciousness is inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
Whatever is the cause, the requisite condition, for the arising of eye-consciousness, that is inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
Having arisen in dependence on an inconstant factor, how could eye-consciousness be constant?
“The coming together, the meeting, the convergence of these three phenomena is eye-contact.”
What this shows is that, to starve the consciousness-process of food, you have to focus less on how you react to sensory contact and more on what you bring to sensory contact — the habits of ignorant fabrication that shape what you sense.
At the third point in the series, consciousness together with its nutriment plays the role of feeding and clinging: building on craving, and leading to becoming — a sense of one's identity in a particular world of experience — which is the prerequisite for birth.
In this case, the Buddha said, consciousness plays the role of a seed that — when watered by craving and delight — blooms into becoming on the level of sensuality, form, or formlessness.
“Karma is the field, consciousness the seed, and craving the moisture.
The consciousness of living beings hindered by ignorance & fettered by craving is established in a lower property… a middling property… a refined property.
Thus there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
This is how there is becoming.
“Like the earth property, monks, is how the four standing-points for consciousness should be seen.
Like the liquid property is how delight & passion should be seen.
Like the five types of plant propagation is how consciousness together with its nutriment should be seen.
To view consciousness and its nutriment here as a seed watered by craving, delight, and passion helps focus attention on the role played by these three latter mind-states in producing food for endlessly repeated suffering and birth.
These are the mind-states that sustain the consciousness-process as it moves from one standing-point to another.
Perhaps the Buddha switched from the feeding analogy to the seed analogy here because the implications of the food analogy at this point would have been too harsh to state explicitly in polite company: We keep feeding off the by-products of our earlier feeding.
The seed analogy, however, makes this point more indirectly.
Just as seeds, when watered, grow into plants that both produce seeds and, when they die, add fertilizer to the soil that feeds those seeds, in the same way, consciousness nourished with karma and craving keeps producing more standing-points — the aggregates of form, feeling, perception, fabrication, and consciousness — for future acts of consciousness to feed on:
“Should consciousness, when standing, stand attached to form, supported by form, landing on form, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
“Should consciousness, when standing, stand attached to feeling, supported by feeling, landing on feeling, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
“Should consciousness, when standing, stand attached to perception, supported by perception, landing on perception, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
“Should consciousness, when standing, stand attached to fabrications, supported by fabrications, landing on fabrications, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
“Were someone to say, 'I will describe a coming, a going, a passing away, an arising, a growth, an increase, or a proliferation of consciousness apart from form, from feeling, from perception, from fabrications,' that would be impossible.
In other words, as long as delight and passion — this phrase is a synonym for clinging — nourishes the consciousness-process, consciousness in turn keeps creating the food to keep the process going indefinitely, even after the form of this body is cast aside.
This is why repeated birth-as-process will not end until it's deprived of the water of craving and clinging.
And the only way to deprive the process of its water and food is to develop dispassion for activities that sustain it.
This is where this model for dependent co-arising shows it pragmatic value.
It demonstrates not only that the food and water for rebirth can be directly experienced, but also that these processes are the direct consequence of choices made in the mind: the intentional activity of fabrication based on ignorance.
In this way, it points to the possibility that the suffering of repeated rebirth can be ended by choice: choosing to develop appropriate attention — right view concerning the four noble truths — which puts an end to craving and ignorance.
That way, instead of getting entangled in trying to destroy the conditions of birth — which would lead to taking on a destroyer-identity, which would merely continue the process of becoming — you choose simply to starve the process of its sustenance, allowing it to end on its own.
That choice is where the path, the fourth noble truth, begins.
Given that passion is something we habitually enjoy, it's not easy to choose a path leading toward total dispassion.
You have to be strongly motivated to take it up and to stick with it.
At the same time, you have to hold yourself to high standards all along the way, for it's all too easy to fall for subtle levels of passion that can pull you back into the processes leading to renewed suffering and rebirth.
This is one of the reasons why right view comes at the beginning of the path — to provide motivation for and guidance to all the other path factors: right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.
As a part of right view, conviction in rebirth — and of the influence of action in leading to rebirth — plays an important role in performing both of these functions: motivating the initial choice to follow the path, and guiding choices made along the way.
We have already noted in chapter four how the Buddha used belief in rebirth to inspire a general desire to escape the rounds of suffering; here the specifics of right view about rebirth help focus that desire specifically on the path.
Some people claim that belief in rebirth breeds complacency — you have many lifetimes to follow the path, so you can take your time — but the Buddha's descriptions of the dangers of rebirth present a very different picture: You could die at any moment, and there are plenty of miserable places — realms where it would be impossible to practice — where you could easily be reborn.
And even if you do manage to reach a good level of rebirth the next time around, the chances of a good rebirth after that are very slim.
So you have to get started on mastering the path while you can.
Then the Blessed One, picking up a little bit of dust with the tip of his fingernail, said to the monks, “What do you think, monks?
Which is greater: the little bit of dust I have picked up with the tip of my fingernail, or the great earth?
“The great earth is far greater, lord.
The little bit of dust the Blessed One has picked up with the tip of his fingernail is next to nothing.
It doesn't even count.
It's no comparison.
It's not even a fraction, this little bit of dust the Blessed One has picked up with the tip of his fingernail, when compared with the great earth.
“In the same way, monks, few are the beings who, on passing away from the human realm, are reborn among human beings.
Far more are the beings who, on passing away from the human realm, are reborn in hell… in the animal womb… in the domain of the hungry ghosts.
… “In the same way, monks, few are the beings who, on passing away from the human realm, are reborn among devas.
Far more are the beings who, on passing away from the human realm, are reborn in hell… in the animal womb… in the domain of the hungry ghosts.
… “In the same way, monks, few are the beings who, on passing away from the deva realm, are reborn among devas.
Far more are the beings who, on passing away from the deva realm, are reborn in hell… in the animal womb… in the domain of the hungry ghosts.
… “In the same way, monks, few are the beings who, on passing away from the deva realm, are reborn among human beings.
Far more are the beings who, on passing away from the deva realm, are reborn in hell… in the animal womb… in the domain of the hungry ghosts.
“Therefore your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress.' Your duty is the contemplation, 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.'
The Buddha also used conviction in rebirth to encourage his listeners not to be deterred by difficulties faced along the path.
Compared to the sufferings of repeated rebirth, those difficulties count for nothing.
“Monks, suppose there was a man whose life span was years, who would live to.
Someone would say to him, 'Look here, fellow.
They will stab you at dawn with spears, at noon with spears, & again at evening with spears.
You, thus stabbed day after day with spears, will have a lifespan of years, will live to be, and at the end of years you will realize the four noble truths that you have never realized before.'
“Monks, a person who desired his own true benefit would do well to take up.
Why is that?
From an inconceivable beginning comes transmigration.
A beginning point is not evident for the blows from spears, swords, & axes.
Even if this were to occur, I tell you that the realization of the four noble truths would not be accompanied by pain & distress.
Instead, I tell you, the realization of the four noble truths would be accompanied by pleasure & happiness.
“Which four?
The noble truth of stress, the noble truth of the origination of stress, the noble truth of the cessation of stress, and the noble truth of the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.
“Therefore your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.'
In principle, the path to the end of suffering can be completed in one lifetime.
The Canon contains many stories of people who gained full awakening after hearing only one of the Buddha's discourses, and MN, among other discourses, states that in some cases even just seven days' determined practice can be enough to complete the path.
But that's in principle.
Each person's awakening, though, is a specific case, and the Buddha knew that, for most of his listeners, the path would be a multi-lifetime affair.
And it's hard not to imagine that many of his listeners — just like many people today — looked at the entanglements of their lives and realized that they would never have enough free time in this lifetime to devote fully to the practice.
So, instead of trying to please them by paring the path down to what they might reasonably accomplish within the limitations of this lifetime, the Buddha encouraged them with a multi-lifetime perspective on the path, to convince them that whatever efforts they made in the direction of awakening wouldn't come to naught.
He kept the bar high, and with good reason: Only when you have a realistic view of what the path to the end of suffering actually entails will you be able to follow it and gain the full results.
At the same time, the Buddha encouraged people on their deathbed to make an effort to develop dispassion for the various realms of rebirth.
He even stated that they might actually achieve full awakening while doing so.
In this way they would be able to prevent huge amounts of future pain and suffering.
A person assuming only a single lifetime would not see the value of these sorts of efforts — which means that the single-lifetime perspective would underestimate what a dying person can do, and would instead favor drugging the person even to the point of losing mindfulness to reduce his or her present pain.
Because a drugged state of mind is in no position to withstand craving, this means that a single-lifetime perspective would place the dying person at a severe disadvantage — and would actually be the more complacent and irresponsible view.
In addition to providing motivation in practicing the path, the assumptions of karma and rebirth play an important role in ferreting out attachments to fabrications and other processes that you might otherwise overlook as you follow the path.
If you don't believe, for instance, that a particular instance of passion or delight could have huge repercussions in the future, and if it seems enjoyable right now, you can easily regard it as insignificant and allow it to keep bubbling away in the mind.
“There is, monks, an intergalactic void, an unrestrained darkness, a pitch-black darkness, where even the light of the sun & moon — so mighty, so powerful — doesn't reach.
When this was said, one of the monks said to the Blessed One, “Wow, what a great darkness!
What a really great darkness!
Is there any darkness greater & more frightening than that?
“There is, monk, a darkness greater & more frightening than that.
“And which darkness, lord, is greater & more frightening than that?
“Any contemplatives or brahmans who do not know, as it has come to be, that 'This is stress'; who do not know, as it has come to be, that 'This is the origination of stress'… 'This is the cessation of stress'… 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress': They revel in fabrications leading to birth; they revel in fabrications leading to aging; they revel in fabrications leading to death; they revel in fabrications leading to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Reveling in fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they fabricate fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Fabricating fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they drop into the darkness of birth.
They drop into the darkness of aging… the darkness of death… darkness of sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
They are not totally released from birth, aging, death, sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
They are not totally released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
Only when you appreciate the potential for even the most natural or innocuous-seeming attachment to lead to long-term suffering will you be willing to take it seriously and work to abandon it.
And only then will you really be following the path.
We've already noted, in chapter three, that a multi-lifetime perspective helps to keep you on track in the area of virtue, a point that applies to the path factors of right speech, right action, and right livelihood.
The same principle also applies to the factors more directly connected to meditation.
This can be illustrated with two examples from the Buddha's two-step meditative strategy for developing dispassion for clinging and craving.
In the first step, he has you focus on the drawbacks of craving for sensuality: the mind's tendency to get obsessed with plans for sensual pleasures.
If you're limited to an exclusively one-life view of the practice, it's hard to fully appreciate the power and drawbacks of sensual craving.
After all, the evolution of life has depended on this craving, and for many people it provides the only pleasure and excitement they know, so it's easy to justify sensuality as a good thing.
Even when you consider the many drawbacks of sensuality visible in this life, it remains simply a matter of taste as to whether you feel the drawbacks are enough to deter you from sensual pursuits: Some people prefer peace and safety; others, the thrills of danger and risk.
If everything ends in oblivion and annihilation, who's to say that harmful pleasures are worse than harmless?
But when you take seriously the long-term consequences of sensuality over many lifetimes, it changes the equation entirely.
You find it easier to see that the pleasures and thrills offered by sensuality are not worth the price.
“It's with sensuality for the reason, sensuality for the source… that engage in bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct.
Having engaged in bodily, verbal, and mental misconduct, they — with the breakup of the body, after death — re-appear in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
Only when you can see sensuality in this light are you genuinely ready to follow the path to fully undercut the sensual craving that acts as one of the causes of suffering and stress.
However, even this understanding is not enough to uproot sensual craving.
The mind needs an alternate source of pleasure to sustain it on the path.
This pleasure is provided by jhana: the path factor of right concentration.
“Even though a disciple of the noble ones has clearly seen with right discernment as it has come to be that sensuality is of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks, still — if he has not attained a rapture & pleasure apart from sensuality, apart from unskillful mental qualities, or something more peaceful than that — he can be tempted by sensuality.
But when he has clearly seen with right discernment as it has come to be that sensuality is of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks, and he has attained a rapture & pleasure apart from sensuality, apart from unskillful qualities, or something more peaceful than that, he cannot be tempted by sensuality.
Still, even though the pleasures of jhana are a necessary part of the path, they aren't totally safe.
To enter jhana is to take on a state of becoming, and so it, too, can be an object of craving.
And because some of the higher jhanas touch dimensions of nothingness and neither perception nor non-perception, they are easy to mistake for states of non-becoming.
This means that even though the practice of jhana can help you overcome sensual craving, on its own it's not enough to overcome the two remaining types of craving — for becoming and non-becoming — that lead to further suffering and stress.
Here again, a multi-lifetime perspective is helpful in detecting these subtle attachments — attachments that even the contemplation of not-self, if it's not informed by this perspective, can easily miss.
As MN states, it's possible to develop the perception of not-self, applying it to all phenomena, and arrive at a refined formless level of jhana, the dimension of nothingness.
At that point, you experience a subtle level of equanimity, so subtle that you can easily miss the fact that you're clinging to it.
If you don't see that even this equanimity can lead to future dangers, you won't feel inclined to investigate it.
This may be why many meditators with a one-lifetime perspective equate equanimity with nibbana: They don't see that there's any need to question their attainment of refined equanimity, for they feel it's enough to maintain them in good stead through the remainder of this lifetime.
And if they hold to the materialist view that all we can know is known through the senses, then equanimity in the face of sensory experience would be the greatest peace they could imagine.
But as the Buddha points out in SN., there is a dimension of experience beyond the senses where an even greater peace can be found through the total end of fabrication.
And as he states in MN, if — with the possibility of this more peaceful dimension in mind — you see that even subtle levels of equanimity can lead to long lifetimes, but that those lifetimes will end, you're more inclined to investigate those levels of equanimity to see how they're fabricated.
Only through this sort of investigation can you develop dispassion for the last traces of seemingly innocuous fabrication that stand in the way of full release.
This is the second step in the Buddha's strategy.
In one of the standard descriptions for how to develop dispassion for jhana, the Buddha first has you master jhana — you can't overcome attachment to it by not doing it.
Then he has you contemplate the mental events sustaining jhana as processes — aggregates, which play a role in dependent co-arising under the factors of fabrication, consciousness, and name — to see that they, too, have their drawbacks.
This focuses attention directly on the factors that dependent co-arising — in its various models — highlights as the spots where the self-sustaining processes leading to suffering can be starved.
This is also where we most clearly see why the Buddha discussed all the factors leading to rebirth as processes.
If you're looking for your inner essence or the ground of being for the world, it's all too easy — when reaching a state of jhana — to mistake that state for what you're looking for.
This, however, leads simply to more ignorance and attachment.
But if you view jhana as the result of actions and processes, then when you reach this stage, you find it easier to develop dispassion for jhana without feeling that anything substantial is being lost.
“Suppose that an archer or archer's apprentice were to practice on a straw man or mound of clay, so that after a while he would become able to shoot long distances, to fire accurate shots in rapid succession, and to pierce great masses.
In the same way, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He regards whatever phenomena there that are connected with form, feeling, perception, fabrications, & consciousness, as inconstant, stressful, a disease, a cancer, an arrow, painful, an affliction, alien, a disintegration, an emptiness, not-self.
He turns his mind away from those phenomena, and having done so, inclines his mind to the property of deathlessness: 'This is peace, this is exquisite — the resolution of all fabrications; the relinquishment of all acquisitions; the ending of craving; dispassion; cessation; Unbinding.'
In line with the Buddha's approach of seeing how these processes manifest on many levels, he advises that you view even the “being” doing jhana as a process composed of aggregates.
When this contemplation yields a sense of dispassion for all aggregates past, present, and future — even those used on the path — it starves the process by which craving can lead to further rebirth.
“Where there is no passion for the nutriment of physical food, where there is no delight, no craving, then consciousness does not land there or increase.
Where consciousness does not land or increase, there is no alighting of name-&-form.
Where there is no alighting of name-&-form, there is no growth of fabrications.
Where there is no growth of fabrications, there is no production of renewed becoming in the future.
Where there is no production of renewed becoming in the future, there is no future birth, aging, & death.
That, I tell you, has no sorrow, affliction, or despair.
“If a monk abandons passion for the property of form… the property of feeling… the property of perception… the property of fabrications… the property of consciousness, then owing to the abandonment of passion, the support is cut off, and there is no landing of consciousness.
Consciousness, thus not having landed, not increasing, not concocting, is released.
Owing to its release, it is steady.
Owing to its steadiness, it is contented.
Owing to its contentment, it is not agitated.
Not agitated, one is totally unbound right within.
One discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.'
What remains is a dimension free of birth and death.
“There is, monks, an unborn — unbecome — unmade — unfabricated.
If there were not that unborn — unbecome — unmade — unfabricated, there would not be the case that emancipation from the born — become — made — fabricated would be discerned.
But precisely because there is an unborn — unbecome — unmade — unfabricated, emancipation from the born — become — made — fabricated is discerned.
This dimension is characterized by a type of consciousness that lies outside of the range of the sensory consciousness involved in dependent co-arising and the realm of the six senses — a realm the Buddha calls the “all.” Thus it's totally free from suffering.
“'Consciousness without surface, endless, radiant all around, has not been experienced through the earthness of earth… the liquidity of liquid… the fieriness of fire… the windiness of wind… the allness of the all.'
The canonical image for this sort of consciousness, totally independent of nutriment, is of a ray of light that doesn't land anywhere.
“Just as if there were a roofed house or a roofed hall having windows on the north, the south, or the east.
When the sun rises, and a ray has entered by way of the window, where does it land?
“On the western wall, lord.
“And if there is no western wall, where does it land?
“On the ground, lord.
“And if there is no ground, where does it land?
“On the water, lord.
“And if there is no water, where does it land?
“It does not land, lord.
“In the same way, where there is no passion for the nutriment of physical food… contact… intellectual intention… consciousness, where there is no delight, no craving, then consciousness does not land there or grow.
Where consciousness does not land or grow, name-&-form does not alight.
Where name-&-form does not alight, there is no growth of fabrications.
Where there is no growth of fabrications, there is no production of renewed becoming in the future.
Where there is no production of renewed becoming in the future, there is no future birth, aging, & death.
That, I tell you, has no sorrow, affliction, or despair.
In line with his discussion of rebirth, the Buddha never offered a metaphysical explanation of what this consciousness is or how it might be.
After all, it would be a mistake to justify the reality of the unconditioned with reference to the conditioned, as it's not dependent on any thing or any “how” in any way.
However, the Buddha did show how to get there: That's why his image for the practice is a path.
A path to a mountain doesn't cause the mountain, but it does provide the opportunity for walking there.
The path of practice doesn't cause the unconditioned, but it does provide the opening for attaining it.
The Canon, when describing a person's full awakening, never depicts the accompanying knowledge as touching on “what” or “how” this unconditioned consciousness is.
Instead, the knowledge is said to begin with a realization of release from the asavas of sensuality, becoming, and ignorance, along with the realization that that release is once and for all.
Then it proceeds to a realization of the future implications of that release, starting with the fact that it has put an end to any future rebirth.
In the Buddha's own case, he expressed the knowledge like this:
“Knowledge & vision arose in me: 'Unprovoked is my release.
This is the last birth.
There is now no further becoming.'
The two most frequently used descriptions of the knowledge accompanying the attainment of arahantship make the same point like this:
“With release, there is the knowledge, 'Released.' One discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.'
Dwelling alone — secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — Ven.
Anuruddha in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here-&-now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And thus Ven.
Anuruddha became another one of the arahants.
In other words, when the mind returns to the fabricated dimension after its total encounter with the unfabricated dimension and has realized its release, the realization that it's through with birth/rebirth — on both the macro and the micro levels — is the first thing that spontaneously occurs to it.
This realization of the ending of birth leads to the further realization that all suffering has been ended as well.
People who hold to a modern materialist view of the world and the self tend to react to these canonical descriptions of what is known in awakening by offering three main reasons for resisting them.
The first is that these descriptions, in their eyes, go beyond what a human being could possibly know.
Sometimes this argument is supported by the claim that the Canon's descriptions violate the Buddha's own criteria, stated elsewhere in the discourses, for what can and cannot be known.
The passage most commonly cited in this argument is this:
“What is the all?
Simply the eye & forms, ear & sounds, nose & aromas, tongue & flavors, body & tactile sensations, intellect & ideas.
This, monks, is termed the all.
Anyone who would say, 'Repudiating this all, I will describe another,' if questioned on what exactly might be the grounds for his statement, would be unable to explain, and furthermore, would be put to grief.
Why?
Because it lies beyond range.
The argument maintains that “beyond range” here means “beyond the range of possible knowledge.” Therefore, the existence of a dimension lying beyond the six senses — such as that of consciousness without surface described in MN — is impossible to know.
This would invalidate any claim that one has known such things — and, by implication, the freedom from rebirth that such a knowledge would imply.
However, there is clear evidence that “beyond range” here simply means “beyond the range of adequate description,” for there are other canonical passages indicating that even though the dimension beyond the six senses cannot be adequately described, it can still be known.
MahaKotthita: “With the remainderless ceasing & fading of the six spheres of contact is it the case that there is anything else?
Sariputta: “Don't say that, my friend.
MahaKotthita: “With the remainderless ceasing & fading of the six spheres of contact, is it the case that there is not anything else?
Sariputta: “Don't say that, my friend.
MahaKotthita: “…is it the case that there both is & is not anything else?
Sariputta: “Don't say that, my friend.
MahaKotthita: “…is it the case that there neither is nor is not anything else?
Sariputta: “Don't say that, my friend.
MahaKotthita: “Being asked… if there is anything else, you say, 'Don't say that, my friend.' Being asked… if there is not anything else… if there both is & is not anything else… if there neither is nor is not anything else, you say, 'Don't say that, my friend.' Now, how is the meaning of this statement to be understood?
Sariputta: “Saying… is it the case that there is anything else… is it the case that there is not anything else… is it the case that there both is & is not anything else… is it the case the there neither is nor is not anything else, one is objectifying the non-objectified.
However far the six spheres of contact go, that is how far objectification goes.
However far objectification goes, that is how far the six spheres of contact go.
With the remainderless ceasing & fading of the six spheres of contact, there comes to be the ceasing, the allaying of objectification.
“Monks, that dimension should be experienced where the eye ceases and the perception of form fades.
That dimension should be experienced where the ear ceases and the perception of sound fades… where the nose ceases and the perception of aroma fades… where the tongue ceases and the perception of flavor fades… where the body ceases and the perception of tactile sensation fades… where the intellect ceases and the perception of idea/phenomenon fades: That dimension should be experienced.
So there's nothing in the Pali discourses to indicate that the Buddha would have agreed with a modern materialist view that experience is limited to the six senses.
And it's doubtful that he would have tried to justify his claims in terms that a modern materialist would accept.
After all, he noted that the Buddha-range of a Buddha, and the jhana-range of a person in jhana are “inconceivables that are not to be conjectured about, that would bring madness and vexation to anyone who conjectured about them”.
This means that he wouldn't encourage the sort of conjecture that a materialist — or anyone else — might make about what a mind trained to master jhana or attain the supreme level of awakening could or couldn't know.
A second modern argument against accepting the canonical accounts of what's known in awakening — and in particular, the knowledge of rebirth achieved in awakening — is that one can still obtain all the results of the practice without having to accept the possibility of rebirth.
After all, all the factors leading to suffering are all immediately present to awareness, so there should be no need, when trying to abandon them, to accept any premises about where they may or may not lead in the future.
This objection, however, ignores the role of appropriate attention on the path.
As we noted above, one of its roles is to examine and abandon the assumptions that underlie one's views on the metaphysics of personal identity.
Unless you're willing to step back from your own views — such as those concerning what a person is, and why that makes rebirth impossible — and subject them to this sort of examination, there's something lacking in your path.
You'll remain entangled in the questions of inappropriate attention, which will prevent you from actually identifying and abandoning the causes of suffering and achieving the full results of the practice.
In addition, the terms of appropriate attention — the four noble truths — are not concerned simply with events arising and passing away in the present moment.
They also focus on the causal connections among those events, connections that occur both in the immediate present and over time.
If you limit your focus solely to connections in the present while ignoring those over time, you can't fully comprehend the ways in which craving causes suffering: not only by latching on to the four kinds of nutriment, but also giving rise to the four kinds of nutriment as well.
This narrow focus places an obstacle in your ability to develop right view — and in particular, your ability to see dependent co-arising as a self-sustaining process.
If, in line with the standard materialist view, you regard consciousness as a mere by-product of material processes, then there's no way you can appreciate the full power of consciousness and craving to generate the food that can sustain the processes of suffering indefinitely.
And if you don't fully appreciate this power, there's no way that you can effectively bring it to an end.
A third argument against accepting the knowledge of rebirth as a necessary part of awakening is that many modern people who claim to have experienced the levels of awakening described in the Canon gained no knowledge of rebirth or of the end of rebirth as part of those experiences.
The fact that people in the Buddha's time claimed to gain this sort of knowledge in the course of their awakening can thus be written off as a cultural artifact: They were primed to see it because of their cultural background, and so it wasn't really an essential part of the experience.
There are, however, two problems with this argument.
The first is that, as we have seen, rebirth was not a universally accepted assumption in the Buddha's time.
An important part of any person's experience of awakening — then as now — would be to prove for oneself whether the Buddha was right on the topic.
The second, more telling, problem with this third argument is that it actually defeats itself.
If one's experiences of awakening don't agree with the Canon's descriptions of the levels of awakening, why would one want to claim the Canon's labels for those experiences?
An essential part of even the first level of awakening described in the Canon — stream entry — confirms the rightness of right view, which includes the understanding that there is a deathless, birthless dimension, and that there is a level of craving that, if not abandoned, will lead to repeated birth.
The distinguishing mark of the attainment of arahantship — as opposed to the lower levels of awakening recognized in the Canon — is that it has put an end to that craving, thus putting an end to birth.
If the Canon is wrong on these points, then the terms it uses to describe the levels of awakening are bogus as well.
This means that if one's experience of awakening doesn't match the descriptions in the Canon, one would do well to examine one's motivation for wanting to claim a canonical label for that experience.
If one's teacher has certified that experience with a canonical name, the teacher's knowledge and motivation should be examined, too.
And if one seriously wants to put an end to suffering, one would do well to take to heart the Canon's insistence that if one's awakening has not put an end to becoming and birth, the possibility for continued suffering remains.
The irony in all three of these arguments against the teaching on rebirth is that the people who make them all assume that the Buddha was incapable of questioning the views of his time, and yet the fact is that they themselves are unwilling to accept the Buddha's challenge to step back and question their own.
We know how the Buddha responded to materialism in his own time, and there's no reason to assume that he would respond any differently to materialism today.
Some people might object that modern materialism is much more sophisticated now than it was in the time of the Buddha, and so it deserves a more serious hearing.
But is that really the case?
The questions that neurobiologists presently bring to issues of consciousness — “What is personal identity?
What sort of thing is consciousness?
How can consciousness be measured in material terms?” — are precisely the questions that the Buddha listed under inappropriate attention.
Even though modern scientific experiments may be more sophisticated than Prince Payasi's experiments on criminals, the scientists who conduct them are just as wrong-headed in thinking that a phenomenological process — consciousness and mental events as experienced from within — can be captured and measured in physical terms.
Although rebirth is often presented as an unscientific view, the material sciences actually have no way at all of proving the issue one way or the other.
As for the efficacy of human action, the scientific method can never prove whether the scientists applying it are actually exercising free will in designing their experiments.
It also can't prove whether their actions in designing and running an experiment actually have an impact on the experiment's results.
Scientific inquiry and peer review certainly act as if these assumptions are true — the idea of criticizing a poorly designed experiment would make no sense if scientists had no free will in designing their experiments.
And if we can judge by appearances, the assumption of free will and the responsibilities it carries have been crucial in enabling scientific knowledge to advance.
But the scientific method itself can't prove whether the appearance of free will and efficacious action is anything more than an appearance.
And of course there's the irony that many scientists assume that the phenomena they observe operate under strict deterministic laws, while the method they employ assumes that they themselves are not driven by such laws in applying that method.
This means that science is in no position to prove or disprove the Buddha's teachings on the range and powers of human action.
Finally, there's the whole question of how valid it is to divorce the Buddha's psychological insights from his cosmological teachings.
As we noted in chapter one, we in the West — beginning with the European Romantics and American Transcendentalists — have long assumed that cosmology is the rightful sphere of the physical sciences, while religion should limit itself to the care of the human psyche.
But one of the central insights of the Buddha's awakening is that events on the micro scale in the mind actually shape experiences on the macro scale in time and space.
If we can't question the clear line our culture draws between psychology and cosmology, we won't be in a position to appreciate the ways in which the Buddha's insight on this issue can actually help bring suffering to an end.
So we're faced with a choice.
If we're sincere about wanting to end suffering and to give the Buddha's teachings a fair test, then — instead of assuming that he was a prisoner of his own time and place, unable to question his cultural assumptions — we have to examine the extent to which, in adhering to our own cultural assumptions, we're imprisoning ourselves.
If we don't want to drop our self-imposed restrictions, we can still benefit from any of the Buddha's teachings that fit within those limitations, but we'll have to accept the consequences: that the results we'll get will be limited as well.
Only if we're willing to submit to the test of appropriate attention, abandoning the presuppositions that distort our thinking about issues like karma and rebirth, will we be able to make full use of the Canon's tools for gaining total release.
Pali Buddhist Texts:
Vedic Texts:
References to DN and MN are to discourse.
The reference to Mv is to chapter, section, and sub-section.
References to other Pali texts are to section and discourse.
All translations from the Pali Canon are the author's own, and are based on the Royal Thai Edition.
According to the teachings of the Buddha the human personality comprises five “aggregates of grasping,” called in Pali pañc'upadanakkhandha.
They are enumerated as:
We may wonder why the Buddha mentions only five aggregates, no more and no less.
We can attempt to answer this question by analyzing any unit of experience in our day-to-day life.
Suppose, for instance, we hear a big noise on the road, and we rush to the spot and recognize that a motorcycle accident has taken place; we feel sorry for the victim and want to rush him to the hospital.
If we look at this experience and analyze the physical and mental phenomena involved, we will notice that they can be accommodated within the five aggregates of grasping.
Of course, we all know the body or the material aspect of our personality.
It is this body which approached the site of the accident.
We heard the noise and saw the scene of the accident, that means we have had auditory and visual consciousness.
We recognized that it is a motorcycle accident, that is the aggregate of perception and ideation.
We felt sorry for the victim, and our sorrow is the feeling aspect of our personality.
We wanted to take the victim to hospital, and that is the volitional aspect.
Thus we have found all five aggregates of grasping in this unit of experience.
The physical and mental phenomena involved in all our varied experiences can be included within these five aggregates.
It is very likely that the Buddha too discovered these five aggregates of grasping by analyzing experience through objective awareness and intuitive wisdom.
Why are they called aggregates, khandha?
Khandha means “heap” or “accumulation.” It is easy to understand that the body is a heap of material elements.
We maintain its process of growth by heaping it up with gross material food.
In the mental sphere, too, through our experiences we accumulate feelings, perceptions and ideas, volitions, and consciousness.
Therefore all five aspects of the personality are called heaps, accumulations, or aggregates.
Since they are intimately interconnected and act on one another, the processes are extremely complex and complicated.
According to one commentarial simile they are like the waters at a confluence where five rivers meet.
One cannot take a handful of water and say that it came from such and such a river.
The aggregates are ever-changing and are constantly in a state of flux.
They are so volatile and dynamic that they give rise to the notion of “I” and “mine.” Just as a fast revolving firebrand gives the illusion of a circle of fire, these dynamic processes of physical and mental energy give rise to the illusion of I, self, ego, soul.
They are called aggregates of grasping because we cling to them passionately as “I” and “mine.” Just as an animal tied with a strap to a firm post runs round and round the post, stands, sits, and lies down beside the post, so the person who regards the five aggregates as his self cannot escape from the aggregates and the suffering, disappointment, and anxiety which invariably accompany them.
The five aggregates constitute a real private prison for us.
We suffer a great deal due to our attachment to this prison and our expectations of what the prison should be.
As our perception of the external world and our relations with our fellow human beings are conditioned by the nature of this prison, interpersonal relations and communication become extremely complex, tricky, and problematic.
Problems become more and more complicated to the extent that we identify ourselves with this private prison.
Now let us try to supplement our understanding of the canonical teachings in terms of our daily experience and see how we cling to each and every one of these aggregates as “I” and “mine,” and continue to suffer in the private prison that we make for ourselves.
If someone were to ask us the question: “Who are you?” we would immediately respond by stating: “I am so and so.” The name is but a label and it can be anything.
We can also say: “I am a human being.” By that we have only stated the species to which we belong.
“I am a man or woman.” This only affirms the sex of the person.
“I am so and so's daughter, sister, wife, mother,” etc.
These describe relationships, but we have still not answered the question: “Who are you?” We produce the identity card to prove our identity, but the identity card shows only a picture of the body with the name label.
Now we believe that we have satisfactorily answered the question: “Who are you?” Thus we identify ourselves with our bodies.
When we say: “I am tall, I am fat, I am fair,” etc., we really mean that the body is tall or fat or fair, but what we do is identify the body as What is more, we decorate it in various ways and regard it as our beautiful self, “Am I not beautiful in this sari?” We regard the body as our precious possession — “my face, my hair, my teeth,” etc.
Thus it is very clear that we cling to the material body as our very own self.
This identification is so widely accepted and thorough that it has crept in linguistic usages as well.
In words such as “somebody,” “everybody,” and “nobody,” “body” is used in the sense of person.
Now the Buddha, who analyzed the body objectively under the microscope of mindfulness, realized the true nature of the body and found that there is nothing in it that can be called beautiful.
It is made up of flesh, phlegm, saliva, blood, urine, and feces, all very repulsive.
Even what is generally considered beautiful such as hair, teeth, and nails, if found out of context, say for instance in one's food, becomes extremely repulsive.
So too the face of a beauty queen if closely looked at before an early morning wash.
It is not necessary to dwell at length on the ravages of old age and the decomposition of the body at death.
Therefore the Buddha says that this body is a bag of filth, a burden to be discarded rather than clung to as “I” and “mine.
The body is composed of the material elements of solidity, cohesion, heat, and motion.
There is nothing worth grasping in any of these elements.
They are found abundantly in the external world too, but we cling to this fathom-long blob of matter as “I” and “mine.
The Buddha defines the body, or “form,” as that which gets re-formed and de-formed; it is afflicted with heat, cold, and insects.
The body is but a body-building activity.
Modern medical science informs us that the body is composed of billions and billions of cells which are continually in a process of growth and decay.
What is meant here can be explained with the help of a simile.
We say that there is rain and use the noun “rain.” But in actuality there is no “thing” called rain apart from the activity of raining.
The process of drops of water falling from the sky — that we call rain.
Though we use the noun “rain,” there is in reality only the activity of raining which can be better described with a verb.
Similarly, what we call the body is but a process of body building; therefore the Buddha defines the noun “form” with its corresponding verb “forming”.
This process of body-building is going on all the time and thus is always in a state of unrest.
Therefore form is looked upon as impermanent.
In this changing process of body-building activity there is absolutely nothing that can be regarded as a self, an unchanging ego, an “I,” a permanent soul.
Thus our identification with the body as self is a big delusion.
During its lifetime the body passes through the stages of infancy, childhood, adolescence, youth, middle age and old age.
Throughout this process there is a type of suffering which is characteristic of each particular age.
Teething, learning skills in locomotion, communication add much frustration to infancy.
Childhood is comparatively free of suffering if one is fortunate to have a healthy body, but coping with the growing body can become frustrating if energy is not channeled towards healthy play and creative work.
Adolescence, when an individual is neither small enough to be a child nor mature enough to be an adult, is particularly troublesome.
In youth the body can be quite problematic as sexual energy is at its peak.
Unless it is wisely channeled, indulged in lawfully accepted ways, restrained with understanding, and sublimated, youth can lead to much misery.
In middle age the body is prone to pressure-related diseases; for many it is a period of much anxiety.
Suffering in old age is manifold; the body becomes too big a burden to carry.
Thus at no stage in life does the body remain trouble-free; it is a source of suffering throughout life.
However much we pamper the body with all five strands of sense pleasures, the body is never grateful.
It never behaves the way we would like it to behave.
However much we wash it, it gets dirty.
However much we feed it, it gets hungry and tired.
It falls ill, it gets old, it loses its beauty and strength.
It never stays within our control.
Therefore it is not worth hankering after, calling it “I” and “mine.
In the private prison of the five aggregates the body is the most tangible shapely wall.
The body of each person is a unique combination of elements having particular biochemical and bioelectrical properties.
Each body has strengths and weaknesses peculiar to itself.
Each one is prone to certain types of diseases in a particular way.
There is no individual who is completely healthy all through life.
One person may be asthmatic, another diabetic.
One may have a weak respiratory system, another a weak digestive system.
Each one suffers individually, privately, by the body he has inherited.
Our bodies vary in size, shape, color and appearance, and because of these differences we suffer various complexities.
Our bodies may not be what we would like them to be.
Then we get disappointed and depressed.
A woman who had lost her sight in early childhood regained her sight after about thirty years as a result of the shock of a sudden fall.
She was overjoyed to regain her sight, but her joy was short-lived, for she discovered through the mirror that she was not beautiful.
Such is the disappointment the body brings when it does not come up to our expectations.
The body also changes from age to age: the once beautiful strong body becomes the haggard and infirm, and we suffer on account of that.
We resort to various methods of making it beautiful and strong — we paint the face, dye the hair, use dentures and wigs; we take vitamins, tonics, and elixirs.
Yet all the same the body defies our expectations and we continue to suffer within the confines of the private prison of our body.
Once a friend of mine related how he saw a child meddling with the rear bumper of a parked car.
The owner started driving the car, and the child, clinging to the rear bumper, was yelling as he got dragged along.
If only the child let go of his hold on the car his suffering would have ceased.
Similarly, we cling to our body, and we grieve and lament when it goes according to its nature.
If only we would learn to let go of it, our suffering would cease.
Therefore the Buddha says: “Give up that which does not belong to you.
The five aggregates of grasping do not belong to you.
Feelings demarcate the body from the rest of the environment and give the body the sense of self.
The Khandhasamyutta says that the uninstructed man, being impressed by feelings which are produced through contact with ignorance, thinks “I am this.” The body is strewn with an intricately woven network of nerve fibers, and there is no part of the body which is not sensitive to touch.
The entire sensitive volume constitutes the I, the self, the ego.
When we say: “I am comfortable or happy or sad,” we identify ourselves with feelings.
Statements such as: “He does not care for my happiness, he hurt my feelings,” also show how we establish a sense of possession for our feelings.
There are three kinds of feelings, namely, pleasurable or happy feelings, unpleasant or painful feelings, and neutral feelings.
No two types ever occur concurrently at any single moment.
When pleasurable feelings are present the other two are absent; when painful feelings are there pleasant and neutral feelings are absent; similarly with neutral feelings.
The Mahanidana Sutta asks the question: when feelings are so complex in this manner, which feeling would one accept as one's self?
According to the Vedanasamyutta, innumerable feelings arise in the body just as all kinds of winds blow in different directions in the atmosphere.
We are hardly aware of these feelings for the simple reason that we do not pay enough attention to them.
If we observe, for a couple of minutes, how often we adjust our bodies and change the position of our limbs, we will be surprised to note that we hardly keep still even for a few seconds.
What is the reason for this constant change of position and posture?
Monotony of position causes discomfort and we change position and posture in search for comfort.
We react to feelings, yearning for more and more pleasurable feelings, revolting against unpleasant feelings, and being generally unaware of neutral feelings.
Therefore pleasurable feelings have desire as their latent tendency, unpleasant feelings have aversion as their latent tendency, and neutral feelings have ignorance as their latent tendency.
Thus all feelings generate unskillful motivational roots and they partake of the nature of suffering.
Though the search for comfort and pleasure goes on constantly throughout life, pleasure always eludes us like a mirage.
Our feelings are extremely private and personal.
One may have a splitting headache, but the one next to him may not know anything about his painful sensations.
We only infer the pain of another by his facial expressions, behavior, and words, but we certainly do not know the feelings of another.
We are so unique in the experiences of feelings: one may be sensitive to heat; another to cold, mosquitoes, or fleas; another to certain kinds of pollen.
One may have a low threshold for pain, another a high threshold.
Thus each one is so unique in the totality of his sensitivity that we are utterly and absolutely alone in our private prison of feelings.
The Buddha defines feeling as the act of feeling.
There is no “thing” called feeling apart from the act of feeling.
Therefore feelings are dynamic, ever-changing, impermanent.
They do not remain within our control either, for we cannot say: “Let me have or not have such and such feelings.” They come and go as they please, we have no control or right of ownership over them.
Therefore the Buddha exhorts us: “Give up that which does not belong to you.” Trying to possess that which is fleeting and defies ownership causes grief.
Giving up spells the end of sorrow.
Sañña in Pali is translated as perception or ideation.
Perception is nothing but the act of perceiving.
Thus it is a dynamic process, an activity.
What does it perceive?
It perceives colors such as blue, yellow, red, white, etc.
This definition of sañña seems to imply that the linguistic ability of man is associated with sañña.
The word sañña also means symbol, and symbolization is closely associated with language.
It is language that helps us to form ideas, and that is the reason why sañña is sometimes translated as ideation.
According to one's perception, one forms a point of view, an idea.
We identify ourselves with our ideas too: “This is my point of view, this is my idea, this is my opinion, this is what I meant” — these are all expressions identifying ourselves with ideation and perception.
Sometimes this identification is so strong that we are ready to sacrifice our lives for the sake of an idea.
Many wars are waged in the world propagating or defending ideas.
As this is such a dominant form of clinging it has been singled out by the Buddha as ditth'upadana, clinging to a particular view one chooses to believe in.
Identifying ourselves with various points of view we call ourselves democrats, socialists, eternalists, annihilationists, positivists.
Our ideas change due to changing emotions and circumstances.
A friend becomes a foe, an enemy becomes an ally, a stranger becomes a spouse.
Therefore in ideation too there is nothing constant and permanent; it is not possible to hold them fast as “I” and “mine” without coming to grief.
Memory is also associated with sañña.
That is why we are able to recognize a person we have met before.
Through the faculty of memory we recall having existed in the past experiencing such and such events.
By projecting the same kind of experience into the future we anticipate that we will exist in the future.
Thus through the memory aspect of sañña we posit the illusion of a self continuing through the three periods of past, present and future.
But we little realize that the retrospection of the past and the anticipation of the future are both in fact done in the present moment itself.
How does sañña form a wall in our private prison?
Each one of us perceives the world around us through our own preconceived ideas.
Let us take a very gross example.
A doctor's perception of the world will be quite different from the perception of a politician or a businessman.
A doctor looking at an apple might think of its nutritional value, a politician of the advantages and disadvantages permitting importation, the businessman of the commercial value.
Thus we are so much conditioned by our interests and ideologies — some absorbed from upbringing, some from the culture we are exposed to, some from the academic and professional training we have acquired — that no two people can have identical perceptions.
There are sufficient common factors in these aspects to allow us to form general superficial agreements with other individuals, but when we take into account all ramifications we have to conclude that as regards perception too each one of us lives in a private prison.
If we wish to experience wisdom and happiness welling within ourselves, we have to give up clinging to our ideas, unlearn what we have spent years to learn, decondition ourselves and empty our minds.
There are three types of volitional activities: physical, verbal, and mental.
We identify ourselves so much with these volitional activities that we posit an agent behind them as the doer, the speaker, and the thinker.
Therefore we say: “I do, I speak, I think.” Because this egocentricity in activities is so much emphasized, we want to perform not only at our maximum efficiency but we also try to outdo others.
Record breaking is a mania today.
There are so many competitors vying with one another at the international level eager to earn a place in the Guinness Book of Records.
Because of our volitional activities we are involved in an endless process of preparation from womb to tomb.
As infants we prepare ourselves for childhood, struggling and learning skills of locomotion and speech.
As children we prepare ourselves for youth, and then we study various skills, arts, and sciences trying to become successful adults.
Adults prepare for parenthood.
At last in our old age too we do not give up preparation.
We turn to religion in our old age to prepare for heaven.
This same aspect of our personalities is expressed in different words as cetana, intention, which in turn is said to constitute the moral force of kamma which propels life from birth to birth.
Repeated action has the cumulative effect of transforming character, and thus through repeated volitional activities we can shape our destinies.
A little story taken from an Indian classical text illustrates how our destiny is affected by our behavior.
One day two young men who were lost in a forest chanced to meet a hermit living there who was able to predict the future.
Before departing the young men requested the hermit to tell their fortunes.
The hermit was reluctant, but the men pleaded.
Then the hermit observed them closely and predicted that Vipul would be a king within a year and Vijan would die in the hands of an assassin.
Vipul was very much elated and Vijan was naturally very sad.
They went back to their homes and Vipul became very arrogant in his behavior towards others, thinking he would soon be king.
Vijan was a teacher and he performed his duties conscientiously; he became very virtuous and led a humble meditative life.
After about six months Vipul called his friend to go in search of a place to build a palace, and they went into a deserted area.
When they were searching Vipul found a pot of gold and was very happy that his fortune was unfolding.
When the two friends were examining the gold in great happiness and excitement, a bandit rushed in and snatched the pot.
Vijan fought with the bandit and rescued the gold, but had to suffer a cut on the shoulder from the bandit's weapon.
Vipul invited Vijan to share the gold, but Vijan declined the offer as he would die in a few months.
Vipul took the gold and spent it in eating, drinking and enjoying himself in anticipation of becoming king.
Vijan spent the time in meditation and humility.
A year passed but the prediction did not come true.
They revisited the hermit and asked why his prediction had not come to pass.
The hermit explained that by the arrogant behavior of Vipul his fortune was reduced to a mere pot of gold, while the virtuous behavior of Vijan was powerful enough to mitigate his misfortune to a mere wound in the hands of a bandit.
The noun sankhara is defined by its verbal counterpart thus: “Volitional activities are those which construct, form, shape or prepare the physical body into what it is, the feelings into what they are, perceptions, volitional activities and consciousness into what they are.” This is a process that is going on all the time.
What is meant can be understood in the following manner: the distinctive physical and mental characteristic features of each individual are determined by these volitional activities.
To this category belong all our hopes, aspirations, ambitions and determinations, and we identify ourselves with them as my hopes, my ambitions, etc.
No two people will be identical in this respect too.
What one person will treasure and strive for, another may consider a trifle.
When one person prefers to hoard money, another would prefer to spend it on education.
Still another may consider both of these as insignificant and run after power, honor, and prestige.
We shape our destinies alone, imprisoned as we are within the wall of volitional activities.
If we want to free ourselves, we have to give up identification with this prison wall too.
Consciousness is defined as the act of becoming conscious of objects through the instrumentality of the sense faculties.
Therefore there is eye-consciousness, ear-consciousness, nose-consciousness, tongue-consciousness, body-consciousness, and mind-consciousness.
This cognitive process takes place so rapidly and so continuously that we identify ourselves with the function of the sense faculties as: “I see, I hear, I smell, I taste, I feel, I think and imagine.” According to the Buddha there is no I, ego, self, or soul who cognizes and enjoys these sense objects.
Sense consciousness is but a causally produce phenomenon, dependent on sense faculties and sense objects.
Each person's sense faculties are differently constituted.
Some are blind, some have weak eyes, some have keen vision, some are deaf, some are short of hearing and some have sharp hearing.
Because of the differences in the very constitution of the sense faculties our cognitive capacity too has to be different, however slight the differences may be.
Moreover, our sense experiences are conditioned by our likes and dislikes, by our previous experiences and memories, by our aspirations and ambitions.
As such, however much we value sense experience as authentic, no two people will experience the same sense object in exactly the same way.
For example, suppose that three people are watching a fight between two boys.
If the three people happen to be a friend, an enemy, and a parent of one of those involved in the fight, the three people will have entirely different views regarding it.
Our senses communicate to us what we prefer to see.
Volitions condition consciousness throughout our day-to-day experiences.
For instance, if we are looking for a pen on a crowded table, we may see the pen and take it away.
We may have failed to see the glass that was next to it and we may have to make a fresh search for the glass, rather than look straight at the place where the pen was.
This is because what we look for is predetermined by our will, which to a certain extent excludes from our field of attention and vision things irrelevant to our purposes.
If we gaze at a scene vacantly, only a few items which kindled our interest are registered in our memory.
Interests are divergent, therefore different people see different things in the same situation.
Thus it is extremely difficult to acquire impartial objective experience of sense objects, as each one of us is psychologically conditioned in a unique way.
Therefore in sense experience too we lead a lonely private life imprisoned in a private cell.
Because each one of us is leading a secluded life within the confines of our individual personalities, interpersonal relations become extremely difficult and complicated.
The way to be released from this self-imprisonment is to stop regarding the five constituents of personality individually or collectively as “I” and “mine.
According to the Khandhasamyutta, a man carried down by the strong current of a river grabs at the grasses and leaves overhanging the river, but they give him no support as they are easily uprooted.
Similarly, the uninstructed man grabs at the five aggregates as his self or ego, but as they are themselves evanescent and unstable they cannot support him.
Being dependent on them the man only comes to grief and delusion.
We have to realize the impermanent, ever-changing, conditional nature of these five factors of personality and become detached from them.
It is only with this detachment that we can make ourselves free from the self-made private prison of our personality.
Lily de Silva is Professor of Pali and Buddhist Studies at the University of Peradeniya in Sri Lanka.
A regular contributor to Buddhist scholarly and popular journals, she is also the editor of the subcommentary to the Digha Nikaya, published by the Pali Text Society of London.
Her collection of essays, One Foot in the World, is published by BPS.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
The Sa.myutta Nikaaya is one of the five great divisions of the Sutta Pi.taka of the Paali canon, the Tipi.taka or “Three Baskets” of doctrine, constituting the Buddha-word for Theravaada Buddhism.
The meaning of “Sa.myutta Nikaaya” is “The Collection of Grouped Discourses” and it is so called because its material is arranged into groups according to subject, of which there are fifty-six.
These again are placed into five vaggas, sections or chapters, corresponding to the five divisions of this anthology.
In the Paali Text Society's complete edition the whole work is contained in five volumes, covering over, pages, so it will be realized that this anthology is a very small selection indeed of the complete Sa.myutta Nikaaya.
The present anthology differs from others that have appeared in that it is not arranged in any special order, merely following the order of the text itself, and that it is confined to just one part of the Paali Tipi.taka.
As regards the choice of material, an attempt was made to make it as representative as possible of the whole collection, but personal preference could not be ignored.
Choice tended to fall upon the more striking discourses, the avoidance of passages that were too repetitive and the inclusion of those that contained similes and parables, so profoundly illuminating and easily remembered.
— John D.
Ireland
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Saavatthi, at the Jeta Grove in Anaathapi.n.dika's monastery.
Now when night was passing a certain devataa, lighting up the whole Jeta Grove with her surpassing beauty, approached the Lord.
Having drawn near and prostrated herself she stood to one side.
Standing there the devataa said:
The Lord replied:
“Once, bhikkhus, a certain devataa of the Heaven of the Thirty-Three, while wandering in the Nandana Grove surrounded by a group of celestial nymphs and possessing and enjoying the fivefold heavenly sense pleasures, recited at that time this verse:
“To these words another devataa retorted with this verse:
…Standing at one side Kaamada devaputta said to the Lord:
“It is difficult to do, Lord, very difficult to do!
“It is difficult to attain, Lord, this contentment!
“It is difficult, Lord, to concentrate the mind!
“It is difficult, Lord, going on an uneven path!
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Saavatthi at the Jeta Grove in Anaathapi.n.dika's monastery.
Then the king Pasenadi of Kosala approached the Lord.
Having drawn near and prostrated himself he sat down to one side.
As he was sitting there king Pasenadi said to the Lord:
“When, Sir, I had retired and was alone this was the reflection that arose in my mind: Who loves himself?
Who does not love himself?
And then, Sir, I thought: Those who practice wrong conduct by body, speech and thought, they do not love themselves.
Even though they should say, 'We love ourselves,' yet they do not love themselves.
What is the reason?
They do to themselves what a hater would do to someone he hates.
Therefore they do not love themselves.
“But those who practice good conduct by body, speech and thought, they love themselves.
Even though they should say, 'We do not love ourselves,' yet they do love themselves.
What is the reason?
They do to themselves what a friend would do to a friend.
Therefore they love themselves.
“So it is, O King, so it is…
“What do you think, O King?
Suppose a loyal and reliable man were to come from the east and approaching you should say: 'Your majesty, you should know I have come from the east and there saw a great mountain as tall as the sky, moving forward and crushing all living creatures in its path.
Do whatever you deem right, sire.'
“And then a second man were to come from the west… a third from the north… a fourth from the south and approaching you should say: 'Your majesty, you should know I have come from the south and there saw a great mountain as tall as the sky, moving forward and crushing all living creatures in its path.
Do whatever you deem right, sire.'
“And in such a situation, O King, when a great danger of terrible destruction to human life has arisen and when considering that a human birth is so difficult to obtain, what is it you could do?
“In such a situation, Sir, a great danger of terrible destruction to human life having arisen and a human birth being so difficult to obtain, what else could be done but to practice Dhamma, to live calmly, to do good and to make merit.
“I tell you, O King, I put it to you: old age and death will come upon you.
Since old age and death are coming what is it you can do?
“Since old age and death are coming upon me what else can be done but to practice Dhamma, to live calmly, to do good and to make merit?
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was stating among the Sakyas at Silaavati and a large number of bhikkhus were dwelling close by, diligent and energetic, devoting themselves.
Now Maara, the evil one, assuming the appearance of a braahmana, with a great pile of matted hair on his head and wearing a leopard-skin cloak, an old man, bent like a roof-beam, breathing heavily and grasping an udumbara-wood staff approached those bhikkhus and said:
“You ascetics are still boys!
Young and black-haired, in the flush of youth!
You are in the prime of life and have not yet amused yourselves with pleasures.
Enjoy human pleasures, goods sirs!
Do not abandon what is visible here and now and run after distant things.
“We have not abandoned what is visible here and now, braahmana, nor are we running after distant things.
We have abandoned what is distant and run towards what is visible here and now.
The Lord has said pleasures are distant, produce much suffering and despair and are a continual disappointment.
But this Dhamma is visible here and now, immediate, inviting one to come and see, guiding one onward and capable of being experienced by the wise.
When they had so spoken, Maara, the evil one, departed shaking his head, lolling out his tongue, frowning and leaning on his staff.
Then those bhikkhus approached the Lord… 
“That was no braahmana, bhikkhus, that was Maara, the evil one, come to cloud your clarity of vision.
Then the Lord, having realized the meaning of it, spoke at that time this verse:
At Saavatthii.
Now the bhikkhunii Vajiraa, having robed herself and taken her bowl and upper robe, entered Saavatthii before noon to collect food.
Having wandered through Saavatthii and returned after her meal, she entered the Andha Grove and sat down at the foot of a certain tree to rest during the heat of midday.
Then Maara, the evil one, approached the bhikkhunii Vajiraa and, desiring to cause fear and consternation, to make her hair stand on end and cause her to fall away from concentration of mind, addressed her with this verse:
Then the bhikkhunii Vajiraa thought, “Who is this human or non-human being who speaks this verse?” And then she thought, “It is Maara, the evil one, desiring to cause me fear and consternation, to make my hair stand on end and cause me to fall away from concentration of mind.” So the bhikkhunii Vajiraa, realizing that it was Maara, the evil one, replied to him in verse:
And Maara, the evil one, thinking, “The bhikkhunii Vajiraa recognizes me,” vanished away, grieved and dejected.
Formerly, bhikkhus, when Sakka, Lord of the devas, was a human being, he undertook to practice unremittingly seven rules of conduct, by reason of which he attained his position of honor.
What seven?
As long as I live may I support my mother and father;
As long as I live may I respect the elders of my family;
As long as I live may I speak kindly and gently;
As long as I live may I not speak maliciously;
As long as I live may I dwell in my house with my mind free from the taint of selfishness, generous, open-handed, pleased to relinquish, accessible to entreaties, enjoying giving and sharing with others;
As long as I live may I speak truthfully;
As long as I live may I control my anger and if anger arises in me may I quickly dispel it.
The Lord said: “Bhikkhus, I will teach you Dependent Arising, listen attend carefully and I will speak.
“Yes, Sir,” those bhikkhus replied to the Lord.
The Lord said: “Now what, bhikkhus, is Dependent Arising?
With ignorance as condition, bhikkhus, volitional activities come to be; with volitional activities as condition, consciousness comes to be; with consciousness as condition, mind-and-body come to be; with mind-and-body as condition, the sixfold sense-field comes to be; with the sixfold sense-field as condition, contact comes to be; with contact as condition, feeling comes to be; with feeling as condition, craving comes to be; with craving as condition, grasping comes to be; with grasping as condition, becoming comes to be; with becoming as condition, birth comes to be; with birth as condition, aging and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair come to be.
That is how there is an origin to this whole mass of suffering.
And this, bhikkhus, is called Dependent Arising.
“But from the complete disappearance and cessation of ignorance, volitional activities cease; from the cessation of volitional activities, consciousness ceases; from the cessation of consciousness, mind-and-body ceases; from the cessation of mind-and-body, the sixfold sense-field ceases; from the cessation of the sixfold sense-field contact ceases; from the cessation of contact feeling ceases; from the cessation of feeling, craving ceases; from the cessation of craving, grasping ceases; from the cessation of grasping, becoming ceases; from the cessation of becoming, birth ceases; from the cessation of birth, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair cease.
That is how there is a ceasing of this whole mass of suffering.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is aging-and-death?
“That which, for these and those beings, in this and that group of beings, is aging, becoming old, decayed-ness, graying of the hair, wrinkling of the skin, drawing to an end of the life-span, failing of the sense-faculties: this is called aging.
“That which, for these and those beings, in this and that group of beings, is passing away, breaking up, disappearance, mortality and dying, making an end, the separation of the aggregates, the casting away of the body: this is called death.
This is aging and this is death and these, bhikkhus, are called aging-and-death.
“And what, bhikkhus, is birth?
“That which, for these and those beings, in this and that group of beings, is birth, being born, conception, reproduction, the appearing of the aggregates, the acquiring of the bases: this, bhikkhus, is called birth.
“And what, bhikkhus, is becoming?
“There are these three becomings: sensuous becoming, form becoming and formless becoming.
This, bhikkhus, is called becoming.
“And what, bhikkhus, is grasping?
“There are these four grasping: grasping at sense objects, grasping at views, grasping at rituals and observances and grasping at a soul-theory.
This, bhikkhus, is called grasping.
“And what, bhikkhus, is craving?
“There are these six groups of craving: craving for visible objects, sounds, scents, tastes, tangible objects, and objects of mind.
This, bhikkhus is called craving.
“And what, bhikkhus, is feeling?
“There are these six groups of feeling born of eye-contact and mind-contact, ear-contact, nose-contact, tongue-contact, bodily-contact and mind-contact.
This, bhikkhus, is called feeling.
“And what, bhikkhus, is contact?
“There are these six groups of contact: eye-contact, ear-contact, nose-contact, tongue-contact, bodily-contact and mind-contact.
This, bhikkhus, is called contact.
“And what, bhikkhus, is the sixfold sense-field?
“Eye-base, ear-base, nose-base, tongue-base, tactile-base and mind-base.
This, bhikkhus, is called the sixfold sense-field.
“And what, bhikkhus, is mind-and-body?
“Feeling, perception, volition, contact and attention: this is called mind.
The four great elements and the material form assumed by the four great elements: this is called mind-and-body.
“And what, bhikkhus, is consciousness?
“There are these six groups of consciousness: eye-consciousness, ear-consciousness, nose-consciousness, tongue-consciousness, body-consciousness and mind-consciousness.
This, bhikkhus, is called consciousness.
“And what, bhikkhus, are volitional activities?
“There are these three volitional activities: a volitional activity of body, a volitional activity of speech, a volitional activity of mind.
These, bhikkhus, are called volitional activities.
“And what, bhikkhus, is ignorance?
“Whatever is absence of knowledge into suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering and the way leading to cessation of suffering.
This, bhikkhus, is called ignorance.
“I will teach you dependent arising, bhikkhus, and phenomena that are dependently arisen…
“Now what, bhikkhus, is Dependent Arising?
“With birth as condition, aging-and-death comes to be.
Whether Tathaagatas appear or do not appear, this nature of things continues, this relatedness of phenomena, this regularity of phenomena, this law of conditionality.
A Tathaagata fully awakens and penetrates to it.
Having fully awakened and penetrated to it, he announces it, teaches it, makes it known, presents it, discloses it, analyzes it, and explains it.
'See' he says, 'with birth as condition, aging-and-death comes to be.
With becoming as condition, birth comes to be.' Whether Tathaagatas appear or do not appear…
”…'See,' he says, 'With ignorance as condition, volitional activities come to be.'
“So, bhikkhus, that which herein is a reality and not an unreality and not otherwise, this law of conditionality — this, bhikkhus, is called Dependent Arising.
“Now what, bhikkhus, are dependently arisen phenomena?
“Aging-and-death, bhikkhus, is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; of a nature to decay, to pass away, to be destroyed and to cease.
“Birth… becoming… grasping… ignorance, bhikkhus, is impermanent, conditioned, dependently arisen; of a nature to decay, to pass away, to be destroyed and to cease.
These, bhikkhus, are called dependently arisen phenomena.
“When a noble disciple has well seen this dependent arising and those dependently arisen phenomena according to actuality with perfect wisdom, it does not occur to him that he should run back to the past, saying 'Did I exist in the past?' 'Did I not exist in the past?' 'What was I in the past?' 'What was I like in the past?' 'Having been what, what did I become in the past?'
“Nor that he should run ahead to the future, saying, 'Shall I exist in the future?' 'Shall I not exist in the future,' 'What shall I be in the future?' 'What shall I be like in the future?' 'Being what, what shall I become in the future?'
“Nor that he should now in the present have doubts within himself, saying, 'Am I?' 'Am I not?' 'What am I?' 'What am I like?' 'This being, where did it come from, where will it go to?'
“What is the reason?
It is because the noble disciple has well seen this dependent arising and these dependently arisen phenomena according to actuality with perfect wisdom.
“Bhikkhus, when it is raining heavily on a mountain-top the water, flowing down the slope, fills the mountain grottos, clefts and gullies, these being filled the small hollows are filled, these being filled the lakes are filled, these being filled the streams are filled, these being filled the large rivers are filled, these being filled the great sea, the ocean, is filled.
“Similarly, bhikkhus, ignorance is the condition for volitional activities, volitional activities are the condition for consciousness, consciousness is the condition for mind-and-body, mind-and-body is the condition for the sixfold sense-field, the sixfold sense-field is the condition for contact, contact is the condition for feeling, feeling is the condition for craving, craving is the condition for grasping, grasping is the condition for becoming, becoming is the condition for birth, birth is the condition for suffering, suffering is the condition for faith, faith is the condition for gladness, gladness is the condition for joy, joy is the condition for tranquility, tranquility is the condition for bliss, bliss is the condition for concentration, concentration is the condition for knowledge and clear-seeing according to actuality, knowledge and clear-seeing according to actuality is the condition for disenchantment, disenchantment is the condition for detachment, detachment is the condition for liberation and liberation is the condition for knowledge of exhaustion.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the seventy-seven sources of knowledge… Now what, bhikkhus, are the seventy-seven?
“The knowledge that aging-and-death is conditioned by birth; the knowledge that there being no birth there is no aging-and-death; the knowledge that in the past aging-and-death was conditioned by birth; the knowledge that had there been no birth there would have been no aging-and-death; the knowledge that in the future aging-and-death will be conditioned by birth; the knowledge that if there is no birth there will be no aging-and-death; the knowledge that whatever there is of knowledge concerning the relatedness of phenomena, this is also of a nature to decay, to pass away, to be destroyed and to cease.
“An uninstructed ordinary person, bhikkhus, might well be dispassionate towards this body, made of the four great elements, might well detach himself and be released from it.
For what reason?
It is seen how this body grows and decays, is taken up and laid aside.
Therefore an uninstructed ordinary person might well be dispassionate toward it, might well detach himself and be released from it.
But this, bhikkhus, which is called mind, is called thought, is called consciousness — towards this an uninstructed ordinary person is not able to be dispassionate, is not able to be detached and released.
What is the reason?
For a long time this has been that with which he identifies himself, to which he has been attached and has held on to, thinking, 'This is mine,' 'I am this,' 'This is myself.' Therefore an uninstructed ordinary person is not able to be dispassionate towards it, to be detached and released from it.
“It would be better, bhikkhus, if an uninstructed ordinary person regarded this body, made of the four great elements, as himself rather than the mind.
For what reason?
This body is seen to continue for a year, for two years, five years, ten years, twenty years, fifty years, a hundred years and even more.
But of that which is called mind, is called thought, is called consciousness, one moment arises as another ceases continually both day and night.
Just as a monkey wandering in a big forest seizes a branch and letting go of it seizes another: similarly, bhikkhus, of that which is called mind, is called thought, is called consciousness, one moment arises as another ceases continually both day and night.
“Now as to this, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple gives well reasoned attention to the dependent arising thus: this being, that is; from the arising of this, that arises: this not being, that is not; from the ceasing of this, that ceases.
“That is to say, with ignorance as condition, volitional activities come to be; with volitional activities as condition, consciousness comes to be… That is how there is an origin of this whole mass of suffering.
But from the complete disappearance and cessation of ignorance, volitional activities cease… That is how there is the ceasing of this whole mass of suffering.
“So seeing, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple is dispassionate towards body, feeling, perception, mental activities and consciousness.
Being dispassionate he detaches himself, being detached he is released and in release is the knowledge of being released and he knows: Finished is birth, lived is the holy life, done is what had to be done, there is no more of this or that state.
“Bhikkhus, it is just as if a person wandering through the jungle, the great forest should see an ancient path, an ancient road, traveled along by men of former times.
And as if he should go along it and going along it should see an ancient town, an ancient royal city, inhabited by men of former times, having parks, groves, ponds and walls — a delightful place.
And then that person should inform the King or the King's chief minister, saying, 'My lord you should know that when wandering through the jungle, the great forest, I saw an ancient path, an ancient road, traveled along by men of former times.
I went along it and saw an ancient town, an ancient royal city inhabited by men of former times, having parks, groves, ponds and walls — a delightful place.
Sire, rebuild that city.' And then the king or the king's chief minister were to rebuild that city, so that in time it became rich, prosperous and well populated, expanded and developed.
“So also, bhikkhus, have I seen an ancient path, an ancient road, traveled along by fully Enlightened Ones of former times.
And what, bhikkhus, is that ancient path, that ancient road, traveled along by fully Enlightened Ones of former times?
It is just this Noble Eightfold Path, that is to say, right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.
“This is that ancient path, that ancient road, traveled along by fully Enlightened Ones of former times, and going along it I came to know aging-and-death, I came to know the origin of aging-and-death, I came to know the cessation of aging-and-death, I came to know the way leading to cessation of aging-and-death.
Going along it I came to know birth… becoming… grasping… craving… I came to know volitional activities, I came to know the origin of volitional activities, I came to know the cessation of volitional activities, I came to know the line of conduct leading to cessation of volitional activities.
“Having understood it I have taught it to the bhikkhus, the bhikkhuniis, the male and female lay-followers, so that this holy life has become rich, prosperous and wide-spread, known to many, widely known and announced by devas and men.
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Saavatthii, at the Jeta Grove in Anaathapi.n.dika's monastery.
Then the Lord, taking up a little dust on the tip of his nail, said “What do you think, bhikkhus, which is greater?
This little dust on the tip of my nail or the great earth?
“This great earth is surely greater, sir.
Compared with it the little dust on the tip of the Lord's nail is insignificant, it does not amount to a hundredth part, a thousandth part, a hundred thousandth part, set beside the great earth.
“Even so, bhikkhus, for a noble disciple who has view, for a person possessing realization, this is the greater suffering: that which is completely finished and exhausted.
Insignificant is what is left over set beside the former heap of suffering that is completely finished and exhausted, it does not amount to a hundredth part, a thousandth part, a hundred thousandth part — seven times at the most.
“So great a gain, bhikkhus, is realization of the Dhamma, so great a gain is to it to obtain Dhamma-vision.
“It is through having like-qualities, bhikkhus, that beings associate and meet together.
Beings of inferior disposition associate and meet with beings of inferior disposition.
Beings of virtuous disposition associate and meet with beings of virtuous disposition.
It was so in the past, it will be so in the future and it is so now.
“Just as a stick thrown up into the air sometimes falls on its butt, sometimes on its side, and sometimes on its tip: similarly, bhikkhus, do beings obstructed by ignorance and fettered by craving migrate and go the round of births.
At one time going from this world to another world and at another time coming from another world to this world.
What is the reason?
“Unimaginable, bhikkhus, is a beginning to the round of births.
For beings obstructed by ignorance and fettered by craving migrating and going the round of births a starting point is not evident.
Thus for a long time, bhikkhus have you experienced suffering, pain and destruction and the cemeteries have grown.
Long enough for you to have become dispassionate towards all conditioned things, long enough for you to have become detached and released from them.
“Unimaginable, bhikkhus, is a beginning to the round of births.
For beings obstructed by ignorance and fettered by craving migrating and going the round of births a starting point is not evident.
It is not easy, bhikkhus, to find a being who has not formerly been one's mother… been one's father… one's brother… sister… son… daughter during this long, long time.
“Therefore, Kassapa, you should train yourself thus: 'Keen shame and dread should be present among elders, new bhikkhus and those of middle-standing.'
“'…Whatever Dhamma-teaching I should hear, bearing upon what is skillful and good, I will listen to all of it with interest and attention and with concentrated mind give ear to it.'
“'…Mindfulness of the body, giving ease and comfort, should not be forsaken by me.'
“Thus should you train yourself, Kassapa.
“Disastrous, bhikkhus, are gain, honor and fame, a bitter, severe danger to the attainment of unsurpassed security from bondage.
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus:
“'When gain, honor and fame have arisen we will renounce them and will not let them establish a hold over our hearts.'
“Just as the beams of a house with a peaked-roof all go to the peak, meet at the peak, are joined at the peak: similarly, bhikkhus, whatever unskilled, bad states there are, are all rooted in ignorance, meet in ignorance, are conjoined with ignorance.
Therefore, bhikkhus, you should train yourselves thus: 'We will live diligently.'
“Just as whatever families having many women and few men are easily plundered by robbers and thieves, similarly, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu who has not developed and often practiced liberation of the heart by love is easily attacked by non-human beings.
“Just as whatever families having few women and many men are difficult to plunder by robbers and thieves, similarly, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu who has developed and often practiced liberation of the heart by love is not easily attacked by non-human beings.
Therefore, bhikkhus, I say, you should train yourselves thus:
“'We will develop the liberation of the heart by love; will often practice it, make a habit of it, an objective of it; will establish it and make a thorough effort to become well acquainted with it.'
“Formerly, bhikkhus, the Dasaarahas had a summoning-drum.
As the drum began to split the Dasaarahas inserted one peg and then another peg until in time the summoning-drum's old drumhead had disappeared and only a framework of pegs remained.
“Even so, bhikkhus, will the bhikkhus become in the future.
And those discourses spoken by the Tathaagata, profound in meaning, transcendental, dealing with voidness, to these they will not listen when they are recited, they will not lend an ear, they will not set the heart upon final knowledge and will not consider that those things should be learned and mastered.
But those discourses made by poets, poetry, mere beautiful words and phrases, spoken by outsiders and disciples, to these they will listen… they will consider that these things should be learned and mastered.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, I say, you should train yourselves thus:
“'Those discourses spoken by the Tathaagata profound in meaning, transcendental, dealing with voidness, to these we will listen when they are recited, we will lend an ear, we will set the heart upon final knowledge and we will consider that these things should be learned and mastered.'
The Venerable Saariputta said: “When, friends, I had gone into seclusion this thought arose in my mind, 'Is there anything in the world, a change and alteration in which would cause sorrow, lamentation, suffering, grief and despair to arise in me?' And then, friends, I thought, 'No.
there is nothing…' Thereupon the Venerable AAnanda said: “But a change and alteration in the Teacher, friend Saariputta.
Would not that cause sorrow, lamentation, suffering, grief and despair to arise?
“Even a change and alteration in the Teacher, friend AAnanda, would not cause sorrow… to arise in me.
Nevertheless I would think in this manner: 'May the Teacher, so influential, of so great supernormal potency and power, not depart.
If the Lord were to stay for a long time it would surely be for the welfare and happiness of many people, out of compassion for the world, for the good, welfare and happiness of devas and men.' “Certainly for a long time 'I-ness' 'mine-ness' and the underlying tendency to conceit have been thoroughly eradicated from the venerable Saariputta, in as much as even a change and alteration in the Teacher would not cause sorrow, lamentation, suffering, grief and despair to arise In the Venerable Saariputta.
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Saavatthii… and there he addressed the bhikkhus as follows:
“Develop concentration, bhikkhus; a bhikkhu who is concentrated understands according to actuality.
And what does he understand according to actuality?
The origin and extinction of body, the origin and extinction of feeling, the origin and extinction of perception, the origin and extinction of mental activities, the origin and extinction of consciousness.
“The body, bhikkhus, is impermanent.
What is impermanent, that is suffering.
What is suffering, that is not-self.
What is not-self 'This is not mine,' 'I am not this,' 'This is not myself': in this manner it should be seen according to actuality with perfect wisdom.
“Feeling is impermanent… Perception… Mental activities… Consciousness is impermanent.
What is impermanent, that is suffering.
What is suffering, that is not-self.
What is not-self, should be considered, 'This is not mine,' 'I am not this,' 'This is not myself': in this manner it should be seen according to actuality with perfect wisdom.
“The body, bhikkhus, is impermanent.
That which is the cause, that which is the condition, for the appearing of body, that is also impermanent.
How could the body, produced by what is impermanent, ever be permanent?
“Feeling is impermanent… Perception… Mental activities… Consciousness is impermanent.
That which is the cause, that which is the condition, for the appearing of consciousness, that is also impermanent.
How could consciousness, produced by what is impermanent, ever be permanent?
“So seeing, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple is dispassionate towards the body, dispassionate towards feeling, dispassionate towards perception, dispassionate towards mental activities, dispassionate towards consciousness.
Being dispassionate he detaches himself, being detached he is released and in release is the knowledge of being released and he knows: finished is birth, lived is the holy life, done is what had to be done, there is no more of this or that state.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the things which should be fully understood and what is full understanding…
“Now what, bhikkhus, are the things which should be fully understood?
The body is a thing which should be fully understood.
Feeling… Perception… Mental activities… Consciousness is a thing which should be fully understood.
“And what, bhikkhus, is full understanding?
The extinction of greed, aversion and delusion.
“Before my Enlightenment, bhikkhus, when I was not completely enlightened, when I was a Bodhisatta, I thought: What is the satisfaction and misery in regard to the body, and the release from it?
What is the satisfaction and misery in regard to feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness, and the release from them?
“And then, bhikkhus, this occurred to me: Whatever happiness and pleasure arises dependent upon the body: this is the satisfaction of the body.
Whatever there is of impermanence, suffering and changeability in the body: this is the misery of the body.
Whatever there is of being rid of desire and attachment, the abandoning of desire and attachment in regard to the body: this is the release from the body.
“Whatever happiness and pleasure arises dependent upon feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness: this is the satisfaction of consciousness.
Whatever there is of impermanence, suffering and changeability in consciousness: this is the misery of consciousness.
Whatever there is of being rid of desire and attachment, the abandoning of desire and attachment in regard to consciousness: this is the release from consciousness.
“As long, bhikkhus, as I did not know satisfaction as satisfaction, misery as misery, and release from the five aggregates of grasping as release from them according to actuality, so long did I not acknowledge that, in the world with its devas, maaras, and braahmas with its recluses and braahmanas and mankind with its princes and men, I was completely enlightened with unequaled and perfect enlightenment.
“But when, bhikkhus, I knew satisfaction as satisfaction, misery as misery, and release from the five aggregates of grasping as release from them according to actuality — I then acknowledged that…I was completely enlightened with unequaled and perfect Enlightenment.
“And the knowledge and vision arose in me: Unshakable is my liberation of the heart, this is the final birth, there is now no further becoming.
At one time the Lord was staying near Saavatthii… and said: “What is not yours, bhikkhus, renounce it.
Renouncing it will be to your good, to your happiness.
And what, bhikkhus, is not yours?
The body, bhikkhus, is not yours… Feeling… Perception… Mental activities… Consciousness, bhikkhus, is not yours, renounce it.
Renouncing it will be to your good, to your happiness.
“It is as if a person were to carry away, burn or do as he pleased with the grass, twigs, branches and foliage in this Jeta Grove.
Would it occur to you to say, 'The person is carrying us away, is burning us, is doing as he pleases with us'?
“Certainly not, Sir.
“For what reason?
“Because, Lord, this is not ourselves nor what belongs to ourselves.
“So also, bhikkhus, the body is not yours, renounce it.
Renouncing it will be to your good, to your happiness.
Feeling is not yours… Perception is not yours… Mental activities are not yours… Consciousness is not yours, renounce it.
Renouncing it will be to your good, to your happiness.
“A Tathaagata, bhikkhus, being a Perfected One is fully enlightened.
Because of dispassion for the body, detachment from the body, cessation of the body, he is called 'liberated without grasping,' 'fully enlightened.' And a bhikkhu liberated by wisdom, because of dispassion for the body, detachment from the body, cessation of the body, is called 'liberated without grasping,' 'liberated by wisdom.'
“A Tathaagata being a Perfected One is fully enlightened.
Because of dispassion for feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness… He is called 'liberated without grasping,' 'fully enlightened.' And a bhikkhu liberated by wisdom, because of dispassion for feeling… consciousness… is called 'liberated without grasping,' 'liberated by wisdom.' Now, bhikkhus, what is the distinction, what is the divergence, what is the difference between a Tathaagata, a Perfected One, a Fully Enlightened One, and a bhikkhu liberated by wisdom?
“For us, Sir, such things originate from the Lord, we have the Lord as our guide, the Lord as our resort.
It would indeed be good, Sir, if the Lord were to explain the meaning of this utterance.
Having heard the Lord the bhikkhus would then remember it.
“Then listen, bhikkhus, attend carefully and I will speak.
“Yes, Sir,” those bhikkhus replied to the Lord.
The Lord said, “A Tathaagata, bhikkhus, a Perfected One, a fully Enlightened One, makes manifest an unmanifest path, he recognizes an unrecognized path, he proclaims an unproclaimed path, he is the knower of the path, the discoverer of the path, is skilled in the path.
And now, bhikkhus, his disciples coming afterwards live following the path.
Now the Venerable Raadha approached the Lord.
Having approached and prostrated himself he sat down to one side.
As he was sitting there, the venerable Raadha said to the Lord:
“How can we know, Sir, how can we see, that in this consciousness-endowed body and externally among all outer objects there is no I-ness, no mine-ness, no underlying tendency to conceit?
“Whatsoever body… feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness, Raadha, past, future or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, is looked upon as, 'This is not mine,' 'I am not this,' 'This is not myself' — in this manner it is seen according to actuality with perfect wisdom.
Thus knowing, thus seeing, in this consciousness-endowed body and externally among all outer objects there is no I-ness, no mine-ness, no underlying tendency to conceit.
Then the venerable Raadha, living alone, secluded, diligent, ardent and resolute, soon realized here and now, through his own direct knowledge, that unequaled quest of the holy life, for which sons of good family rightly go forth from home to the homeless state, and entering into it abide in it.
And he knew: finished is birth, lived is the holy life, done is what had to be done, there is no more of this or that state.
And the venerable Raadha became one of the Perfect Ones.
“Those recluses or braahmanas, bhikkhus, who remember a number of former lives, they all remember one or another of these five aggregates of grasping.
'In the past I had this sort of body': thus remembering, it is just body he remembers.
'In the past I had this sort of feeling': thus remembering, it is just feeling he remembers.
'In the past I had this sort of perception': thus remembering, it is just perception he remembers.
'In the past I had this sort of mental activity': thus remembering, it is just mental activity he remembers.
'In the past I had this sort of consciousness': thus remembering, it is just consciousness he remembers.
“And why, bhikkhus, do you say 'body'?
'It is afflicted', bhikkhus, therefore it is called 'body'.
Afflicted by what?
Afflicted by cold and heat, hunger and thirst, afflicted by coming into contact with gnats, mosquitoes, wind, sun and snakes.
'It is afflicted,' bhikkhus, therefore it is called 'body.'
“And why, bhikkhus, do you say 'feeling'?
'It is felt', bhikkhus, therefore it is called 'feeling'.
What is felt?
Pleasure is felt, pain is felt, neutral feeling is felt.
'It is felt,' bhikkhus, therefore it is called 'feeling.'
“And why, bhikkhus, do you say 'perception'?
'It is perceived', bhikkhus, therefore it is called 'perception'.
What is perceived?
Blue is perceived, yellow is perceived, red is perceived, white is perceived.
'It is perceived,' bhikkhus, therefore it is called 'perception.'
“And why, bhikkhus, do you say 'mental activities'?
They activate that which is formed and conditioned, bhikkhus, therefore they are called 'mental activities'.
What is the formed and conditioned that they activate?
They activate body in its corporeal nature, feeling in its nature of feeling, perception in its perceptual nature, mental activities in their activating nature, consciousness in its cognitive nature.
They activate that which is formed and conditioned, bhikkhus, therefore they are called 'mental activities.'
“And why, bhikkhus, do you say 'consciousness'?
'It cognizes', bhikkhus, therefore it is called 'consciousness'.
What does it cognize?
It cognizes sour and bitter, acid and sweet, alkaline and non-alkaline, salty and non-salty.
'It cognizes,' bhikkhus, therefore it is called 'consciousness.'
“As to this, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple reflects thus: 'I am being consumed by the body now.
Just as in the past I was consumed by the body.
And if in the future I should have an expectation of pleasure from the body, so in the future would I be consumed by the body just as I am now in the present.' Thus reflecting he has no yearning for a past body, he has no expectation of pleasure from a future body and towards the present body he cultivates dispassion, detachment, cessation.
“What do you think, bhikkhus, is the body permanent or impermanent?
“Impermanent, Sir.
“What is impermanent, is that dissatisfying or satisfying?
“Dissatisfying, Sir.
“What is impermanent, dissatisfying, of a nature to change, is it suitable to regard as, 'This is mine,' 'I am this,' 'This is myself'?
“No, Sir.
“Is feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness permanent or impermanent?
“Impermanent, Sir.
“What is impermanent, dissatisfying, of a nature to change, is it suitable to regard as, 'This is mine.' 'I am this,' 'This is myself'?
“No, Sir.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, I say, whatsoever body… feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness, past, future or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, should be looked upon as, 'This is not mine,' 'I am not this,' 'This is not myself.' In this manner it should be seen according to actuality with perfect wisdom.
“I do not dispute with the world, bhikkhus.
The world disputes with me.
A proclaimer of Dhamma does not dispute with anyone in the world.
What is not believed by the wise in the world, of that I say 'It is not so.' What is believed by the wise in the world, of that I say 'It is so.'
“And what is it, bhikkhus, that is not believed by the wise in the world and of which I say 'It is not so'?
That the body… feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness is permanent, stable, eternal, not liable to change, is not believed by the wise in the world and I also say it is not so.
“And what is it, bhikkhus, that is believed by the wise in the world and of which I say 'It is so'?
That the body… feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness is impermanent, unsatisfactory, liable to change, is believed by the wise in the world and I also say it is so.
“There is, bhikkhus, in the world a world-condition which the Tathaagata has fully awakened to, has fully realized.
Having fully awakened to it and fully realized it he declares it, teaches it, makes it known, establishes it, discloses it, analyzes it, makes it clear.
And what, bhikkhus, in the world is the world-condition which the Tathaagata has fully awakened to, has fully realized?
The body, bhikkhus,… feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness, bhikkhus, in the world is that world-condition the Tathaagata has fully awakened to, has fully realized…
“And whosoever, bhikkhus, when it is being declared, taught, made known, established, disclosed, analyzed, made clear by the Tathaagata thus, does not understand, does not see, him, a foolish worldly person, blind, without vision, not understanding, not seeing, I can do nothing for.
“Just as a water-lily or a blue lotus or a white lotus, born in water, growing in water, having arisen above the water stands unwetted by the water, similarly, bhikkhus, the Tathaagata, brought up in the world and conquering the world, lives unsullied by the world.
“At one time the Lord was staying at Ayojjhaaya on the bank of the river Ganges.
There the Lord addressed the bhikkhus as follows: 'Suppose, bhikkhus, a large lump of froth was floating on this river Ganges and a clear-sighted man were to see it, observe it and properly examine it.
Seeing it, observing it, properly examining it, it would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in a lump of froth?
“In the same way, bhikkhus, whatsoever body, past, future or present, internal or external, gross or subtle, inferior or superior, far or near, that a bhikkhu sees, observes and properly examines… it would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in body?
“Suppose, bhikkhus, in autumn when it is raining in large drops a bubble arises and disappears on the water and a clear-sighted man were to see it, observe it and properly examine it.
Seeing it, observing it, properly examining it, it would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in a water-bubble?
“In the same way, bhikkhus, whatsoever feeling, past, future or present… that a bhikkhus sees, observes and properly examines… it would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in feeling?
“Suppose, bhikkhus, in the last month of the hot season at midday a mirage appeared and a clear-sighted man were to see it, observe it and properly examine it.
Seeing it, observing it, properly examining it, it would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in a mirage?
“In the same way, bhikkhus, whatsoever perception… that a bhikkhu sees, observes and properly examines… it would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in perception?
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man, needing sound timber, going about seeking, looking for sound limber, and taking a sharp axe should enter a forest and there see a large plantain tree, straight-trunked, young, of great height.
And he were to cut it down at the root.
Having cut it down at the root he were to chop off the top and remove the outer skin.
On removing the outer skin he would find no soft wood, not to speak of sound timber.
Then a clear-sighted man were to see it, observe it and properly examine it.
Seeing it, observing it, properly examining it, it would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in a plantain tree?
“In the same way, bhikkhus, whatsoever mental activities… a bhikkhu sees, observes and properly examines… they would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in mental activities?
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a magician or a magician's assistant should produce an illusion on the high road and a clear-sighted man were to see it, observe it and properly examine it.
Seeing it, observing it, properly examining it, it would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in a magical illusion?
“In the same way, bhikkhus, whatsoever consciousness… a bhikkhu sees, observes and properly examines… it would appear to him to be empty, unsubstantial, without essence.
What essence, bhikkhus, could there be in consciousness?
“So seeing, the instructed noble disciple is dispassionate towards the body, towards feeling, perception, mental activities and consciousness.
Being dispassionate he detaches himself, being detached he is released and in release is the knowledge of being released and he knows: 'Finished is birth, lived is the holy life, done is what had to be done, there is no more of this or that state.' So spoke the Lord and when he had so spoken the Happy One, the Teacher, added further:
“Unimaginable, bhikkhus, is a beginning to the round of births.
For beings obstructed by ignorance and fettered by craving, migrating and going the round of births, a starting point is not evident.
“Just as a dog, bhikkhus, tied with a leash to a strong stake or post; if he moves, he moves towards that stake or post; if he stands still, he stands close to that stake or post; if he sits down, he sits close to that stake or post; if he lies down, he lies close to that stake or post.
“Similarly, bhikkhus, the uninstructed ordinary person looks upon the body as, 'This is mine,' 'I am this,' 'This is myself,'… He looks upon feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness as, 'This is mine,' 'I am this,' 'This is myself.' If he moves, he moves towards these five aggregates of grasping; if he stands still, he stands close to these five aggregates of grasping; if he sits down, he sits close to these five aggregates of grasping; if he lies down, he lies close to these five aggregates of grasping.
“Hence, bhikkhus, I say one should constantly reflect upon one's own mind thus: 'For a long time this mind has been corrupted by greed, aversion and delusion.' Through a corrupt mind, bhikkhus, beings are corrupted; from purity of mind beings become pure.
Have you seen, bhikkhus, an elaborate painting?
“Yes, Sir.
“Now that elaborate painting, bhikkhus, was devised by mind.
Therefore mind is even more intricate than that elaborate painting.
Hence, bhikkhus, I say one should constantly reflect upon one's own mind thus: 'For a long time this mind has been corrupted by greed, aversion and delusion.' Through a corrupt mind, bhikkhus, beings are corrupted; from purity of mind beings become pure.
“I perceive no other single group, bhikkhus, so diverse as the creatures of the animal world.
These creatures of the animal world are diversified by mind.
Therefore mind is even more diverse than the creatures of the animal world.
“Hence, bhikkhus, I say a bhikkhu should constantly reflect upon his own mind thus: 'For a long time this mind has been corrupted by greed, aversion and delusion.' Through a corrupt mind, bhikkhus, beings are corrupted; from purity of mind beings become pure.
“Just as a dyer or a painter, with dye or lac or turmeric or indigo or madder, and a well-smoothed wooden panel or wall or piece of cloth, can reproduce the form of a woman or a man complete in every detail — similarly, bhikkhus, the uninstructed ordinary person brings body into existence too… brings feeling… perception… mental activities… brings consciousness into existence too.
“Just as a carpenter or a carpenter's assistant sees on his adze-handle the marks made by his fingers and thumb, but does not thereby have the knowledge.
'So much of the adze-handle was worn away by me today, so much yesterday, so much at another time,' but merely has the knowledge that it is being worn away by its wearing away.
“In the same way, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu living devoted to the practice of mind-development does not have the knowledge, 'So much of the taints was worn away today, so much yesterday, so much at another time.' But he has the knowledge they are being worn away by their wearing away.
“Just as a sea-going boat, stranded for six months on the shore by the tide in the winter, has its rigging spoilt by wind and sun, and then, warped by a shower of rain in the rainy season, easily weakens and rots away: in the same way, bhikkhus, for a bhikkhu living devoted to the practice of mind-development, the fetters easily weaken and rot away.
“The perceiving of impermanence, bhikkhus, developed and frequently practiced, removes all sensual passion, removes all passion for material existence, removes all passion for becoming, removes all ignorance, removes and abolishes all conceit of 'I am.'
“Just as in the autumn a farmer, plowing with a large plow cuts through all a spreading rootlets as he plows; in the same way, bhikkhus, the perceiving of impermanence, developed and frequently practiced, removes all sensual passion… removes and abolishes all conceit of 'I am.'
…The venerable Raadha said to the Lord: “'A being' 'a being,' one is called.
In what respect, Sir, is one called 'being'?
“Because of being caught and held fast by that desire, that attachment, that delight, that craving for body… for feeling… for perception… for mental activities… for consciousness, therefore one is called 'a being'.
“Just as when little boys or girls are playing with mud-pies.
As long as they are not rid of attachment to those mud-pies, are not rid of desire, are not rid of affection, thirst, excitement, and craving for them, so long do they delight in them, are amused by them, value, and cherish them.
But when those little boys or girls are rid of attachment to those mud-pies, are rid of desire, are rid of affection, thirst, excitement, and craving for them, then with hand and foot they scatter them, destroy them, demolish them, stop playing with them.
“In the same way, Raadha, do you scatter body, destroy it, demolish it, stop playing with it, do you practice so as to end craving for it.
Do you scatter feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness, destroy it, demolish it, stop playing with it, do you practice so as to end craving for it.
“Indeed, Raadha, the ending of craving is Nibbaana.
“Bhikkhus, whatever there is of desire and attachment to body — that is a corruption of the mind.
Whatever there is of desire and attachment to feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness — that is a corruption of the mind.
“But when, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu has abandoned mental corruption with regard to these five, his mind is inclined towards renunciation.
And a mind filled with renunciation is fit for realizing those things to be realized by direct knowledge.
“Bhikkhus, I will teach you the All.
Listen, attend carefully to it and I will speak.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the All?
It is just the eye and visible objects, the ear and sounds, the nose and odors, the tongue and tastes, the body and tangible objects, the mind and objects of mind.
This, bhikkhus, is called the All.
“Now whoever should speak thus: 'Setting aside this All I will proclaim another All,' it would be mere talk on his part and on being questioned he would be unable to proceed and in addition, vexation will befall him.
For what reason?
It would not be within his scope, bhikkhus.
Once a certain bhikkhu approached the Lord.
Having drawn near and prostrated himself he sat down to one side.
Sitting there that bhikkhu said to the Lord:
“How knowing, Sir, how seeing is ignorance abandoned and understanding produced?
“By knowing and seeing the impermanence of the eye, bhikkhus, ignorance is abandoned and understanding is produced.
By knowing and seeing the impermanence of visible objects… visual-consciousness… visual-contact… And whatever arises conditioned by visual-contact, felt as pleasant or painful or neutral — by knowing and seeing the impermanence of that also, ignorance is abandoned and understanding is produced.
“By knowing and seeing the impermanence of the ear… nose… tongue… body… mind… mind-objects… mind-consciousness… mind-contact… And whatever arises conditioned by mind-contact, felt as pleasant or painful or neutral — by knowing and seeing the impermanence of that also, ignorance is abandoned and understanding is produced.
“It is by thus knowing and thus seeing, bhikkhu, that ignorance is abandoned and understanding is produced.
“I will teach you the Dhamma, bhikkhus, for the full understanding of all grasping…
“Dependent upon the eye and visible-objects, visual consciousness arises.
Contact is the coming together these three.
Conditioned by contact is feeling.
So seeing, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple is dispassionate towards the eye, is dispassionate towards visible-objects… towards visual-consciousness… visual-contact… towards feeling.
Being dispassionate he is detached, being detached he is liberated, being liberated he knows, 'Grasping has been fully understood by me.'
“Dependent upon the ear and sounds… the nose and odors… the tongue and tastes… the body and tangible objects…
“Dependent upon the mind and objects of mind, mind consciousness arises.
Contact is the coming together of these three.
Conditioned by contact is feeling.
So seeing, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple is dispassionate towards the mind… towards mind-objects… mind-consciousness… mind-contact… towards feeling.
Being dispassionate he is detached, being detached he is liberated, being liberated he knows, 'Grasping has been fully understood by me.'
“This, bhikkhus, is the Dhamma for the full understanding of all grasping.
“Bhikkhus, whatsoever bhikkhu does not know according to actuality the arising and passing away, the satisfaction, misery and release from the six bases of contact; not lived by him is the holy life, he is far from this Dhamma and Discipline.
When this had been said a certain bhikkhu said to the Lord:
“As to this, Sir, I am in despair; for I, Sir, do not know according to actuality the arising and passing away, the satisfaction, misery and release from the six bases of contact.
“What do you think, bhikkhu, do you look upon the eye as, 'This is mine,' 'I am this,' 'This is myself'?
“No, Sir.
“It is good, bhikkhu.
Now by the eye as, 'This is not mine,' 'I am not this,' 'This is not myself,' it will be well understood by you according to actuality with perfect wisdom.
Just this is the end of suffering.
“Do you look upon the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… the mind as, 'This is mine,' 'I am this,' 'This is myself'?
“No, Sir.
“It is good, bhikkhu.
Just this is the end of suffering.
…Sitting at one side the venerable AAnanda said this to the Lord:
“The world, the world they say, Sir.
In what sense, Sir, is it called 'the world'?
“Whatever is of a nature to dissolve, AAnanda, this is called the world in the discipline of the Noble.
Now what is of a nature to dissolve?
The eye, AAnanda… visible-objects… visual-consciousness… visual-contact…
“The ear… sounds… mind… mind-contact… And whatever arises conditioned by mind-contact felt as pleasant or painful or neutral — that is of a nature to dissolve.
Once the venerable Pu.n.na approached the Lord… sat down to one side… and said:
“It would be good, Sir, were the Lord to teach me the Dhamma briefly.
On hearing that Dhamma from the Lord I might live alone, secluded, diligent, ardent and resolute.
“There are, Pu.n.na, visible objects cognized by the eye… sounds cognized by the ear… odors cognized by the nose… flavors cognized by the tongue… tangible objects cognized by the body… mind-objects cognized by the mind, pleasing, agreeable, charming, endearing, desirable, arousing the passions.
If a bhikkhu delights in them, welcomes them, cleaves to them… enjoyment arises.
The origin of enjoyment is the origin of suffering, I say, Pu.n.na.
”…but if a bhikkhu does not delight in them, does not welcome them, does not cleave to them… enjoyment ceases.
The cessation of enjoyment is the cessation of suffering, I say.
“Now that you have been instructed by me, Pu.n.na, with this brief instruction in what country will you live?
“There is, Sir, a country called Sunaaparanta, I will live there.
“The men of Sunaaparanta are violent and cruel, Pu.n.na.
If they were to insult and abuse you, how would it be with you?
“If, Sir, the men of Sunaaparanta were to insult and abuse me it would be thus with me: 'Good are these men of Sunaaparanta, very good are these men of Sunaaparanta, in that they do not strike me with their hands.' It would be thus with me, Lord.
It would be thus with me, Happy One.
“But if the men of Sunaaparanta were to strike you with their hands, how would it be with you?
“… it would be thus with me: 'Good are these men of Sunaaparanta, very good are these men of Sunaaparanta, in that they do not strike me with clods of earth'… “But if the men of Sunaaparanta were to strike you with clods of earth, how would it be with you?
“… it would be thus with me: 'Good are these men of Sunaaparanta, very good are these men of Sunaaparanta, in that they do not strike me with a stick'… “But if the men of Sunaaparanta were to strike you with a stick, how would it be with you?
“… it would be thus with me: 'Good are these men of Sunaaparanta very good are these men of Sunaaparanta, in that they do not strike me with a weapon'… “But if the men of Sunaaparanta were to deprive you of your life, how would it be with you?
“… it would be thus with me: 'There are disciples of the Lord who, being vexed, ashamed and disgusted with body and life, seek a weapon, but I come by a weapon that was unsought.' It would be thus with me, Lord.
It would be thus with me, Happy One.
“It is good, it is good Pu.n.na.
Being endowed with this self-mastery and composure you will be able to settle in the country of the Sunaaparanta people.
Do now, Pu.n.na, whatever you consider it the time for.
Then the venerable Pu.n.na, pleased and appreciative of the Lord's utterance, arose from his seat, prostrated himself before the Lord and, keeping his right side towards him, departed.
And having put away his bed and seat and taking his bowl and robe he set off for the country of Sunaaparanta.
And walking, journeying by stages, the venerable Pu.n.na arrived in the country of Sunaaparanta and dwelt there.
Now the venerable Pu.n.na during that rainy season, brought in as many as five hundred lay followers.
During that rainy season he established himself in the three knowledges.
And during that rainy season he attained final release.
Then a large number of bhikkhus approached the Lord… and said: “The clansman Pu.n.na, Sir, who was instructed by the Lord with a brief instruction has died.
What is his destiny?
What is his future state?
“A wise man, bhikkhus was the clansman Pu.n.na.
He practiced according to Dhamma and did not trouble me with queries about Dhamma.
The clansman Pu.n.na, bhikkhus, has attained final release.
“It is a gain for you, bhikkhus, it is a great gain for you, to have found the opportunity for living the holy life.
“I have seen bhikkhus, the hells called the 'six bases of contacts.' There whatever visible object one sees with the eye, one sees only the unpleasant, never the pleasant, one sees only the disagreeable, never the agreeable, one sees only the unattractive, never the attractive.
Whatever sound one hears with the ear… Whatever odor one smells with the nose… Whatever flavor one tastes with the tongue… Whatever tangible object one touches with the body… Whatever mind-object one cognizes with the mind, one cognizes only the unpleasant, never the pleasant, one cognizes only the disagreeable, never the agreeable, one cognizes the unattractive, never the attractive.
It is a gain for you, bhikkhus, it is a great gain for you, to have found the opportunity for living the holy life.
“I have seen, bhikkhus, the heavens, called the 'six bases of contact.' There whatever visible object one sees with the eye, one sees only the pleasant, never the unpleasant, one sees only the agreeable, never the disagreeable, one sees only the attractive, never the unattractive.
Whatever sound one hears with the ear…
“Whatever mind-object one cognizes with the mind, one only cognizes the pleasant, never the unpleasant, one cognizes only the agreeable, never the disagreeable, one cognizes only the attractive, never the unattractive.
“It is a gain for you, bhikkhus, it is a great gain for you, to have found the opportunity for living the holy life.
“'The ocean, the ocean!' says the uninstructed ordinary person, bhikkhus.
But that is not the ocean in the Noble One's Discipline.
It is a great mass of water, a great extent of water.
There are, bhikkhus, visible objects cognizable by the eye… sounds cognizable by the ear… odors cognizable by the nose… flavors cognizable by the tongue… tangible objects cognizable by the body… mind-objects cognizable by the mind, pleasing, agreeable, charming, endearing, desirable, arousing the passions.
This is called 'the ocean' in the Noble One's Discipline.
Herein this world with its devas, maaras, brahmas, with its recluses and braahma.nas and mankind with its princes and ordinary men is almost entirely immersed, is entangled like a ball of thread, has become entangled like muñja-grass and rushes, unable to go beyond a state of loss, a bad destination, ruination, the round of births.
At one time the Lord was staying near Saavatthi… and there he addressed the bhikkhus saying:
“Suppose, bhikkhus, there were four poisonous snakes, highly dangerous, extremely venomous.
And a man were to come along, wishing to live, not wishing to die, desiring happiness and loathing pain.
And people were to say to him: 'Here, good man, are four poisonous snakes, highly dangerous, extremely venomous.
From time to time they must be roused, bathed, fed and bedded down.
But when one or the other of these four poisonous snakes… becomes disturbed and angry, then you will come by your death or suffering comparable to death.
So do whatever must be done, good man.'
“Then suppose, bhikkhus, that man, in terror of the four poisonous snakes, might run away and people were to say to him: 'Good man, five murderers are following after you saying, “When we see him we shall kill him.” So do whatever must be done, good man.'
“Then suppose, bhikkhus, that man, in terror of the four poisonous snakes, in terror of the five murderers, might run away and people were to say to him: 'Good man, a sixth, a murderous robber with an upraised sword is following after you saying, “When I see him I shall cut off his head.” So do whatever must be done, good man.'
“Then suppose, bhikkhus, that man, in terror of the four poisonous snakes, in terror of the five murderers, in terror of the sixth, the murderous robber, might run away.
And, he should see an empty village.
Whatever house he enters he finds it bare, void and empty.
Whatever vessel he handles therein he finds it bare, void and empty.
Then people were to say to him: 'Good man, bandits who attack villages are going to attack this empty village.
So do whatever must be done, good man.'
“Then suppose, bhikkhus, that man, in terror of the four poisonous snakes, in terror of the five murderers, in terror of the sixth, the murderous robber, in terror of the village-attacking bandits, might run away.
And he should see a great stretch of water, the near shore insecure and fearful, the far shore secure and free from fear, but no boat for crossing over nor a bridge for walking from one shore to the other.
“Then, bhikkhus, it might occur to that man: 'Here is a great stretch of water… but no boat… nor a bridge… What if I were to collect grass, pieces of wood, branches and leaves, construct a raft and supported by it and laboring with hands and feet, go safely to the other shore.
“Crossed over, gone beyond, the braahma.na stands on dry ground.
“This is my simile, bhikkhus, for showing the meaning.
And this is its interpretation:
“'The four poisonous snakes, highly dangerous, extremely venomous' — this is a designation for the four great elements: the elements of earth, water, fire and air.
“'The five murderers' — this is a designation for the five aggregates of grasping: the body-aggregate of grasping, the feeling-, perception-, mental activities-, consciousness-aggregate of grasping.
“'The sixth, the murderous robber with an upraised sword' — this is a designation for enjoyment and attachment.
“'The empty village' — this is a designation for the six internal sense-bases.
For if a wise, learned and intelligent man examines the eye… the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… the mind, it appears as void, unsubstantial and empty.
“'The village-attacking bandits' — this is a designation for the six external sense-bases.
For the eye is attacked by attractive and repulsive visible objects, the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… the mind is attacked by attractive and repulsive mental objects.
“'The great stretch of water,' — this is a designation for the four 'floods': sensual desire, becoming, views and ignorance.
“'The near shore insecure and fearful' — this is a designation for the existence-group.
“'The far shore secure and free from fear' — this is a designation for Nibbaana.
“'The raft — this is a designation for the Noble Eightfold Path, that is to say, right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.
“'Laboring with hands and feet' — this is a designation for strenuous effort.
“'Crossed over, gone beyond, the braahma.na stands on dry ground,' — this is a designation for the Perfected One.
At one time the Lord was staying near Kosambii on the bank of the river Ganges.
Now the Lord saw a large log of wood being carried along by the current of the river Ganges and on seeing it said to the bhikkhus:
“Bhikkhus, do you see that large log of wood being carried along by the current of the river Ganges?
“Yes, Sir.
“If that log of wood, bhikkhus, does not run aground on the near bank or the far bank, does not sink in midstream, is not caught on a sandbank, is not seized by humans or non-humans, is not held in a whirlpool, does not rot from within — then that log of wood will float down to the ocean, will be led down to the ocean, will tend towards the ocean.
“Similarly, bhikkhus, if you do not run aground on the near bank or the far bank, if you do not sink in midstream, if you are not caught on a sandbank, if you are not seized by humans or non-humans, if you are not held in a whirlpool, If you do not rot from within — then you will float down to Nibbaana, you will be led down to Nibbaana, you will tend towards Nibbaana.
What is the reason?
Right view, bhikkhus, floats to Nibbaana, leads to Nibbaana, tends towards Nibbaana.
On this being said a certain bhikkhu asked the Lord: “What, Sir, is the near bank?
What is the far bank?
What is sinking in midstream?
What is being caught on a sandbank?
What is being seized by humans?
What is being seized by non-humans?
What is being held in a whirlpool?
What is rotting from within?
“'The near bank,' bhikkhu, is a designation for the six internal sense-bases.
'The far bank' is a designation for the six external sense-bases.
'Sinking in midstream' is a designation for enjoyment and attachment.
'Being caught on a sandbank' is a designation for the 'I am-conceit.' Now what is 'being seized by humans'?
Herein a bhikkhu lives in close association with lay folk.
He shares their joys and sorrows.
He is happy with those who are happy, he suffers with those who suffer.
He involves himself in all manner of business that goes on.
This is called 'being seized by humans.'
“Now what is 'being seized by non-humans'?
Herein, bhikkhu, someone lives the holy life with the aspiration among a certain group of devas.
'By this virtuous conduct or observance or austerity or holy living may I become a deva or a certain kind of deva.' This is called 'being seized by non-humans.'
“'Being held in a whirlpool' is a designation for the fivefold sensual pleasures.
“Now what is 'rotting from within'?
Herein, bhikkhus, someone is immoral, of an evil nature, impure, of dubious behavior, of concealed deeds.
Not a recluse, though pretending to be a recluse; not one who lives the holy life, though pretending to be one who does so; rotten within, full of desires, a heap of impurity.
This is called 'rotting from within.' Now at that time Nanda the cowherd was standing near the Lord… and said: “I, Sir, have not run aground on the near bank.
I have not run aground on the far bank, I shall not sink in midstream, I shall not be caught on a sandbank, neither humans nor non-humans shall seize me, I shall not be held in a whirlpool, I shall not rot from within.
Sir, may I obtain the going forth in the Lord's presence, may I obtain full ordination?
“Nanda, you must return the cattle to their owners.
“They will go back by themselves, Sir; the cows are longing for their calves.
“Do return them, Nanda.
Then Nanda the cowherd, having returned the cattle to their owners, approached the Lord… and said: “Sir, the cattle are restored.
May I obtain, Sir, the going forth in the Lord's presence, may I obtain full ordination?
And Nanda the cowherd obtained the going forth in the Lord's presence, obtained full ordination.
And not long after his ordination the venerable Nanda, living alone, secluded, diligent, ardent and resolute, soon realized here and now, through his own direct knowledge, that unequaled quest of the holy life… And the venerable Nanda became one of the Perfected Ones.
“Let us suppose, bhikkhus, that there is a king or a king's chief minister who has never heard the sound of a lute.
Then, on hearing the sound for the first time, he says: 'Good man, what is that sound, so exciting, so beautiful, so intoxicating, so entrancing, so captivating?'
“And they say to him: 'It is the sound, Sire, of what is called a lute…'
“Thereupon he says: 'Go and bring me that lute.'
“They bring it to him, saying: 'This, Sire, is that lute, the sound of which is so exciting… so captivating.'
“But he rejoins: 'Away with the lute, my man!
Just bring me that sound.'
“Then they say to him: 'This which is called a lute, Sire, is made of various parts, a great number of parts.
It is because of its various parts, that it makes a sound; that is to say, owing to the belly, sounding board, arm, head, strings, plectrum and the effort of a man's fingers…'
“The king or the king's chief minister then breaks up the lute into ten or a hundred pieces.
Having broken it up he splinters it further, burns it in a fire and reduces it to ashes.
Having reduced it to ashes he winnows the ashes in a strong wind or lets them be borne away on the swift current of a river.
And he says: 'A poor thing is this that you call a lute, my man, whatever the so-called lute may be.
People have been infatuated and led astray by it for too long.'
“Just in this way, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu investigates body as far as body goes; he investigates feeling… perception… mental activities… consciousness as far as consciousness goes.
So investigating whatever there may be, there is for him no 'I' or 'mine' or 'I am' in it.
“The uninstructed ordinary person, bhikkhus, has a saying: 'There is a bottomless abyss in the great ocean.' But the uninstructed ordinary person speaks of what does not exist, of what is not to be found, to wit, that there is a bottomless abyss in the great ocean.
A designation for painful bodily feeling, bhikkhus, is this term 'bottomless abyss.' When an uninstructed ordinary person experiences painful bodily feeling he grieves, is afflicted, laments, beats his breast, cries out loud and becomes distraught.
So it is said, bhikkhus, the uninstructed ordinary person has not emerged from the bottomless abyss, has not obtained a firm foothold.
“But, bhikkhus, when an instructed noble disciple experiences painful bodily feeling he does not grieve, is not afflicted, does not lament nor beat his breast nor cry out loud nor become distraught.
So it is said, bhikkhus, the instructed noble disciple has emerged from the bottomless abyss and has obtained a firm foothold.
At one time the venerable Saariputta was dwelling in Magadha at the village of Naalaka.
There the wandering ascetic Jambukhaadaka approached the venerable Saariputta and exchanged friendly greetings with him.
After exchanging greetings and reminiscences he sat down to one side.
Having sat down the wandering ascetic Jambukhaadaka said this to the venerable Saariputta:
“'Nibbaana, Nibbaana!' It is called, friend Saariputta.
But what, friend, is Nibbaana?
“The ending of greed, aversion and delusion, friend, is called Nibbaana.
“But is there a path, is there a line of conduct, for the realization of this Nibbaana?
“There is a path, there is a line of conduct, friend, for the realization of this Nibbaana.
“What is the path, what is the line of conduct…?
“It is just this Noble Eightfold Path… that is to say, right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration… “It is a good path, friend, a good line of conduct for the realization of this Nibbaana, and a sufficient reason for being diligent!
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying amongst the Sakyas, at the Sakya market town of Sakkara.
Then the venerable AAnanda approached the Lord, prostrated himself and sat down to one side.
Sitting there the venerable AAnanda said to the Lord:
“Half of this holy life, Lord, is friendship with the good, companionship with the good, association with the good.
“Do not say that, AAnanda.
Do not say that, AAnanda.
It is the whole of this holy life, this friendship, companionship and association with the good.
Of a bhikkhu, AAnanda, who is a friend, companion, and associate of the good it is to be expected that he will cultivate and seriously practice the Noble Eightfold Path.
And how, AAnanda, does a bhikkhu… cultivate and seriously practice the Noble Eightfold Path?
Herein, AAnanda, a bhikkhu cultivates right view centered on detachment, centered on dispassion, centered on cessation, ending in relinquishment.
He cultivates right thought… speech… action… livelihood… effort… mindfulness… right concentration centered on detachment, centered on dispassion, centered on cessation, ending in relinquishment.
“In this manner, AAnanda, a bhikkhu who is a friend, companion, associate of the good cultivates and seriously practices the Noble Eightfold Path.
“It is in this manner, AAnanda, it should be understood how the whole of this holy life is friendship, companionship, and association with the good.
“By taking me as a good friend, beings liable to birth are released from birth, beings liable to old age are released from old age, beings liable to death are released from death, beings liable to sorrow, lamentation, suffering, grief and despair are released there from.
“In this manner, AAnanda, it should be understood how the whole of this holy life is friendship with the good, companionship with the good, association with the good.
Saavatthi was the place.
“I will teach you, bhikkhus, the Noble Eightfold Path and analyze it.
Listen, attend carefully and I will speak.
“Yes, Sir,” those bhikkhus replied to the Lord.
The Lord said: “What, bhikkhus, is the Noble Eightfold Path?
It is right view and so forth…
“Now what, bhikkhus, is right view?
Whatever is knowledge of suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering and the way leading to cessation of suffering.
This, bhikkhus, is called right view.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is right thought?
Whatever is a thought of renunciation, a thought of friendliness, a thought of harmlessness.
This, bhikkhus, is called right thought.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is right speech?
Whatever is abstention from lying speech, abstention from malicious speech, abstention from harsh speech, abstention from idle speech.
This, bhikkhus, is called right speech.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is right action?
Whatever is abstention from harming living creatures, abstention from unchastity.
This, bhikkhus, is called right action.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is right livelihood?
Herein, bhikkhus, the noble disciple having given up a wrong livelihood lives his life by means of a right livelihood.
This, bhikkhus, is called right livelihood.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is right effort?
Herein, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu generates desire, strives, stirs up energy, exerts his mind and struggles to prevent the arising of evil, unskilled states that have not arisen.
He generates desire and strives… to be rid of evil, unskilled states that have arisen.
He generates desire and strives… to establish and not lose, for the further cultivation, abundance, development and perfection of skilled states that have arisen.
This, bhikkhus, is called right effort.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is right mindfulness?
Herein, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives practicing body-contemplation on the body, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
He lives practicing feeling-contemplation on feelings… mind-contemplation on mind… mind-object-contemplation on the objects of mind, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
This, bhikkhus, is called right mindfulness.
Now what, bhikkhus, is right concentration?
Herein, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu, secluded from unskilled things, dwells having entered the first absorption, accompanied by thinking and investigation, born of detachment and joy and bliss.
“After the subsiding of thinking and investigation and by gaining inner serenity and unification of mind, he dwells having entered the second absorption, which is without thinking and investigation, is born of concentration and joy and bliss.
“After the fading away of joy he dwells in equanimity, mindful and clearly comprehending, and experiences in his person a bliss of which the Noble Ones say, 'He who has equanimity and is mindful lives blissfully,' and he dwells having entered the third absorption.
“After the abandoning of pleasure and pain and the disappearance of former happiness and grief, he dwells having entered the fourth absorption which is without pleasure and pain and is purified by equanimity and mindfulness.
This, bhikkhus, is called right concentration.
“Bhikkhus, whatsoever bhikkhus possess moral virtue, possess concentration, possess wisdom, possess liberation, possess the knowledge and insight of liberation — the seeing of those bhikkhus is of great profit, I say.
To hear about those bhikkhus… to approach those bhikkhus… to associate with those bhikkhus… to remember those bhikkhus… to imitate those bhikkhus in going forth is of great profit, I say.
For what reason?
On hearing the Dhamma of such bhikkhus one lives secluded with a twofold seclusion, of body and mind.
Living thus secluded one remembers the Dhamma and reflects upon it.
“At whatever time, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu living thus secluded remembers and reflects upon the Dhamma, at that time the enlightenment factor of mindfulness is aroused in that bhikkhu.
At whatever time a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of mindfulness, at that time that bhikkhu's development of it comes to perfection.
He living mindful thus, considers with wisdom and investigates the Dhamma and undertakes an inquiry into it.
“At whatever time, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu, living thus mindful, considers with wisdom, investigates and undertakes an inquiry into the Dhamma, at that time the enlightenment factor of reality-investigation is aroused in that bhikkhu.
At whatever time a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of reality-investigation, at that time that bhikkhu's development of it comes to perfection.
In him, considering with wisdom, investigating and undertaking an inquiry into the Dhamma, tireless energy is aroused.
“At whatever time… tireless energy is aroused, at that time the enlightenment factor of energy is aroused in that bhikkhu.
At whatever time a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of energy, at that time that bhikkhu's development of it comes to perfection.
In one who has energy aroused non-carnal joy arises.
“At whatever time, in one who has energy aroused non-carnal joy arises, at that time the enlightenment factor of joy is aroused in that bhikkhu.
At whatever time a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of joy, at that time that bhikkhu's development of it comes to perfection.
In one who is joyful body and mind are tranquilized.
“At whatever time… body and mind are tranquilized, at that time the enlightenment factor of tranquility is aroused in that bhikkhu.
At whatever time a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of tranquility, at that time that bhikkhu's development of it comes to perfection.
One who has tranquility of body is blissful; in one who is blissful the mind is concentrated.
“At whatever time… the mind is concentrated, at that time the enlightenment factor of concentration is aroused in that bhikkhu.
At whatever time a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of concentration at that time that bhikkhu's development of it comes to perfection.
On his mind thus concentrated he looks with perfect equanimity.
“At whatever time, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu looks with perfect equanimity on mind thus concentrated, at that time the enlightenment factor of equanimity is aroused in that bhikkhu.
At whatever time a bhikkhu develops the enlightenment factor of equanimity, at that time that bhikkhu's development of it comes to perfection.
“By developing the seven enlightenment factors and seriously practicing them thus, seven fruits, seven benefits are certain.
What seven fruits, what seven benefits?
“One attains final knowledge here and now prior; if one does not attain final knowledge here and now prior, then one attains it at the time of death; if one does not attain final knowledge here and now… nor at the time of death, then by the destruction of the five lower fetters one attains final deliverance early; if one does not attain final knowledge here and now… nor… early, then by the destruction of the five lower fetters one attains final deliverance late; if one does not attain final knowledge here and now… nor… late, then by the destruction of the five lower fetters one attains final deliverance without effort; if one does not attain final knowledge here and now… nor… without effort, then by the destruction of the five lower fetters one attains final deliverance with effort; if one does not attain final knowledge here and now… nor… with effort, then by the destruction of the five lower fetters one goes up-stream, bound for the highest gods.
“By developing the seven enlightenment factors and seriously practicing them thus, these seven benefits are certain.
At one time the Lord was staying at Uruvela on the bank of the river Nerañjara beneath the Goatherd's Banyan Tree, having just attained full Enlightenment.
While thus alone and secluded this thought arose in the Lord's mind:
“This is the sole way for the purification of beings, for the surmounting of sorrow and lamentation, for the disappearing of suffering and grief, for reaching the right path, for realizing Nibbaana, namely, the four foundations of mindfulness.
What are the four?
“A bhikkhu should live practicing body-contemplation on the body… feeling-contemplation on feelings… mind-contemplation on mind… mind-object-contemplation on the objects of mind, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
This is the sole way… namely, the four foundations of mindfulness.
Then Brahma Sahampati, being aware by his mind of the thought in the Lord's mind, just as a strong man might stretch his bent arm or bend his stretched arm, so did he disappear from the Brahma world and appear in front of the Lord.
And arranging his upper robe over one shoulder, he bowed down before the Lord with folded hands and said:
“So it is, Lord!
So it is, Happy One!
This is the sole way for the purification of beings… namely, the four foundations of mindfulness.
So spoke Brahma Sahampati.
And after these words he further said:
“Bhikkhus, a bhikkhu should live mindful and clearly comprehending.
This is our instruction to you.
And how is a bhikkhu mindful?
Herein, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu lives practicing body-contemplation on the body feeling… feeling-contemplation on feelings… mind-contemplation on mind… mind-object-contemplation on the objects of mind, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
In this manner, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is mindful.
And how is a bhikkhu clearly comprehending?
“Herein, bhikkhus, feelings are known to a bhikkhu as they arise, known as they stay, known as they come to an end.
Thoughts are known as they arise, known as they stay, known as they come to an end.
Perceptions are known as they arise, known as they stay, known as they come to an end.
In this manner, bhikkhus, a bhikkhu is clearly comprehending.
“A bhikkhu should live mindful and clearly comprehending.
This is our instruction to you.
“These, bhikkhus, are the four foundations of mindfulness…
“While he is living practicing body-contemplation on the body, whatever desire there is with regard to the body is abandoned.
By abandoning desire the deathless is realized.
“While he is living practicing feeling-contemplation on feelings… mind-contemplation on mind… mind-object contemplation on the objects of mind, whatever desire there is with regard to mind-objects is abandoned.
By abandoning desire the deathless is realized.
“Bhikkhus, there are these five faculties.
What five?
The faculties of faith, energy, mindfulness, concentration and wisdom.
Now what, bhikkhus, is the faculty of faith?
“Herein, bhikkhus, the noble disciple has faith.
He has faith in the Enlightenment of the Tathaagata thus: 'The Lord is such since he is Arahant, fully Enlightened, perfect in understanding and conduct, sublime, knower of the worlds, unsurpassed leader of men to be tamed, the Teacher of devas and men, enlightened, the Lord.' This, bhikkhus, is called the faculty of faith.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the faculty of energy?
“Herein, bhikkhus, the noble disciple lives with energy aroused for getting rid of unskilled states and perfecting skilled states, strenuous and energetic, not giving up the effort with regard to skilled states.
This, bhikkhus, is called the faculty of energy.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the faculty of mindfulness?
“Herein, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is mindful, possessing excellent mindfulness and prudence, remembering and recollecting what was done and said long ago.
This, bhikkhus, is called the faculty of mindfulness.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the faculty of concentration?
“Herein, bhikkhus, the noble disciple, by making relinquishment the object of thought, obtains concentration, obtains unification of mind.
This, bhikkhus, is called the faculty of concentration.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the faculty of wisdom?
“Herein, bhikkhus, the noble disciple is wise, possessing the wisdom the rising and passing away, noble, penetrating, leading to the complete ending of suffering.
This, bhikkhus, is called the faculty of wisdom.
At one time the venerable Saariputta and the venerable Anuruddha were staying at Vesaalii in Ambapaalii's Grove.
And the venerable Saariputta, emerging from seclusion in the evening, approached the venerable Anuruddha… and said:
“Very clear and bright are your faculties, friend Anuruddha.
Quite pure and cleansed are your features.
In what state does the venerable Anuruddha mostly dwell now?
“I mostly dwell now, friend with the mind well established in the four foundations of mindfulness.
What four?
I live practicing body-contemplation on the body… feeling… mind… mind-object-contemplation on the objects of mind, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
I mostly dwell now, friend, with the mind well established in these four foundations of mindfulness.
“Whatever bhikkhu, friend, is an Arahant, has finished with the taints, reached fulfillment, done what had to be done, laid aside the burden, attained his objective, completely finished with the fetter of becoming and is released through perfect knowledge, he mostly dwells with a mind well established in the four foundations of mindfulness.
“It is indeed a gain for us, friend.
It is indeed a great gain for us, friend, that in the presence of the venerable Anuruddha we have heard him utter this impressive speech.
“Bhikkhus, even though a Wheel-turning King has absolute lordship and sovereignty over the four continents, and when the body breaks up at death he arises in a good bourne, the heaven world, in companionship with the devas of the Heaven of the Thirty-three, and there in the Nandana Grove, surrounded by a group of celestial nymphs he roams about possessing and enjoying the fivefold heavenly sense-pleasures — even so, there are four things he does not have.
And thus he is not completely freed from Niraya hell, the animal womb, the realm of ghosts, a state of loss, an evil bourne, a state of ruin.
“Even though a noble disciple, bhikkhus, keeps himself alive with scraps of food and wears cast-off rags — yet there are four things that he has, and is thus completely freed from Niraya hell, the animal womb, the realm of ghosts, a state of loss, an evil bourne, a state of ruin.
What are the four things he has?
“The noble disciple, bhikkhus, through experience has confidence in the Enlightened One thus: 'The Lord is such since he is an Arahant, fully enlightened, perfect in understanding and conduct, sublime, knower of the worlds, unsurpassed leader of men to be tamed, the Teacher of devas and men, enlightened, the Lord.'
“Through experience he bas confidence in the Dhamma thus: 'Well taught is the Dhamma by the Lord, visible here and now, immediate, inviting one to come and see, guiding one onward and capable of being experienced by the wise.'
“Through experience he has confidence in the Community thus: 'The community of the Lord's disciples has progressed by the good way, the community of the Lord's disciples has progressed by the straight way, the community of the Lord's disciples has progressed by the true way, the community of the Lord's disciples has progressed by the proper way, that is to say, the four pairs of men, the eight types of persons.
This community of the Lord's disciples is worthy of adoration, is worthy of hospitality, is worthy of gifts, is worthy of reverential salutation, as an unsurpassed field of merit for the world.'
“He has the virtues pleasing to the Noble Ones; unbroken, untorn, unblotched, unmottled, liberating, commended by the perceptive, not misapprehended, conducive to concentration.
“These are the four things he has.
“There is the possession of the four continents, bhikkhus, and there is the possession of these four things.
But the possession of the four continents is not worth a sixteenth of the possession of these four things.
“Bhikkhus, those for whom you have compassion, those who think you worth listening to — whether friends, acquaintances, kinsmen or relatives — they should be encouraged in, introduced to and established in the four factors of stream-entry.
What are the four?
“They should be encouraged in, introduced to and established in confidence in the Enlightened One… the Dhamma… the Community… in the virtues pleasing to the Noble Ones, unbroken, untorn, unblotched, unmottled, liberating, commended by the perceptive, not misapprehended, conducive to concentration.
“Those for whom you have compassion, those who think you worth listening to — whether friends, acquaintances, kinsmen or relatives — they should be encouraged in, introduced to and established in these four factors of stream-entry.
“There are, bhikkhus, these four Noble Truths.
What four?
The Noble Truth of suffering, the Noble Truth of the origin of suffering, the Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering and the Noble Truth of the way leading to cessation of suffering.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the Noble Truth of suffering?
“It may be said to be the five aggregates of grasping, namely, the body-aggregate of grasping, the feeling-aggregate of grasping, the perception-aggregate of grasping, the mental activities-aggregate of grasping, the consciousness-aggregate of grasping.
This, bhikkhus, is called the Noble Truth of suffering.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the Noble Truth of the origin of suffering?
“It is that craving leading to becoming along with enjoyment and attachment, finding enjoyment now here, now there; namely, sensual craving, the craving for becoming, the craving for non-becoming.
This, bhikkhus, is called the Noble Truth of the origin of suffering.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering?
“It is the complete fading away and cessation of this very craving, the abandoning and rejecting of it, liberation and detachment from it.
This, bhikkhus, is called the Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the Noble Truth of the way to cessation of suffering?
“It is just this Noble Eightfold Path, that is to say, right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.
This, bhikkhus, is called the Noble Truth of the way to cessation of suffering.
“These, bhikkhus, are the four Noble Truths.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, to realize, 'This is suffering,' an effort must be made.
To realize, 'This is the origin of suffering,' an effort must be made.
To realize, 'This is the cessation of suffering,' an effort must be made.
To realize, 'This is the way leading to cessation of suffering,' an effort must be made.
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man whose life-span is a hundred years, who would live a hundred years, and they were to say to him: 'Come, good man, in the morning they will strike you with a hundred spears and again at midday and in the evening.
Now, good man, you whose life-span is a hundred years, who will live a hundred years, being struck daily with three hundred spears, at the end of the hundred years will penetrate the four Noble Truth not penetrated before.'
“Even if it were to happen like that a son of good family, bhikkhus, influenced by what is of value, might well undergo.
For what reason?
Unimaginable, bhikkhus, is the beginning to the round of births.
A starting point is not evident of blows by spears, swords, and axes.
But, O monks, I do not say that the penetration of the four Noble Truths is accompanied by suffering and grief, but it is accompanied by pleasure and happiness, I say… Therefore, bhikkhus, to realize, 'This is suffering,' an effort must be made… To realize, 'This is the way to cessation of suffering,' an effort must be made.
“Bhikkhus, as long as moon and sun do not arise in the world, so long is there no manifestation of a great light, of great brightness.
There is then blinding darkness, a total darkness.
There is no discerning of night and day, the months and half-months nor the seasons and the years.
“But when moon and sun arise in the world, then there is a manifestation of a great light, of great brightness.
There is then no blinding darkness, no total darkness.
Then night and day are discerned, the months and half-months and the seasons and the years.
“Similarity, bhikkhus, as long as a Tathaagata, a Perfected One, a fully Enlightened One does not arise in the world, so long is there no manifestation of a great light, of great brightness.
There is then a blinding darkness, a total darkness.
There is no declaring, teaching, making known, establishing, disclosing, analyzing, making clear of the four Noble Truths.
“But when a Tathaagata, a Perfected One, a fully Enlightened One arises in the world, then there is a manifestation of a great light, of great brightness.
There is then no blinding darkness, no total darkness.
There is then a declaring, a teaching, a making clear of the four Noble Truths…
“Therefore, bhikkhus, to realize, 'This is suffering,' an effort must be made… To realize, 'This is the way leading to cessation of suffering,' an effort must be made.
Traditionally the twelve factors are regarded as spread over the three periods of time or past, present and future lives, and fall into groups as being active or causative and passive or resultant.
There are two past active factors, ignorance and volitional activities, giving rise to their results in this life, consciousness, mind-and body, the sixfold sense-field, contact and feeling.
Craving, grasping, and becoming are the present causative factors with their results in a future life, represented by birth and aging-and-death, etc..
See Dependent Origination, by Piyadassi Thera.
Furthermore:
All are enumerated fully in Majjhima Nikaaya, sutta.
A person who has eliminated these five fetters is called an anaagaamii, a never-returner.
After death he does not come back again to this world, but is born in one of the five Pure Abodes of the realm of form and there realizes final deliverance.
The last five of these seven fruits refer to the five grades of anaagaamii in descending order, the highest is “one who attains final deliverance early,” down to the “one going upstream.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
I will now explain this verse so that you can practice in a way leading to the supreme attainment, capable of eliminating all your suffering and fears, reaching the refuge of peace.
We come into this world without a substantial refuge.
Nothing — aside from the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha — will follow us into the next life.
These three are the only things in which we can take refuge both in this life and in lives to come.
There are two levels on which people take refuge in the Triple Gem.
Some take refuge only allegorically, on the level of individuals, whereas others take refuge on the level of inner qualities, by developing the steps of the practice within themselves.
A.
Buddha.
Buddhas are people who have attained purity of heart.
There are four types:
Private Buddhas: those who have gained Awakening without establishing a religion.
On attaining the goal, they live by themselves.
Disciple Buddhas: a Buddha's immediate disciples — male or female — who have practiced in line with the teachings of a Buddha until they too have gained Awakening.
Learned Buddhas: those who have studied the teachings in detail, have followed them, and have attained the goal.
All four of these types are individual people, so to take refuge in them is to take refuge on the level of individuals.
They can give us refuge only in a shallow and not very substantial way.
Even though taking refuge on this level can be advantageous to us, it helps us only on the level of the world and can give only temporary protection against falling into the realms of deprivation.
If we lose faith in these individuals, our mind can change to a lower level — for all individuals fall under the laws of all fabricated things: They are inconstant and changing, subject to stress, and not-self — i.e., they can't prevent their own death.
So if you go to a Buddha as refuge on the level of individuals, there are only two sorts of results you'll get: at first gladness, and then sadness when the time comes to part — for it's the nature of all individuals in the world that they arise, age, grow ill, and die.
The wisest sages and the most ordinary people are all equal on this point.
B.
Dhamma.
For many of us, the teachings in which we take our refuge are also on the level of individuals.
Why is that?
Because we see them as the words of individual people.
Sages of the past have divided the teachings in the Buddhist Canon into four types:
Sayings of his disciples.
Sayings of heavenly beings.
There were occasions when heavenly beings, on coming to pay respect to the Buddha, said truths worth taking to heart.
Sayings of seers.
Some hermits and yogis uttered truths from which Buddhists can benefit.
All of these sayings were organized into the three parts of the Buddhist Canon: the discourses, the discipline, and the Abhidhamma.
If we take refuge in the Dhamma on this level, it is simply an object: something we can remember.
But memory is inconstant and can't provide us with a safe, dependable refuge.
At best it can help us only on the worldly level because we are depending allegorically on individuals, on objects, as our refuge.
Sangha.
There are two sorts of Sangha.
The conventional Sangha: ordinary people who have ordained and taken up the homeless life.
This sort of Sangha is composed of four sorts of people.
b.
Upadusika: those who, on being ordained in Buddhism, destroy the Buddha's teachings through their behavior — not abandoning the things they should abandon, not doing the things they should do, damaging their own capacity for good and that of others, being destructive, falling away from the Buddha's teachings.
c.
Upamuyhika: those who, on being ordained in Buddhism, make themselves blind and ignorant, who don't look for tactics for bringing their behavior into line with the Buddha's teachings.
They don't pull themselves out of their unskillful ways and stay continually deluded, oblivious, and defiled.
d.
Upanisaranika: those who, on being ordained in Buddhism, are intent on studying and practicing in line with what they have learned, who try to find themselves a secure refuge, and who don't let themselves become heedless or complacent.
Whatever evil the Buddha said to abandon, they try to abandon.
Whatever good he said to develop, they try to develop.
Whether or not they attain that goodness, they keep on trying.
All four of these count as one type of Sangha on the level of individuals.
The Noble Sangha.
This has four levels: those who have practiced the Buddha's teachings until they have reached the attainments of stream-entry, once-returning, non-returning, or arahantship.
All four of these are still on the level of individuals because they are individual people who have reached the transcendent attainments in their hearts.
Suppose, for example, we say that Aññakondañña is a stream-winner, Sariputta a once-returner, Moggallana a non-returner, and Ananda an arahant.
All four of them are still individuals in name and body.
To take refuge in them is to take refuge on the level of individuals — and as individuals they are inconstant and unstable.
Their bodies, sense faculties, and mental phenomena by nature have to age, grow ill, and die.
In other words, they are anicca, inconstant and changeable; dukkha, subject to stress and suffering; and anatta: They themselves can't prevent the nature of conditioned phenomena from taking its course with them.
This being the case, then when anyone tries to take refuge in them, that refuge is inconstant.
We can depend on them only for a while, but they can't provide us any true refuge.
They can't keep us from falling into the realms of deprivation.
At best, taking refuge in them can give us results on the worldly level — and the worldly level is changing with every moment.
This ends the discussion of the Triple Refuge on the level of individuals.
Taking refuge in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha on the level of inner qualities means reaching the Triple Gem with the heart through the practice.
To reach the Buddha on the level of inner qualities, you first have to know the virtues of the Buddha, which are of two sorts: causes and results.
The causes of his Awakening are mindfulness and alertness.
The result of his Awakening is the transcendent: the stilling of all defilements and mental fermentations.
So we have to develop these qualities within ourselves.
Buddha-sati — mindfulness like the Buddha's — is what wakes us up.
Full alertness is what makes us correctly aware of cause and effect.
The way to develop these qualities is to practice in line with the four frames of reference.
This will enable us to reach the Buddha on the level of inner qualities.
A.
Contemplation of the body as a frame of reference.
This means being firmly mindful of the body, using mindfulness to wake up the body and mind both by day and by night — sitting, standing, walking, lying down.
We use mindfulness and alertness to be fully conscious throughout the body.
This is the cause for reaching the Buddha on the level of inner qualities — i.e., reaching the Buddha by oneself and within oneself, without having to depend on anyone else.
When you depend on yourself, that's when you're on the right track.
Before focusing mindfulness on the body so as to wake yourself up, you first have to know that there are two ways of looking at the body:
The body in and of itself — i.e., any one aspect of any of these four properties.
For example, we can take the wind property.
Focus your mindfulness and alertness on nothing but the wind property and keep them there.
You don't have to get involved with any of the other properties.
This is called the body in and of itself.
From there you can go to wind in and of itself.
There are six aspects to the wind property: the breath energy flowing down from the head to the spaces between the fingers and toes; the breath energy flowing from the spaces between the fingers and toes up to the top of the head; the breath forces in the stomach; the breath forces in the intestines; and the in-and-out breath.
These six aspects make up the wind property in the body.
When you focus on wind in and of itself, be mindful to keep track of only one of these aspects at a time — such as the in-and-out breath — without worrying about any other aspects of the breath energy.
This can be called focusing on wind in itself.
The same principle applies to earth in and of itself, water in and of itself, and fire in and of itself.
When you have mindfulness and alertness constantly established in the body, the body in and of itself, wind, fire, earth, or water in and of itself — whichever seems easiest and most comfortable — keep with it as much as possible.
When you do this, the body will wake up, for you aren't letting it simply follow its natural course.
To bring mindfulness into the body helps keep it awake.
The body will feel lighter and lighter as we keep it in mind.
Alertness is what enables us to be aware throughout the body.
When these two mental qualities enter into the body, the body will feel agile, pliant, and light.
In Pali this is called kaya-lahuta.
The mind will also be awake and will give rise to knowledge in and of itself through its own “sanditthiko” practice — i.e., the person who does the practice will see the results for him or herself in the here and now.
People who awaken from their slumbers are able to see things and know them.
The same holds true for people who practice mindfulness immersed in the body as a frame of reference: They are bound to see the true nature of their own bodies.
To penetrate in, knowing and seeing in this way, is to reach the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha — which differ only in name, but are one and the same in their essence.
Whoever doesn't practice in this way is asleep, both in body and mind.
A person asleep can't see or know anything at all, which is why we can say that people of this sort have yet to reach the Buddha on the level of the inner qualities.
B.
Contemplation of feelings as a frame of reference.
Be mindful of feelings as they arise within you.
Feelings are results that come from your own past and present actions.
There are three sorts:
To practice contemplation of feelings, be mindful of each of the various kinds of feeling that occur in the body and mind.
For instance, sometimes there's physical pleasure but mental distress; sometimes physical pain but mental pleasure; sometimes pleasure both in body and mind; and sometimes pain both in body and mind.
So focus in on being mindful of feelings as they arise.
Examine them closely.
This is called contemplation of feelings.
As for feelings in and of themselves, this means focusing on one type of feeling.
For instance, wherever there's pleasure, focus right there, solely on the pleasure.
You don't have to get involved with feelings of pain or equanimity.
If you're going to focus on pleasure, keep focused right there.
Or, if you want, you can focus on equanimity without getting involved with pleasure or pain.
Don't let the mind jump around in such a way that any other preoccupations come in and interfere.
Keep monitoring the feeling you've chosen until you know its true nature through your own awareness.
Whichever type of feeling is easiest for you to focus on, keep your mindfulness and alertness right there as much as you can.
This is what will enable you to awaken from the feelings within you.
Whoever does this ranks as having developed the inner quality of “buddha” that is the cause for coming awake.
Contemplation of the mind as a frame of reference.
Be mindful of the state of your own mind so that you can awaken it from the slumber of its delusions.
When your mind awakens, it will be able to see and know the various things occurring in the present.
This will enable it to become firmly centered in the factors of concentration and jhana, or mental absorption, which in turn lead to discernment, skilled awareness, and release.
There are three basic states of mind you can focus on:
Aversion: The mind at times gets irritated and angry, causing whatever internal goodness it has to deteriorate.
Aversion is thus a way in which the mind destroys itself.
Delusion: absent-mindedness, forgetfulness, mental darkness, misunderstanding.
These states of mind arise from preoccupations concerning what we like and dislike.
If you have mindfulness watching over your mind with every moment, it will enable the mind to awaken and blossom, to know the truth about itself.
Whenever passion arises in the mind, focus on being mindful of the mind in and of itself.
Don't focus on the object of the passion.
Pay attention solely to the present, and the passion will fade.
Or, if you want, you can use other methods to help, by contemplating the object of the passion in certain ways.
For example, you can contemplate the unattractiveness of the body, focusing first on the insides of your own body, seeing them as filthy and disgusting.
Your mind, which has been attached, will then be able to free itself from the passion in which it is immersed and to become more blooming and bright.
Whenever aversion arises in the mind, focus on being mindful exclusively of the present state of your mind.
Don't focus attention on the external object or person that gave rise to the anger and aversion.
Anger in the mind is like a burning fire.
If you aren't mindful and alert to the state of your own mind, and instead think only of the object or person that incited the anger, it's like setting yourself on fire.
All you can do is end up getting burnt.
So you shouldn't preoccupy yourself with the outside object.
Instead, focus on being mindful and aware of the state of aversion in the mind.
When mindfulness reaches full strength, the state of aversion will immediately disband.
Aversion and anger are like a cover over a fire that lets the fire keep smoldering away, providing heat but no light.
If we remove the cover by doing away with the aversion, the light of the fire can brighten the mind.
The “light” here is discernment and skilled awareness.
Actually, there's nowhere else that we have to look for goodness other than our own minds.
That's how we'll be able to gain the freedom from suffering and stress that is termed citta-vimutti, mental release, i.e., a mind beyond the reach of its preoccupations.
This is one way in which we reach the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha on the level of inner qualities.
As for states of delusion, in which the mind tends to be absent-minded and forgetful: These come from there being many objects crowding in on the mind.
When we find this happening, we should center the mind on a single preoccupation where we can gather strength for our mindfulness and alertness, in the same way that we can take diffused light rays and focus them on a single point.
The power of the light is sure to get brighter.
In the same way, when we are constantly mindful of the mind and don't let it get involved with various outside perceptions and preoccupations, mindfulness will give rise to a powerful light: skilled awareness.
When skilled awareness arises within us, our minds will grow shining bright, and we'll awaken from our slumber of unawareness.
We will have attained a quality of secure refuge in our own hearts.
We'll know for ourselves and see for ourselves, and this is what will enable us to attain the noble qualities of the transcendent.
D.
Mental qualities as a frame of reference.
Be mindful to focus on the mental qualities that occur in the mind with every moment.
Mental qualities are of two basic sorts, good and bad.
Bad mental qualities, which obstruct the mind from attaining higher levels of goodness, are called the Hindrances, and there are five sorts.
a.
Sensual desire: hankering after sensual objects — sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas that you like and find appealing; and a hankering after sensual moods, such as passion, anger, aversion, and delusion — assuming good to be bad and bad to be good, right to be wrong and wrong to be right.
A hankering for any of these things is classed as sensual desire.
b.
Malevolence: ill will for people or objects, hoping that they will be destroyed or come to a bad end.
c.
Sloth & drowsiness: sleepiness, torpor, lassitude, laziness, and depression.
d.
Restlessness & anxiety: being upset at failure in your aims, lacking the mindfulness to put a brake on your worries and concerns.
e.
Uncertainty: indecision; doubt about the various things or qualities your are working to develop in your practice.
These five Hindrances are bad mental qualities.
If you fall into any of them, you're in the dark — like a person at the bottom of a well who can't see anything on the surface of the earth, can't move around as he likes, can't hear what people at the top of the well are saying, can't see the light of the sun and moon that illumine the earth.
In the same way, the Hindrances obstruct us from developing goodness in many, many ways.
They close off our ears and eyes, keep us in the dark, put us to sleep.
This is why we should work at developing the good mental qualities that will awaken us from the slumber of our unawareness.
For instance, we should develop the four levels of jhana or mental absorption, which are the tools for suppressing or eliminating all of the Hindrances.
a.
The first jhana has five factors.
Directed thought: Think about any one of the objects of meditation that exist within you, such as the in-and-out breath.
Make the mind one, keep it with the object you are thinking of, and don't let it slip off to anything else: This is called singleness of preoccupation.
Evaluation: Carefully observe the object of your meditation until you see its truth.
When you are thoroughly aware of the object — this is called alertness — the results will arise within you: pleasure or ease; and rapture — fullness of body and mind.
When mindfulness fills the body like this, the body feels saturated, like soil saturated with moisture: Whatever you plant stays green and fresh.
Plants flourish.
Birds and other forest animals come to live in their shade.
When rain falls, the soil can hold it instead of letting it wash away.
A person who has mastered the first jhana is like a holding-place of goodness for other human and celestial beings because jhana and concentration can have a cooling influence not only on oneself, but also on others as well.
When mindfulness and alertness are stay focused on your mind, the mind feels saturated and full with an unadulterated sense of rapture and joy at all times.
As for the pleasure and ease that come from the first jhana, they give you a sense of freedom with no worries or concerns for anyone or anything — like a person who has attained enough wealth that he no longer has any worries or concerns about his livelihood, and so can relax in peace.
When you attain the pleasure and ease that come from the first jhana, you are freed from the Hindrances of indecision and restlessness & anxiety.
So you should work at developing these factors in your mind until it can stay steadily in jhana.
Your heart will then be blooming and bright, giving rise to the light of discernment, or liberating insight.
And if you have developed your capabilities enough, then on attaining the first jhana you may gain entry to the transcendent.
Some people, though, may go on to the second jhana.
b.
The second jhana has three factors: rapture, pleasure, and singleness of preoccupation.
The power of the mind gets stronger step by step, so try to keep your mind in that state simply by focusing down and keeping mindfulness firmly established right there.
The mind will grow even stronger and this will lead you on to the third jhana.
c.
The third jhana has two factors: pleasure and singleness of preoccupation.
Keep focusing down through the power of mindfulness and alertness, and you will be able to shed the factor of pleasure and enter the fourth jhana.
d.
The fourth jhana has two factors: equanimity and singleness of preoccupation.
On this level of jhana, the mind has great strength, based on its strong focus accompanied by mindfulness and alertness.
The mind is firm and unmoving — so completely unmoved by past and future that it lets them both go.
It keeps track solely of the present, steady and unwavering like the light of a Coleman lantern when there's no wind.
When the mind attains the fourth jhana, it gives rise to a brightness: discernment and the skill of liberating insight.
This is what enables it to gain understanding into the four Noble Truths, and so to proceed to the transcendent — the truly safe refuge.
People who have done this experience nothing but an inner brightness and happiness in their hearts, for they dwell with the quality they have given rise to within themselves.
They reach the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha on the highest level, the level of release or ultimate attainment, a quality free from defilement and mental fermentations.
People who train their hearts in this way have reached the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha on the level of inner quality.
In other words, they have reached refuge in their own hearts.
They have absolutely closed off the route to the realms of deprivation.
At the very least, they are destined after death to go to the higher realms of happiness.
At best, they will attain nibbana.
All of them are certain to attain nibbana within at least seven lifetimes, for they have reached an inner quality that's steady and certain.
They won't fall into anything low.
Anyone who has yet to attain this quality, though, has an uncertain future.
So if we want the peace and security that the Buddha's teachings has to offer, we should all try to find ourselves a dependable refuge.
If you take refuge on the allegorical level, the level of individuals, find people of worth so that your conviction in them will take you to the happy realms.
As for refuge on the level of inner qualities, which will really be of substantial value to you, practice so as to give rise to those qualities within yourself.
To summarize: On the level of inner qualities, the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha are all one and the same thing.
They differ only in name.
So you should “opanayiko” — bring these qualities into your heart.
“Sanditthiko” — When you practice, you'll see them for yourself.
“Paccattam” — You'll know them only for yourself.
Things that other people know about aren't safe.
If you want peace and refuge that are substantial and sure, you should give rise to them in your own heart.
The result will be nibbana, liberation from defilement, from all birth, aging, illness, and death in this world and any world to come.
This is “buddha” on the level of results: freedom from sleep, total Awakening.
And this ends our discussion of the verse on refuge.
When I was separated from my little one, his father, and the old mahout, it was the end of the world for me.
For days and months I had gone about in a daze.
But that experience I have related in a previous story.
Now I would like to tell you about the peacock.
The peacock was kept in a cage in the temple premises.
I never could understand why the monk allowed him to be caged up like that.
The whole day long he used to pace back and forth, back and forth, unceasingly inside his cage.
When this gorgeous creature let out his mournful cry, which resounded through the air, I recognized the call all too well.
The note of pain, grief, lamentation, and despair in the cry was unmistakable.
I realized he was suffering from the pain of separation — from his mate, perhaps, his kith and kin, his familiar haunts in the jungle, and furthermore, he was experiencing extreme frustration at being locked up in a cage.
I walked up close to the cage and observed the marvelous colors of his body.
He was a majestic specimen.
He stood still, posing, feeling my admiring gaze on him.
At that moment I knew he was not feeling any grief or loneliness.
He was finding self-affirmation in my admiring gaze, no doubt.
I lost myself in the sheer beauty of his form, complexity of design, and color.
He held his arched neck in a stately fashion, its head proudly poised with its dainty coronet.
From the top of his head, down over his neck to his breast and under-carriage, he wore, like a coat of mail, an eye-shattering resplendent blue.
Then came a bold pattern of black and white on its wing feathers, ending in a band of buff edging.
On the nape of his neck, where the blue ended, there was a scarf, as it were, of ornate embroidery in greens and golds.
I had never seen anything like it before; not even the richest of caparisons I and my companions wore in the Esala Perahera could compare with this.
And the whole of his body had a wet glistening gold sheen to it.
The fine quills of his green tail feathers with their “eyes” seemed a-quiver as though just dipped in liquid gold.
As I contemplated this ornate bird, this mythical vehicle of a Hindu god, my admiration slowly gave way to sadness.
My little one's father too had been a lordly, majestic specimen, but old age, sickness, and death had overtaken him in the end.
The peacock was in the prime of his life but if I were able to telescope time into a few minutes' duration, I would see the change taking place in him very clearly revealed before me as though I were watching a film.
The change in us takes place in such slow motion that we do not notice it from moment to moment.
Once an arctic tern told me that when he looked down from way up high at the great wide ocean beneath him, he saw no motion at all.
Only a frozen sheet of blue with gashes of white swirls all over like a “still” from a film.
That did not mean there was no motion in what he saw.
So perhaps we do not see the constant flux in us and all around us, but it is there all the same.
Though the peacock's carriage was haughty, his lackluster eyes betrayed his wretchedness.
I longed to comfort him.
But what comforting words could I give him?
“Friend,” I said finally, trying hard to swallow down the lump that had got stuck in my throat, “We must count ourselves fortunate to be in the peaceful precincts of this temple.
The peacock jerked his neck around and focused on me with angry red eyes.
“You call me fortunate?” he asked, “Do you speak in jest?
I have been sentenced for life in this hideous iron cage and you call me fortunate?
What wrong have I done to deserve this punishment?
“We are all prisoners of our karma — up to a certain point,” I said.
“Listen to the monk when he preaches to devotees on a full-moon day.
I have learned such lessons from his sermons.
“Listening to sermons will not unlock the door of this prison, will it?
“It will unlock other doors — the doors of your mind.
The mind is free to roam anywhere at will.
By disciplining it, you can attain the highest bliss inside this cage.
Make out of your penance a unique opportunity to free your mind.
“Free my mind?” the peacock let out a hollow croak.
“Yes.
Discipline your mind.
Start today itself and see if it does not bring you peace and freedom from suffering.
“How does one discipline one's mind?
I was about to teach him the technique of the in-and-out breathing meditation when the tortoise spoke up.
I had not seen him among the tall grass and weeds by the cage.
“You are talking about being imprisoned in a cage,” he said, “but what about my carapace that I carry around with me wherever I go?
“But that is your protection, not your prison,” the peacock countered, pecking away at the iron rails and sometimes trying desperately to grip one rail in between his beak and to pull it out.
“Exactly.
I do not look upon it as a burden or prison but my protection.
Like Kapuri here, I have learned to listen to the words of the Dhamma.
We are blessed to live in these grounds, as she says, where we can hear the words of the Dhamma and live within sight of the Sangha who are protectors and teachers of the Buddha-word.
Like Kapuri, I meditate too.
I can reach far beyond the confines of my carapace.
The mind's potentialities are infinite.
“And what do you meditate on?” the peacock asked with idle curiosity.
“On my thoughts.
I watch each thought as it arises and passes away.
I place a guard at the gateway of my mind and I challenge each and every thought as it comes, peruse its identity card, check the contents of its accompanying baggage and prevent it entry if it is unwholesome.
Now I have become so adept at this exercise that I can even forestall unwholesome thoughts before they show their faces at the gate.
Haven't you heard the words of the Tibetan yogi, Milarepa: 'Let no perverted thought find entry in your mind'?
Then when wholesome thoughts come and I have checked their credentials, I let them in and even encourage them to bring their friends.
In that manner do I pass the time of day.
“And you don't get bored?
“I used to, at the beginning, when I was a novice at the practice of mental discipline.
Not only bored, I used to have all sorts of unruly thoughts barging through the gateway.
There would be a veritable clamor and scrimmage at the entrance and then an onrush of chaos.
Thoughts of hate, desire, worries, anxieties and even sloth and torpor would manage to slip in surreptitiously, and also doubt and skepticism, all trying their best to destroy my concentration.
Such impeding thoughts are common to us all.
But as I progressed with my meditations, my mindfulness became sharper and more alert in recognizing them, stalling them or chasing them away.
They now only strengthen my will to persevere.
“You are luckier than us,” I said, “for you have a carapace which shields you from the external world.
We are exposed and vulnerable and are being continually bombarded by sense-impressions.
This makes the work of our meditations so much more difficult.
“How can I meditate?” the peacock asked irritably.
“I'm all the time thinking of home — my little corner of the jungle grassland which was my kingdom.” He sighed deeply.
“There I roamed at will with my dear ones, roosting in the low wood-apple trees, scratching for grub under scrub jungle.
I was a king among the fraternity of jungle birds.
Even the beasts of the jungle respected me.
How sweet were conversations with them all.
Even when the rowdy monkeys came bounding from tree to tree and saw me, they would pause to exchange a few words of polite chatter.
Pleasant was the speech of jungle friends to my ears.
Pleasant was it under the shade of the trees and sweet the taste of fruits and the waters of clear, cool, meandering streams in the grasslands.
That whole kingdom is now lost to me.
A whole world did I lose when I was ensnared by a two-legged hunter.
“Moan not and do not think with bitterness of the two-legged hunter.
He was your karma,” I said.
“I know exactly how you must feel for I too lost a whole world.
However, I practice very diligently the exercises set for meditation, which is the only way out of pain, grief, lamentation, and despair.
“Your little corner of the jungle,” the tortoise said, “is not safe from the destructive powers of the elements, earthquakes, cyclones, fires, and man.
Neither are you.
You yourself fell victim to man's cunning.
You know the jungle teems with wild, wily beasts of carnivorous bent from whom even you and your dear ones are not safe.
You say the sweetest taste you ever want is the taste of jungle fruits and the water of the jungle streams.
But where is that world now?
There is no security in the external world because nothing is free from change.
The world of sense cannot offer a safe refuge to anyone.
“You take our advice and start disciplining your mind from today,” I said, and gave him a lesson on mindfulness of breathing and the meditation on loving-kindness.
Having given the instructions, we left him.
On the following day when I went to see how the peacock was, I found him in a very depressed state of mind.
The tortoise was already there trying to console him.
“But is there any harm in hoping?” the peacock asked tremulously as soon as he saw me.
“Hoping for what?
“Hoping that I may escape this prison one day and return to my corner of the jungle?
Hoping that some day in the future I may be able to join my loved ones?
It is this hope that is preventing me from languishing away inside this cage.
“Dear friend, do not languish away with vain hoping,” I said gently.
“Do not knock your head against a stone wall.
Let that stone wall turn into vistas along which your mind can travel to real freedom.
The peacock suddenly sat on the floor of the cage in a heap of feathers, like a rebellious child.
“Am I to end my days then in this miserable cage?” he cried out shrilly.
“Kapuri, you are wise and talk like an oracle.
Do please read my future.
What does it hold?
Will I never go back home and see my dear ones?
I could see that the peacock had begun to panic.
Fear was written all over his quivering, harried face.
“No one can see the future,” I said, “for the future is as yet uncharted.
You can work out your deliverance by making fresh, wholesome karma.
Seek your refuge in that karma.
“Tortoise, sir, you look like a sage,” the peacock turned to him beseechingly, “Surely, you can read my future?
The tortoise came up close to the cage, then peering at the peacock, whispered softly and soothingly.
“There is hope — much hope to be had in your own efforts.
Seek your refuge in discipline.
Strive hard.
Be brave!
If you will excuse me, I will go back to my meditations now,” the tortoise added, “but I shall come again to see you, later.
“Thank you, sir, I'm most grateful to you.
After the tortoise went away, I remained with the peacock.
He looked desperate still and had begun to shiver.
Slowly, I thrust my trunk through the gap between the rails and stroked him gently.
“You are shivering,” I told him.
“Do you know why you are shivering?
The peacock shook his head.
“It's because you are afraid.
You are frightened of losing that so-called world of security — your loved ones, familiar haunts and friends.
I went through the same experience when the little one was taken away from me and before that, when his father left me, and later, when my old mahout died.” I fell silent, recalling those grim days when I alternated between panic, anguish, fear and despair which filled my legs with disquiet.
I remembered how restless I was, so restless that I was unable to stay still even for a minute.
I swayed to and fro while I was tethered to a coconut tree in the temple premises, just as the peacock paced back and forth in his cage.
To and fro, to and fro, I swayed, swaying my head and trunk as well and lifting my feet one after the other in a tormented, unceasing motion.
Then I remembered how I used to stand stricken with fear, my hide and my legs visibly shaking, uncontrollably.
Once, when this happened, my young mahout noticed me shivering and rubbed my body all over and covered me with a heavy cloth, thinking I had caught a chill.
But the cloth was not necessary.
The moment his hand touched my body, I felt a warmth coursing through me.
There was no magic in his touch, either.
It was my instantaneous response to that physical contact of concern.
Reflecting on the instantaneous warmth that coursed through my body when the mahout touched me and how the kindly feelings of gratitude surged through me, ousting grief, I had begun to see how quickly feelings arise and pass away.
All feelings are mere phenomena, the monk had said in a sermon.
We are but a continual arising and a passing away of physical and mental phenomena, conditioned by a host of physical and mental phenomena and conditioning more physical and mental phenomena to arise.
The monk had described this life process as corporeality, consisting of the four elements of earth, water, heat and air, together with the mental factors of feeling, perception, mental formations and consciousness; all fleeting phenomena and nothing abiding in them — no self.
Our mind, rooted in ignorance, tries to attach a subject to these fleeting phenomena which are as insubstantial as foam.
Reflecting on that experience of warmth that coursed through my body and how the kindly feelings of gratitude ousted grief, I realized how good it was to cultivate and augment these thoughts of gratitude, loving-kindness, compassion and joy.
That was a sure way of dispelling grief and losing one's so-called “self.
Then I remembered how in those days, when I was estranged from thoughts of loving-kindness and sunk in my grief, my chest used to hurt, as if a dagger had been plunged into it.
Sometimes it used to burn as though in flames.
So did my head beneath the scalp as if it was exposed to the raw air.
The monk had said in a sermon once that we are all burning like a fire, all the time.
The sense organ of sight — the eye — when it comes into contact with its sense-object, starts up a conflagration in our minds, he had said.
So also the other senses when they come into contact with their respective sense-objects.
The resulting process of physical and mental phenomena is like a raging fire.
“Did you have nightmares?” the peacock's question cut across my thoughts, bringing me up sharply to the present.
“Of course.
They were frightful images thrown up by fear — my little one looking lost and forlorn, weeping for me or tearfully asking me why I had let him go.
Then death.
Yes, I dreamt of death too.
Not as something peaceful or as a release from suffering but something that evoked in me a dreadful fear of the deep, dark, unknown.
These nightmares came to me in symbols but nevertheless they struck chords of doom in me.
“So how did you overcome fear?
“Well, even while groveling in the depths of abysmal despair, when the ground underneath my feet seemed to be sliding away, the words of the Blessed One would percolate through to my consciousness as I recalled the monk intoning passages from the Banner Protection.
“Tell me the Banner Protection,” the peacock begged.
He was still shivering.
So I began to chant it and the peacock settled down to listen.
“Once when the Buddha was residing near Savatthi at Jetavana at the monastery of Anathapindika, he addressed the monks… And I chanted on but the peacock began to doze off.
When I finished, I found that the peacock had truly fallen asleep.
So I quietly left him.
A few days later, when my mahout led me into the temple premises after bathing me in the river, following a hard day's work at a dam site, the tortoise told me that the peacock wanted to see me.
The tortoise had been teaching him the in-and-out breathing meditation and the meditation on loving-kindness again, but the peacock was not making much progress with them, so it seemed.
We went together to see him.
“How do you feel today?” I asked him cheerfully.
“A little better,” he said, “but tell me, did repeating the Banner Protection really help you to get rid of fear?
“Yes, when the full meaning of the words sank into my mind, repeating the protection helped me a great deal.
You see, you must have faith in the Buddha-Dhamma.
Not blind faith but faith resulting from having tested the validity of the Dhamma in the light of your own experience.
When I contemplated the meaning of the words, I realized that fear arises because one is afraid to lose what one values, like one's life or what one thinks, in ignorance, is valuable and what one wants all the time and having which gives one a feeling of security.
This object which one values does not last forever and so the sense of security derived from it is also not lasting.
It cannot last because of change.
One cannot ignore change in life.
Change is suffering.
And what is at the root of wanting this and wanting that or not wanting this or not wanting that?
It is craving.
Cut off craving and one is spared fear and anguish.
So simple is the remedy but so difficult — oh, so difficult!
— to do.
But give up attachment I had to.
You see, there was nothing else I could do.
“I cannot give up my past,” the peacock shook his head sadly.
“It is impossible.
We knew the peacock said this because he was an aesthete and an epicurean.
We realized that the chasteness of mental culture did not appeal to him.
He told us that when he was in the jungle grasslands, he had been used to dancing in the sun, listening to concerts of bird song, tasting wild fruits and spending his time agreeably with a community of peacocks and peahens.
It seemed his enjoyment of life was so intense that sometimes he would break into an impromptu dance which was appreciated by an applauding audience.
He confessed to us that it was truly this that he enjoyed more than anything else — the adulation and admiration of his circle of friends among the bird population and the friendlier of the jungle beasts.
Even leopards were seen to amble over to the edge of the jungle to watch his performances, which took place in a naturally formed shallow amphitheater.
Finally, it had come to a stage when his performances became the be-all and end-all of his life, for he had come to delight in the adulation and admiration of all those around him.
If he had no new audience to bedazzle every day he became bored and irritable.
He had no idea to what extent he had been pampering his ego-supporting delusion.
“I do not think I will be successful in severing attachment,” the peacock shook his head again.
“I know giving up attachment cannot be done without pain,” I said.
“Can one amputate a limb without anaesthesia without feeling pain?
Well, cutting off attachment is like that.
It was like that when my little one was taken away from me, and before that when his father left me, and after that, when the old mahout died.
When one loses the object of one's attachment, there is bound to be sorrow and fear because one feels insecure.
It is this attachment that gives one that false sense of 'self.' “Listen to me,” the tortoise said patiently.
“We are all, to a greater or lesser extent, prisoners of our karma — but our minds are always free to make new karma.
That is why the message of the Buddha-Dhamma holds out so much hope and promise for the future to beings suffering in samsara.
It is not a pessimistic message but one that reveals the true nature of existence and offers hope for release.
“Is it through disciplining the mind alone that one can achieve freedom and happiness?” the peacock asked dubiously.
“Mind is chief,” the tortoise declared firmly and quoted from the Dhammapada:
All mental states have mind as their forerunner, mind is their chief and they are mind-made.
If one speaks or acts with a polluted mind, then suffering follows one as the wheel follows the hoof of the draft-ox.
All mental states have mind as their forerunner, mind is their chief and they are mind-made.
If one speaks or acts with a pure mind, then happiness follows one like one's shadow that never departs.
“But one cannot rush headlong into meditation without first having prepared the groundwork for it,” I said.
“If one disciplines oneself in normal day-to-day activities, by keeping the five or eight precepts, one would have already prepared the foundation for mental culture.
You see, discipline in day-to-day life is very important for purifying the mind.
Defilements are then easier to get rid of.
Observing the precepts implies the application of discipline conscientiously and scrupulously over our actions, both with regard to our thoughts as well as actions that stem from thoughts.
A highly trained discipline is an essential prerequisite for a meditator seeking the path of freedom.
“Correct,” the tortoise said.
“Now, peacock, you are in an enviable position to practice the five precepts or even the eight precepts.
But know that mind is the forerunner of all evil and guard your mind, for that is your greatest treasure.
When an angry thought comes into your mind, observe it, analyze why you are angry and check it.
In that way, discipline your mind.
“Also faith is very necessary,” I said, “implicit faith and confidence in the path of mental discipline undertaken.
Effort too is necessary; unflagging effort, mindfulness, concentration, all of which ultimately lead to wisdom or insight.
These are the factors that help to make good one's escape from samsara.
But the humble foundation is discipline in day-to-day life and that cannot be achieved without some basic disciplining of the mind.
The peacock was now listening with avid interest.
“Tell me,” he said, “did you say that by putting a guard at the gateway of the mind and allowing only wholesome thoughts to enter, good karma is made?
“Yes, indeed,” the tortoise said, “that is correct.
We noticed that now the peacock had become quiet and calm.
“Try the meditation,” the tortoise advised him.
“First do the meditation on loving-kindness to all as I have taught you and then do the in-and-out breathing meditation.
The peacock nodded and we left him.
Some days later, when I went to see him, I found he was in a better frame of mind.
He did not seem so obsessed with his past and the pain of separation from it.
He was obviously making an effort to keep his mind on the present moment, all the time.
“Truly, the past is only a construction of the mind,” he confided in me.
“I am learning to let go of it.
“Good,” I said, “Then you will realize that clinging to ideas and concepts and such mental constructions are all superficial and misleading.
They all arise mostly out of ignorance and have only one purpose — self-affirmation.
You will realize this when you go on meditating on your thoughts.
“Not so fast,” he said, “I have not given up the notion of 'self' yet.
But perhaps if I persevere hard enough I might see that 'no-self' point of view.
“Experience it, see it,” I told him.
“The point of view of 'no-self' is not merely to be understood conceptually.
It is to be experienced, to be seen and realized for oneself.
Only then will all your grief and pain fall away.
Suvimalee Karunaratna was born in Sri Lanka in and received her early education in Washington, D.and in Colombo.
While living in Rangoon, where her father was posted as the Sri Lankan ambassador to Burma from -, she received meditation instructions from the Ven.
Mahasi Sayadaw and the Ven.
Webu Sayadaw.
Her first volume of short stories was published in, and several of her short stories have appeared in anthologies of modern writing from Sri Lanka as well as in literary journals.
She is the author of The Walking Meditation and The Healing of the Bull.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
In village India, so I am told, there are men who earn some extra rupees by trapping and taming monkeys to be sold as pets.
Over the years, through trial and error, several ways have been devised to capture these primates, but the simplest method is said to be the monkeypot.
In a clearing, the trapper fastens a short piece of cord or thin chain to a stake or tree-stump.
To the other end he attaches a small pot, one with a rather narrow neck.
Into this pot he drops several nuts, and scatters a few more on the ground nearby.
He then goes a short distance away to wait out of sight.
Soon a band of monkeys arrives and descends to feed.
Before long, one of them discovers the contents of the pot.
He puts his hand in easily enough, but, having grasped the enticing snack, he cannot pull his clenched fist out through the narrow opening no matter how hard he struggles.
In fear and panic the trapped monkey creates quite a ruckus, which brings the trapper running with net and cage.
The monkey's fate, for all his cleverness, is sealed.
At first glance it would appear that the villager is the trapper, the baited pot his trap, and the poor monkey his victim.
No doubt the villager sees things the same way, and the hapless simian, were he able to speak, would likely agree.
A closer look, however, shows a different perspective.
The villager is not the trapper, nor the pot a trap, because there is nothing holding the monkey.
He could very easily remove his hand from the pot and rejoin his kin in the freedom of the treetops if only he would let go of the nuts.
If he would only let go!
The monkey in our anecdote does not suspect that he is being held prisoner solely by his mind.
He has found some nuts.
Greed — unreasonable and unreasoning desire — has arisen.
Though the jungle abounds with fruits and nuts and all kinds of foods, his conditioned reaction dictates that he must have these as well.
His narrow mindset is the only thing that imprisons him, that prevents him from letting go, from seeing the absurdity of his predicament as well as the obvious way out of it.
Now, before we make any smug comments about the monkey and his intelligence, or the apparent lack thereof, and before we congratulate ourselves on our vastly superior reasoning powers, let us see where we ourselves stand.
This business of letting go is so easy, and yet so hard, for monkey and for human being alike.
We are both caught up in the same predicament.
The details may be different, played out on higher levels of sophistication or complexity, but the end result is the same: enslavement by concepts and conditioning.
While the monkey is done in by its greed for a few nuts, we humans are done in by our greed for wealth, fame, power, status, pleasure, and shiny trinkets and toys which we believe we absolutely must have, and cannot live without.
Even more fundamentally, we become enslaved not so much by the material objects themselves, but by our attitudes and feelings toward them.
We endlessly seek gratification for the senses: pleasant things to look at, to listen to, to touch, to taste, to smell.
And more: we are spurred on by thoughts or concepts created by our ego-driven minds.
These last can be the hardest to satisfy since we cannot just please our senses and be content.
Rather, we strive to fulfill fantasies of outdoing our peers, of turning them green with envy by having the Biggest, the Costliest, the Latest, the Shiniest.
We are always caught up in competition, in a game of one-up-manship.
It cannot even be said that we are materialistic: We don't know how to be!
We don't genuinely enjoy and appreciate the material things we have, much less life itself.
We don't even know how to relax.
Aggressive competitiveness and acquisition become so obsessive, so compulsive, so ingrained, that everything we do, right down to the simplest recreational activity, is turned into a contest, a race, a struggle to outdo others, ourselves, a clock, or a calendar.
Everything becomes a contest for money, trophies, prestige, or some other form of recognition.
The ironic part of all this is that while we are frantically making more money, getting a bigger house, and another pricey car, hoarding more and better playthings, and trying to impress the dickens out of the neighbors, we have less and less time to enjoy the very things we are slaving for.
The tragic part is that in the same feverish process of acquisition of material things, we so very often lose our families, our health, our self-respect, and our peace of mind.
Rush, rush, rush!
Tempers flare, ulcers growl, blood pressure soars.
Millions of us die from stress-related illnesses.
Millions more try to find relief from their misery in alcohol and drugs.
In the end, all we manage to do is to rush into an early grave.
Though we may rise to an ever higher and higher “standard of living,” at the same time our society is falling apart before our very eyes.
The prize is not what we expected, is it?
All this misery in the name of what?
$UCCE$$?
Are we really that different from that poor monkey?
We do not know how or when to let go either.
Or what to let go of.
Who is to say that we are not even worse off than our furry little friend?
Craving is a normal, basic part of our conditioned nature.
There are certain things that are necessary for our physical survival and mental well-being, and others that are detrimental.
The mind of every sentient being discriminates, putting these things into convenient categories, labeling them “good,” “bad,” and “indifferent” according to how it perceives them.
And there are, of course, gradations within those categories.
According to the needs of the living organism, itself an extremely complex psycho-biological process, a complicated psycho-biological sub-process causes a desire to arise in the consciousness, alerting the organism to seek or avoid certain objects or conditions to ensure its proper functioning or survival.
So far, so good.
This is a necessary strategy evolved to maintain and protect the sentient being, be it man or microbe, as it goes about its business in the conditioned world.
When this survival mechanism gets out of hand, and instead of serving, takes over as master, it plunges us into a fog of cravings and longings.
This vague, objectless wanting leaves us perpetually dissatisfied and unfulfilled.
It leaves us feeling empty, driven to search endlessly and compulsively for an elusive “something” that we hope might quench the craving.
But we do not know what we want, or even why we want it.
Like the monkey drawn to the baited pot, we grasp at all sorts of things — and ideas — with essentially the same results.
We get trapped, if not in the literal, physical sense, then certainly psychologically, which makes the suffering even more damaging and prolonged.
And the emptiness persists.
But there is a solution, and it is rather simple.
Simple, now, though not necessarily easy.
Rather than give in and blindly obey these impulses to grasp more, to acquire more, to hoard more, we need to confront and analyze them.
Where do they arise, and why?
The answers may surprise us: Behind this acquisitiveness is the ego-concept, which necessarily gives rise to insecurity and fear in myriad forms.
These in turn cause us, consciously or subconsciously, to seek all sorts of things with which to defend the apparent solidity of the ego, to embellish and adorn it, and to build a protective wall around it: power, status, fame, attention, and material possessions.
We are even driven to exaggerate the basic requisites of food, clothing, shelter, and medicine to rather outlandish proportions.
To put it simply, due to ignorance of the nature of the ego, we fail to make the distinction between “This is needed” and “I WANT.” Through ego-motivated thinking we create a great deal of unnecessary suffering for ourselves, and we sacrifice much, even most of the quality of our lives.
The Buddha taught that as conditioned beings living in a conditioned existence we can never be completely free of all sorts of unpleasantness, stress, and suffering.
All conditioned phenomena are flawed, and that inevitably gives rise to unsatisfactoriness.
This is the First Noble Truth of the Buddha's teaching, and far from being a vague philosophical speculation, it is something that each of us experiences first hand for him-or-herself in daily life.
While true and permanent freedom comes about as a result of the insight gained through Vipassana meditation, we can eliminate a great deal of unnecessary suffering in the meantime by applying the principle of renunciation.
Unfortunately, the very word “renunciation” has a strange medieval ring to it in this modern, Western-dominated, supposedly hedonistic age.
For most, it carries the smell of sack-cloth and ashes, an image of penance, self-denial, self-deprivation, even self-torture.
It is thought of as a negative, dejected turning away from the world, a gloomy giving up on life, the last refuge of spurned lovers and aging old maids.
It is none of those things.
Genuine renunciation, as the Buddha teaches it, is akin to throwing open the windows of the mind to morning sunshine and crisp, cool air.
Renunciation is “cleaning house,” getting rid of trash and useless clutter, both figurative and literal.
It is recognizing that when we become attached to things, we do not own them, instead they own us.
It is putting things in proper perspective, simplifying our lives, and being satisfied with “enough.
On occasion the question is brought up whether the Dhamma is still valid in our time.
Some people seem to think that while the Dhamma may have been well suited for the Asia of twenty-five hundred years ago, it has no place in a twentieth century world dominated by fast-paced, aggressive, increasingly amoral Western technology and materialism, and therefore it should be retired to a museum, to rest amid the musty relics of a vanished Golden Age.
In other words, it is as if an age-old system of treatment were no longer useful because the diseases of today are different.
Others approach the problem from another perspective.
The efficacy and appropriateness of the Dhamma are not questioned.
Instead, they feel that people today do not have the necessary time and opportunity for effective application and practice of the Dhamma.
The medicine is right for the disease, but the patient is not able to take advantage of the treatment.
Let us examine both of these views.
It is true that the ancient world was a different place from ours.
Certainly life must have been considerably slower-paced, as it is even today in agricultural village societies.
In short, the th century Rat-Race, the technology that created it, and all that they imply, both good and bad, did not exist.
It is very tempting for us to look back longingly to some gentler and quieter Golden-Age Utopia-That-Never-Was.
Yes, the ancient world surely was a very different place, perhaps more so than we realize, or even are capable of realizing.
But in no way can that be taken to mean that it was a better place!
These differences are really only superficial and cosmetic.
The underlying problem, the basic problem of the world, remains the same no matter how much the exterior trappings may change.
And that problem is that the world is a place of suffering.
The world is a place of suffering, but the suffering is not in the world.
It is in the mind.
It is in your mind, and it is in my mind, and it is in the mind of every sentient being in existence.
That is, of course, the kind of statement that brings out the critics who insist that Buddhism is pessimistic.
Not so.
Buddhism impartially states what everyone can see and verify independently for himself or herself.
Let us define suffering.
In his first sermon given after his Enlightenment the Buddha said as follows:
Birth is accompanied by pain; disease is painful; death is painful.
Sorrow, lamentation, grief, and despair are suffering.
Enduring the unpleasant is suffering, and separation from the pleasant is suffering.
Not getting what one wants is suffering.
Indeed, all the five aggregates which arise from craving and attachment are suffering.
Who can possibly argue with that statement?
Suffering is physical, mental, and emotional.
And none of us is exempt or immune.
It is true that pleasure and happiness also exist.
No one can deny that, either.
But pleasure and happiness are fragile and fleeting.
They depend on certain conditions being in accord with what we want and expect.
As soon as those conditions change, as soon as we no longer have things our way, some degree of unhappiness or suffering arises.
Be it trivial or severe, it is suffering nonetheless.
We each create our own misery and unhappiness, and even determine the degree to which we suffer by the expectations we set up, and by the strength and inflexibility with which we hold those expectations.
We have just restated the first and second of the Four Noble Truths, and all we have said is just as true for us today as it was on the day that the Buddha first uttered his Teaching.
We see that the ancient and contemporary worlds are alike in that both are filled with sentient beings, all of whom experience suffering, and all of whom seek relief.
To this suffering the Buddha was no stranger.
He saw it clearly all around him, and he was sensitive to it.
Out of his compassion he set aside his own life of comfort and privilege in order to find, once and for all time, full and permanent release from the suffering inherent in all conditioned things, situations, and circumstances.
After years of diligent searching, he succeeded in liberating himself.
After that attainment of Enlightenment, again out of his great compassion, he spent the remaining forty-five years of his life showing the way to liberation to any and all who would listen.
The Dhamma, the Teaching of the Buddha, is not his invention any more than the laws of physics are the invention of Isaac Newton.
Newton was simply an observer who devoted himself to the investigation of certain laws of nature which he studied, experimented with, described, and brought to the attention of others for the benefit of society.
Just so did the Buddha devote himself to finding the cause for the arising of suffering, and the means to its cessation.
The Dhamma is a summary of the Buddha's search, discoveries, applications, and results.
It is a report of the way the laws of nature and mind operate, and a set of instructions, a manual, as it were, of how we each can most effectively use that information for our own greatest benefit in all aspects of daily life, and ultimately for liberation from suffering.
It is eternally valid.
The first two of the Four Noble Truths serve to identify the problem and to reveal its cause.
The Third Noble Truth identifies the remedy and the Fourth Noble Truth is the actual application of the treatment.
It is now entirely up to each of us to take it from there.
The Buddha did all that he could do.
No one could have done more.
The doctor can identify the disease and indicate the remedy.
But he cannot undergo the treatment on behalf of the patient.
Similarly, the Buddha shows us the path, and gives us a detailed map with comprehensive instructions, but each of us must put forth the effort to travel that path in order to reach the goal.
No one can travel it for us.
What does it mean to be a Buddhist?
What does it entail to follow the path that the Buddha mapped out for us?
Can we do a good job of it in today's world?
To be a Buddhist in name only is very easy.
It is also a colossal waste of time, a disservice to all practicing Buddhists, and an insult to the Buddha.
To be a serious practicing Buddhist does take time and effort and commitment.
One has to take time to study the Dhamma, to be well acquainted with the core of the Teaching.
One must know the Precepts not just well enough to repeat them, or to do the minimum to “get by,” but to understand in depth their ethical and moral basis.
Once a person has this knowledge and understanding and lives by it, one realizes that it is not for the sake of one's spiritual benefit alone, but that it orders and simplifies all of everyday life as well.
This includes family, business, and social relationships, child-rearing, in short, all the aspects of lay householder life.
And upon this solid foundation, and only upon it, can one build one's meditative practice, that is, the mental cultivation of insight that leads to Enlightenment.
Yes, it does take time and effort.
But all worthwhile endeavors do.
And this is the most worthwhile endeavor of all, bar none!
We find time and energy for all sorts of draining, useless, even harmful pursuits.
Certainly we can make time for the application of the Dhamma.
One further point must be addressed.
Many persons seem to feel that in order to make significant progress, one needs to enter the monastic life.
That they cannot do so because of lay responsibilities, or because they feel they are not suited for monastic life, appears to them a great obstacle.
The good news is that the lay person can make a great deal of progress right where he is, in his present situation.
The Suttas abound with accounts of lay women and men who rose to great spiritual heights, even attained Nibbana.
And all the while they managed households, raised families, earned livings, took care of personal affairs, and operated businesses.
To the casual observer they were living very ordinary, normal lives.
And this is no less true today.
The Dhamma is unique, a complete training system, unmatched and unsurpassed by any other.
It is not difficult to follow.
One starts precisely where one is and proceeds at one's own proper pace.
At the very least, adherence to Buddhist ethics will greatly simplify life, bring peace of mind, and allow one to live a blameless existence.
It will also assure a wholesome rebirth in which one may again have the opportunity to continue making progress toward liberation from Samsara, should one fall short of liberation in this life.
The Dhamma is fully as potent now as it ever was.
And once we make up our minds to apply its principles to our lives, we shall see that all that needs to be done is well within our capabilities, even in today's hostile, whirlwind world.
All of us seek, each in his or her own way, that strangely elusive state called happiness, but very few of us can describe or define just what we think will give us that happiness.
Most of us are looking for something, but we don't quite know what.
At best we may have only some vague, nebulous hunches.
Not very much to go on!
It is as if we have undertaken a journey without a clear idea of where we are going, or how we are to get there.
Is it any wonder that we repeatedly fail in spite of all our efforts?
All things change, and our notions of happiness are no exception.
It is clear that, if it is formed at all, the concept of happiness is extremely subjective and personal, open not only to wide individual interpretation, but to the vagaries of social, cultural, and even economic conditioning as well.
In simpler, bygone days, it appears that happiness was generally taken to be a tranquil, anxiety-free state of contentment brought about by the fulfillment of certain conditions necessary for survival.
One who was properly sheltered, adequately clothed, well fed, free from serious illness and pain, and was not in danger of harm from enemies, was deemed to be happy.
For what more could one ask?
Fragile though it was, such a basic state of security was deemed to be a blessing, and grounds for great happiness.
In our time, however, it seems that happiness is more than ever held to be somehow linked with the experience of pleasure, and with “getting and having things.” Some seek it in the direct agitation and gratification of the senses.
Others, in the accumulation of material objects, and in the attainment of fame, status, power, and wealth.
And many think it lies in the rather hazy concept of “being free,” which today has taken on the extreme connotation of freedom from discipline, morals, social conventions, and even good taste!

Unhappiness is much easier to define, possibly because we experience so much more of it.
But either way, whether we are scrutinizing happiness or suffering, we are dealing with unstable, impermanent states of mind and impermanent external conditions being in accord, or at odds, with what we want and expect.
As soon as we no longer have things going our way, happiness wanes and some degree of unhappiness or suffering arises.
It may be trivial or severe, but it is nonetheless suffering.
Suffering is simply wanting, endless wanting.
It is dissatisfaction with things being the way they are.
The Buddha identifies wanting as the basis of all our suffering, and in the same breath he adds that it is the causative factor of rebirth.
The Buddha points out that there is no lasting, inherent pleasure or happiness to be derived from having satisfied a desire.
Any desire.
The pleasure occurs only during the peak moment of releasing the frustration, the anticipation, the tension of the wanting itself.
Once the desired object is secured, once the discomfort of wanting has been relieved, gratification dwindles to an afterglow, and soon ceases.
As soon as the novelty wears off, our attention rather quickly moves to the next item that catches our eye.
It is a never-ending process.
Furthermore, the Buddha also points out that no object or situation can ever, in and of itself, be a source of pleasure or displeasure.
Rather, these are constructs of the mind.
In our minds we form certain expectations, the way we want specific things, situations, and persons to be.
As long as these expectations happen to be met, we experience a degree of satisfaction.
When they are not met, we experience displeasure, disappointment, anger, and other unwholesome mind-states in direct proportion to our frustration.
We cannot crave that which we already have, only that which is still out of our reach.
We can have an attachment to what is already ours, but that is also a desire, a wanting for the future to be a certain way.
We want a guarantee that the object of our attachment will continue to give us pleasure, that it will remain in our possession, and that it will not change, break, or otherwise fail to live up to our expectations.
We still want something that is out of reach: a firm guarantee that future circumstances will not alter.
We deceive ourselves and each other into believing that happiness is just one more step away, almost within our reach.
If only we could get rid of this, if only we could have that, if only we could change the other, then for sure we would be really and truly happy forever!
We spend our lives “if-onlying,” reaching and grasping, yet we never manage to get hold of happiness.
It always seems to slip through our fingers.
That is the story of our lives, life after life, birth after birth.
Yes, this constant reaching and grasping for “just one more thing,” this is the craving, the tanha about which the Buddha warns us.
This is the glue that binds us so firmly to the Wheel of Samsara, this grim Merry-Go-Round of Misery that drags us endlessly from birth to rebirth, from death to death again, and from suffering to more suffering, relieved here and there by short-lived sparks of gratification or pleasure.
Ironically, the more we grasp at this thing called happiness, the more we chase after it, the more certain it is that it will escape us.
We have misinterpreted, misunderstood both the cause and the nature of happiness, and then we have compounded the error by looking for the happiness in the wrong place, in the world, rather than within the mind!
Our efforts are doomed to failure from the very first.
Happiness lies not in the ability to satisfy our every desire, but rather in the ability to refrain from reacting compulsively to every craving and prodding of the mind.
It is the ability to observe the mind dispassionately, to allow anything to manifest without our “buying into it,” without becoming enslaved by it.
There is little that can be done about what occurs to us through external circumstances.
That is old, conditioned stuff, kammavipaka surfacing.
We need do nothing, except to observe carefully its arising and its passing away.
We do, however, need to be very careful about how we react to it.
That reaction, that mental, emotional, and volitional response, creates our conditioning for the future.
The clear awareness of our feelings toward the arisen object or thought, unaccompanied by an automatic, self-interested, reflex reaction based in greed or aversion, begins to weaken the kammic bonds that hold us to samsaric misery.
And practiced regularly, it provides insight into the workings of nature and of the mind.
This insight, this understanding of the impermanence, ultimate unsatisfactoriness, and selfless nature of all conditioned phenomena, quickly breaks the kammic chains and leads to liberation from Samsara.
It is the very core of the Buddha's Teaching.
Petr Karel Ontl was born into a Bohemian-American family in Prague, Czechoslovakia, in, and emigrated to the United States in.
A certified foreign language teacher, he has worked in the fields of teaching, photography, care for the elderly, and translation.
He has been a Theravada Buddhist for the past twenty years and is affiliated with the Bhavana Society in High View, West Virginia.

The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
This booklet contains a collection of short suttas spoken by the Buddha and a passage from the Visuddhimagga, each preceded by a brief introduction by the translator.
The unifying theme of these pieces may be called a positive response in dealing with provocative people and situations.
The texts set forth practical techniques taught by the Buddha for overcoming resentment, hatred and other such pollutants, and for cultivating such elevating mental qualities as good will, amity and compassion.
For anyone intent on spiritual development these practical instructions will help to cleanse the mind and to unfold its great hidden potentials.
In the realm of spirituality, “tit for tat,” very much a norm in the world, never works.
It is only by a positive response that spiritual progress is possible.
If one is reproached, even manhandled, and one reacts with resentment, one would certainly fail either to achieve a purposive result for oneself or to win over the opponent.
But if one endures the reproach and responds with good will, then one can win over the offending person as well as effect a significant triumph over oneself, making progress on the onward path to spiritual liberation.
An outlook that fosters a positive response to every negative move thus becomes imperative to any serious seeker of truth.
It is essential, therefore, that a meditator should assiduously strive to cultivate a positive attitude leading to the conquest of evil by good.
The Buddha, in a masterly discourse entitled “The Parable of the Saw,” makes this point amply clear.
The Buddha exhorts the monk Phagguna: “Phagguna, if anyone were to reproach you right to your face… give you a blow with the hand, or hit you with a clod of earth, or with a stick, or with a sword, even then you should abandon those urges and thoughts which are worldly.
There, Phagguna, you should train yourself thus: 'Neither shall my mind be affected by this, nor shall I give vent to evil words; but I shall remain full of concern and pity, with a mind of love, and I shall not give in to hatred.' So that the point will go straight home, the Buddha recounts a delightful story of the mistress Vedehika, which is again supported by several analogies: the great earth, empty space, the river Ganges, and the catskin bag.
To emphasize this philosophy of positive approach, the Buddha further tells the monks that even if bandits were to sever them limb by limb with a double-handled saw, they should not give way to hatred but must develop thoughts of boundless love towards the bandits as well as the entire world.
The monks, it is said, were greatly inspired as they heard this philosophy of positive response.
“Phagguna, if anyone were to reproach you right to your face, even then you should abandon those urges and thoughts which are worldly.
There, Phagguna, you should train yourself thus: 'Neither shall my mind be affected by this, nor shall I give vent to evil words; but I shall remain full of concern and pity, with a mind of love, and I shall not give in to hatred.' This is how, Phagguna, you should train yourself.
“Phagguna, if anyone were to give you a blow with the hand, or hit you with a clod of earth, or with a stick, or with a sword, even then you should abandon those urges and thoughts which are worldly.
There, Phagguna, you should train yourself thus: 'Neither shall my mind be affected by this, nor shall I give vent to evil words; but I shall remain full of concern and pity, with a mind of love, and I shall not give in to hatred.' This is how, Phagguna, you should train yourself.
“In the past, monks, in this very Savatthi, there was a mistress, Vedehika by name.
And, monks, this good reputation had spread about the mistress Vedehika: 'The mistress Vedehika is gentle, the mistress Vedehika is meek, the mistress Vedehika is calm.' Now, monks, the mistress Vedehika had a maid-servant, Kali by name, who was able, energetic and very methodical in her work.
Then, monks, it occurred to Kali, the maid-servant: 'This good reputation has spread about my lady: “The mistress Vedehika is gentle, the mistress Vedehika is meek, the mistress Vedehika is calm.” Could it be that my lady does have anger within her which she does not show, or could it be that she does not have anger?
Or is it because I am methodical in my job that my lady, though she does have anger within, does not show it, and not because she does not have anger?
Why don't I test my lady?'
“Thus, monks, the maid-servant Kali got up late the next morning.
And, monks, the mistress Vedehika told this to the maid-servant Kali: 'Hey, you Kali!' — 'What is it, lady?' — 'Why did you get up so late?' — 'Oh, that is nothing, lady.' — 'What!
That is nothing, indeed!
You bad maid-servant, you got up late!' Angry and displeased, she frowned.
“Then, monks, it occurred to Kali the maid-servant: 'Though she does have anger within, my lady does not show it; it is not that she does not have anger.
It is because I am methodical in my job that, though she does have anger within, my lady does not show it, and not because she does not have anger.
Why don't I test my lady further?'
“Now, monks, Kali the maid-servant got up even later than before.
Then, monks, the mistress Vedehika told the maid-servant Kali: 'Hey, you Kali!' — 'What is it, lady?' — 'Why did you get up even later than before?' — 'Oh, that is nothing, lady.' — 'What!
That is nothing, indeed!
You bad maid-servant, you got up even later than before!' Angry and displeased, she gave vent to her displeasure.
“Then, monks, it occurred to the maid-servant Kali: 'Though she does have anger within, my lady does not show it; it is not that she does not have anger.
It is because I am methodical in my job that, though she does have anger within, my lady does not show it, and not because she does not have anger.
Why don't I test my lady further?'
“And, monks, the maid-servant Kali got up even later than before.
Then, monks, the mistress Vedehika told the maid-servant Kali: 'Hey, you Kali!' — 'What is it, lady?' — 'Why did you get up so late?' — 'Oh, that is nothing, lady.' — 'What!
That is nothing, indeed!
You bad maid-servant, you got up so late!' And angry and displeased, she hit her on the head with the door-bar.
And this injured her head.
“Now, monks, the maid-servant Kali, with her head injured and blood oozing, went about among the neighbors, shouting: 'Look, sirs, at the deed of the gentle one!
Look, sirs, at the deed of the meek one!
Look, sirs, at the deed of the calm one!
How can she, saying to her own maid-servant, “You got up late today,” angry and displeased, having taken a door-bar, give me a blow on the head and injure my head?'
“And then, monks, this ill-repute spread thereafter about the mistress Vedehika: 'The mistress Vedehika is violent, the mistress Vedehika is arrogant, the mistress Vedehika is not calm.'
“In the same way, monks, some monk here is very gentle, very meek, and very calm, so long as disagreeable ways of speech do not assail him; but when disagreeable ways of speech do assail the monk, it is then that the monk is to be judged whether he is 'gentle,' 'meek,' or 'calm.' Monks, I do not call that monk 'dutiful,' who is dutiful on account of the requisites he gets, i.e., the robe, almsfood, lodging and medicaments, whereby he falls into pseudo-dutifulness.
And why?
For, monks, when that monk fails to get the requisites of the robe, almsfood, lodging and medicaments, he ceases to be dutiful, and is not in keeping with the norms of dutifulness.
But, monks, whichever monk out of reverence for the Teaching, out of respect for the Teaching, out of dedication to the Teaching, showing honor to the Teaching, and giving regard to the Teaching, comes to be dutiful and is in keeping with the norms of dutifulness, him do I consider as dutiful.
Therefore, monks, you should consider: 'Only out of reverence for the Teaching, out of respect for the Teaching, out of dedication to the Teaching, showing honor to the Teaching, and giving regard to the Teaching, shall we become dutiful, shall we be in keeping with the norms of dutifulness.' Thus, indeed, monks, you should train yourselves.
“Monks, there are these five modes of speech which people might use when speaking to you — speech that is timely or untimely, true or false, gentle or harsh, with a good or a harmful motive, and with a loving heart or hostility.
“Monks, some might speak to you using speech that is timely or untimely; monks, some might speak to you according to truth or falsely; monks, some might speak to you gently or harshly; monks, some might speak to you with a good motive or with a harmful motive; monks, some might speak to you with a loving heart or with hostility.
On all occasions, monks, you should train yourselves thus: 'Neither shall our minds be affected by this, nor for this matter shall we give vent to evil words, but we shall remain full of concern and pity, with a mind of love, and we shall not give in to hatred.
On the contrary, we shall live projecting thoughts of universal love to that very person, making him as well as the whole world the object of our thoughts of universal love — thoughts that have grown great, exalted and measureless.
We shall dwell radiating these thoughts which are void of hostility and ill will.' It is in this way, monks, that you should train yourselves.
“Suppose, monks, a person were to come to you, holding a hoe and a basket and he were to say: 'I shall make this great earth earthless.' Then he would strew the earth here and there, spit here and there, and urinate here and there, and would say:' 'Be earthless, be earthless.' What do you think, monks, would this person render this great earth earthless?
“No, indeed not, most venerable sir.
“And why?
“Because this great earth, most venerable sir, is deep and without measure.
It cannot possibly be turned earthless.
On the contrary, that person would only reap weariness and frustration.
“In the same way, monks, others may use these five modes of speech when speaking to you — speech that is timely or untimely, true or false, gentle or harsh, with a good or a harmful motive, and with a loving heart or hostility.
In this way, monks, you should train yourselves: 'Neither shall our minds be affected by this, nor for this matter shall we give vent to evil words, but we shall remain full of concern and pity, with a mind of love, and we shall not give in to hatred.
On the contrary, we shall live projecting thoughts of universal love to that very person, making him as well as the whole world the object of our thoughts of universal love — thoughts that have grown great, exalted and measureless.
We shall dwell radiating these thoughts which are void of hostility and ill will.' It is in this way, monks, that you should train yourselves.
“Suppose, monks, a person were to approach you, carrying paints of lacquer, turmeric, indigo or carmine, and he were to say: 'I will draw this picture, I will make this painting appear on this empty space.' What do you think, monks, could he make this painting appear on empty space?
“No, indeed not, most venerable sir.
“And why not?
“Because this empty space, most venerable sir, is formless and invisible.
He cannot possibly draw a picture or make a painting appear on this empty space.
On the contrary, that person will only reap weariness and frustration.
“In the same way, monks, others may use these five modes of speech when speaking to you — speech that is timely or untimely, true or false, gentle or harsh, with a good or a harmful motive, and with a loving heart or hostility.
In this way, monks, you should train yourselves: 'Neither shall our minds be affected by this, nor for this matter shall we give vent to evil words, but we shall remain full of concern and pity, with a mind of love, and we shall not give in to hatred.
On the contrary, we shall live projecting thoughts of universal love to that very person, making him as well as the whole world the object of our thoughts of universal love — thoughts that have grown great, exalted and measureless.
We shall dwell radiating these thoughts which are void of hostility and ill will.' It is in this way, monks, that you should train yourselves.
“Suppose, monks, a person were to come holding a burning grass-torch, and he were to say: 'With this burning grass-torch I shall set fire to and scorch this river Ganges.' What do you think, monks, could that person set fire to and scorch the river Ganges with a grass-torch?
“No, indeed not, most venerable sir.
“And why not?
“Because, most venerable sir, the river Ganges is deep and without measure.
It is not possible to set fire to and scorch the river Ganges with a burning grass-torch.
On the contrary, that person will only reap weariness and frustration.
“In the same way, monks, others may use these five modes of speech when speaking to you — speech that is timely or untimely, true or false, gentle or harsh, with a good or a harmful motive, and with a loving heart or hostility.
In this way, monks, you should train yourselves: 'Neither shall our minds be affected by this, nor for this matter shall we give vent to evil words, but we shall remain full of concern and pity, with a mind of love, and we shall not give in to hatred.
On the contrary, we shall live projecting thoughts of universal love to that very person, making him as well as the whole world the object of our thoughts of universal love — thoughts that have grown great, exalted and measureless.
We shall dwell radiating these thoughts which are void of hostility and ill will.' It is in this way, monks, that you should train yourselves.
“Suppose, monks, there was a supple and silky leather bag made of catskin that had been beaten, tanned, cured and fully processed, and made completely free of all creases and wrinkles.
Then a man were to come with a stick or mallet and say, 'With this stick or mallet I shall make creases and wrinkles in this supple and silky catskin bag which has been beaten, tanned, cured and fully processed, and made free of creases and wrinkles.' What do you think, monks, could that person with a stick or mallet make creases and wrinkles in that supple and silky catskin bag which has been beaten, tanned, cured and fully processed, and made free of creases and wrinkles?
“No, indeed not, most venerable sir.
“And why not?
“Because, most venerable sir, that supple and silky leather bag made of catskin has been beaten, tanned, cured and fully processed, and made free of creases and wrinkles.
It is not possible to make creases and wrinkles in it with a stick or mallet.
On the contrary, he will only reap weariness and frustration.
“In the same way, monks, others may use these five modes of speech when speaking to you — speech that is timely or untimely, true or false, gentle or harsh, with a good or a harmful motive, and with a loving heart or hostility.
In this way, monks, you should train yourselves: 'Neither shall our minds be affected by this, nor for this matter shall we give vent to evil words, but we shall remain full of concern and pity, with a mind of love, and we shall not give in to hatred.
On the contrary, we shall live projecting thoughts of universal love to that very person, making him as well as the whole world the object of our thoughts of universal love — thoughts that have grown great, exalted and measureless.
We shall dwell radiating these thoughts which are void of hostility and ill will.' It is in this way, monks, that you should train yourselves.
“Monks, even if bandits were to savagely sever you, limb by limb, with a double-handled saw, even then, whoever of you harbors ill will at heart would not be upholding my Teaching.
Monks, even in such a situation you should train yourselves thus: 'Neither shall our minds be affected by this, nor for this matter shall we give vent to evil words, but we shall remain full of concern and pity, with a mind of love, and we shall not give in to hatred.
On the contrary, we shall live projecting thoughts of universal love to those very persons, making them as well as the whole world the object of our thoughts of universal love — thoughts that have grown great, exalted and measureless.
We shall dwell radiating these thoughts which are void of hostility and ill will.' It is in this way, monks, that you should train yourselves.
“Monks, if you should keep this instruction on the Parable of the Saw constantly in mind, do you see any mode of speech, subtle or gross, that you could not endure?
“No, Lord.
“Therefore, monks, you should keep this instruction on the Parable of the Saw constantly in mind.
That will conduce to your well-being and happiness for long indeed.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Delighted, those monks acclaimed the Teaching of the Blessed One.
A sylvan grove nestled at the foothills surrounding the capital city of Rajagaha: this royal pleasance, known as the Bamboo Grove, was offered to the Buddha by King Bimbisara.
The king built a monastery there with a large number of meditation huts where at least monks stayed, spending their time in meditation and intense spiritual endeavor.
The Bamboo Grove was neither too far nor too near the city, but at just the right distance from it for the large number of devotees who flocked there every morning and evening to pay homage to the Lord.
A certain brahman belonging to the Bharadvaja clan had a great prejudice against the Buddha since he thought a kshatriya had claimed to be a saint.
And as it transpired, his own wife was a great devotee of the Master.
On a certain festival day when everybody, including his wife, had gone to the monastery to hear the discourse, the brahman, coming to know of it, became furious.
Fuming with rage, he rushed to the monastery, and forcing his way through the crowd and shouting loudly foul abuse, he headed straight to the place where the Buddha was seated.
People were aghast.
Even the presence of the king, the nobles and ministers did not deter the enraged brahman from reviling the Buddha to his face.
When the Buddha remained completely unruffled, projecting powerful thoughts of loving-kindness, the brahman stopped abusing him.
But he was still peevish.
Now the Buddha asked him: “My friend, if somebody visits you, and you offer food which he refuses, who gets it?
“If the visitor doesn't accept it, I will get it back because I offered it to him.
“Since I don't accept your abuse, to whom will it return?
The brahman was so moved by the tremendous implication of this analogy that he fell at the feet of the Buddha and sought to be ordained as a monk.
Soon after his ordination he attained Arahatship.
The Buddha had transformed him by his positive approach.
A friend of this brahman, belonging to the same Bharadvaja clan and noted for his cantankerous nature, heard about the incident and became very angry.
In fact, he was known as Akkosa Bharadvaja, “Bharadvaja the Abusive.” He made his way to the monastery on a certain day when a large number of people flocked to hear the Buddha's discourse.
The outcome was identical and he too became a monk, and later on an Arahat.
Such was the tremendous impact which the Buddha's positive response wrought even on the most hostile persons.
The Tipitaka is replete with such instances.
The following discourse known as the Akkosa Sutta describes the incident vividly.
Once the Blessed One was staying at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove near the Squirrels' Feeding Place.
Now the brahman Akkosa Bharadvaja heard this: “The brahman Bharadvaja, it seems, has become a monk under the Great Monk Gotama.” Angry and unhappy, he went to where the Blessed One was.
Having approached the Blessed One, he abused and criticized the Blessed One in foul and harsh words.
Thus reviled, the Blessed One spoke to the brahman Akkosa Bharadvaja: 'Well, brahman, do friends, confidants, relatives, kinsmen and guests visit you?
“Yes, Gotama, sometimes friends, confidants, relatives, kinsmen and guests do visit me.
“Well, brahman, do you not offer them snacks or food or tidbits?
“Yes, Gotama, sometimes I do offer them snacks or food or tidbits.
“But if, brahman, they do not accept it, who gets it?
“If Gotama, they do not accept it, I get it back.
“Even so, brahman, you are abusing us who do not abuse, you are angry with us who do not get angry, you are quarreling with us who do not quarrel.
All this of yours we don't accept.
You alone, brahman, get it back; all this, brahman, belongs to you.
“When, brahman, one abuses back when abused, repays anger in kind, and quarrels back when quarreled with, this is called, brahman, associating with each other and exchanging mutually.
This association and mutual exchange we do not engage in.
Therefore you alone, brahman, get it back; all this, brahman, belongs to you.
“People, including the king, know the Venerable Gotama thus: 'The Monk Gotama is the Worthy One.' When does the Venerable Gotama become angry?
Said the Buddha:
When the Lord proclaimed this, the brahman Akkosa Bharadvaja said this to the Blessed One: “Wonderful, indeed, O Venerable Gotama!
Herewith I go to the Venerable Gotama for refuge, to his Teaching and to his Holy Order of Monks.
Most venerable sir, may I have the privilege to receive at the hands of the revered Lord Gotama the initial monastic ordination and also the higher ordination of a bhikkhu.
And the brahman Akkosa Bharadvaja received at the hands of the Blessed One the initial monastic ordination and he also received the higher ordination of a bhikkhu.
And within a short time of his ordination, the Venerable Akkosa Bharadvaja, living alone, secluded, diligent, zealous and unrelenting, reached that incomparable consummation of holiness for which sons of noble families, having totally abandoned the household life, take to the life of homelessness.
With direct knowledge he realized the ultimate, then and there, and lived having access to it.
He saw with his supernormal vision: “Ceased is rebirth, lived is the holy life, completed is the spiritual task and henceforth there is nothing higher to be achieved.
The Venerable Akkosa Bharadvaja, indeed, became one of the Arahats.
The modern psychoanalytical technique known as T.A., Transactional Analysis, distinguishes four possible attitudes that condition a man's conduct.
These are:
Out of these, the fourth one represents the approach of positive response.
The person who says “I am all right and you are also all right,” is optimistic and tries to find the best in every man and in every situation.
It is only when one seeks good that one finds good, which leads one to ultimate good.
Whoever is committed to the philosophy of positive response must necessarily seek good and discover good.
In a discourse entitled “Wood from a Pyre,” the Buddha classifies human beings into four distinct categories, namely:
Of these, the last category represents the man who is committed to positive response.
The Buddha uses very telling analogies.
The worst of the four he says, is a man who is like a piece of wood from a pyre, burnt on both sides and fouled with dung in the middle.
It cannot be used as firewood in the village, nor can it be used as timber in the forest.
Even so is the man who neither promotes his own wellbeing nor another's.
He represents a man of negative approach, void of love — metta.
The best man is compared with the skimmings of ghee, which is reckoned as the best of dairy products.
Says the sutta: “From a cow comes milk; from milk, curd; from curd, butter; from butter, ghee; and from ghee, the skimmings of ghee, which is the best.” The man who treads the path of positive response is the man who promotes his own well-being as well as the good of others.
He has the bright outlook which says, “I am all right and you are also all right.” That is to say, “I have nothing to complain about, I grudge none.
I see good everywhere.
Even from the worst of men, I can learn something.
Every impediment for me is something to be turned into an aid and every failure into a step forward to success.
“Monks, these four kinds of persons are to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
One who is engaged in promoting neither his own good nor in promoting the good of another; one who is engaged in promoting another's good but not in promoting his own good; one who is engaged in promoting his own good but not in promoting the good of another; and one who is engaged in promoting his own good and also in promoting the good of another.
“Just as, monks, a piece of wood from a pyre, burnt at both ends and in the middle fouled with dung, serves neither for fuel in the village nor for timber in the forest, so in the same way, monks, is such a person, I say, who is engaged in promoting neither his own good nor in promoting the good of another.
“Monks, there is the person who is engaged in promoting the good of another but not in promoting his own good.
Of these two individuals the latter is superior.
Monks, there is the person who is engaged in promoting his own good but not in promoting the good of another.
Of these three individuals he is superior.
Monks, there is the person who is engaged in promoting his own good and also in promoting another's good.
Of these four individuals he is the foremost, the chief, the principal, the best and the supreme.
“Just as, monks, from a cow comes milk; from milk, curd; from curd, butter; from butter, ghee; from ghee, the skimmings of ghee, and that is reckoned the best; even so, monks, among these four individuals the person who is engaged in promoting his own good and also the good of another is the foremost, the chief, the principal, the best and the supreme.
Monks, these are the four individuals who are to be found existing in the world.
The approach of positive response calls for self-transformation through a sustained process of self-admonition and self-correction.
Unless one has brought about a measure of transformation in one's conduct and beliefs, attitudes and thinking, it is impossible to respond positively, leading to one's own well-being as well as that of others.
But transformation cannot come about without a reorientation of one's motivations.
That is where self-admonition and self-correction play a crucial role.
Self-admonition requires a reconsideration of one's judgments and a reassessment of one's value-system.
The Visuddhimagga contains some very valuable passages concerning reassessment and consideration of judgments which instantly cause resentment to subside.
Says the Visuddhimagga: “If by striving and putting forth effort, his resentment subsides, well and good.
If it does not, he should then consider some of the qualities of the person which express calmness and purity and which inspire confidence when recollected, and after reconsidering in this manner, he should make resentment subside.
Now for someone, his bodily conduct is calm, and this calmness can be seen in the way he performs the various duties; but his conduct in speech and thought is not calm.
Having ignored his latter conduct, only the calm conduct in his bodily actions should be considered.
For another, his conduct in speech is calm, and this calmness is apparent to all.
He is by nature very skilful in welcoming others, friendly, and a good conversationalist; he is congenial, easily approachable and courteous in his speech; he expounds the Teaching in a pleasant way, explaining the Dhamma in clear language and in detail; but his conduct in bodily actions and in thought is not calm.
Having ignored his latter conduct, only his calm conduct in speech should be considered.
Another is calm in his thoughts, and this calmness is evident to all from the way he worships at the shrine, etc.
One who is not calm in his thoughts, when he worships at the shrine or at the Bodhi tree, or an elder, does not do it devoutly, and when he sits at the pavilion where the Dhamma is preached, his mind strays away and he nods.
Yet another has calm thoughts, worships devoutly and deliberately, and hears the Dhamma attentively, retaining it in mind and evincing joyful conviction.
Thus for someone, his conduct in thought is calm but not so his conduct in bodily action and speech.
Having ignored his latter conduct, only his calm conduct in thought should be considered.
For someone, however, not even one of these three actions is calm.
For such a person compassion should be aroused thus: “Although he is now going about in the human world, after a certain time he will surely find himself in any of the eight great hells, or the sixteen minor hells.” For through compassion, resentment subsides also.
For someone, all these actions are calm.
For such, whichever one likes one might consider.
Towards such persons the cultivation of universal love is easy.
The Buddhist Publication Society is an approved charity dedicated to making known the Teaching of the Buddha, which has a vital message for people of all creeds.
Founded in, the BPS has published a wide variety of books and booklets covering a great range of topics.
Its publications include accurate annotated translations of the Buddha's discourses, standard reference works, as well as original contemporary expositions of Buddhist thought and practice.
These works present Buddhism as it truly is — a dynamic force which has influenced receptive minds for the past years and is still as relevant today as it was when it first arose.
In the early centuries after the Buddha's passing away, as Buddhism became a popular religion, the idea was formalized that there were three paths to awakening to choose from: the path to awakening as a disciple of a Buddha; the path to awakening as a private Buddha, i.e., one who attained awakening on his own but was not able to teach the path of practice to others; and the path to awakening as a Rightly Self-awakened Buddha.
Each path was defined as consisting of perfections of character, but there was a question as to what those perfections were and how the paths differed from one another.
The Theravadins, for instance, specified ten perfections, and organized their Jataka collection so that it culminated in ten tales, each illustrating one of the perfections.
The Sarvastivadins, on the other hand, specified six perfections, and organized their Jataka collection accordingly.
All Buddhists agreed that the third path took by far the longest to follow, but disagreements arose as to whether the perfections developed along the different paths were quantitatively or qualitatively different.
In other words, did a Buddha develop more of the same sort of perfections that an arahant developed, or did he develop perfections of a radically different sort?
Those who believed that the perfections differed only quantitatively were able to take the early Buddhist canons as their guide to the path to Buddhahood, for they could simply extrapolate from the path of the arahant as described in those canons.
Those seeking Buddhahood who believed that the perfections differed qualitatively, however, had to look outside the canons.
People in this latter group often practiced a form of meditation aimed at inducing visions of bodhisattvas treading the path to full Buddhahood, along with Buddhas in other world-systems.
These Buddhas and bodhisattvas — it was hoped — would provide an insider's knowledge of the full Buddha's path.
The teachings that resulted from these visions were very diverse; not until the rd century C.E., with the development of the Yogacara school, was a concerted effort made to collate these various teachings into a single body — what we now know as the Mahayana movement — but the differences among these teachings were so great that the Mahayana never achieved true unity.
Thus, historically, there have been two major ways of following the path to full Buddhahood: following guidelines gleaned from the early canons, and following the traditions set in motion by the experiences of visionaries from the beginning of the common era.
The materials in this study guide take the first course.
There's a common misunderstanding that the Theravada school teaches only the savaka path, but a glance at Theravada history will show that many Theravadins have vowed to become bodhisattvas and have undertaken the practice of the ten perfections as set forth in the Theravadin Jatakas.
Because these perfections differ only quantitatively for arahants, Theravadins who aspire to arahantship cite the perfections as qualities that they are developing as part of their practice outside of formal meditation.
For example, they make donations to develop the perfection of generosity, undertake building projects to develop the perfection of endurance, and so forth.
For people in the modern world who are wrestling with the issue of how to practice the Dhamma in daily life, the perfections provide a useful framework for developing a fruitful attitude toward daily activities so that any activity or relationship undertaken wisely with the primary purpose of developing the perfections in a balanced way becomes part of the practice.
The perfections also provide one of the few reliable ways of measuring the accomplishments of one's life.
“Accomplishments” in the realm of work and relationships have a way of turning into dust, but perfections of the character, once developed, are dependable and lasting, carrying one over and beyond the vicissitudes of daily living.
Thus they deserve to take high priority in the way we plan our lives.
These two facts are reflected in the two etymologies offered for the word perfection: They carry one across to the further shore; and they are of foremost importance in formulating the purpose of one's life.
The material in this study guide is organized under the heading of the eighth perfection — determination — for several reasons.
The first reason is that determination is needed for undertaking the path of perfections to begin with, in that it gives focus, motivation, and direction to the practice.
The second reason is that the four aspects of skilled determination — discernment, truth, relinquishment, and calm — when studied carefully, cover all ten of the perfections: generosity, virtue, renunciation, discernment, persistence, endurance, truth, determination, good will, and equanimity.
In this way, the material gathered here illustrates the general principle that each of the perfections, when properly practiced, includes all ten.
The third reason is that the four aspects of skilled determination highlight the importance of establishing wise priorities and sticking to them regardless of the temptation to sacrifice them for lesser aims.
In this way, they help guard against a common problem in approaching practice in daily life: a tendency to indulge in the self-delusion that can justify any activity, as long as it's done mindfully, as part of the path.
The fourth, and perhaps most important, reason for organizing the material in this way is that skilled determination begins with discernment, the ability to make wise distinctions that help keep each of the perfections on path to the goal of ending suffering.
If they are not informed by these distinctions, the perfections are simply generic virtues, common to all cultures, leading to pleasant results but not necessarily to the transcendent.
Thus the material here has been chosen to highlight the need to use discernment in making important distinctions in developing the perfections in a wise and effective way.
For instance, under the theme of good will, passage § shows that good will is not necessarily loving-kindness: Wishing happiness for others is not necessarily a desire to become involved with them.
Passages §§- show that, although one should extend good will to all, one should be selective in one's friendships.
Passage § makes the point that good will should not be practiced to the point of entanglement.
Similarly, under the theme of persistence, passage § points out that persistence is not simply a matter of brute force.
One has to discern which type of effort is appropriate for the issue at hand.
Passages §§- show that the amount of effort appropriate in a particular situation has to be gauged both by the nature of the problem and by one's own level of energy.
Under the theme of renunciation, passages §§- teach standards for determining how much physical pleasure is compatible with progress on the path.
Under the theme of patience, passage § points out the need to distinguish what should and should not be tolerated, at the same time counseling common sense in avoiding unnecessary dangers.
Under the theme of equanimity, passages §§- distinguish between levels of equanimity on the path, and between them and the equanimity that results from awakening.
This makes the point that — contrary to a common misunderstanding — equanimity in the face of sensory input is not the goal, or even the highest level of equanimity on the path.
Instead, it is simply a means to a higher end: the highest bliss of nibbana.
Passages in this guide are drawn from the Pali canon and from the teachings of Ajaan Lee Dhammadharo.
“These two are wise people.
Which two?
The one who sees his transgression as a transgression, and the one who rightfully pardons another who has confessed his transgression.
These two are wise people.
“As for the course of action that is pleasant to do but that, when done, leads to what is unprofitable, it is in light of this course of action that one may be known — in terms of manly stamina, manly persistence, manly effort — as a fool or a wise person.
For a fool doesn't reflect, 'Even though this course of action is pleasant to do, still when it is done it leads to what is unprofitable.' So he does it, and thus the doing of that course of action leads to what is unprofitable for him.
But a wise person reflects, 'Even though this course of action is pleasant to do, still when it is done it leads to what is unprofitable.' So he doesn't do it, and thus the non-doing of that course of action leads to what is profitable for him.
“And what is right resolve?
Resolve aimed at renunciation, at freedom from ill will, at harmlessness: This is called right resolve.
“And what is the right view that is without fermentations, transcendent, a factor of the path?
The discernment, the faculty of discernment, the strength of discernment, analysis of qualities as a factor of Awakening, the path factor of right view in one developing the noble path whose mind is noble, whose mind is free from fermentations, who is fully possessed of the noble path.
This is the right view that is without fermentations, transcendent, a factor of the path.
“One tries to abandon wrong view & to enter into right view: This is one's right effort.
One is mindful to abandon wrong view & to enter & remain in right view: This is one's right mindfulness.
Thus these three qualities — right view, right effort, & right mindfulness — run & circle around right view.
“Of those, right view is the forerunner.
And how is right view the forerunner?
One discerns wrong resolve as wrong resolve, and right resolve as right resolve.
And what is wrong resolve?
Being resolved on sensuality, on ill will, on harmfulness.
This is wrong resolve.
“And what is right resolve?
Right resolve, I tell you, is of two sorts: There is right resolve with fermentations, siding with merit, resulting in the acquisitions; and there is noble right resolve, without fermentations, transcendent, a factor of the path.
“And what is the right resolve that has fermentations, sides with merit, & results in acquisitions?
Being resolved on renunciation, on freedom from ill will, on harmlessness.
This is the right resolve that has fermentations, sides with merit, & results in acquisitions.
“And what is the right resolve that is without fermentations, transcendent, a factor of the path?
The thinking, directed thinking, resolve, mental absorption, mental fixity, focused awareness, & verbal fabrications in one developing the noble path whose mind is noble, whose mind is without fermentations, who is fully possessed of the noble path.
This is the right resolve that is without fermentations, transcendent, a factor of the path.
“One tries to abandon wrong resolve & to enter into right resolve: This is one's right effort.
One is mindful to abandon wrong resolve & to enter & remain in right resolve: This is one's right mindfulness.
Thus these three qualities — right view, right effort, & right mindfulness — run & circle around right resolve.
What you've done is to learn from your own actions.
As for your previous efforts, you needn't concern yourself with them any longer.
Throw them out.
This is a sense of discernment that arises of its own accord, an ingenuity and sense of judgment that come not from anything your teachers have taught you, but from observing and evaluating on your own the object that you yourself have made.
The same holds true in practicing meditation.
For discernment to arise, you have to be observant as you keep track of the breath and to gain a sense of how to adjust and improve it so that it's well-proportioned throughout the body — to the point where it flows evenly without faltering, so that it' s comfortable in slow and out slow, in fast and out fast, long, short, heavy, or refined.
Get so that both the in-breath and the out-breath are comfortable no matter what way you breathe, so that — no matter when — you immediately feel a sense of ease the moment you focus on the breath.
When you can do this, physical results will appear: a sense of ease and lightness, open and spacious.
The body will be strong, the breath and blood will flow unobstructed and won't form an opening for disease to step in.
The body will be healthy and awake.
As for the mind, when mindfulness and alertness are the causes, a still mind is the result.
When negligence is the cause, a mind distracted and restless is the result.
So we must try to make the causes good, in order to give rise to the good results we've referred to.
If we use our powers of observation and evaluation in caring for the breath, and are constantly correcting and improving it, we'll develop awareness on our own, the fruit of having developed our concentration higher step by step.
— Ajaan Lee 
The all-around knowing that arises within us comes from causes and effects, not from what we read in books, hear other people tell us, or conjecture on our own.
Suppose we have some silver coins in our pocket.
If all we know is that other people say it's money, we don't know its qualities.
But if we experiment with it and put it in a smelter to see what it's made of and to see how it can be made into other things, that's when we'll know its true qualities.
This is the kind of knowledge that comes from our own actions.
This knowledge, when we meditate, comes in five forms.
We find within ourselves that some things are caused by the properties of the body, some are caused by the mind, some causes come from the mind but have an effect on the body, some causes come from the body but have an effect on the mind, some causes come from the body and mind acting together.
— Ajaan Lee 
* * *
We should make a point of searching for whatever will give rise to discernment.
Sutamaya-pañña: Listen to things that are worth listening to.
Cintamaya-pañña:Once you've listened, evaluate what you've learned.
Don't accept it or reject it right off hand.
Bhavanamaya-pañña: Once you've put what you've learned to the test, practice in line with it.
This is the highest perfection of discernment — liberating insight.
You know what kinds of stress and pain should be remedied and so you remedy them.
You know what kinds shouldn't be remedied and so you don't.
For the most part we're really ignorant.
We try to remedy the things that shouldn't be remedied, and it just doesn't work — because there's one kind of stress that should simply be observed and shouldn't be fiddled with at all.
Like a rusty watch: Don't polish away any more rust than you should.
If you go taking it apart, the whole thing will stop running for good.
What this means is that once you've seen natural conditions for what they truly are, you have to let them be.
If you see something that should be fixed, you fix it.
Whatever shouldn't be fixed, you don't.
This takes a load off the heart.
Ignorant people are like the old woman who lit a fire to cook her rice and, when her rice was cooked, had her meal.
When she had finished her meal, she sat back and had a cigar.
It so happened that when she lit her cigar with one of the embers of the fire, it burned her mouth.
'Damned fire,' she thought.
'It burned my mouth.' So she put all her matches in a pile and poured water all over them so that there wouldn't be any more fire in the house — just like a fool with no sense at all.
The next day, when she wanted fire to cook her meal, there wasn't any left.
At night, when she wanted light, she had to go pestering her neighbors, asking this person and that, and yet still she hated fire.
We have to learn how to make use of things and to have a sense of how much is enough.
If you light only a little fire, it'll be three hours before your rice is cooked.
The fire isn't enough for your food.
So it is with us: We see stress as something bad and so try to remedy it — keeping at it with our eyes closed, as if we were blind.
No matter how much we treat it, we never get anywhere at all.
People with discernment will see that stress is of two kinds: physical stress, or the inherent stress of natural conditions; and mental stress, or the stress of defilement.
Once there's birth, there has to be aging, illness, and death.
Whoever tries to remedy aging can keep at it till they're withered and gray.
When we try to remedy illness, we're usually like the old woman pouring water all over her matches.
Sometimes we treat things just right, sometimes we don't — as when the front step gets cracked, and we dismantle the house right up to the roof.
Illness is something that everyone has, in other words, the diseases that appear in the various parts of the body.
Once we've treated the disease in our eyes, it'll go appear in our ears, nose, in front, in back, in our arm, our hand, our foot, etc., and then it'll sneak inside.
Like a person trying to catch hold of an eel: The more you try to catch it, the more it slips off every which way.
And so we keep on treating our diseases till we die.
Some kinds of disease will go away whether we treat them or not.
If it's a disease that goes away with treatment, then take medicine.
If it's one that goes away whether we treat it or not, why bother?
This is what it means to have discernment.
Ignorant people don't know which kinds of stress should be treated and which kinds shouldn't, and so they put their time and money to waste.
As for intelligent people, they see what should be treated and they treat it using their own discernment.
All diseases arise either from an imbalance in the physical elements or from kamma.
If it's a disease that arises from the physical elements, we should treat it with food, medicine, etc.
If it arises from kamma, we have to treat it with the Buddha's medicine.
In other words, stress and pain that arise from the heart, if we treat them with food and medicine, won't respond.
We have to treat them with the Dhamma.
Whoever knows how to manage this is said to have a sense of how to observe and diagnose stress.
If we look at it in another way, we'll see that aging, illness, and death are simply the shadows of stress and not its true substance.
People lacking discernment will try to do away with the shadows, which leads only to more suffering and stress.
This is because they aren't acquainted with what the shadows and substance of stress come from.
The essence of stress lies with the mind.
Aging, illness, and death are its shadows or effects that show by way of the body.
When we want to kill our enemy and so take a knife to stab his shadow, how is he going to die?
In the same way, ignorant people try to destroy the shadows of stress and don't get anywhere.
As for the essence of stress in the heart, they don't think of remedying it at all.
This ignorance of theirs is one form of avijja, or unawareness.
To look at it in still another way, both the shadows and the real thing come from tanha, craving.
We're like a person who has amassed a huge fortune and then, when thieves come to break in, goes killing the thieves.
He doesn't see his own wrong-doing and sees only the wrong-doing of others.
Actually, once he's piled his house full in this way, thieves can't help but break in.
In the same way, people suffer from stress and so they hate it, and yet they don't make the effort to straighten themselves out.
Stress comes from the three forms of craving, so we should kill off craving for sensuality, craving for becoming, and craving for no becoming.
These things are fabricated in our own heart, and we have to know them with our own mindfulness and discernment.
Once we've contemplated them until we see, we'll know: 'This sort of mental state is craving for sensuality; this sort is craving for becoming; and this sort, craving for no becoming.'
People with discernment will see that these things exist in the heart in subtle, intermediate, and blatant stages, just as a person has three stages in a lifetime: youth, middle age, and old age.
'Youth' is craving for sensuality.
Once this thirst arises in the heart, it wavers and moves — this is craving for becoming — and then takes shape as craving for no further becoming — a sambhavesin with its neck stretched out looking for its object, causing itself stress and pain.
In other words, we take a liking to various sights, sounds, smells, flavors, etc., and so fix on them, which brings us stress.
So we shouldn't preoccupy ourselves with sights, sounds, etc., that provoke greed, anger, or delusion, causing the mind to waver and whisk out with concepts.
When we gain discernment, we should destroy these forms of craving with anulomika-ñana, knowledge in accordance with the four Noble Truths, knowing exactly how much ease and pleasure the mind has when cravings for sensuality, becoming, and no becoming all disappear.
This is called knowing the reality of disbanding.
As for the cause of stress and the path to the disbanding of stress, we'll know them as well.
Ignorant people will go ride in the shadow of a car — and they'll end up with their heads bashed in.
People who don't realize what the shadows of virtue are, will end up riding only the shadows.
Words and deeds are the shadows of virtue.
Actual virtue is in the heart.
The heart at normalcy is the substance of virtue.
The substance of concentration is the mind firmly centered in a single preoccupation without any interference from concepts or mental labels.
The bodily side to concentration — when our mouth, eyes, ears, nose, and tongue are quiet — is just the shadow, as when the body sits still, its mouth closed and not speaking with anyone, its nose not interested in any smells, its eyes closed and not interested in any objects, etc.
If the mind is firmly centered to the level of fixed penetration, then whether we sit, stand, walk, or lie down, the mind doesn't waver.
Once the mind is trained to the level of fixed penetration, discernment will arise without our having to search for it, just like an imperial sword: When it's drawn for use, it's sharp and flashing.
When it's no longer needed, it goes back in the scabbard.
This is why we are taught,
The mind is the most extraordinary thing there is.
The mind is the source of the Dhamma.
This is what it means to know stress, its cause, its disbanding, and the path to its disbanding.
This is the substance of virtue, concentration, and discernment.
Whoever can do this will reach release: nibbana.
Whoever can give rise to the Dhamma of study and practice within themselves will meet with the Dhamma of attainment without a doubt.
This is why it's said to be sanditthiko, visible in the present; akaliko, bearing fruit no matter what the time or season.
Keep working at it always.
— Ajaan Lee 
The intention to do harm is a heavy form of self-harm.
At the very least, it uses up our time and destroys our opportunity to do good.
We have to wipe it out with the intention not to do harm — or in other words, with concentration.
This is like seeing that there's plenty of unused space in our property and that we aren't making enough for our living.
We'll have to leap out into the open field so as to give ourselves the momentum for doing our full measure of goodness as the opportunity arises.
Nekkhamma-sankappo, i.e., being at ease in quiet, solitary places.
Abyapada-sankappo: We don't have to think about our own bad points or the bad points of others.
Avihinsa-sankappo, not creating trouble or doing harm to ourselves, i.e., not thinking about our own shortcomings, which would depress us; if we think about our own shortcomings, it'll spread like wildfire to the shortcomings of others.
For this reason, wise people lift their thoughts to the level of goodness so that they can feel love and good will for themselves, and so that they can then feel love and good will for others as well.
When our mind has these three forms of energy, it's like a table with three legs that can spin in all directions.
To put it another way, once our mind has spun up to this high a level, we can take pictures of everything above and below us.
We'll develop discernment like a bright light or like binoculars that can magnify every detail.
This is called ñaṇa — intuitive awareness that can know everything in the world: Lokavidū.
The discernment here isn't ordinary knowledge or insight.
It's a special cognitive skill, the skill of the Noble Path.
We'll give rise to three eyes in the heart, so as to see the reds and greens, the highs and lows of the mundane world: a sport for those with wisdom.
Our internal eyes will look at the Dhamma in front and behind, above and below and all around us, so as to know all the ins and outs of goodness and evil.
This is discernment.
We'll be at our ease, feeling pleasure with no pain interfering at all.
This is called vijja-carana-sampanno — being fully equipped with cognitive skill…
Whoever sees the world as having highs and lows doesn't yet have true intuitive discernment.
Whoever has the eye of intuition will see that there are no highs, no lows, no rich, no poor.
Everything is equal in terms of the three common characteristics: inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
It's like the equality of democracy.
Their home is the same as our home, with no differences at all.
People commit burglaries and robberies these days because they don't see equality.
They think that this person is good, that person isn't; this house is a good place to eat, that house isn't; this house is a good place to sleep, that house isn't, etc.
It's because they don't have insight, the eye of discernment, that there's all this confusion and turmoil…
If we can get our practice on the Noble Path, we'll enter nibbana.Virtue will disband, concentration will disband, discernment will disband.
In other words, we won't dwell on our knowledge or discernment.
If we're intelligent enough to know, we simply know, without taking intelligence as being an essential part of ourselves.
On the lower level, we're not stuck on virtue, concentration, or discernment.
On a higher level, we're not stuck on the stages of stream-entry, once-returning, or non-returning.
Nibbana isn't stuck on the world, the world isn't stuck on nibbana.Only at this point can we use the term 'arahant.'
This is where we can relax.
They can say inconstant, but it's just what they say.
They can say stress, but it's just what they say.
They can say not-self, but it's just what they say.
Whatever they say, that's the way it is.
It's true for them, and they're completely right — but completely wrong.
As for us, only if we can get ourselves beyond right and wrong will we be doing fine.
Roads are built for people to walk on, but dogs and cats can walk on them as well.
Sane people and crazy people will use the roads: They didn't build the roads for crazy people, but crazy people have every right to use them.
As for the precepts, even fools and idiots can observe them.
The same with concentration: Crazy or sane, they can come and sit.
And discernment: We all have the right to come and talk our heads off, but it's simply a question of being right or wrong.
None of the valuables of the mundane world give any real pleasure.
They're nothing but stress.
They're good as far as the world is concerned, but nibbana doesn't have any need for them.
Right views and wrong views are an affair of the world.
Nibbana doesn't have any right views or wrong views.
For this reason, whatever is a wrong view, we should abandon.
Whatever is a right view, we should develop — until the day it can fall from our grasp.
That's when we can be at our ease.
— Ajaan Lee 
“One sleeps easily, wakes easily, dreams no evil dreams.
One is dear to human beings, dear to non-human beings.
The devas protect one.
Neither fire, poison, nor weapons can touch one.
One's mind gains concentration quickly.
One's complexion is bright.
One dies unconfused and — if penetrating no higher — is headed for the Brahma worlds.
“'As you say, Master,' Frying Pan answered the bamboo acrobat and, climbing the bamboo pole, stood on his shoulders.
“So then the bamboo acrobat said to his assistant, 'Now you watch after me, my dear Frying Pan, and I'll watch after you.
Thus, protecting one another, watching after one another, we'll show off our skill, receive our reward, and come down safely from the bamboo pole.'
“When he had said this, Frying Pan said to him, 'But that won't do at all, Master.
You watch after yourself, and I'll watch after myself, and thus with each of us protecting ourselves, watching after ourselves, we'll show off our skill, receive our reward, and come down safely from the bamboo pole.'
“What Frying Pan, the assistant, said to her Master was the right way in that case.
“The establishing of mindfulness is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after myself.' The establishing of mindfulness is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after others.' When watching after oneself, one watches after others.
When watching after others, one watches after oneself.
“And how does one, when watching after oneself, watch after others?
Through pursuing, through developing it, through devoting oneself to it.
This is how one, when watching after oneself, watches after others.
“And how does one, when watching after others, watch after oneself?
Through endurance, through harmlessness, and through a mind of kindness & sympathy.
This is how one, when watching after others, watches after oneself.
“The establishing of mindfulness is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after myself.' The establishing of mindfulness is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after others.' When watching after oneself, one watches after others.
When watching after others, one watches after oneself.
The only way to put out these fires is to meditate and develop thoughts of good will.
The mind won't feel any anger, hatred, or ill will, and instead will feel nothing but thoughts of sympathy, seeing that everyone in the world aims at goodness, but that our goodness isn't equal.
You have to use really careful discernment to consider cause and effect, and then be forgiving, with the thought that we human beings aren't equal or identical in our goodness and evil.
If everyone were equal, the world would fall apart.
If we were equally good or equally bad, the world would have to fall apart for sure.
Suppose that all the people in the world were farmers, with no merchants or government officials.
Or suppose there were only government officials, with no farmers at all: We'd all starve to death with our mouths gaping and dry.
If everyone were equal and identical, the end of the world would come in only a few days' time.
Consider your body: Even the different parts of your own body aren't equal.
Some of your fingers are short, some are long, some small, some large.
If all ten of your fingers were equal, you'd have a monster's hands.
So when even your own fingers aren't equal, how can you expect people to be equal in terms of their thoughts, words, and deeds?
You have to think this way and be forgiving…
When you can think in this way, your good will can spread to all people everywhere, and you'll feel sympathy for people on high levels, low levels and in between.
The big ball of fire inside you will go out through the power of your good will and loving kindness.
This comes from getting life insurance: practicing tranquility meditation so as to chase the defilements away from the mind.
Thoughts of sensual desire, ill will, lethargy, restlessness, and uncertainty will vanish, and the mind will be firmly centered in concentration, using its powers of directed thought to stay with its meditation word — buddho —and its powers of evaluation to create a sense of inner lightness and ease.
When the mind fills itself with rapture — the flavor arising from concentration — it will have its own inner food and nourishment, so that whatever you do in thought, word, or deed is sure to succeed.
— Ajaan Lee 
A characteristic of a “thoroughbred of a monk”: “Whatever tricks or deceits or wiles or subterfuges he has, he shows them as they actually are to the Teacher or to his knowledgeable companions in the holy life, so that the Teacher or his knowledgeable companions in the holy life can try to straighten them out.
Then the Blessed One, having left a little bit of the remaining water in the water dipper, said to Ven.
Rahula, “Rahula, do you see this little bit of remaining water left in the water dipper?
“Yes sir.
“That's how little of a contemplative there is in anyone who feels no shame at telling a deliberate lie.
Having tossed away the little bit of remaining water, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Rahula, “Rahula, do you see how this little bit of remaining water is tossed away?
“Yes, sir.
“Rahula, whatever there is of a contemplative in anyone who feels no shame at telling a deliberate lie is tossed away just like that.
Having turned the water dipper upside down, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Rahula, “Rahula, do you see how this water dipper is turned upside down?
“Yes, sir.
“Rahula, whatever there is of a contemplative in anyone who feels no shame at telling a deliberate lie is turned upside down just like that.
Having turned the water dipper right-side up, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Rahula, “Rahula, do you see how empty & hollow this water dipper is?
“Yes, sir.
“Rahula, whatever there is of a contemplative in anyone who feels no shame at telling a deliberate lie is empty & hollow just like that.
“Rahula, it's like a royal elephant: immense, pedigreed, accustomed to battles, its tusks like chariot poles.
Having gone into battle, it uses its forefeet & hindfeet, its forequarters & hindquarters, its head & ears & tusks & tail, but will simply hold back its trunk.
The elephant trainer notices that and thinks, 'This royal elephant has not given up its life to the king.' But when the royal elephant… having gone into battle, uses its forefeet & hindfeet, its forequarters & hindquarters, its head & ears & tusks & tail & his trunk, the trainer notices that and thinks, 'This royal elephant has given up its life to the king.
There is nothing it will not do.'
“In the same way, Rahula, when anyone feels no shame in telling a deliberate lie, there is no evil, I tell you, he will not do.
Thus, Rahula, you should train yourself, 'I will not tell a deliberate lie even in jest.'
“I do not say, brahman, that everything that has been seen should be spoken about.
Nor do I say that everything that has been seen should not be spoken about.
I do not say that everything that has been heard… everything that has been sensed… everything that has been cognized should be spoken about.
Nor do I say that everything that has been cognized should not be spoken about.
“When, for one who speaks of what has been seen, unskillful mental qualities increase and skillful mental qualities decrease, then that sort of thing should not be spoken about.
But when, for one who speaks of what has been seen, unskillful mental qualities decrease and skillful mental qualities increase, then that sort of thing should be spoken about.
“When, for one who speaks of what has been heard… what has been sensed… what has been cognized, unskillful mental qualities increase and skillful mental qualities decrease, then that sort of thing should not be spoken about.
But when, for one who speaks of what has been cognized, unskillful mental qualities decrease and skillful mental qualities increase, then that sort of thing should be spoken about.
Then Vassakara the brahman, delighting & rejoicing in the Blessed One's words, got up from his seat and left.
“Tell me, Bharadvaja, is there among the brahmans even one brahman who says, 'This I know; this I see; only this is true; anything else is worthless?' “No, Master Gotama.
“And has there been among the brahmans even one teacher or teacher's teacher back through seven generations who said, 'This I know; this I see; only this is true; anything else is worthless?' “No, Master Gotama.
“And among the brahman seers of the past, the creators of the hymns, the composers of the hymns — those ancient hymns, sung, repeated, & collected, which brahmans at present still sing, still chant, repeating what was said, repeating what was spoken — i.e., Atthaka, Vamaka, Vamadeva, Vessamitta, Yamataggi, Angirasa, Bharadvaja, Vasettha, Kassapa & Bhagu: was there even one of these who said, 'This we know; this we see; only this is true; anything else is worthless?' “No, Master Gotama.
“So then, Bharadvaja, it seems that there isn't among the brahmans even one brahman who says, 'This I know; this I see; only this is true; anything else is worthless.' And there hasn't been among the brahmans even one teacher or teacher's teacher back through seven generations who said, 'This I know; this I see; only this is true; anything else is worthless.' And there hasn't been among the brahman seers of the past, the creators of the hymns, the composers of the hymns… even one who said, 'This we know; this we see; only this is true; anything else is worthless.' Suppose there were a row of blind men, each holding on to the one in front of him: the first one doesn't see, the middle one doesn't see, the last one doesn't see.
In the same way, the statement of the brahmans turns out to be a row of blind men, as it were: the first one doesn't see, the middle one doesn't see, the last one doesn't see.
So what do you think, Bharadvaja: this being the case, doesn't the conviction of the brahmans turn out to be groundless?
“It's not only out of conviction, Master Gotama, that the brahmans honor this.
They also honor it as unbroken tradition.
“Bharadvaja, first you went by conviction.
Now you speak of unbroken tradition.
There are five things that can turn out in two ways in the here-&-now.
Which five?
Conviction, liking, unbroken tradition, reasoning by analogy, & an agreement through pondering views.
These are the five things that can turn out in two ways in the here-&-now.
Now some things are firmly held in conviction and yet vain, empty, & false.
Some things are not firmly held in conviction, and yet they are genuine, factual, & unmistaken.
Some things are well-liked… truly an unbroken tradition… well-reasoned… Some things are well-pondered and yet vain, empty, & false.
Some things are not well-pondered, and yet they are genuine, factual, & unmistaken.
In these cases it isn't proper for a knowledgeable person who safeguards the truth to come to a definite conclusion, 'Only this is true; anything else is worthless.
“But to what extent, Master Gotama, is there the safeguarding of the truth?
To what extent does one safeguard the truth?
We ask Master Gotama about the safeguarding of the truth.
“If a person has conviction, his statement, 'This is my conviction,' safeguards the truth.
But he doesn't yet come to the definite conclusion that 'Only this is true; anything else is worthless.' To this extent, Bharadvaja, there is the safeguarding of the truth.
To this extent one safeguards the truth.
I describe this as the safeguarding of the truth.
But it is not yet an awakening to the truth.
“If a person likes something… holds an unbroken tradition… has something reasoned through analogy… has something he agrees to, having pondered views, his statement, 'This is what I agree to, having pondered views,' safeguards the truth.
But he doesn't yet come to the definite conclusion that 'Only this is true; anything else is worthless.' To this extent, Bharadvaja, there is the safeguarding of the truth.
To this extent one safeguards the truth.
I describe this as the safeguarding of the truth.
But it is not yet an awakening to the truth.
“Yes, Master Gotama, to this extent there is the safeguarding of the truth.
To this extent one safeguards the truth.
We regard this as the safeguarding of the truth.
But to what extent is there an awakening to the truth?
To what extent does one awaken to the truth?
We ask Master Gotama about awakening to the truth.
“There is the case, Bharadvaja, where a monk lives in dependence on a certain village or town.
Then a householder or householder's son goes to him and observes him with regard to three mental qualities — qualities based on greed, qualities based on aversion, qualities based on delusion: 'Are there in this venerable one any such qualities based on greed that, with his mind overcome by these qualities, he might say, “I know,” while not knowing, or say, “I see,” while not seeing; or that he might urge another to act in a way that was for his/her long-term harm & pain?' As he observes him, he comes to know, 'There are in this venerable one no such qualities based on greed… His bodily behavior & verbal behavior are those of one not greedy.
And the Dhamma he teaches is deep, hard to see, hard to realize, tranquil, refined, beyond the scope of conjecture, subtle, to-be-experienced by the wise.
This Dhamma can't easily be taught by a person who's greedy.
“When, on observing that the monk is purified with regard to qualities based on greed, he next observes him with regard to qualities based on aversion… based on delusion: 'Are there in this venerable one any such qualities based on delusion that, with his mind overcome by these qualities, he might say, “I know,” while not knowing, or say, “I see,” while not seeing; or that he might urge another to act in a way that was for his/her long-term harm & pain?' As he observes him, he comes to know, 'There are in this venerable one no such qualities based on delusion… His bodily behavior & verbal behavior are those of one not deluded.
And the Dhamma he teaches is deep, hard to see, hard to realize, tranquil, refined, beyond the scope of conjecture, subtle, to-be-experienced by the wise.
This Dhamma can't easily be taught by a person who's deluded.
“When, on observing that the monk is purified with regard to qualities based on delusion, he places conviction in him.
With the arising of conviction, he visits him & grows close to him.
Growing close to him, he lends ear.
Lending ear, he hears the Dhamma.
Hearing the Dhamma, he remembers it.
Remembering it, he penetrates the meaning of those dhammas.
Penetrating the meaning, he comes to an agreement through pondering those dhammas.
There being an agreement through pondering those dhammas, desire arises.
With the arising of desire, he becomes willing.
Willing, he contemplates.
Contemplating, he makes an exertion.
Exerting himself, he both realizes the ultimate meaning of the truth with his body and sees by penetrating it with discernment.
“To this extent, Bharadvaja, there is an awakening to the truth.
To this extent one awakens to the truth.
I describe this as an awakening to the truth.
But it is not yet the final attainment of the truth.
“Yes, Master Gotama, to this extent there is an awakening to the truth.
To this extent one awakens to the truth.
We regard this as an awakening to the truth.
But to what extent is there the final attainment of the truth?
To what extent does one finally attain the truth?
We ask Master Gotama about the final attainment of the truth.
“The cultivation, development, & pursuit of those very same qualities: to this extent, Bharadvaja, there is the final attainment of the truth.
To this extent one finally attains the truth.
I describe this as the final attainment of the truth.
So he posed himself a question: 'Now that you've been born as a human being, what is the highest thing you want in this world?' He then placed the following conditions on his answer: 'In answering, you have to be really honest and truthful with yourself.
And once you've answered, you have to hold to your answer as an unalterable law on which you've affixed your seal, without ever letting a second seal be affixed on top.
So what do you want, and how do you want it?
You have to give an honest answer, understand?
I won't accept anything false.
And once you've answered, you have to keep to your answer.
Don't be a traitor to yourself.'
When he was sure of his answer, he said to himself, 'I want only the highest and most certain happiness and ease: the happiness that won't change into anything else.
Other than that, I don't want anything else in the world.'
Once he had given this answer, he kept to it firmly.
He didn't allow anything that would have caused the least bit of pain or distraction to his heart to get stuck there as a stain on it.
He kept making a persistent effort with all his might to discover the truth, without retreat, until he finally awakened to that truth: the reality of Liberation.
If we search for the truth like the Buddha — if we're true in our intent and true in what we do — there's no way the truth can escape us.
But if we aren't true to ourselves, we won't find the true happiness the Buddha found.
We tell ourselves that we want to be happy but we go jumping into fires.
We know what things are poison, yet we go ahead and drink them anyway.
This is called being a traitor to yourself…
Every person alive wants happiness — even common animals struggle to find happiness — but our actions for the most part aren't in line with our intentions.
This is why we don't get to realize the happiness we want, simply because there's no truth to us.
For example, when people come to the monastery: If they come to make offerings, observe the precepts, and sit in meditation for the sake of praise or a good reputation, there's no real merit to what they're doing.
They don't gain any real happiness from it, so they end up disappointed and dissatisfied.
Then they start saying that offerings, precepts, and meditation don't give any good results.
Instead of reflecting on the fact that they weren't right and honest in doing these things, they say that there's no real good to the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha, that the Buddha's teachings are a lot of nonsense and lies.
But actually the Buddha's teachings are an affair of the truth.
If a person isn't true to the Buddha's teachings, the Buddha's teachings won't be true to that person —and that person won't be able to know what the Buddha's true teachings are…
When we practice virtue, concentration, and discernment, it's as if we were taking the jewels and robes of royalty and the Noble Ones to dress up our heart and make it beautiful.
But if we aren't true in our practice, it's like taking robes and jewels and giving them to a monkey.
The monkey is bound to get them dirty and tear them to shreds because it has no sense of beauty at all.
Whoever sees this kind of thing happening is sure to see right through it, that it's a monkey show.
Even though the costumes are genuine, the monkey inside isn't genuine like the costumes.
For instance, if you take a soldier's cap and uniform to dress it up as a soldier, it's a soldier only as far as the cap and uniform, but the monkey inside is still a monkey and not a soldier at all.
For this reason, the Buddha teaches us to be true in whatever we do — to be true in being generous, true in being virtuous, true in developing concentration and discernment.
Don't play around at these things.
If you're true, then these activities are sure to bear you the fruits of your own truthfulness without a doubt.
— Ajaan Lee 
“There is the case where a noble disciple, abandoning the taking of life, abstains from taking life.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the first gift, the first great gift — original, long-standing, traditional, ancient, unadulterated, unadulterated from the beginning — that is not open to suspicion, will never be open to suspicion, and is unfaulted by knowledgeable contemplatives & brahmans.
“Furthermore, abandoning taking what is not given, the noble disciple abstains from taking what is not given.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the second gift, the second great gift…
“Furthermore, abandoning illicit sex, the noble disciple abstains from illicit sex.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the third gift, the third great gift…
Furthermore, abandoning lying, the noble disciple abstains from lying.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the fourth gift, the fourth great gift…
“Furthermore, abandoning the use of intoxicants, the noble disciple abstains from taking intoxicants.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the fifth gift, the fifth great gift — original, long-standing, traditional, ancient, unadulterated, unadulterated from the beginning — that is not open to suspicion, will never be open to suspicion, and is unfaulted by knowledgeable contemplatives & brahmans.
“And how is one made pure in four ways by verbal action?
There is the case where a certain person, abandoning false speech, abstains from false speech.
When he has been called to a town meeting, a group meeting, a gathering of his relatives, his guild, or of the royalty, if he is asked as a witness, 'Come & tell, good man, what you know': If he doesn't know, he says, 'I don't know.' If he does know, he says, 'I know.' If he hasn't seen, he says, 'I haven't seen.' If he has seen, he says, 'I have seen.' Thus he doesn't consciously tell a lie for his own sake, for the sake of another, or for the sake of any reward.
Abandoning false speech, he abstains from false speech.
He speaks the truth, holds to the truth, is firm, reliable, no deceiver of the world.
Abandoning divisive speech he abstains from divisive speech.
What he has heard here he does not tell there to break those people apart from these people here.
What he has heard there he does not tell here to break these people apart from those people there.
Thus reconciling those who have broken apart or cementing those who are united, he loves concord, delights in concord, enjoys concord, speaks things that create concord.
Abandoning abusive speech, he abstains from abusive speech.
He speaks words that are soothing to the ear, that are affectionate, that go to the heart, that are polite, appealing & pleasing to people at large.
Abandoning idle chatter, he abstains from idle chatter.
He speaks in season, speaks what is factual, what is in accordance with the goal, the Dhamma, & the Vinaya.
He speaks words worth treasuring, seasonable, reasonable, circumscribed, connected with the goal.
This is how one is made pure in four ways by verbal action.
“And how is one made pure in three ways by mental action?
There is the case where a certain person is not covetous.
He does not covet the belongings of others, thinking, 'O, that what belongs to others would be mine!' He bears no ill will and is not corrupt in the resolves of his heart.
'May these beings be free from animosity, free from oppression, free from trouble, and may they look after themselves with ease!' He has right view and is not warped in the way he sees things: 'There is what is given, what is offered, what is sacrificed.
There are fruits & results of good & bad actions.
There is this world & the next world.
There is mother & father.
There are spontaneously reborn beings; there are contemplatives & brahmans who, faring rightly & practicing rightly, proclaim this world & the next after having directly known & realized it for themselves.' This is how one is made pure in three ways by mental action.
Hetthima-sila:normalcy of word and deed, which consists of three kinds of bodily acts — not killing, not stealing, not engaging in sexual misconduct; and four kinds of speech — not lying, not speaking divisively, not saying anything coarse or abusive, not speaking idly.
If we class virtue on this level according to the wording of the precepts and the groups of people who observe them, there are four — the five precepts, the eight, the ten, and the precepts.
All of these deal with aspects of behavior that should be abandoned, termed pahana-kicca.
At the same time, the Buddha directed us to develop good manners and proper conduct in the use of the four necessities of life — food, clothing, shelter, and medicine — so that our conduct in terms of thought, word, and deed will be orderly and becoming.
This aspect is termed bhavana-kicca, behavior we should work at developing correctly.
Observance of these precepts or rules — dealing merely with words and deeds — forms the lower or preliminary level of virtue, which is what makes us into full-fledged human beings.
Majjhima-sila:the medium level of virtue, i.e., keeping watch over your words and deeds so that they cause no harm; and, in addition, keeping watch over your thoughts so as to keep your mental kamma upright in three ways —
a.
Anabhijjha-visamalobha: not coveting things that do not belong to you and that lie beyond your scope or powers; not focusing your thoughts on such things; not building what are called castles in the air.
The Buddha taught us to tend to the wealth we already have so that it can grow on its own.
The wealth we already have, if we use our intelligence and ingenuity, will draw more wealth our way without our having to waste energy by being covetous or greedy.
For example, suppose we have a single banana tree: If we water it, give it fertilizer, loosen the soil around its roots, and protect it from dangers, our single banana tree will eventually give rise to an increase of other banana trees.
In other words, if we're intelligent we can turn whatever wealth we have into a basis for a livelihood.
But if we lack intelligence — if our hearts simply want to get, without wanting work — then even if we acquire a great deal of wealth, we won't be able to support ourselves.
Thus, greed of this sort, in which we focus our desires above and beyond our capacities, is classed as a wrong kind of mental action.
b.
Abyapada: abandoning thoughts of ill will, hatred, and vengeance, and developing thoughts of good will instead; thinking of the good aspects of the people who have angered us.
When people make us angry, it comes from the fact that our dealings with them — in which we associate with and assist one another — sometimes lead to disappointment.
This gives rise to dislike and irritation, which in turn cause us to brood, so that we develop hurt feelings that grow into anger and thoughts of retaliation.
Thus we should regard such people from many angles, for ordinarily as human beings they should have somegood to them.
If they don't act well toward us, they may at least speak well to us.
Or if they don't act or speak well to us, perhaps their thoughts may be well-meaning to at least some extent.
Thus, when you find your thoughts heading in the direction of anger or dislike, you should sit down and think in two ways —
Try to think of whatever ways that person has been good to you.
When these things come to mind, they'll give rise to feelings of affection, love, and good will.
This is one way.
Anger is something worthless, like the scum floating on the surface of a lake.
If we're stupid, we won't get to drink the clean water lying underneath; or if we drink the scum, we may catch a disease.
A person who is bad to you is like someone sunk in filth.
If you're stupid enough to hate or be angry with such people, it's as if you wanted to go sit in the filth with them.
Is that what you want?
Think about this until any thoughts of ill will and anger disappear.
c.
Samma-ditthi:abandoning wrong views and mental darkness.
If our minds lack the proper training and education, we may come to think that we and all other living beings are born simply as accidents of nature; that 'father' and 'mother' have no special meaning; that good and evil don't exist.
Such views deviate from the truth.
They can dissuade us from restraining the evil that lies within us and from searching for and fostering the good.
To believe that there's no good or evil, that death is annihilation, is Wrong View — a product of short-sighted thinking and poor discernment, seeing things for what they aren't.
So we should abandon such views and educate ourselves, searching for knowledge of the Dhamma and associating with people wiser than we, so that they can show us the bright path.
We'll then be able to reform our views and make them Right, which is one form of mental uprightness.
Virtue on this level, when we can maintain it well, will qualify us to be heavenly beings.
The qualities of heavenly beings, which grow out of human values, will turn us into human beings who are divine in our virtues, for to guard our thoughts, words, and deeds means that we qualify for heaven in this lifetime.
This is one aspect of the merit developed by a person who observes the middle level of virtue.
Uparima-sila: higher virtue, where virtue merges with the Dhamma in the area of mental activity.
There are two sides to higher virtue —
a.
PAHANA-KICCA: qualities to be abandoned, which are of five sorts —
     Kamachanda: affection, desire, laxity, infatuation.
     Byapada: ill will and hatred.
     Thīna-middha: discouragement, drowsiness, sloth.
     Uddhacca-kukkucca: restlessness and anxiety.
     Vicikiccha:doubt, uncertainty, indecision.
Ill will lies at the essence of killing, for it causes us to destroy our own goodness and that of others — and when our mind can kill off our own goodness, what's to keep us from killing other people and animals as well?
Restlessness lies at the essence of taking what isn't given.
The mind wanders about, taking hold of other people's affairs, sometimes their good points, sometimes their bad.
To fasten onto their good points isn't too serious, for it can give us at least somenourishment.
As long as we're going to steal other people's business and make it our own, we might as well take their silver and gold.
Their bad points, though, are like trash they've thrown away — scraps and bones with nothing of any substance — and yet even so we let the mind feed on them.
When we know that other people are possessive of their bad points and guard them well and yet we still take hold of these things to think about, it should be classed as a form of taking what isn't given.
Sensual desires lie at the essence of sensual misconduct.
The mind feels an attraction for sensual objects — thoughts of past or future sights, sounds, smells, tastes, or tactile sensations — or for sensual defilements — passion, aversion, or delusion — to the point where we forget ourselves.
Mental states such as these can be said to overstep the bounds of propriety in sensual matters.
Doubt lies at the essence of lying.
In other words, our minds are unsure, with nothing reliable or true to them.
We have no firm principles and so drift along under the influence of all kinds of thoughts and preoccupations.
Drowsiness is intoxication — discouragement, dullness, forgetfulness, with no mindfulness or restraint watching over the mind.
This is what it means to be drugged or drunk.
All of these unskillful qualities are things we should eliminate by training the heart along the lines of:
b.
BHAVANA-KICCA: qualities to be developed —
Mindfulness:Start out by directing your thoughts to an object, such as your in-and-out breathing.
Use mindfulness to steady the mind in its object throughout both the in-breath and the out-.
Vitakka, thinking in this way, is what kills off sensual desires, in that the discipline of mindfulness keeps the mind from slipping off into external objects.
Vicara:Evaluate and be observant.
Make yourself aware of whether or not you've received a sense of comfort and relaxation from your in- and out-breathing.
If not, tend to the breath and adjust it in a variety of ways: e.g., in long and out long, in long and out short, in short and out short, in short and out long, in slow and out slow, in fast and out fast, in gently and out gently, in strong and out strong, in throughout the body and out throughout the body.
Adjust the breath until it gives good results to both body and mind, and you'll be able to kill off feelings of ill will and hatred.
Piti:When you get good results — for instance, when the subtle breath sensations in the body merge and flow together, permeating the entire sense of the body — the breath is like an electric wire; the various parts of the body, such as the bones, are like electricity poles; mindfulness and alertness are like a power source; and awareness is thus bright and radiant.
Both body and mind feel satisfied and full.
This is piti, or rapture, which can kill off feelings of drowsiness.
Sukha: Now that feelings of restlessness and anxiety have disappeared, a sense of pleasure and ease arises for both body and mind.
This pleasure is what kills off restlessness.
Ekaggata: Doubts and uncertainty fade into the distance.
The mind reaches singleness of preoccupation in a state of normalcy and equilibrium.
This normalcy of mind, which is maintained through the power of the discipline of mindfulness, forms the essence of virtue: firmness, steadiness, stability.
And the resulting flavor or nourishment of virtue is a solitary sense of calm for the mind.
When freedom of this sort arises within us, this is called the development of silanussati, the mindfulness of virtue.
This is virtue that attains excellence — leading to the paths, their fruitions, and nibbana — and thus can be called uparima-sila, higher virtue.
To summarize, there are three levels of virtue: external, intermediate, and internal.
In ultimate terms, however, there are two —
Mundane virtue: virtue connected with the world, in which we maintain the principles of ordinary human morality but are as yet unable to reach the transcendent levels: stream entry, once-returning, non-returning, and arahantship.
We can't yet cut the Fetters that tie the heart to the influences of all the worlds.
This is thus called mundane virtue.
Transcendent virtue: virtue that's constant and sure, going straight to the heart, bathing the heart with its nourishment.
This arises from the practice of tranquility meditation and insight meditation.
Tranquility meditation forms the cause, and insight meditation the result: discovering the true nature of the properties, aggregates, and senses; seeing clearly the four Noble Truths, in proportion to our practice of the Path, and abandoning the first three of the Fetters —
a.
Sakkaya-ditthi: views that see the body or the aggregates as in the self or as belonging to the self.
Ordinarily, we may be convinced that views of this sort are mistaken, yet we can't really abandon them.
But when we clearly see that they're wrong for sure, this is called Right View — seeing things as they truly are — which can eliminate such wrong views as seeing the body as belonging to the self, or the self as the five aggregates, or the five aggregates as in the self.
b.
Vicikiccha: doubt about what's genuine and true, and what's counterfeit and false.
The power of Right View allows us to see that the quality to which we awaken exists at all times and that the true qualities enabling us to awaken also exist and are made effective through the power of the practices we're following.
Our knowledge is definite and true.
Our doubts about the virtues of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha are cleared up for good.
This is called becoming a niyata-puggala, a person who is certain and sure.
c.
Silabbata-paramasa: When the heart abandons this Fetter, it no longer fondles theories concerning moral virtue; it's no longer stuck merely on the level of manners and activities.
Good and evil are accomplished through the heart; activities are something separate.
Even though people who reach this level do good — taking the precepts, making gifts and offerings, or meditating in line with the good customs of the world — they're not caught up on any of these things, because their hearts have reached the nourishment of virtue.
They aren't stuck on the particulars, i.e., their activities; nor are they stuck on the purpose, i.e., the meaning or intent of their various good manners.
Their hearts dwell in the nourishment of virtue: tranquility, stability, normalcy of mind.
Just as a person who has felt the nourishment that comes from food permeating his body isn't stuck on either the food or its flavor — because he's received the benefits of the nourishment it provides — in the same way, the hearts of people who have reached the essence of virtue are no longer stuck on activities or manners, particulars or purposes, because they've tasted virtue's nourishment.
This is thus classed as transcendent virtue, the first stage of nibbana.
Even though such people may be destined for further rebirth, they're special people, apart from the ordinary.
Anyone whose practice reaches this level can be counted as fortunate, as having received dependable wealth, like ingots of gold.
Just as gold can be used as currency all over the world because it has special value for all human beings — unlike paper currency, whose use is limited to specific countries — in the same way, a heart that has truly attained virtue has a value in this life that will remain constant in lives to come.
Thus, a person who has reached this level has received part of the Noble Wealth of those who practice the religion.
— Ajaan Lee 
Then the Blessed One, as soon as he perceived with his awareness the train of thought in Ven.
Sona's awareness disappeared from Vulture Peak Mountain — just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — appeared in the Cool Wood right in front of Ven.
Sona, and sat down on a prepared seat.
Ven.
Sona, after bowing down to the Blessed One, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “Just now, as you were meditating in seclusion, didn't this train of thought appear to your awareness: 'Of the Blessed One's disciples who have aroused their persistence, I am one, but my mind is not released from fermentations… What if I were to disavow the training, return to the lower life, enjoy wealth, & make merit?' “Yes, lord.
“Now what do you think, Sona.
Before, when you were a house-dweller, were you skilled at playing the vina?
“Yes, lord.
“And what do you think: when the strings of your vina were too taut, was your vina in tune & playable?
“No, lord.
“And what do you think: when the strings of your vina were too loose, was your vina in tune & playable?
“No, lord.
“And what do you think: when the strings of your vina were neither too taut nor too loose, but tuned to be right on pitch, was your vina in tune & playable?
“Yes, lord.
“In the same way, Sona, over-aroused persistence leads to restlessness, overly slack persistence leads to laziness.
Thus you should determine the right pitch for your persistence, attune the pitch of the faculties, and there pick up your theme.
“Yes, lord,” Ven.
Sona answered the Blessed One.
Then, having given this exhortation to Ven.
Sona, the Blessed One — as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — disappeared from the Cool Wood and appeared on Vulture Peak Mountain.
So after that, Ven.
Sona determined the right pitch for his persistence, attuned the pitch of the faculties, and there picked up his theme.
Dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute, he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And thus Ven.
Sona became another one of the arahants.
Ven.
Matangaputta
Ven.
Suppiya:
“Wherever the mind feels confidence, great king.
“But a gift given where, lord, bears great fruit?
“This is one thing, great king — 'Where should a gift be given?' — while this — 'A gift given where bears great fruit?' — is something else entirely.
What is given to a virtuous person — rather than to an unvirtuous one — bears great fruit.
“Having given a gift with a sense of conviction, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And he is well-built, handsome, extremely inspiring, endowed with a lotus-like complexion.
“Having given a gift attentively, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And his children, wives, slaves, servants, and workers listen carefully to him, lend him their ears, and serve him with understanding hearts.
“Having given a gift in season, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And his goals are fulfilled in season.
“Having given a gift with an empathetic heart, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And his mind inclines to the enjoyment of the five strings of lavish sensuality.
“Having given a gift without adversely affecting himself or others, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And not from anywhere does destruction come to his property — whether from fire, from water, from kings, from thieves, or from hateful heirs.
“These five are a person of integrity's gifts.
— nor with the thought, 'Giving is good,'
— nor with the thought, 'This was given in the past, done in the past, by my father & grandfather.
It would not be right for me to let this old family custom be discontinued,'
— nor with the thought, 'I am well-off.
These are not well-off.
It would not be right for me, being well-off, not to give a gift to those who are not well-off,'
— nor with the thought, 'Just as there were the great sacrifices of the sages of the past — Atthaka, Vamaka, Vamadeva, Vessamitta, Yamataggi, Angirasa, Bharadvaja, Vasettha, Kassapa & Bhagu — in the same way this will be my distribution of gifts,'
— nor with the thought, 'When this gift of mine is given, it makes the mind serene.
Gratification & joy arise,' 
— but with the thought, 'This is an ornament for the mind, a support for the mind' — on the break-up of the body, after death, one reappears in the company of Brahma's Retinue.
Then, having exhausted that action, that power, that status, that sovereignty, one is a non-returner and does not come back to this world.
“This, Sariputta, is the cause, this is the reason, why a person gives a gift of a certain sort and it does not bear great fruit or great benefit, whereas another person gives a gift of the same sort and it bears great fruit and great benefit.
“And which are the three factors of the donor?
There is the case where the donor, before giving, is glad; while giving, his/her mind is bright & clear; and after giving is gratified.
These are the three factors of the donor.
“And which are the three factors of the recipients?
There is the case where the recipients are free of passion or are practicing for the subduing of passion; free of aversion or practicing for the subduing of aversion; and free of delusion or practicing for the subduing of delusion.
These are the three factors of the recipients…
“Just as it is not easy to take the measure of the great ocean as 'just this many buckets of water, just this many hundreds of buckets of water, just this many thousands of buckets of water, or just this many hundreds of thousands of buckets of water.' It is simply reckoned as a great mass of water, incalculable, immeasurable.
In the same way, it is not easy to take the measure of the merit of a donation thus endowed with six factors as 'just this much a bonanza of merit, a bonanza of what is skillful — a nutriment of bliss, heavenly, resulting in bliss, leading to heaven — that leads to what is desirable, pleasing, charming, beneficial, pleasant.' It is simply reckoned as a great mass of merit, incalculable, immeasurable.
“Furthermore, good people, people of integrity, admire one who is generous, a master of giving… this, too, is a fruit of generosity visible in the here & now.
“Furthermore, the fine reputation of one who is generous, a master of giving, is spread far & wide… this, too, is a fruit of generosity visible in the here & now.
“Furthermore, when one who is generous, a master of giving, approaches any assembly of people — noble warriors, brahmans, householders, or contemplatives — he/she does so confidently & without embarrassment… this, too, is a fruit of generosity visible in the here & now.
“Furthermore, at the break-up of the body, after death, one who is generous, a master of giving, reappears in a good destination, the heavenly world… this is a fruit of generosity in the next life.
So when you develop yourself so as to gain the discernment that sees how worldly things are undependable and unsure, don't let your property — your worldly possessions — sit idle.
The Buddha teaches us to plant crops on our land so that we can benefit from it.
If you don't make use of your land, it's sure to fall into other people's hands.
In other words, when we stake out a claim to a piece of property, we should plant it full of crops.
Otherwise the government won't recognize our claim, and we'll lose our rights to it.
Even if we take the case to court, we won't have a chance to win.
So once you see the weakness of an idle claim, you should hurry up and plant crops on it so that the government will recognize your claim and issue you a title to the land.
What this means is that we should make use of our material possessions by being generous with them, using them in a way that develops the inner wealth of generosity within us.
This way they become the kind of wealth over which we have full rights, and that will benefit us even into future lifetimes.
— Ajaan Lee 
As a first step we're taught dana — to be generous, to give donations — as a strategy for getting us to learn how to let go.
The next step is caga — renouncing rights of possession — which is letting go at a higher level than dana.
And finally, on a more refined level, we're taught to relinquish all our upadhi, or the acquisition-defilements in the mind.
This is the level on which we examine and explore until we can gain total release.
Dana means giving away material things.
If we don't give them away, they're hard to let go.
For the most part, if we don't give things away, we hold rights over them and regard them as belonging to us.
But if we give them away, we no longer have any rights over them.
Things we hold onto are dangerous.
They can cause us harm.
They cause harm to people who steal them from us.
And once those people have stolen them, then they claim rights over them.
The Buddha saw these dangers, which is why he taught us to be generous, to learn how to give things away.
People who develop the habit of being generous reap many rewards.
Their act of generosity comes back to them both in the present and on into the future.
They have lots of friends.
Other people trust them.
Their hearts are light — they aren't weighed down with worries about looking after the things they've given away.
And these same results will keep coming in the future, just as when we have a bucket of rice grains: if we plant them in a field, we'll reap ten buckets of rice in return.
The same holds true with the goodness we develop in this lifetime.
It gives enormous returns.
That's how people of discernment understand it.
Caga is the next step.
Dana is something that even crazy people can do, but caga is a type of giving that only wise people can do, because their sense of personal possession has to end immediately in the act of giving.
They see that all material things are common property: things don't really belong to us, they don't really belong to other people.
If you see things as belonging to you, that's addiction to sensuality.
If you see things as belonging to others, that's addiction to self-affliction.
When we're born, we didn't bring anything along with us when we came.
When we die, we won't take anything along when we go.
So what really belongs to us?
Our sense of possession has to fall away from the heart if our giving is to count as caga.
The third level of letting go is relinquishing what's in the heart.
Whether or not we give things away, we let go of them in the heart every day.
We let go of the things we have.
We let go of the things we don't have.
Just as a person has to wash his mouth and hands every day after he eats if he wants to stay clean at all times.
What this means is that we're not willing to let anything act as an enemy to the heart by making us stingy or grasping.
If we don't do this, we're the type of person who doesn't wash up after a meal.
We're not clean.
We stay asleep without ever waking up.
But when we let go in this way, it's called viraga-dhamma,or dispassion.
The lower levels of letting go are things we can do only from time to time.
Dispassion is something we can develop always.
— Ajaan Lee 
“So it is, Ananda.
So it is.
Even I myself, before my self-awakening, when I was still an unawakened Bodhisatta, thought: 'Renunciation is good.
Seclusion is good.' But my heart didn't leap up at renunciation, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace.
The thought occurred to me: 'What is the cause, what is the reason, why my heart doesn't leap up at renunciation, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace?' Then the thought occurred to me: 'I haven't seen the drawback of sensual pleasures; I haven't pursued.
I haven't understood the reward of renunciation; I haven't familiarized myself with it.
That's why my heart doesn't leap up at renunciation, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace.'
“Then the thought occurred to me: 'If, having seen the drawback of sensual pleasures, I were to pursue that theme; and if, having understood the reward of renunciation, I were to familiarize myself with it, there's the possibility that my heart would leap up at renunciation, grow confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.'
“So at a later time, having seen the drawback of sensual pleasures, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of renunciation, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at renunciation, grow confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
Then, quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, I entered & remained in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
“As I remained there, I was beset with attention to perceptions dealing with sensuality.
That was an affliction for me.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with sensuality that beset me was an affliction for me.
“Yes, young man.
I have slept in ease.
Of those in the world who sleep in ease, I am one.
“But cold, lord, is the winter night.
The 'Between-the-Eights' is a time of snowfall.
Hard is the ground trampled by cattle hooves.
Thin is the spread of leaves.
Sparse are the leaves in the trees.
Thin are your ochre robes.
And cold blows the Veramba wind.
Yet still the Blessed One says, 'Yes, young man.
I have slept in ease.
Of those in the world who sleep in ease, I am one.' “In that case, young man, I will question you in return.
Answer as you see fit.
Now, what do you think: Suppose a householder or householder's son has a house with a gabled roof, plastered inside & out, draft-free, with close-fitting door & windows shut against the wind.
Inside he has a horse-hair couch spread with a long-fleeced coverlet, a white wool coverlet, an embroidered coverlet, a rug of kadali-deer hide, with a canopy above, & red cushions on either side.
And there a lamp would be burning, and his four wives, with their many charms, would be attending to him.
Would he sleep in ease, or not?
Or how does this strike you?
“Yes, lord, he would sleep in ease.
Of those in the world who sleep in ease, he would be one.
“But what do you think, young man.
Might there arise in that householder or householder's son any bodily fevers or fevers of mind born of passion so that — burned with those passion-born fevers — he would sleep miserably?
“Yes, lord.
“As for those passion-born fevers — burned with which the householder or householder's son would sleep miserably — that passion has been abandoned by the Tathagata, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of existence, not destined for future arising.
Therefore he sleeps in ease.
“Reflecting appropriately, he uses alms food, not playfully, nor for intoxication, nor for putting on bulk, nor for beautification; but simply for the survival & continuance of this body, for ending its afflictions, for the support of the holy life, thinking, 'Thus will I destroy old feelings and not create new feelings.
I will maintain myself, be blameless, & live in comfort.'
“Reflecting appropriately, he uses lodging simply to counteract cold, to counteract heat, to counteract the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles; simply for protection from the inclemencies of weather and for the enjoyment of seclusion.
“Reflecting appropriately, he uses medicinal requisites that are used for curing the sick simply to counteract any pains of illness that have arisen and for maximum freedom from disease.
“Suppose that a fletcher were to heat & warm an arrow shaft between two flames, making it straight & pliable.
Then at a later time he would no longer heat & warm the shaft between two flames, making it straight & pliable.
Why is that?
Because he has attained the goal for which he was heating & warming the shaft… In the same way, the monk… no longer exerts himself with stress & pain.
Why is that?
Because he has attained the goal for which he was exerting himself with stress & pain.
Then the Blessed One told a certain monk, “Come, monk.
In my name, call Bhaddiya, saying, 'The Teacher calls you, my friend.' “As you say, lord,” the monk answered and, having gone to Ven.
Bhaddiya, on arrival he said, “The Teacher calls you, my friend.
“As you say, my friend,” Ven.
Bhaddiya replied.
Then he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “Is it true, Bhaddiya that, on going to a forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, you repeatedly exclaim, 'What bliss!
What bliss!'?
“Yes, lord.
“What meaning do you have in mind that you repeatedly exclaim, 'What bliss!
What bliss!'?
“Before, when I has a householder, maintaining the bliss of kingship, I had guards posted within and without the royal apartments, within and without the city, within and without the countryside.
But even though I was thus guarded, thus protected, I dwelled in fear — agitated, distrustful, and afraid.
But now, on going alone to a forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, I dwell without fear, unagitated, confident, and unafraid — unconcerned, unruffled, my wants satisfied, with my mind like a wild deer.
This is the meaning I have in mind that I repeatedly exclaim, 'What bliss!
What bliss!'
Then Mara the Evil One went to the Blessed One and recited this verse in his presence:
The Buddha:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “The Blessed One knows me; the One Well-Gone knows me” — vanished right there.
Ven.
Yasoja:
Ven.
Vakkali:
“So Kali the slave got up after daybreak.
Then Lady Vedehika said to her: 'Hey, Kali!'
“'Yes, madam?'
“'Why did you get up after daybreak?'
“'No reason, madam.'
“'No reason, you wicked slave, and yet you get up after daybreak?' Angered & displeased, she scowled.
Then the thought occurred to Kali the slave: 'Anger is present in my lady without showing, and not absent.
And it's just because I'm diligent, deft, & neat in my work that the anger present in my lady doesn't show.
Why don't I test her some more?'
“So Kali the slave got up later in the day.
Then Lady Vedehika said to her: 'Hey, Kali!'
“'Yes, madam?'
“'Why did you get up later in the day?'
“'No reason, madam.'
“'No reason, you wicked slave, and yet you get up later in the day?' Angered & displeased, she grumbled.
Then the thought occurred to Kali the slave: 'Anger is present in my lady without showing, and not absent.
And it's just because I'm diligent, deft, & neat in my work that the anger present in my lady doesn't show.
Why don't I test her some more?'
“So Kali the slave got up even later in the day.
Then Lady Vedehika said to her: 'Hey, Kali!'
“'Yes, madam?'
“'Why did you get up even later in the day?'
“'No reason, madam.'
“'No reason, you wicked slave, and yet you get up even later in the day?' Angered & displeased, she grabbed hold of a rolling pin and gave her a whack over the head, cutting it open.
Then Kali the slave, with blood streaming from her cut-open head, went and denounced her mistress to the neighbors: 'See, ladies, the gentle one's handiwork?
See the even-tempered one's handiwork?
See the calm one's handiwork?
How could she, angered & displeased with her only slave for getting up after daybreak, grab hold of a rolling pin and give her a whack over the head, cutting it open?'
After that this evil report about Lady Vedehika circulated: 'Lady Vedehika is vicious.
Lady Vedehika is foul-tempered.
Lady Vedehika is violent.'
“In the same way, monks, a monk may be ever so gentle, ever so even-tempered, ever so calm, as long as he is not touched by disagreeable aspects of speech.
But it is only when disagreeable aspects of speech touch him that he can truly be known as gentle, even-tempered, & calm.
I don't call a monk easy to admonish if he is easy to admonish and makes himself easy to admonish only by reason of robes, almsfood, lodging, & medicinal requisites for curing the sick.
Why is that?
Because if he doesn't get robes, almsfood, lodging, & medicinal requisites for curing the sick, then he isn't easy to admonish and doesn't make himself easy to admonish.
But if a monk is easy to admonish and makes himself easy to admonish purely out of esteem for the Dhamma, respect for the Dhamma, reverence for the Dhamma, then I call him easy to admonish.
Thus, monks, you should train yourselves: 'We will be easy to admonish and make ourselves easy to admonish purely out of esteem for the Dhamma, respect for the Dhamma, reverence for the Dhamma.' That's how you should train yourselves.
“Monks, there are these five aspects of speech by which others may address you: timely or untimely, true or false, affectionate or harsh, beneficial or unbeneficial, with a mind of good-will or with inner hate.
Others may address you in a timely way or an untimely way.
They may address you with what is true or what is false.
They may address you in an affectionate way or a harsh way.
They may address you in a beneficial way or an unbeneficial way.
They may address you with a mind of good-will or with inner hate.
In any event, you should train yourselves: 'Our minds will be unaffected and we will say no evil words.
We will remain sympathetic to that person's welfare, with a mind of good will, and with no inner hate.
We will keep pervading him with an awareness imbued with good will and, beginning with him, we will keep pervading the entire world with an awareness imbued with good will — abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.' That's how you should train yourselves.
“Suppose that a man were to come along carrying a hoe & a basket, saying, 'I will make this great earth be without earth.' He would dig here & there, scatter soil here & there, spit here & there, urinate here & there, saying, 'Be without earth.
Be without earth.' Now, what do you think — would he make this great earth be without earth?
“No, lord.
Why is that?
Because this great earth is deep & enormous.
It can't easily be made to be without earth.
The man would reap only a share of weariness & disappointment.
“In the same way, monks, there are these five aspects of speech by which others may address you: timely or untimely, true or false, affectionate or harsh, beneficial or unbeneficial, with a mind of good-will or with inner hate.
Others may address you in a timely way or an untimely way.
They may address you with what is true or what is false.
They may address you in an affectionate way or a harsh way.
They may address you in a beneficial way or an unbeneficial way.
They may address you with a mind of good-will or with inner hate.
In any event, you should train yourselves: 'Our minds will be unaffected and we will say no evil words.
We will remain sympathetic to that person's welfare, with a mind of good will, and with no inner hate.
We will keep pervading him with an awareness imbued with good will and, beginning with him, we will keep pervading the entire world with an awareness imbued with good will equal to the great earth — abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.' That's how you should train yourselves.
“Suppose that a man were to come along carrying lac, yellow orpiment, indigo, or crimson, saying, 'I will draw pictures in space, I will make pictures appear.' Now, what do you think — would he draw pictures in space & make pictures appear?
“No, lord.
Why is that?
Because space is formless & featureless.
It's not easy to draw pictures there and to make them appear.
The man would reap only a share of weariness & disappointment.
“In the same way, monks, there are these five aspects of speech by which others may address you… In any event, you should train yourselves: 'Our minds will be unaffected and we will say no evil words.
We will remain sympathetic to that person's welfare, with a mind of good will, and with no inner hate.
We will keep pervading him with an awareness imbued with good will and, beginning with him, we will keep pervading the entire world with an awareness imbued with good will equal to space — abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.' That's how you should train yourselves.
“Suppose that a man were to come along carrying a burning grass torch and saying, 'With this burning grass torch I will heat up the river Ganges and make it boil.' Now, what do you think — would he, with that burning grass torch, heat up the river Ganges and make it boil?
“No, lord.
Why is that?
Because the river Ganges is deep & enormous.
It's not easy to heat it up and make it boil with a burning grass torch.
The man would reap only a share of weariness & disappointment.
“In the same way, monks, there are these five aspects of speech by which others may address you… In any event, you should train yourselves: 'Our minds will be unaffected and we will say no evil words.
We will remain sympathetic to that person's welfare, with a mind of good will, and with no inner hate.
We will keep pervading him with an awareness imbued with good will and, beginning with him, we will keep pervading the entire world with an awareness imbued with good will equal to the river Ganges — abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.' That's how you should train yourselves.
“Suppose there were a catskin bag — beaten, well-beaten, beaten through & through, soft, silky, free of rustling & crackling — and a man were to come along carrying a stick or shard and saying, 'With this stick or shard I will take this catskin bag — beaten, well-beaten, beaten through & through, soft, silky, free of rustling & crackling — and I will make it rustle & crackle.' Now, what do you think — would he, with that stick or shard, take that catskin bag — beaten, well-beaten, beaten through & through, soft, silky, free of rustling & crackling — and make it rustle & crackle?
“No, lord.
Why is that?
Because the catskin bag is beaten, well-beaten, beaten through & through, soft, silky, free of rustling & crackling.
It's not easy to make it rustle & crackle with a stick or shard.
The man would reap only a share of weariness & disappointment.
“In the same way, monks, there are these five aspects of speech by which others may address you: timely or untimely, true or false, affectionate or harsh, beneficial or unbeneficial, with a mind of good-will or with inner hate.
Others may address you in a timely way or an untimely way.
They may address you with what is true or what is false.
They may address you in an affectionate way or a harsh way.
They may address you in a beneficial way or an unbeneficial way.
They may address you with a mind of good-will or with inner hate.
In any event, you should train yourselves: 'Our minds will be unaffected and we will say no evil words.
We will remain sympathetic to that person's welfare, with a mind of good will, and with no inner hate.
We will keep pervading him with an awareness imbued with good will and, beginning with him, we will keep pervading the entire world with an awareness imbued with good will equal to a catskin bag — abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.' That's how you should train yourselves.
“Monks, even if bandits were to carve you up savagely, limb by limb, with a two-handled saw, he among you who let his heart get angered even at that would not be doing my bidding.
Even then you should train yourselves: 'Our minds will be unaffected and we will say no evil words.
We will remain sympathetic, with a mind of good will, and with no inner hate.
We will keep pervading these people with an awareness imbued with good will and, beginning with them, we will keep pervading the entire world with an awareness imbued with good will — abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.' That's how you should train yourselves.
“Monks, if you attend constantly to this admonition on the simile of the saw, do you see any aspects of speech, slight or gross, that you could not endure?
“No, lord.
“Then attend constantly to this admonition on the simile of the saw.
That will be for your long-term welfare & happiness.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, attacks the accuser: 'What use is there in your speaking, you inexperienced fool?
Think of yourself as worthy to be spoken to.' He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — jumps back and hits the carriage railing, breaking the triple bar.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the second fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, accuses the accuser in return: 'You, too, have committed an offense of this name.
You make amends for it first.' He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — kicks the chariot pole and stomps on it.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the third fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, wanders from one thing to another, straying outside the topic, displaying anger, irritation, & sulkiness.
He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — goes off the road and makes the chariot turn over.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the fourth fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, speaks waving his arms around in the midst of the Sangha.
He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — rears up and paws the air.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the fifth fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, not heeding the Sangha, not heeding his accuser, goes off where he will, still an offender.
He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — not heeding the goad, bites through the bit with its teeth and goes where it will.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the sixth fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, 'I've neither committed an offense, nor have I committed an offense,' vexes the Sangha by falling silent.
He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — goes neither forward nor back, but stands right there like a post.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the seventh fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, says this: 'Why do you venerable ones persecute me so much?
I'll disavow the training and return to the lower life.' On having disavowed the training and returned to the lower life he says, 'I hope you venerable ones are gratified now!' He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — draws in its forefeet, draws in its hind feet, and sits down right there on its four feet.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the eighth fault in a man.
“These, monks, are the eight unruly men and eight faults in men.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to sights?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, sees a troop of elephants, a troop of cavalry, a troop of chariots, a troop of foot soldiers, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is resilient to sights.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to sounds?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, hears the sound of elephants, the sound of cavalry, the sound of chariots, the sound of foot soldiers, the resounding din of drums, cymbals, conchs, & tom-toms, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is resilient to sounds.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to aromas?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, smells the stench of the urine & feces of those pedigreed royal elephants who are at home in the battlefield, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is resilient to aromas.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to flavors?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, goes without his ration of grass & water for one day, two days, three days, four days, five, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is resilient to flavors.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to tactile sensations?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, is pierced by a flight of arrows, two flights, three flights, four flights, five flights of arrows, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is resilient to tactile sensations.
“Endowed with these five qualities, monks, a king's elephant is worthy of a king, is a king's asset, counts as a very limb of his king.
“In the same way, a monk endowed with five qualities is deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.
Which five?
There is the case where a monk is resilient to sights, resilient to sounds, resilient to aromas, resilient to flavors, resilient to tactile sensations.
“And how is a monk resilient to sights?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a sight with the eye, feels no passion for a sight that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to sights.
“And how is a monk resilient to sounds?
There is the case where a monk, on hearing a sound with the ear, feels no passion for a sound that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to sounds.
“And how is a monk resilient to aromas?
There is the case where a monk, on smelling an aroma with the nose, feels no passion for an aroma that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to aromas.
“And how is a monk resilient to flavors?
There is the case where a monk, on tasting a flavor with the tongue, feels no passion for a flavor that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to flavors.
“And how is a monk resilient to tactile sensations?
There is the case where a monk, on touching a tactile sensation with the body, feels no passion for a tactile sensation that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to tactile sensations.
“Endowed with these five qualities, a monk is deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.
“There is the case of a warrior who, on seeing a cloud of dust, falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the first type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, but on seeing the top of the enemy's banner, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the second type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust & the top of the enemy's banner, but on hearing the tumult, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the third type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, & the tumult, but when in hand-to-hand combat he is struck and falls wounded.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the fourth type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, the tumult, & the hand-to-hand combat.
On winning the battle, victorious in battle, he comes out at the very head of the battle.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the fifth type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“These are the five types of warriors who can be found existing in the world.
“In the same way, monks, there are these five warrior-like individuals who can be found existing among the monks.
Which five?
“There is the case of the monk who, on seeing a cloud of dust, falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
What is the cloud of dust for him?
There is the case of the monk who hears, 'In that village or town over there is a woman or girl who is shapely, good-looking, charming, endowed with the foremost lotus-like complexion.' On hearing this, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
That, for him, is the cloud of dust.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who, on seeing a cloud of dust, falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the first type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who can handle the cloud of dust, but on seeing the top of the enemy's banner, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
What is the top of the banner for him?
There is the case of the monk who not only hears that 'In that village or town over there is a woman or girl who is shapely, good-looking, charming, endowed with the foremost lotus-like complexion.' He sees for himself that in that village or town over there is a woman or girl who is shapely, good-looking, charming, endowed with the foremost lotus-like complexion.
On seeing her, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
That, for him, is the top of the banner.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, but on seeing the top of the enemy's banner, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the second type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who can handle the cloud of dust & the top of the enemy's banner, but on hearing the tumult, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
What is the tumult for him?
There is the case of the monk who has gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty building.
A woman approaches him and giggles at him, calls out to him, laughs aloud, & teases him.
On being giggled at, called out to, laughed at, & teased by the woman, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
That, for him, is the tumult.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust & the top of the enemy's banner, but on hearing the tumult he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the third type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, & the tumult, but when in hand-to-hand combat he is struck and falls wounded.
What is the hand-to-hand combat for him?
There is the case of the monk who has gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty building.
A woman approaches him and sits down right next to him, lies down right next to him, throws herself all over him.
When she sits down right next to him, lies down right next to him, and throws herself all over him, he — without renouncing the training, without declaring his weakness — engages in sexual intercourse.
This, for him, is hand-to-hand combat.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, & the tumult, but when in hand-to-hand combat he is struck and falls wounded.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the fourth type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, the tumult, & hand-to-hand combat.
On winning the battle, victorious in battle, he comes out at the very head of the battle.
What is victory in the battle for him?
There is the case of the monk who has gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling.
A woman approaches him and sits down right next to him, lies down right next to him, throws herself all over him.
When she sits down right next to him, lies down right next to him, and throws herself all over him, he extricates himself, frees himself, and goes off where he will.
“He resorts to a secluded dwelling place: the wilderness, the foot of a tree, a mountain, a glen, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a forest grove, the open air, a haystack.
Having gone to the wilderness, the foot of a tree, or an empty building, he sits down, crosses his legs, holds his body erect, and brings mindfulness to the fore.
“Abandoning covetousness with regard to the world, he dwells with an awareness devoid of covetousness.
He cleanses his mind of covetousness.
Abandoning ill will & anger, he dwells with an awareness devoid of ill will, sympathetic with the welfare of all living beings.
He cleanses his mind of ill will & anger.
Abandoning sloth & drowsiness, he dwells with an awareness devoid of sloth & drowsiness, mindful, alert, percipient of light.
He cleanses his mind of sloth & drowsiness.
Abandoning restlessness & anxiety, he dwells undisturbed, his mind inwardly stilled.
He cleanses his mind of restlessness & anxiety.
Abandoning uncertainty, he dwells having crossed over uncertainty, with no perplexity with regard to skillful mental qualities.
He cleanses his mind of uncertainty.
“Having abandoned these five hindrances, corruptions of awareness that weaken discernment, then — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — he enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
“With his mind thus concentrated, purified, & bright, unblemished, free from defects, pliant, malleable, steady, & attained to imperturbability, he directs and inclines it to the knowledge of the ending of the fermentations.
He discerns, as it has come to be, that 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress… These are fermentations… This is the origination of fermentations… This is the cessation of fermentations… This is the way leading to the cessation of fermentations.' His heart, thus knowing, thus seeing, is released from the fermentation of sensuality, the fermentation of becoming, the fermentation of ignorance.
With release, there is the knowledge, 'Released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“This, for him, is victory in the battle.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, the tumult, & hand-to-hand combat.
On winning the battle, victorious in battle, he comes out at the very head of the battle.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the fifth type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“These are the five warrior-like individuals who can be found existing among the monks.
“And what are the fermentations to be abandoned by avoiding?
There is the case where a monk, reflecting appropriately, avoids a wild elephant, a wild horse, a wild bull, a wild dog, a snake, a stump, a bramble patch, a chasm, a cliff, a cesspool, an open sewer.
Reflecting appropriately, he avoids sitting in the sorts of unsuitable seats, wandering to the sorts of unsuitable habitats, and associating with the sorts of bad friends that would make his knowledgeable friends in the holy life suspect him of evil conduct.
The fermentations, vexation, or fever that would arise if he were not to avoid these things do not arise for him when he avoids them.
These are called the fermentations to be abandoned by avoiding.
“And what are the fermentations to be abandoned by destroying?
There is the case where a monk, reflecting appropriately, does not tolerate an arisen thought of sensuality.
He abandons it, destroys it, dispels it, & wipes it out of existence.
“Reflecting appropriately, he does not tolerate an arisen thought of ill will…
“Reflecting appropriately, he does not tolerate an arisen thought of cruelty…
“Reflecting appropriately, he does not tolerate arisen evil, unskillful mental qualities.
He abandons them, destroys them, dispels them, & wipes them out of existence.
The fermentations, vexation, or fever that would arise if he were not to destroy these things do not arise for him when he destroys them.
These are called the fermentations to be abandoned by destroying.
So when we're intent on training our minds to be good, there are bound to be obstacles — the forces of Mara — just as in the case of the Buddha, but we simply have to slash our way through them, using our powers of endurance and the full extent of our abilities to fight them off.
It's only normal that when we have something good, there are going to be other people who want what we've got, in the same way that sweet fruit tends to have worms and insects trying to eat it.
A person walking along the road empty-handed doesn't attract anyone's attention, but if we're carrying something of value, there are sure to be others who will want what we've got, and will even try to steal it from us.
If we're carrying food in our hand, dogs or cats will try to snatch it.
But if we don't have any food in our hand, they won't pounce on us.
It's the same way when we practice.
When we do good, we have to contend with obstacles if we want to succeed.
We have to make our hearts hard and solid like diamond or rock, which don't burn when you try to set them on fire.
Even when they get smashed, the pieces maintain their hardness as diamond and rock.
The Buddha made his heart so hard and solid that when his body was cremated, parts of it didn't burn and still remain as relics for us to admire even today.
This was through the power of his purity and truthfulness.
So we should set our minds on purifying our bodies and minds until they become so truly elemental that fire won't burn them, just like the Buddha's relics.
Even if we can't get them to be that hard, at least we should make them like tamarind seeds in their casing: even if insects bore through the casing and eat all the flesh of the tamarind fruit, they can't do anything to the seeds, which maintain their hardness as always.
— Ajaan Lee 
And what is unworldly equanimity?
There is the case where, with the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — one enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
This is called unworldly equanimity.
And what is an even more unworldly unworldly equanimity?
Any equanimity that arises in one free from fermentation while he/she is reflecting on his/her mind that is released from greed, released from aversion, released from delusion: this is called an even more unworldly unworldly equanimity.
“And what is equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity?
There is equanimity with regard to forms, equanimity with regard to sounds… smells… tastes… tactile sensations.
This is equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity.
“And what is equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness?
There is equanimity dependent on the sphere of the infinitude of space, equanimity dependent on the sphere of the infinitude of consciousness… dependent on the sphere of nothingness… dependent on the sphere of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness.
“By depending & relying on equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness, abandon & transcend equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity.
Such is its abandoning, such its transcending.
“By depending & relying on non-fashioning, abandon & transcend the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness.
Such is its abandoning, such its transcending.
And another thing: If you put the zero after other numbers, they become ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, hundreds, thousands, on to infinity.
But if you put the zero's first, even if you have ten thousand of them, they don't count.
So it is with the heart: Once we've turned it from one to zero and put the zero first, then other people can praise or criticize us as they like but it won't count.
Good doesn't count, bad doesn't count.
This is something that can't be written, can't be read, that we can understand only for ourselves.
— Ajaan Lee 
If it is possible to live with a purpose, what should that purpose be?
A purpose might be a guiding principle, a philosophy, or a value of sovereign importance that informs and directs our activities and thoughts.
To have one is to live seriously — though not necessarily wisely — following some track, believing in a hub to the wheeling universe or a sea toward which we flow or an end before which all the hubbub of civilization subsides.
What is your purpose, friend, or what should it be?
Perhaps most of us do not come to a clear conclusion in the matter, but this does not mean we have no purpose, only that we do not recognize it or admit it or even choose it for ourselves.
In the unhappiest case nature simply takes its course, which is a turbid meandering through the swamps of desire.
If life means nothing then only pleasure is worthwhile; or if life has meaning and we cannot get at it then still only enjoyment matters — such is the view of brutes and some sophisticated philosophers.
It slips into the unconscious by default when we hold no other, but we are reluctant to entertain it and will rather, if we think about it, take as our purpose support of family, search for beauty, improvement of society, fame, self-expression, development of talent, and so on.
But it might be fair to say that apart from these or beneath these the fundamental purpose of many of us is the search for love, particularly romantic love.
The love of a man for a woman and a woman for a man is often the floor to which people fall after the collapse of other dreams.
It is held to be solid when nothing else is, and though it frequently gives way and dumps them into a basement of despair, it still enjoys a reputation of dependability.
No matter that this reputation is illogical — it still flourishes and will continue to flourish regardless of what is said in any book.
Love, or possibly the myth of love, is the first, last, and sometimes the only refuge of uncomprehending humanity.
What else makes our hearts beat so fast?
What else makes us swoon with feeling?
What else renders us so intensely alive and aching?
The search for love — the sublime, the nebulous, the consuming — remains sacred in a world that increasingly despises the sacred.
When the heroic and the transcendental are but memories, when religious institutions fill up with bureaucrats and social scientists, when nobody believes there is a sky beyond the ceiling, then there seems no other escape from the prison of self than the abandon of love.
With a gray age of spiritual deadness upon us, we love, or beg for love, or grieve for love.
We have nothing higher to live for.
Indeed, many take it on faith that romantic love is the highest thing to live for.
Popular literature, movies, art, and music tirelessly celebrate it as the one truth accessible to all.
Such love obliterates reason, as poets have long sweetly lamented, and this is part of its charm and power, because we want to be swept up and spirited out of our calculating selves.
“Want” is the key word, for in the spiritual void of modern life the wanting of love becomes increasingly indistinguishable from love itself.
So powerful, so insistent is it that we seldom notice that the gratification is rare and the craving relentless.
Love is mostly in anticipation; it is an agony of anticipation; it is an ache for a completion not found in the dreary round of mundane routine.
That we never seem to possess it in its imagined fullness does not deter us.
It hurts so bad that it must be good.
Practically nobody questions the supremacy of romantic love, which is good enough reason to do a little poking around the foundations of its pedestal.
Who is entirely satisfied with the romance in his or her life?
Who has found the sublime rapture previously imagined?
And if one has actually found such a thing, does it last, or does it not rather change and decline from the peak of ecstasy?
And if it declines what becomes of one's purpose in life?
If a purpose is achieved it is no longer a purpose; it can no longer guide or sustain us.
Does one taste of nectar satisfy us forever?
When we tire of crass, material goals we may go searching for love instead of, say, religious insight, because love seems both more accessible and more urgent, and because so much of institutional religion in our time has degenerated into insipid humanism.
Some claim refuge here but many more, longing for authentic and moving experience, turn to the vision of the “lover,” that source of wonder, joy, and transcendence, who, it is thought, must be pursued and if captured perfected and if perfected then enjoyed forever — or until some other lover lights up the horizon.
Love is its own justification, especially for the young who have no other inspiration or no career or responsibilities to dull themselves with as their plodding elders do.
Longing bursts through this one channel that seems open, dizzily insisting that the life of unreflecting passion is the highest they can aspire to.
They do not reason, but fall.
Their elders do reason — obsessively — but fall all the same, thereby admitting that, with all their thought and experience, they find, when driven to extremity, they have nothing but love to live for.
This is not to say that such a surrender must be bad, only that it happens out of instinct and uninformed passion.
Love is sweet and it is our nature to give way.
But why do we worship it so ardently and why do we break off our search for fulfillment here?
Perhaps because we see no other gods.
Yet if love is the highest thing to live for then this is a hopeless universe, because we should see in a calm hour that Cupid's arrows not only thrill us but make us bleed.
“Man Kills Estranged Lover, Then Self.” “Wife Stabs Husband in Domestic Quarrel.” “Love Triangle Leads To Shooting.” So read the headlines with depressing regularity.
The stories behind these are only the most shocking of countless tales of passion, but they do forcefully suggest that romantic love is not always a blessing.
One might object that hate, not love, spawns such tragedies, but where has such hate come from if not from a prior attachment now broken?
We should know from experience how easily what we call love can turn to bitterness, jealousy, and malice, and though we protest that this is not the fault of love, we ought to notice that where one passion arises another is likely to follow.
Passions are unreliable, volatile, dangerous, and a poor foundation for happiness.
Divorces, suicides, dissipation, violence, depravity, fanaticism, and other miseries great and small follow from passion, and yet passion is still, in the public mind, considered commendable, a mark of vigor and liveliness.
Though everybody will admit that passion gone awry is dangerous, few realize that passion is by its nature likely to go awry.
Romantic love is a chancy passion that may result in the opposite of what is desired.
It may have happy consequences, too — else it would not have so many votaries — but it raises the stakes in the gamble of life and makes us more vulnerable both to our own weaknesses and to unpredictable fortune.
As most of us count the joys of successful love worth the pain involved in its pursuit, we must learn to step lightly and with intelligence.
We believe, with some reason, that love can ennoble and redeem us, and call forth our purest energies, but we are slower to see that when the lamp of love flickers out, as it tragically tends to do, we might lose our way in a fearful labyrinth of suffering.
Granted that few will shun the pursuit of romance out of fear of unhappy consequences, what can be done to ameliorate those consequences?
If we really have nothing higher to live for, nothing to fall back on, the lugubrious truth is that nothing much can be done to ameliorate them, given the volatile nature of human affections, so it would be wise to make sure there really is no superior, sustaining ideal before committing ourselves exclusively to the chase.
Buddhism, of course, teaches such an ideal, which is nothing less than deliverance from all sorrow, called Nibbana.
While worldly joys are mutable and fleeting, Nibbana is established, sorrowless, stainless, and secure.
While worldly pains are piercing, unpredictable, and unavoidable, Nibbana is altogether free from pain.
It is the end of suffering, the supreme refuge, the ultimate emancipation.
The Buddha himself applied many terms of praise to it while recognizing their essential inadequacy.
Nibbana cannot be grasped by language or concept, but it can be known and realized by one who makes the right efforts.
This is a critical point.
Nibbana is not something that happens to us through an external agency; rather it is something that we ourselves may achieve.
The Buddha certainly never would have troubled himself to teach had he not understood that his own realization was not fortuitous but rightly won and that those who followed his instructions could win realization for themselves.
That understanding, passed down, has sustained the Buddhist religion to the present day.
